
BAD HARE DAY
Goosebumps - 41
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
“Pick a card, any card.” I spread out the deck of cards in front of Sue Mailer,
facedown. She giggled and picked one.
“Don’t show it to me,” I warned her. She glanced at the card, keeping it
hidden from me.
A small crowd of kids gathered on the school steps to watch. School was
out for the day. Sue showed them her card.
I love doing magic tricks—especially in front of an audience. My dream is
to be a great magician like my idol, Amaz-O.
I’ve been playing around with stage names. My real name is Tim Swanson
—but that’s way too boring for a professional magician. I’ve been thinking of
calling myself Swanz-O. My best friend, Foz, thinks Swanz-O sounds like a
laundry detergent.
“Now, Sue,” I said in a louder voice, so everybody could hear me. “Put the
card back in the deck.”
Sue slipped the card in with the others. I shuffled the deck and tapped it
three times. “I will now make your card rise to the top of the deck,” I announced.
Tap, tap, tap. I picked up the top card and showed it to Sue. “Was this your
card?” I asked her.
Her eyebrows shot up in amazement. “The three of clubs!” she cried. “That
was my card!”
“How’d you do that?” Jesse Brown asked.
“Magicians never reveal their secrets,” I said, bowing. “And now, for my
next trick—”
“I know how he did it.” My little sister, Ginny, suddenly popped up in the
crowd. The sound of her scratchy voice made my hair stand on end. She loves to
spoil my magic shows.
But a true magician doesn’t let anything throw him. I grinned my biggest,
fakest grin at the little brat.
“Ladies and gentlemen, my lovely assistant, Ginny!”
“I’m not your assistant, freak-face,” Ginny snarled. “You won’t catch me
doing nerdy magic tricks. I’m into karate. Hi-ya!” She demonstrated her karate
chop.
Some of the kids laughed. I pretended to laugh, too. “Ha, ha. Isn’t she a
riot?”
Everybody says Ginny looks like an angel. She has long, wavy blond hair,
rosy cheeks, big blue eyes. People always ooh and aah over her.
No one ever oohs and aahs over me. I’ve got curly light-brown hair and
hazel eyes. I’m twelve, which Mom says isn’t a “cute age”.
My nose is long and curves up at the end like a hot dog. Ginny likes to flick
the end of my nose with her finger and say, “Boi-oi-oing.”
Her nose is small and perfect, of course.
I tried to continue my show, Ginny or no Ginny. I slipped the deck of cards
into my pocket and yanked out my magic scarf. “Now, be amazed as I—”
Ginny reached into my pocket and snatched out the cards. “Look,
everybody!” she cried, showing them the cards. “All the cards are the three of
clubs!”
Ginny started passing the cards around so everyone could see.
“Hey! Give those back!” I protested. I grabbed the cards away. It was true.
Every single card in the deck was the three of clubs. But no one was supposed to
know that.
“You’re a phony,” Sue mumbled.
“No—wait!” I cried. “Watch this!”
I whipped out my magic rings—two large silver hoops hooked together.
The kids quieted down a little.
“These silver rings are locked together,” I declared. “They’re completely
solid—linked together forever!” I tugged on them to show that they wouldn’t
come apart.
Then I handed them to Jesse. “Try to pull the rings apart,” I told him. He
pulled hard. He pulled lightly. He pulled hard again. He jangled them around.
The rings stayed hooked together.
I took them back. “The rings will never come apart,” I said. “Unless I say
the magic words.” I waved one hand over the rings. “Hocus pocus!” I gently
pulled the rings apart. A couple of kids clapped.
“You’re not going to fall for that old trick, are you?” Ginny mocked. “You
want to know how he does it?” She grabbed the rings away and began to
demonstrate. “They’re trick rings—”
“I will now make my lovely assistant disappear!” I cried, shoving Ginny
aside. “Beat it!”
“Stop pushing me!” she shouted. “Hi-ya!”
She karate-kicked me in the stomach.
“Oof!” I doubled over. Everybody laughed and clapped.
“That’s a great trick!” Sue said.
I clutched my stomach. Some trick.
Stupid Ginny and her karate kicks. Why did Mom have to take her to that
martial-arts school? My life has been miserable ever since. She’s only ten, and
she fights way better than I do. I’ve got the bruises to show it.
“Kick him again!” somebody yelled.
Ginny crouched, ready to attack.
“Try it, and I’ll tell Mom where that dent in the refrigerator door came
from,” I warned her.
She backed off. She knew Mom would kill her for karate-chopping the
fridge just because we were out of ice cream.
“She’s not going to kick him,” Jesse said. “Show’s over.”
The kids drifted away.
“Wait!” I cried. “Come back!”
“See you tomorrow, Tim,” Sue said. Everybody began to head for home.
“Thanks for wrecking everything, Ginny,” I snapped.
She flicked my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.”
“Stop it!” I swatted her away. “You’re definitely going to get it. I’m telling
Mom about the fridge for sure.”
“Go ahead,” she taunted. “But if you do, I’ll give you the freezer chop.”
She waved her arms through the air, making those weird karate noises. “Wah
wah wee—ah! Right to the neck. You’ll never walk again!”
She trotted away. “See you at home, Swanz-O!”
This is what I have to deal with every day of my life. A little sister who
could kill me if she wanted to. What can I do? I’m helpless against her.
That’s one reason I want to be a magician. Maybe Ginny can karate-chop
my arms off—but not if I make her disappear first!
I sighed and buttoned up my denim jacket. It was almost four o’clock and
getting chilly. The wind had picked up, too. When is it going to get warm? I
wondered. It’s the end of March—it’s supposed to be spring already.
The school door burst open. “I’m outta here!” Foz shouted.
Foz’s real name is Foster Martin. But he doesn’t look like a Foster. He’s a
Foz. He’s chubby, with a brown buzz cut. His shirt is always untucked.
“Where’ve you been?” I asked him.
“Mrs. Pratt made me stay after school,” he replied, making a disgusted face.
“Why?” I asked.
“No reason,” Foz said.
Foz has to stay after school almost every day. He always says it’s for no
reason.
I picked up my magic kit and started down the school steps. Foz followed.
We left the school grounds and walked toward town.
“What were you doing at school so late?” he asked.
“I was trying out a few magic tricks. Ginny told everybody how they work.
It was a disaster.”
“You need better tricks,” Foz said. “Lots of kids have the same magic kit as
yours.”
“You’re right,” I agreed, rattling my kit. “This is amateur stuff. I’m ready
for some real magic tricks. Professional ones.”
“Like a hat you can pull a rabbit out of.”
“Or that spinning box Amaz-O has,” I added.
Amaz-O was my hero—the greatest magician ever. “Did you see him on
TV last week? His assistant stepped into a big black box. Amaz-O spun it around
three times, and she disappeared!”
“He’s doing a show at Midnight Mansion,” Foz said. Midnight Mansion is a
club in town where magicians perform every night.
“I know. I wish I could go. But the tickets cost twenty-five dollars.”
We turned onto Bank Street and headed toward the center of town. It wasn’t
on the way home, but Foz knew what I was doing. Malik’s Magic Shoppe was
on Bank Street. I stopped in there at least once a week, just to drool over the cool
tricks they had.
“Malik’s has a bunch of new tricks,” I told Foz. “Designed by Amaz-O
himself.”
“I’ll bet they’re expensive,” Foz said.
“They are.” I reached into my pocket to see how much money I had. Five
bucks.
“That’ll buy you a squirting flower,” Foz said. “Maybe.”
I stuffed the bill back into my pocket. “You’ve got to see this stuff, anyway.
There’s a table—you put a plate or something on it—it can be anything you
want. The plate will rise up over the table and float!”
“How does it work?” Foz asked.
“I don’t know. Mr. Malik wouldn’t tell me. He said you have to buy the
trick to find out.”
“How much does it cost?”
“Five hundred dollars.”
Foz rolled his eyes. “I guess you’ll have to stick with card tricks.”
“I guess.” I sighed.
A little bell rang as we opened the door to Malik’s. I breathed in the musty
smell of the shop. It was jam-packed with old tricks, new tricks, magic books,
and costumes. There were even cages in the back for rabbits and doves. Mr.
Malik sold everything.
I called out, “Hi, Mr. Malik.” He stood behind the cash register. He was a
short, bald old man with a fat stomach.
I waited for Mr. Malik to say, “What’s new, Magoo?” in his gravelly voice.
That’s how he greets all his regular customers.
I called out, “Hi!” again, but he didn’t answer. He just stood there and
grunted.
“Mr. Malik?” Foz and I crept closer to the counter.
“Unh!” Mr. Malik grunted. He stumbled forward.
Something was sticking out of his stomach. A sword!
“Mr. Malik?” I asked. “Are you okay?”
He clutched the handle of the sword and moaned in pain.
Someone had stabbed him!
“Help me!” he groaned. “Please—help!”
Foz and I froze in fear. I let out a gasp—but I was too frightened to move.
Foz’s whole body trembled.
Mr. Malik uttered another groan. Then his expression changed. He pulled
out the sword—and he tossed it to me.
“Hey!” I cried. “It’s a fake!”
Mr. Malik laughed. He rubbed his round stomach, which hadn’t been
stabbed at all. “What’s new, Magoo?” he chuckled. “Get a load of that trick
sword. Just got it in today.”
I tested the sword against my own stomach. It had a sliding blade. I pushed
the blade into the handle, then let go. It popped out again. Very cool.
Foz fingered the blade. “Think of the tricks you could play on Ginny with a
sword like this!”
“Like it, Tim?” Mr. Malik asked. “Only twenty bucks.”
I shook my head. “We’re just looking, Mr. Malik.”
He hung the sword on the wall behind him. “All right. Take your time and
look around. But would it kill you to actually buy something once in a while?”
Mr. Malik always said that, too.
I wandered to the back of the shop. I checked out a rack of magician’s
jackets. I pulled a sparkly blue tuxedo jacket off the rack and tried it on. It had a
trick sleeve for hiding things.
I stared at myself in the mirror. I pretended to announce myself. “The
Amazing Swanz-O!”
Foz shook his head in disgust. “That name is so lame.”
“Yeah, you’re right.” I thought of another name. “How about ‘Swanson the
Magnificent’?”
“It’s okay,” Foz said. “A little boring, but okay.”
He tried on a top hat and added, “You need something cooler, like ‘Tim the
Destroyer’.”
“That sounds like a wrestler,” I commented.
“At least it’s not wimpy,” Foz retorted. “Like Swanz-O.”
“Hey, boys.” Mr. Malik shuffled toward us. He held out two tickets.
“Take these, if you want them,” he said. “Two free passes to Amaz-O’s
magic show tomorrow night.”
“Wow!” I cried. I took a ticket and read it.
Admit One
An Evening of Magic
with the Great Amaz-O
March 23
10 P.M.
Midnight Mansion
“Thanks Mr. Malik! I can’t believe we’ll get to see Amaz-O in person!” I
gushed. “Tomorrow night!”
“Tomorrow night?” Foz frowned at his ticket. “I can’t go. My aunt and
uncle are coming over. It’s my mother’s birthday.”
“So? This is a once-in-a-lifetime chance! Your mother has a birthday every
year.”
Foz stuffed the ticket into my palm, shaking his head. “I know my mom—
and she won’t see it that way. Anyway, tomorrow night is a school night.”
I’d forgotten about that. I hoped my mom would let me go. Ten o’clock was
pretty late to go out on a school night.
She has to let me go, I decided. She just has to. What kind of horrible
mother would keep her son from seeing his hero in person? Only a really mean,
monstery mother.
My mother is a grump, but she’s not a monster.
I took off the blue jacket and hung it back up on the rack. A large wooden
box caught my eye. It was the size of a coffin, brightly painted with red and
yellow stars. I lifted the lid.
The box was empty, lined with blue velvet on the inside. “What’s the box
do, Mr. Malik?” I asked.
“That’s for sawing people in half,” Mr. Malik replied.
I examined the inside of the box, trying to figure out how it worked. I found
no secret compartments or panels or anything.
“How does it work?” I asked Mr. Malik.
“You going to buy it?” he demanded.
“Well—how much does it cost?”
“Two-fifty.”
“Two dollars and fifty cents? I can afford that.”
Mr. Malik waved me away and started toward the stockroom at the back of
the shop. “Two dollars and fifty cents,” he muttered. “In your dreams.”
“He meant two hundred and fifty dollars, Brainz-O,” Foz said.
I tried to cover myself. “I knew that. I was joking.”
Foz fiddled with a cool-looking trick in the corner. I moved closer to see.
“It’s a guillotine,” Foz said. “For chopping off heads.”
The guillotine had a place for the victim to rest his head at the bottom—and
a razor-sharp blade at the top.
Mr. Malik emerged from the back room. “I’m closing up soon, boys,” he
called.
“I just want to see how this works,” Foz said. He twisted a lever on the
guillotine.
“Foz—no!” I cried.
The blade slid down the guillotine.
And landed with a horrifying thunk.
“My hand!” Foz shrieked. “My hand!”
2
Mr. Malik gasped. “I’ll call an ambulance! Nine-one-one!” He grabbed the
phone.
The guillotine blade had sliced right through Foz’s hand. He screamed in
pain.
“Oh!” Foz moaned. “I cut off my hand!” he wailed. “I’ll never write again!”
I started laughing.
“Why are you laughing?” Mr. Malik demanded. “This is an emergency!”
“No, it’s not.” Foz held up his hands to show that he was fine. “Got a paper
towel? I need to wipe off this fake blood.”
“Fake?” Mr. Malik stammered. “Fake blood?”
“We got you back for that sword trick,” I told him.
Mr. Malik clutched his sweaty forehead in his hands. “I’m so stupid! I
know that’s a trick guillotine. Why did I fall for such a dumb joke?”
“Hey,” Foz protested. “It was a lot funnier than your sword-in-the-stomach
joke.”
Mr. Malik wiped his brow and smiled. “All right, boys. Enough tricks. It’s
five o’clock. Get out of here.” He shoved us toward the door.
“Thanks for the tickets, Mr. Malik,” I called. “See you next week.”
“Sure. Next week, when I’ll have a new shipment of magic tricks you won’t
buy.”
The bell on the door jangled as we left the shop. Foz and I walked down
Bank Street toward home.
“Sure you won’t go to Midnight Mansion tomorrow night?” I asked him.
“I can’t. Your mom will never let you go, either.”
“I’ll find a way,” I insisted. “You’ll see.”
We paused in front of Foz’s house. “Come over to my house after school
tomorrow,” I said. “I’m giving another magic show. Only this time Ginny won’t
wreck it.”
“I’ll be there,” Foz promised.
“And bring your sister’s rabbit,” I added.
Foz shuffled his feet uncomfortably. “Clare is not going to like that…” he
began.
“Please, Foz,” I begged. “I’m going to finish building my rabbit table
tonight. The rabbit trick is going to be so amazing—”
“I’ll try to bring the rabbit,” Foz said. “But if anything happens to it, Clare
will kill me.”
“Nothing will happen to it—I promise.”
I waved good-bye to Foz and went home. “The Great Swanzini is here!” I
announced as I burst into the kitchen.
“You mean the Great Jerk,” Ginny mumbled. She sat at the kitchen table,
folding napkins. She reached up and flicked at my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.”
“Get off me.” I slapped her hand away.
Mom set a plate of chicken on the table. “Go wash up, Tim,” she ordered.
“And tell your father supper is ready.”
“Look, Mom.” I held up a quarter. Then, with a flick of my wrist, I slipped
it up my sleeve. “I made the quarter disappear!”
I showed her my two empty hands.
“Very nice. I see two hands that haven’t been washed yet,” Mom said
impatiently.
“I saw the quarter go up your sleeve,” Ginny sneered.
“No one appreciates me around here,” I complained. “Someday I’m going
to be the greatest magician in the world. And my own family doesn’t care!”
Mom strode to the kitchen door. “Bill!” she called upstairs to my dad.
“Supper!”
I made my way out of the kitchen to wash my hands. My parents didn’t take
my magic act seriously. They thought it was just a hobby.
But Ginny’s karate lessons were the most important thing in the world, of
course. Mom always said, “Girls need to know how to defend themselves.” Now
I needed to defend myself against my own sister!
I returned to the kitchen and sat down. Mom plunked a piece of chicken
down beside the rice on my plate. Dad and Ginny were already eating.
“I had a terrible day at work today,” Mom grumbled, ripping into her
chicken. She’s a high school guidance counselor. “First Michael Lamb
threatened to beat up another boy. His teacher yelled at him, and he threatened to
beat her up, too. She sent him to my office. When I tried to talk to him, he said
he’d beat me up. So I called his mother in—and she tried to beat me up. I had to
call the police!”
“That’s a piece of cake next to my day,” Dad complained. Dad sells cars.
“Some guy came in and said he wanted to test-drive the new minivan. I handed
him the keys, and he took off. He never came back. He stole the car!”
I sighed and shoveled rice into my mouth. Dinner is like this every night.
Both of my parents hate their jobs.
“I had a really tough day, too,” Ginny put in. “Michael Franklin teased me.
So I had to karate-kick him in the leg!”
I smirked. “Poor you.”
Mom’s forehead wrinkled—her concerned look. “You didn’t hurt yourself,
did you, Ginny?”
“No,” Ginny replied. “But I could have.”
“What about me?” I protested. “I’m the one who got kicked in the stomach.
And it hurt a lot!”
“You seem to be fine now,” Dad chimed in.
I gave up. I knew that arguing would get me nowhere. Mom and Dad
always take Ginny’s side.
“Is there any dessert?” Ginny demanded.
“Ice cream,” Mom answered.
“I’ll clear the table,” I offered, hoping it would put Mom in a better mood. I
needed both Mom and Dad to be in a good mood.
Because I was about to ask the big question.
Would they let me go to Midnight Mansion tomorrow night?
Would they?
3
I stood up, collecting dirty plates. “Guess what? Amaz-O is doing his act at
Midnight Mansion tomorrow night. Mr. Malik gave me two free passes.” I held
my breath, waiting for their answer.
“Excellent!” Ginny cried. “That means I can go too!”
“I’m not taking you,” I told her. “I’ll ask Mark or Jesse or somebody.
Anybody but you.” I dropped the plates in the sink. They crashed but didn’t
break.
“Careful, Tim,” Mom warned.
Ginny slithered over to the sink and tried to hug me. “Please, Tim. I’m your
sister. Your only sister in the whole world. I’d do anything for you. You have to
take me with you!”
“Neither one of you is going,” Dad said quietly. “It’s a school night.”
“But Dad, it’s free!” I protested. “Just this once. Amaz-O is my hero. I’ll
never get another chance to see him in person!”
“What time does the show start?” Mom asked.
“Ten o’clock,” I told her.
She shook her head. “Absolutely not. You’re not going out at ten o’clock on
a school night. Especially not to a nightclub. You’re much too young.” She
furiously spooned ice cream into a bowl.
“Mom—please!” I begged. “I’m twelve. I can handle it.”
“You heard your mother,” Dad said. “You’ll have other chances to see
Amaz-O, Tim. Don’t worry.”
Mom offered me a bowl of ice cream. “I don’t want it,” I grumbled. I
stormed out of the kitchen. As I left, I heard Ginny say, “Good. Now I’ll get two
bowls of ice cream.”
Stupid Ginny, I thought. Stupid Mom and stupid Dad. My one chance to see
my idol, the great Amaz-O—and they won’t let me go.
I wandered into the garage. In the corner stood a new trick I was building—
the rabbit table. It was a square table that came up to my waist. The top had a
hole in it that led to a secret compartment under the table.
I planned to hide a rabbit in the compartment and cover the hole with my
magic top hat. When I pressed a pedal at the foot of the table, the bottom of the
secret compartment would rise up. Then I’d lift my hat—and there would be the
rabbit!
The table was almost finished. I turned it upside down and hammered on
the bottom of the secret compartment.
This trick is going to knock everybody out tomorrow afternoon, I thought.
I’ll be almost as amazing as Amaz-O!
I was so busy hammering I didn’t hear the garage door open. Two baby blue
high-tops suddenly appeared in front of me. I didn’t have to look up. I knew
Ginny’s smelly sneakers when I saw them.
“Go away,” I commanded.
She never listens to me. “You going to do the rabbit trick tomorrow?” she
asked.
“Uh-huh. Now go away.”
“Where are you going to get the rabbit?”
I set down my hammer. “I’m going to turn you into a rabbit.”
“Ha ha.” She flipped her wavy blond hair. “You know what this table would
be perfect for?” she asked. “Karate-chopping. I’ll bet I could chop it in half with
one hand.”
“Try it and I’ll—”
“You’ll what?” she taunted.
What could I do to her? Not much. “I’ll turn you into a rabbit for real,” I
threatened.
“Oh, yeah? How are you going to do that?”
“It’s easy,” I replied. “Mr. Malik showed me how. Tonight, while you’re
sleeping, I’m going to sneak into your room and turn you into a rabbit.”
“Give me a break,” Ginny said. “That is so dumb.”
“Maybe. Maybe not. I guess we’ll find out tonight.” I picked up my
hammer again. “I hope you like carrots,” I told her.
“You’re crazy,” she said. She hurried out of the garage.
Well, I thought. At least that got rid of her for a while.
I set the table on its legs again. All I had to do was paint it, and it would be
ready.
Wouldn’t it be great? I thought as I opened a can of blue paint. Wouldn’t it
be great if I really could turn Ginny into a rabbit?
But that was impossible. Wasn’t it?
4
“We want the rabbit trick! We want the rabbit trick!”
Ginny sat in the grass in our backyard. Six or seven other kids sat around. I
was in the middle of my magic act. Ginny was stirring up trouble.
She knew I didn’t have a rabbit for the trick. I was still waiting for Foz to
show up.
Where is he? I wondered. He’s ruining my show!
The other kids joined in Ginny’s chant. “The rabbit trick! The rabbit trick!”
I tried to stall them. “The amazing, incredible rabbit trick is coming up,” I
promised. “But first—wouldn’t you like to see me pull a quarter out of Ginny’s
ear again?”
“No!” the kids yelled. “Boo!”
“Karate fight!” Sue called. “We want a karate fight. Ginny versus Tim!”
Things were getting ugly.
At last I glimpsed Foz at the side of the house. He waved at me frantically.
“Intermission!” I announced. “I’ll be back in two minutes. And then—I’ll
pull a rabbit out of my hat!”
I hurried over to Foz. A big cardboard box sat at his feet.
“What took you so long?” I demanded.
“I’m sorry,” Foz said. “I almost had to rip the rabbit out of Clare’s hands.”
I opened the box. Clare’s big white rabbit lifted its nose and sniffed at me. I
grabbed it and stuffed it under my jacket.
“Be careful!” Foz warned. “If anything happens to it, my sister will chop
me into rabbit food!”
“The rabbit will be fine,” I told him. “What could happen to it?”
I sneaked the rabbit to the table. With my back to the audience, I stuffed it
into the secret compartment and plopped my hat on top.
Then I turned to face the kids. None of them had seen the rabbit. Perfect.
“Ladies and gentlemen!” I called. “Thanks for being so patient. Here is the
moment you’ve all been waiting for—”
“Karate fight!” Ginny called.
“Even better than a karate fight!” I said. “I, the Great Timothini, will now
pull a rabbit out of my hat!”
Ginny snorted. “The Great Timothini?”
I pointed at her. “You, in the front row. Quiet!”
“You be quiet!” Ginny shot back.
“Get on with it!” Jesse called.
“Okay. I need complete silence now. I must concentrate.”
To my surprise, the kids actually quieted down. Even Ginny. Everyone
stared up at me, waiting.
I lifted my hat off the table. “As you can see, my hat is empty. It’s an
ordinary, everyday top hat. Sue, will you please examine the hat?”
I passed the hat to Sue. She turned it over. “It looks like a regular hat to
me,” she declared.
I set the hat on the table, covering the secret compartment. “Thank you,
Sue. Now—watch carefully.”
I waved my arms over the hat. “Abracadabra, abracadeer, rabbit, rabbit,
rabbit—appear!”
I stepped on the pedal to make the rabbit rise up. Then I lifted the hat with a
flourish.
Nothing there. The hat stood empty.
I checked the secret compartment. No rabbit there, either.
My heart pounded. How could this be?
“The rabbit!” I cried. “It’s gone!”
5
What have I done? I thought in horror.
My trick must have worked better than I thought!
I glanced up and saw Ginny pointing across the backyard. “There it goes!”
she cried. “There’s the rabbit!”
I whirled around. Clare’s white rabbit was hopping away.
How could that happen? I wondered. I glanced into the secret compartment
again.
I’d left one side of the secret compartment open. How could I have been so
stupid?
“Tim—you promised!” Foz screamed. “Grab it!”
I chased after the rabbit. Foz huffed behind me. The rabbit had already
hopped halfway across our next-door neighbors’ backyard. I glanced back.
Ginny and the other kids were yelling and running after us.
The rabbit stopped behind a bush. I sped up—and pounced.
“Got him!” I cried. But the rabbit slipped out of my hands and bounded
away.
“He’s headed for the stream!” Ginny shouted.
A muddy stream ran behind all the backyards on our block. The rabbit
disappeared behind the trees that hid the stream.
Whooping like crazy, Ginny led the kids after the rabbit.
“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re scaring it away!”
But none of them listened to me. There was nothing to do but keep chasing.
“Don’t let the rabbit hop into the water!” Foz screamed. “He’ll drown!”
“He won’t drown,” I told Foz. “That stream is only about two inches deep.”
“Just catch the rabbit!” Foz ordered. He was in a total panic. Maybe his
sister really would chop him into rabbit food.
The rabbit hopped through the mud and across the stream into the Darbys’
yard. I shoved the other kids aside. I splashed through the stream.
The rabbit stopped. Its ears twitched.
I motioned to the others to keep still. I squatted down and crept toward the
rabbit.
I saw why it had stopped. The Darbys’ cat, Boo Boo, crouched low in the
grass, waiting to pounce.
The rabbit was trapped between us. I crawled closer. Closer. I was almost
there….
“Watch out for the cat!” Foz shrieked.
With a yowl, the cat leaped. The rabbit bounced about a foot in the air. I
missed him.
Everybody raced after him again. I threw Foz a dirty look.
“You’re ruining everything!” I shouted.
“You’re the one who lost him in the first place!” Foz yelled back.
“Hey!” Sue called. “Look at Ginny!”
Ginny had raced to the head of the pack. The rabbit paused, then started
running again. Ginny took a flying leap. “Yaw, hee ha how!” she screeched in
her weirdo karate voice.
She landed on her feet in front of the rabbit. It tried to change course. Too
late.
“Hiii—ya!” Ginny swooped down and grabbed the rabbit. She held him
over her head like a trophy.
“I got him!” she cried. “I got him!”
“Yay, Ginny!” Everyone crowded around her, slapping her on the back.
“Don’t let him go!” Foz cried. He hurried over to Ginny and snatched the
rabbit away.
We all started back to my yard. “Awesome trick, Tim.” Jesse patted me on
the back. “You almost made the rabbit really disappear!”
Everybody laughed. “You should change your stage name, Timothini,” Sue
chimed in. “How about ‘The Great Goofballini’?”
“Or ‘Mess-Up the Magnificent’!” Jesse suggested.
I sighed and shut my eyes. Another magic show—another disaster.
“I can’t believe you almost lost my sister’s rabbit,” Foz grumbled.
“I’m sorry, Foz. I’ll be more careful next time.”
He clutched the rabbit tightly to his chest. “Next time, get your own rabbit.”
He hurried to the side of the house and stuffed the rabbit into the box.
“Anybody want to come over to my house?” Jesse called. He lived next
door. “I’ve got a great trick to show you—the disappearing dog. I let go of his
leash, and he runs away!”
Laughing, the other kids drifted over to Jesse’s house. Foz took the rabbit
home to his sister.
“You going over to Jesse’s?” Ginny asked.
I shook my head. “I’m going inside for a snack.”
“Maybe you should do your magic act inside from now on,” Ginny said.
“Then your tricks won’t be able to escape from you!” She giggled.
“Very funny,” I mumbled. “You won’t be laughing so hard when I turn you
into a rabbit. I don’t think rabbits know how to laugh.”
“Ooh. I’m scared.” She rolled her eyes.
“You’d better be.” I leaned close to her and whispered. “Tonight’s the night.
Tonight, while you’re sleeping, I’ll turn you into a rabbit. And if you try to run
away, the Darbys’ cat will get you.”
She rolled her eyes again. Then she reached up to tweak my nose. “Boi-oioing.”
She trotted off to Jesse’s house.
I definitely need better magic tricks, I thought as I dragged myself into the
house. Better equipment, too. So I can do really cool tricks. Tricks that actually
work.
I thought of all the stuff Mr. Malik sold in his shop. If I could have just one
of those tricks, I could do a great act. I’ve got to get one somehow.
But how?
That night everybody went to bed early. Mom and Dad were exhausted and
crabby after another bad day at work.
“Today was the worst day ever!” Mom grumbled. “I’m so exhausted.
Everybody to bed!”
Ginny and I knew better than to protest. We didn’t want to stay up, anyway,
with Mom and Dad grouching around all evening.
I lay in bed with the lights off, trying to sleep. Amaz-O’s show is tonight, I
thought miserably. He’s performing tonight, only a few miles away from my
house. I have free passes. And I can’t go. It’s not fair!
How am I ever going to be a great magician if I never see any magic
shows? Amaz-O is the greatest of the great—and I have to miss my one chance
to see him!
Or do I? A wicked thought popped into my head. Why should I miss the
show?
I’ve got the tickets. I can ride to Midnight Mansion on my bike. I could
sneak out of the house for a couple of hours—and Mom and Dad would never
have to know.
I rolled over in bed and peered at my alarm clock. The dial glowed in the
dark. Nine-forty.
The show would start in twenty minutes, I knew. I could still make it if I
left right now.
I couldn’t stand to think about it any longer. I had to go.
I slid out of bed, hoping my mattress wouldn’t creak. I tiptoed across the
room to my dresser. I silently pulled on a pair of jeans and a shirt.
Sneakers in hand, I carefully opened my bedroom door. The house was
dark. I heard Dad snoring in my parents’ room down the hall.
I crept toward the stairs. Am I really doing this? I thought, suddenly
nervous. Am I really sneaking out in the middle of the night to go to Midnight
Mansion?
6
Yes—I’m really doing it, I thought. I’ll do anything to see Amaz-O. It’s totally
worth the risk.
What’s the worst that could happen?
Mom and Dad could find out. Then what? Maybe they’d ground me. But I
will have seen the great Amaz-O in person. And while I’m grounded, I can try to
learn some of Amaz-O’s tricks.
Anyway, I won’t get caught. I won’t.
I paused at the top of the stairs. The stairs in my house are the creakiest
stairs in the universe.
Once when I was little, I tried to sneak downstairs on Christmas Eve to see
what Santa had left me. I barely touched the top step with my foot
—CRRREEEEAAAK! Mom burst out of her room before I even had a chance to
try the second step.
It’s not going to happen this time, I told myself. I’ll take each step very
slowly. I’ll lean on the banister to keep them from creaking. No one will wake
up. No one will hear me.
I put both my hands on the banister and rested my weight on it. Then I set
my right foot carefully—the toe, then the heel—on the top step.
Crick. Just a tiny little sound. I’m sure no one heard it, I thought.
I shifted my hands down the banister and took another step. This one made
no creak at all.
So far, so good.
I took the third step. Creak. Not a rip-roaring loud creak, but louder than the
first. I froze.
I listened for the sound of someone stirring in the house.
Silence. All clear.
If Amaz-O only knew what I’m going through to see him, I thought. I must
be his biggest fan on the face of the earth.
I made it all the way down the stairs with only one more creak. I breathed a
sigh of relief.
I’m safe now, I thought. I’ll wait until I get outside to put my shoes on.
Then I’ll grab my bike and go.
I tiptoed across the cold hallway floor. I reached for the handle of the front
door. Twisted it.
Almost there.
Almost.
Then a shrill voice demanded, “Tim—where do you think you’re going?”
7
I spun around. Ginny!
She was dressed in jeans and a sweater, all ready to go out. She bounded
down the stairs.
“Ssshhhhhhhh! You’ll wake up Mom and Dad!”
I grabbed her by the arm and yanked her out the front door.
“What are you doing up?” I demanded.
“I was waiting for you to come into my room and turn me into a rabbit,”
she replied. “Or pretend to, anyway.”
“I’m not going to do that tonight,” I said. “Go back to bed.”
“What are you doing up? Where are you going?”
I sat on the front steps and pulled on my sneakers. “Out to the garage,” I
lied. “To practice a new trick.”
“You are not. I know where you’re going. To Midnight Mansion!”
I grabbed her by the shoulders. “Okay. You’re right. I’m going to Midnight
Mansion. Don’t tell Mom and Dad—promise?”
“I want to go!” she insisted. “Let me go with you.”
“No. Go back to bed—and don’t tell. Or you’ll be sorry.”
“You have to take me!” she declared. “If you don’t, I’ll run upstairs and tell
Mom and Dad right now. Then you’ll never get to see Amaz-O.”
“You wouldn’t.”
“I would.”
I knew she would.
“All right,” I agreed. “You can come. But you have to be good and do
everything I tell you to do.”
“Maybe I will—and maybe I won’t.”
I sighed. I had to take her, no matter how bratty she was. If I did, she’d
never tell—because then she’d be in as much trouble as me.
“Let’s go,” I whispered.
We sneaked into the garage and got our bikes. Then we pedaled off into the
night.
It felt strange riding down Bank Street late at night. The shops were all
closed and dark. Hardly any traffic on the street.
Oh, no. A police car up ahead—cruising toward us down Bank Street. If he
spotted us, he’d stop us for sure. And then he’d take us home. And then we’d
really be in trouble.
I searched desperately for a place to hide. The police couldn’t miss us—
Bank Street was lined with streetlights.
“Ginny!” I called. “Quick—out of the light!” I swerved into the dark
doorway of a dress shop. Ginny followed. We leaped off our bikes and pressed
ourselves into the shadows.
The police car glided past. I held my breath as the headlights brushed across
us. The car stopped.
“He saw us!” Ginny whispered. “Run!”
I grabbed her arm to stop her. “Wait.” I peeked out into the street.
The police car was idling, but the driver stayed inside.
“It’s a red light,” I told Ginny. A few seconds later the light turned green,
and the police car rolled away.
“We’re safe now,” I said. We hopped back onto our bikes and rode off.
Midnight Mansion loomed huge and dark at the edge of town. People said
that a crazy old woman had lived alone in the mansion for forty years. She was
rich, but so stingy she wore ragged old clothes and ate nothing but peanut butter,
right out of the jar.
When people tried to visit her, she screamed, “Go away!” and threw rocks
at them. She had about fifty cats. When she died, a businessman bought the
mansion and turned it into a nightclub.
I braked in front of the old house and stared at it. Midnight Mansion.
It looked like a spooky old castle made of sooty black stone. Three stories
tall, with two towers shooting up into the night sky. Vines crept across the roof.
A floodlight threw creepy shadows over the house.
I’d seen the mansion a million times before. But late at night it looked
bigger and darker than usual. I thought I saw bats fluttering around the two
towers.
“No wonder the old lady went crazy,” Ginny whispered. “Living in a
spooky place like that.”
“Do you think she kept prisoners in those towers?” I wondered.
“I think she had a torture chamber in the basement,” Ginny said.
We walked our bikes up to the entrance. People hurried inside to see Amaz-
O’s magic show. Three men in long black capes breezed past us. A woman with
long black hair, black lipstick, and pointy black fingernails smiled at me.
“Where did all these weird people come from?” Ginny asked.
I shrugged. “Let’s go in. The show is about to start.”
We locked our bikes and ran up the long stone steps. We entered a big hall
lit by a crystal chandelier. We crossed the hall to a doorway covered by a heavy
red curtain.
A tall, thin man in a black tuxedo guarded the curtain. He reached out a
long, bony finger to stop us.
He had no hair, a pencil neck, and dark, hollow eye sockets. “He looks like
a skeleton,” Ginny whispered to me.
I pulled the two tickets out of my back pocket and handed them to him.
“Very good,” he croaked in a low voice. “But where are your parents? I
can’t seat children without their parents.”
My parents? Think fast, Swanz-O, I told myself. “Um—my parents. Yes.
Well, my parents, you see…” I had a feeling he didn’t want to hear that my
parents were home sleeping.
“They’re outside, parking the car,” I lied. “They’ll be here in a minute.
They told us to come in and get a table.”
The man’s hollow black eyes seemed to burn a hole in my brain. Would he
buy it?
“I don’t like it. But all right.” He led us through the red curtain. The
houselights went down just as we walked in. He showed us to a table right next
to the stage.
“Excellent!” I said to Ginny as we sat down. “The best seats in the whole
place!”
“This is so exciting!” she exclaimed. “I can’t believe we’re in a real, grownup nightclub. By ourselves!”
The eerie-looking host stood by the red curtain, watching us. “We may not
be here long,” I warned her. “That skeleton guy’s got his eye on us. When he
realizes we’re not here with our parents—”
“Shh! The show’s starting.”
A voice came over a loudspeaker. “Ladies and gentlemen! Midnight
Mansion is proud to present the most famous magician in America. The
fabulous, the incredible, the mind-boggling Amaz-O!”
A drum roll, and then horns bleating “Ta da!” The audience clapped and
cheered. The curtain rose.
I gasped when I saw the stage. It was filled with wonderful equipment—a
tall, shiny black box with a door in the front, a platform suspended from the
ceiling, a glittering box with holes in it for a head, arms, and legs to stick out of.
And a big white rabbit sitting beside a vase of blue flowers on a table covered
with a red scarf.
The rabbit wasn’t tied up or caged or anything. “I wonder how he keeps that
rabbit from running away,” Ginny whispered. “That’s a trick you need to learn.”
“You’re so funny, Ginny,” I said, rolling my eyes. “My sides are splitting
with laughter.”
“You have no sense of humor,” Ginny jeered. “That’s your problem.”
“No. You’re my problem,” I snapped.
Amaz-O strode onstage. He was tall and slim, and his top hat made him
seem even taller. He had long black hair and wore a black cape lined with red
satin over a black tuxedo.
He tossed the cape over his shoulders and bowed.
I can’t believe I’m seeing Amaz-O in person! I thought, my heart pounding
with excitement. And so close—I could almost touch him!
Maybe I’ll even see how some of his tricks are done, I thought. Maybe,
sitting so close, I’ll catch some of his secrets!
Without saying a word, Amaz-O scanned the audience. He trained his eyes
on me.
My whole body shook. He’s staring right at me! I gasped.
Amaz-O took a step forward and leaned toward me.
What’s he doing? I thought. Is he going to talk to me?
Amaz-O leaned closer. His face was right next to mine! I cowered in my
seat.
He scowled and whispered in a deep, menacing voice, “Disappear!
Disappear!”
8
I shrank back.
“Disappear!” he growled again.
“Excuse me?” I gasped. I stared up at him. On TV he seemed friendly. But
in person he was definitely frightening.
“Disappear!” he whispered. “I’m going to make you disappear at the end of
the show. I will ask for volunteers—and I will choose you.”
He didn’t want me to disappear for real. He wanted me to be part of his act!
I couldn’t believe it!
I’ll find out how he does his famous disappearing trick! I thought. Maybe
I’ll get to meet him after the show. Maybe he’ll even tell me some of his secrets!
Ginny leaned across the table. “He’s going to make you disappear forever!”
she teased. “What will I tell Mom and Dad?”
I paid no attention to her. Nothing Ginny did or said could bother me now.
This was too cool! Just seeing Amaz-O was exciting enough. But he chose
me to be in his show!
Maybe he could tell that I’m a magician, too, I thought.
Amaz-O began his act. “Good evening, ladies and gentlemen,” he crooned.
“Tonight you will see some amazing feats. You will see me do things you always
thought were impossible. Are these feats real—or are they illusions? It’s up to
you to decide.”
He waved his hands, and a wand appeared out of thin air. The audience
clapped.
Then Amaz-O began to fidget with his hat, as if it felt uncomfortable on his
head. “Something is wrong with my hat,” he said. “It feels strange—almost as
if…”
He lifted the hat off his head and peered into it. He showed us the inside of
it. It looked perfectly normal. There was nothing inside it.
He placed it back on his head. “It’s funny,” he chuckled. “I thought for a
minute there might be something inside my hat. I thought I felt—oh, I don’t
know—a flock of birds fluttering around in there.”
The hat jiggled. Amaz-O appeared annoyed. “There it goes again!”
He whipped the hat off his head and stared into it. On top of his head sat a
large white feather. People in the audience giggled.
“What’s so funny?” Amaz-O asked. He felt the top of his head and found
the feather. “Where did that come from?” he gasped, acting amazed. Everyone
laughed.
“Well, I’ll try not to let this bother me,” he went on, replacing his hat.
“Back to the show. For my first trick—”
The hat began to shake again—slightly at first, then harder. It practically
jumped off his head. The audience cracked up. Amaz-O pretended to be
horrified.
He yanked the hat off his head—and out flew a whole flock of doves! They
swooped over the audience and flew up to the rafters.
“I knew something was going on in there!” Amaz-O joked. Loud laughter
and clapping.
He’s the greatest, I thought, clapping along. How did he get all those birds
inside his hat?
I glanced at the rabbit on stage. It sat calmly on the table, staring at AmazO. It almost seemed to be watching the act.
I can’t wait to see his rabbit trick, I thought. Will he make the rabbit
disappear? Or pull off some kind of twist?
“For my next trick I need a needle and thread,” Amaz-O announced. He
produced a packet of needles and a long, thick thread from one of his pockets.
He picked out a needle and squinted, trying to push the thread through the eye.
“I always have trouble threading a needle,” he said. He licked the end of the
thread and tried again. He couldn’t get the thread to go through.
He threw up his hands in frustration. “It’s impossible!” he cried. “How do
tailors do it?”
The audience chuckled. I waited to see what would come next. I knew all
this needle-and-thread business was a buildup to something incredible.
“So much for the hard way to thread a needle,” Amaz-O said. “I’ll show
you a better way.”
He snatched up the packet of needles. There must have been at least twenty
needles stuck into a piece of cardboard. He popped the whole thing into his
mouth. Then he dangled the long string over his mouth like a piece of spaghetti.
He slowly drew the string into his mouth, chewing. It looked as if he were
eating a piece of spaghetti—with a packet of needles in his mouth, too.
“Don’t you think that hurts?” Ginny whispered. “Chewing up all those
needles?”
I barely nodded. I watched Amaz-O, spellbound.
Amaz-O nearly swallowed the whole string. About an inch of string stuck
out between his lips. The audience waited, hushed.
He paused. Then he opened his mouth and tugged at the string. Slowly,
slowly, he pulled it out of his mouth.
One by one the needles appeared—dangling from the string! Somehow he
had threaded twenty needles with his tongue!
The audience gasped, then applauded. The needles flashed as Amaz-O held
up the string.
“Threading needles the easy way!” he cried as he took another bow.
I’ve got to find out how he did that, I thought. Maybe I’ll ask him after the
show.
“How’s the show going?” Amaz-O asked the audience. We all cheered. “I
wonder how much time we have left?” He strode across the stage to the table
where the rabbit and the blue flowers sat on top of the red scarf.
With a flick of his wrist, he yanked the scarf out from under the rabbit.
The rabbit didn’t move. Neither did the vase of flowers. The table was now
bare.
The rabbit blinked calmly. Amaz-O waved the scarf over his left hand. He
let it drop—and a big red alarm clock appeared in his hand!
He glanced at the clock. “I suppose we have time for a few more tricks.” He
covered the clock with the scarf—and the clock disappeared.
A loud ringing suddenly erupted from the other side of the stage. I turned
toward it.
The red alarm clock—floating in midair! It seemed to have flown across the
stage by itself.
Amaz-O crossed the stage, grabbed the clock, and shut off the alarm.
“My clock is a little fast,” he joked. “It’s not time for the show to end. Not
yet.”
I hope not, I thought. This is the greatest magic act I’ve ever seen in my
life!
The rest of the show was fantastic, too. Amaz-O escaped from a locked
safe. He walked through a brick wall. He tapped his hat with his magic wand—
and in a puff of smoke his tuxedo changed from black to yellow!
“And now for my big finale,” Amaz-O announced. “I am going to make a
member of the audience disappear. Are there any volunteers?”
He gazed out over the audience. No one said a word. Ginny kicked me
under the table.
“Ow!” I whispered, rubbing my skin. “What did you do that for?”
“He asked for volunteers, you moron,” she said. “That means you.”
I’d been so caught up in the show, I almost forgot. I stood up. “I’d like to
volunteer.”
Amaz-O smiled. “Excellent, young man. Please step up on stage.”
My stomach suddenly jolted with terror. I stumbled up to the stage.
Here I go, I thought nervously. Amaz-O is going to make me disappear.
I hope nothing goes wrong.
9
Amaz-O towered over me on stage. This is unbelievable, I thought. I’m on stage
with the great Amaz-O. I’m about to be part of one of his famous tricks.
He’s going to make me disappear!
I clutched my stomach, wondering, Why do I feel so scared?
“Thanks for volunteering, young man,” Amaz-O said to me. “You must be
very brave. Are your parents here tonight?”
My parents? Uh-oh. “Um—they’re here. Sure they’re here,” I stammered.
“But—uh—they had to make a phone call.”
Amaz-O frowned. “A phone call? In the middle of my show?”
“Well—it was an emergency,” I explained.
“Never mind. I’m glad they’ve stepped away. If they knew what was about
to happen to you, they might try to stop me.”
“Stop you?” My heart skittered nervously. But I heard the audience
laughing.
Don’t let him scare you, I told myself. This is just part of the act. He’s
joking.
I faked a laugh. “What—um—exactly—is about to happen to me?”
“I’m going to make you disappear,” Amaz-O replied. “You will be
transported into another dimension. I will try my best to bring you back, of
course—but it doesn’t always work.”
“It doesn’t?” I gulped.
He patted me on the back. “Don’t worry. I’ve done this hundreds of times.
I’ve only missed once or twice.”
The audience chuckled. They figured he was kidding. I hoped they were
right.
“Is that your sister sitting at the front table?” Amaz-O asked.
I nodded.
“Better wave good-bye to her, just in case,” he warned me.
Ginny smiled and waved at me.
She can’t wait for me to disappear! I thought bitterly. She hopes I’ll never
come back.
“Go on,” Amaz-O urged. “Wave to her.”
I smiled weakly and waved at Ginny. The audience laughed. Then Amaz-O
led me to a tall black box in the center of the stage. He threw open the door. It
looked like a closet inside.
“Step inside here if you would, please,” he said.
I stepped inside the box. Amaz-O shut the door firmly.
It was pitch-black inside that box. I stood still, waiting for something to
happen. I could hear Amaz-O talking to the audience.
“Ladies and gentlemen, this box is my own invention—the Fifth Dimension
Spin-o-Rama.” I heard him slap his hand against the side of the box.
“Here’s how it works: my brave volunteer steps inside the box. I lock him
in. I spin the box ten times—very fast.
“A magical force inside the box will send the boy into another dimension.
He will disappear!
“I must ask for absolute silence while I do this trick. I need complete
concentration.”
For several seconds I heard nothing.
Then the box began to spin. “Whoa!” I cried. My body slammed against the
back of the box.
It whirled around faster than any ride in an amusement park. I shut my eyes.
I felt so dizzy.
I hope I don’t puke, I thought. That would spoil everything.
The box kept spinning, spinning. How will the trick work? I wondered.
How will I disappear?
What if he really sends me into another dimension?
But that’s just talk, I told myself. Magician talk—to entertain the audience.
Isn’t it?
10
The box spun faster and faster. I clutched my stomach. I saw stars dancing
before my eyes.
When is it going to stop? I thought. I’m really going to be sick.
Then, suddenly, the bottom of the box dropped out from under me.
“Help!” I cried as I fell down, down, down.
“Whoa!”
I slid down a long wooden chute and landed—thunk!—on some kind of
mattress.
I lay on my back in a daze. I heard water dripping somewhere. A dim
yellow light flickered from a bare bulb on the ceiling.
I sat up, gazing around me. The room was nearly empty, dark and damp,
with a cement floor. I spotted a furnace in the corner.
I’m in the basement of Midnight Mansion, I realized.
I stood up and examined the chute. So that’s how the trick works, I thought.
Amaz-O sets up his spinning box over a trap door in the floor of the stage. The
bottom of the box drops out, and the volunteer slides down the chute and out of
sight. When Amaz-O opens the door of the box—presto!—the volunteer has
disappeared. It’s so simple.
But how do I get back upstairs? I wondered. How will Amaz-O make me
reappear?
Muffled applause drifted down from overhead. I could hear Amaz-O’s
voice, faintly. “Thank you very much, ladies and gentlemen. I must be going
now. I’ve got to disappear into the fifth dimension and find that boy! Good
night!”
The audience laughed. Then I heard music, an explosion, and loud
clapping.
Amaz-O must have made himself disappear, I thought. He’ll probably come
sliding down this chute any minute.
I waited.
No one came sliding down the chute.
I waited a few more minutes.
Nothing.
He must have disappeared some other way, I figured.
He’ll show up soon, I thought. He’ll come and let me out of here. And then
I’ll ask him how he does that trick with the alarm clock. Maybe he’ll even give
me his autograph!
A few minutes later I heard chairs scraping across the floor upstairs and a
stampede of footsteps. The show was over. The audience was leaving.
Is somebody going to let me out of here? I wondered. I was getting a little
nervous. I sat down on the mattress to wait.
What’s taking Amaz-O so long?
Maybe he wants to wait until everyone is gone, so no one will figure out
how he did the trick. That must be it.
I waited a little longer. I heard a rustling, scuttling noise. A rat! I thought,
jumping up off the mattress. I stared at the floor, watching for the rat.
The noise stopped.
Maybe it wasn’t a rat, I thought, trying to calm myself. My muscles were all
tense. Maybe it was only a mouse. Or a cockroach. Or my imagination.
The drip, drip, drip of the water somewhere in the basement was starting to
drive me crazy. Drip, drip, drip. Like some kind of water torture.
Where is Amaz-O? When is he going to let me out of here?
I listened for signs of life upstairs. Nothing. Everything was silent up there
now.
Okay, I said to myself. Everyone is gone. You can let me out now, Amaz-O.
I listened hard. I didn’t hear anyone in the building.
What if Amaz-O is gone, too? I thought, panicking. What if he forgot about
me and left me here?
I’ve got to find a way out myself, I decided.
I crept across the cement floor, keeping an eye out for rats.
It sure is dark down here, I thought.
I drifted toward the dripping sound and found myself in a room with a big
laundry sink. I crossed the laundry room. On the other side I found a steep flight
of steps leading to a door at the top.
Aha, I thought, feeling better now. A way out.
I climbed the rickety stairs. I reached for the doorknob and pushed.
The door didn’t open. I turned the knob again and pulled.
Nothing.
The door was locked!
I rattled the door as hard as I could. I pounded on it with my fists.
“Let me out of here!” I cried. “Can anyone hear me?
“Let me out of here!”
11
“Hey!” I shouted. I rattled the door. “Somebody! Get me out of here!”
How could Amaz-O do this? I thought angrily. How could he forget all
about me like this?
He wouldn’t lock me in the basement on purpose—would he?
No, I told myself. Why would he want to do that?
It’s all just a big mistake.
I shook the door again. It loosened a little. I pushed on it, and it opened a
crack.
The door was bolted from the outside with a metal hook. But the hook
wasn’t secure.
I’ll bet I can break the door open, I realized.
I backed partway down the stairs. Then I ran to the top and threw myself
against the door.
“Ow!” I grunted. The door loosened a little more. But it didn’t open. And
now my shoulder ached.
Then I thought the unthinkable. I couldn’t believe I was thinking this—but I
sure wished Ginny were with me.
She could’ve karate-kicked through that door in about five seconds. I know,
because she’s kicked her way into my bedroom lots of times.
Where is Ginny, anyway? I thought. She must be outside in the parking lot,
waiting for me.
I had to try again. I rammed my shoulder against the door as hard as I
could.
Bang! The hook broke, and the door flew open.
Excellent, I thought, rubbing my shoulder. I’m out of that horrible basement
at last.
But where am I now?
A long, dark corridor.
“Hello?” I called. No answer. “Hello?”
Where is everybody? I wondered. Shouldn’t there be stagehands bustling
around or something?
I tiptoed down the hall. The place appeared deserted.
How could they have left me down in the basement like that? I thought
angrily. How could they leave me here alone—and just go home?
At the end of the hall I saw a sliver of light. It came from under a door.
Someone’s still here, I realized. Maybe it’s Amaz-O!
I crept down the hall. The door had a star on it. It must be Amaz-O’s
dressing room! I thought. This is fantastic! I’m alone in Midnight Mansion with
the great Amaz-O! We’ll probably stay up all night talking about magic. If I
could get him to show me a few of his secrets…
I felt so excited and nervous my hands shook. I almost forgot about being
left in the basement.
That was just a mistake, I thought. A stagehand forgot to come get me.
Amaz-O must have thought I was all right. He’ll probably be really glad to see
me.
I stared at the star on the door. What should I do? I wondered. Should I
knock? Should I call out his name?
I’ll knock, I decided. I stepped to the door. Thunk! I tripped over something
propped against the wall. A large black case with PROPERTY OF AMAZ-O
written on the side.
Wow, I thought, running my fingers along the gold letters. This must be
Amaz-O’s magic kit! I’m touching it with my own hands!
I turned back to the door. I was about to meet my idol, my all-time hero. It
was the biggest moment of my life.
I reached for the door. My hand trembled. I knocked lightly.
I waited.
Maybe he didn’t hear me, I thought. I knocked again, harder this time.
Nothing.
“Hello?” I called softly, peeking into the room. Amaz-O’s big white rabbit
perched on the couch.
Amaz-O sat on a chair across from the rabbit. I could see his legs.
“Hello?” I called again. “It’s me. From the disappearing act. Can I come
in?”
I paused at the door. Amaz-O didn’t answer me. Suddenly the door
slammed shut in my face!
“Hey!” I cried in surprise.
A voice growled at me from the other side. “Beat it!”
“But—I’m your biggest fan! I’d just like to shake hands—”
“Beat it!” the voice snarled again. “Beat it, punk!”
12
Punk? Punk?
Did the great Amaz-O call me a punk?
I couldn’t believe it. I stood staring at the star on the door in shock.
How could Amaz-O talk to me this way? After I volunteered for his
disappearing trick—and he left me locked in the basement!
What’s his problem, anyway?
For a few seconds I couldn’t move. I couldn’t think. My hero had called me
a punk. The greatest magician in the world—and he turned out to be a big fat
jerk!
Okay, so he wasn’t fat. But he was the biggest jerk I’d ever met in my
whole life.
I hung my head and turned away from the door to leave. Then I saw it again
—the big black case.
Amaz-O’s magic kit.
Without thinking, I grabbed the case and ran.
It was heavy and awkward, but I lugged it down the hall as quickly and
quietly as I could.
Why am I doing this? I wondered as I burst into the stage area.
I’m still not sure why I did it. I’d gone through so much trouble to get to the
show—sneaking out of the house to meet Amaz-O. And then he was so mean to
me. Maybe I wanted to get back at him.
It doesn’t matter why I did it. I did it. I stole Amaz-O’s magic tricks.
In the back of my mind, I knew I was headed for trouble.
I paused near the stage. Was Amaz-O following me? I listened.
Not a sound. No one coming. I swallowed hard and started running again.
I passed under the chandelier in the lobby and burst through the front door.
I hope Amaz-O was the last person in the club, I thought. I hope there aren’t any
guards lurking around.
I didn’t have time to check. I dragged the case across the gravel parking lot
toward my bike.
Almost there, I told myself, panting. The parking lot was empty now. The
floodlights that lit up the mansion were off. The old house lay hidden in
darkness.
It must be really late, I thought. I’d better hurry home.
My bike stood where I’d left it, leaning against a rail.
I was reaching for the handlebars when a voice called “Stop!”
I froze.
I knew I was caught.
13
I heard heavy footsteps crunch toward me across the gravel parking lot.
Here they come, I thought. They’ve caught me red-handed with Amaz-O’s
bag. They’ll probably arrest me.
“Where were you?” the voice called.
Ginny! I’d completely forgotten about her. Oops.
“Why are you leaving without me?” she demanded.
“Wh-why?” I stammered. What could I say? I didn’t want to admit I’d
forgotten all about her. “I-I wasn’t leaving without you. I was looking for you.
Where have you been?”
“Looking for you, Tim,” she snapped. “What happened to you? You
disappeared—and you never came back!”
“It’s a long story,” I said.
She leaned forward to read the lettering on Amaz-O’s black case.
“‘Property of Amaz-O.’ Where did you get that?”
“He gave it to me,” I lied. “Wasn’t that nice of him?”
She reached out to open the clasp that held the case shut. “Cool. What’s
inside?”
I stopped her hand. “I’ll show it to you when we get home. It’s filled with
tricks. Amaz-O said I could keep it. He was grateful to me for being such a good
sport in the disappearing act.”
Ginny looked puzzled. “If Amaz-O gave you that case,” she began, “why
are those guards running this way?”
I glanced toward the mansion. Two guards charged across the parking lot,
waving flashlights. Uh-oh.
I grabbed the case. “Let’s get out of here!” I cried. “Quick—get on your
bike. Let’s ride!”
“I can’t!” Ginny cried.
“Huh? Why not?”
“My bike is gone!”
14
I jumped on my bike. “Too bad!” I cried. “See you at home!”
“Tim!” Ginny wailed. “You can’t leave me here!”
I would have left her there if I could. She can take care of herself. But I
knew Mom and Dad would kill me.
Besides, when the guards caught her, she’d tell on me. I’d still get in
trouble.
I sat on my bike, watching the guards run right for us. Then I spotted her
bike on the edge of the parking lot. “It’s over there!” I told her. “Hurry!”
She raced to her bike. I balanced the case on top of my handlebars. It wasn’t
easy.
“Stop!” a guard yelled. Ginny and I sped out of the parking lot and down
the dark street.
“Hey—stop!” the guards shouted. The beams of their flashlights blinded me
for a second. I pedaled as hard as I could. Ginny darted ahead of me.
I clutched the black case with one hand and steered with the other. The case
slowed me down. The guards were gaining on us. At the first corner I zoomed
left. Ginny followed.
I glanced back. The guards had stopped running. One of them bent over,
panting.
“They’ll never catch us now!” Ginny shouted. We biked home as fast as we
could. The streets were empty and really dark. The lights were out in most of the
houses.
It’s after midnight, I realized. Please let Mom and Dad be asleep. If they
catch us, they’ll ground us till we’re thirty-five! I’d almost rather be arrested.
But then, if I got arrested, Mom and Dad would still ground me.
We braked at our street and walked our bikes into the driveway.
“Sshhh,” Ginny whispered.
“Sshhh yourself,” I whispered back.
We parked the bikes in the garage. It was hard to see without the lights on.
On the way into the house, Ginny tripped over the lawn mower.
“Ow!” she yelped.
“Quiet!” I snapped.
We both froze. Did Mom and Dad hear us?
Silence. “I think it’s okay,” I whispered.
“That hurt,” Ginny whined.
“Ssshhhh!”
We sneaked into the house. “I’ll hide the case in my room,” I whispered.
“I want to look at it now,” Ginny protested.
I shook my head. “It’s mine.”
“No, it’s not. You have to share it with me.”
“Amaz-O gave it to me,” I insisted, even though it wasn’t exactly true.
“I’m going to tell Mom and Dad,” Ginny threatened. “I’ll tell them you
woke me up and forced me to go with you to Midnight Mansion.”
“You little brat!” I cried angrily. Stupid Ginny. “Okay, I’ll share it with
you.”
“Promise?”
“If you promise not to tell Mom and Dad.”
“I promise. But you can’t keep the case in your room. It’s both of ours
now.”
I sighed. “All right. I’ll hide it in the attic. Okay?”
She nodded.
“But we won’t touch it until Saturday,” I said. “On Saturday, we’ll have
plenty of time to try everything out and do it right. Deal?”
“Deal. On Saturday we’ll both open the case, at the same time, together.”
“Right. Now go to bed. I’ll sneak it up to the attic.”
We tried to be careful going up the creaky stairs. It took us about ten
minutes. At the top I paused to listen for sounds from Mom and Dad’s room.
“Everything is okay,” Ginny whispered. “Dad is snoring.”
She crept into her room and shut the door. I tiptoed up to the attic, lugging
the black case.
I shut the attic door and switched on the light. Where can I hide this? I
wondered, gazing around at all the junk. I stepped over piles of old magazines.
In one corner sat my old toy chest.
Perfect, I thought, opening the chest. I pulled out a toy school bus and a
couple of trucks to make room for the case.
What’s in here, anyway? I wondered as I hefted Amaz-O’s case. I held
Amaz-O’s magic kit in my hands. How could I go to sleep without seeing what’s
in it? How could I wait two whole days until Saturday?
Maybe I’ll take a little peek inside, I thought. Just a quick one. Then I’ll go
to bed.
I set the case on the floor. My hands trembled as I fumbled with the clasp.
Here goes, I thought, tugging open the clasp. I pulled the case open—
And it blew up in my face!
15
I fell over backwards. I lay sprawled on the floor, covering my eyes.
What happened?
Am I dead?
I opened my eyes. I squeezed my arms. I grabbed my chest.
I’m okay, I realized.
I sat up. The case sat on the floor. No signs of an explosion.
Carefully I crawled over to the case. I could have sworn it had blown up.
But I didn’t see anything that would blow up.
Then, taped to the inside of the top flap, I saw a little metal disk. I tapped it.
It made a muffled roar.
I examined the metal disk. It was an electronic chip. It made an explosion
sound effect when I shook it or tapped it.
Just one of Amaz-O’s tricks.
What else is in here? I wondered.
I pulled out all kinds of cool stuff. A pair of trick handcuffs. A pocket watch
for hypnotizing people. Three different decks of trick cards. A rope. And a long
chain of silk scarves tied together.
I wonder how all this stuff works, I thought. I’ll have to fool around with it
on Saturday and figure it out.
I found a small black sack that held three oval shells and a little red ball.
The shell game, I realized. One of my favorite tricks. You hide the ball under one
of the shells and shift them around. The audience has to guess which shell the
ball is under.
They always guess wrong, because the ball isn’t under any of the shells.
The magician secretly palms the ball while he’s shifting the shells around.
Gets ’em every time.
I reached into the case again. My hand brushed against something silky. I
pulled it out. It was a black tuxedo jacket.
“Wow!” I gasped. “Amaz-O’s own jacket!”
I had to try it on. I pulled it over my shoulders. It was too big. The
shoulders drooped halfway down my arms, and the sleeves covered my hands.
But it felt great. I ran my hands over the satin lapels.
I stood up and walked around in it. A real magician’s jacket. I wonder what
he’s got in the pockets?
I stuck my hands in the pockets. But suddenly I felt something wiggle.
Along the back of the jacket, near my neck.
I shook my shoulders. The wiggling stopped.
But then I felt it again. Something came sliding down the sleeve!
I shook my arm. What is it? I thought. Is it alive?
The thing crawled along my arm. “Yuck!” I sputtered. “Get off me!” I
squirmed inside the coat, trying to shake the thing off.
I had to get the jacket off—right away! I struggled to get my arms out of the
sleeves.
Then something poked its head out. Out of the sleeve, near my hand.
A snake.
A live snake.
16
I clamped my mouth shut to keep from screaming. The snake felt warm and
creepy against my arm. I shook my arm hard. The snake clung to me!
I gritted my teeth and shook my arm again. And again. I brushed at my
sleeve with my free hand.
It wasn’t working!
I shook my arm once more, as hard as I could. The snake uncoiled and
slithered out of the sleeve. It dropped to the floor.
It hissed and curved around the toy chest. I watched it with a shiver.
Then I felt it again—that slippery, wriggling feeling. Something hissed near
my ear and squirmed across my shoulder.
“Ohhh!” I moaned. Another snake! I slapped at it. “Get off me!”
As I tried to brush the snake away, another one slithered down my sleeve.
Something slimy wriggled across my stomach and down my back. A snake
popped out of an inner pocket and plopped to the floor. It started to coil around
my leg.
The jacket is crammed with snakes! I realized with horror.
I thrashed my arms, frantically trying to tear off the jacket. A snake slid
down the front of my shirt.
I thrashed harder, shaking my arms and legs. Now I was covered with
snakes! My whole body!
I wanted to scream—but I couldn’t wake Mom and Dad. A snake curled up
my neck and around my head. I squirmed, desperately trying to get out of the
jacket.
“Help!” I moaned. “Ohhhh—help!”
17
Snakes everywhere!
One slithered over my head. With a trembling hand, I grabbed at it and
heaved it away.
Gasping in terror, I struggled out of the jacket. I tossed it on the floor.
Snakes wriggled over it. Snakes wriggled over my feet. I hopped up and down.
Then I hopped onto a chair. A snake coiled up the leg of the chair. It crept closer.
“Go away!” I whispered. “Leave me alone!”
The snake hissed. I jumped off the chair.
Squish! My stomach turned. Did I step on a snake? I was afraid to look.
I lifted my foot and glanced down. I hadn’t stepped on a snake. It was one
of Ginny’s old dolls.
A snake slid over the doll’s face and around its neck. Another snake
slithered over my shoe.
There’s no escape! I realized. I’ve got no choice—I have to wake up Mom
and Dad. What else can I do?
I hopped around the squirming, hissing snakes.
I’ll get into trouble, I thought. But at least I’ll be out of this snake pit!
A snake darted toward me—then suddenly froze. The room fell silent. No
more hissing.
All around me the snakes stopped moving. They lay stiff on the floor. Their
cold eyes stared.
What happened? Were they dead?
I glanced around, afraid to move. The floor was littered with dead snakes.
How could they all die at once? I wondered. It’s so weird!
I stood there, not moving a muscle. My eyes darted around the room.
I slowly reached out my leg and tapped one of the snakes with my foot. It
jiggled a little.
I took a deep breath. Should I touch it?
I got up the courage to bend close to the snake. I stuck out a finger and
poked at it. Nothing happened. My heart pounded. I picked up the snake.
It lay limp in my hand. It didn’t seem real.
I twisted the body. It was rubber! I examined the eyes. They were made of
glass.
They’re mechanical snakes, I realized.
I turned the snake over. I found a tiny wind-up key hidden under a rubber
flap.
Amaz-O’s jacket was rigged with wind-up snakes.
I began to breathe again. Everything is okay, I told myself. I don’t have to
wake up Mom and Dad. I’m not going to get into trouble. I’m not going to be
eaten alive by snakes.
When will I learn? I scolded myself. All of these things are just tricks. None
of them is real. Amaz-O is a magician.
I gathered up the snakes and stuffed them back inside the jacket. Then I
jammed the jacket into Amaz-O’s magic kit. I took one last look inside the bag.
This is amazing, I thought. I’ve got some of Amaz-O’s best tricks—right
here in my own house!
I forced myself to close the kit. I’d better stop fooling around with this
stuff, I thought—before anything else happens!
I’ll check it all out on Saturday. In daylight, when I have plenty of time to
see how it all works.
Then I’ll give the kit back to Amaz-O. On Monday.
I knew I had to return the kit. It had been wrong to take it. And crazy.
If only Amaz-O hadn’t been so mean to me! He used me in his act—and
then he locked me in the basement! He told me to get lost. He called me a punk!
I started to get angry all over again. Amaz-O doesn’t deserve to get his
magic kit back, I thought.
But deep down I knew I had to return it. I wanted to do the right thing. I’d
check out the tricks, then give them back.
Of course, I didn’t know then how dangerous the kit was. I didn’t know the
trouble it would cause.
If I had known, I would have returned the case that night!
18
“Another day of work,” Mom sighed at the breakfast table the next morning.
“I’m absolutely dreading it. Those students just drive me crazy.”
Dad grabbed a doughnut and gazed out the window. “It’s raining,” he said
unhappily. “I probably won’t sell a single car today.”
Ginny and I exchanged glances. Mom and Dad had no idea we had sneaked
out the night before.
I slumped into a chair and ate my cereal. I was sleepy. I’m not used to
staying up so late.
“You look tired, Tim,” Mom said, sitting across from me. She glanced at
Ginny. “So do you, honey.”
“Didn’t you two get any sleep?” Dad asked.
“Sure we did,” I replied.
Ginny grinned. “Not that much sleep. Tim and I have a secret!”
The little brat! I kicked her under the table.
“Ow!” she cried. “Tim kicked me!”
“Don’t kick your sister,” Dad scolded. “I have to leave.” He picked up his
briefcase and kissed Mom good-bye. “Off to another day of torture. See you
tonight, kids.”
Dad left. Mom started clearing away the breakfast dishes. “Did you say
something about a secret?” she asked.
“No!” I insisted. “Ginny didn’t say anything about a secret. She said, ‘Tim
and I want a wee pet.’”
Mom shot me a weird look. “A what? A wee pet?”
“Yeah,” I said. “You know, a little pet. A nice little kitten or something.
Ginny’s learning about Scotland in school now. She’s picked up some Scottish
words, right, Ginny? She’s been running around calling everything ‘wee’.”
“I have not,” Ginny protested. “I’ve never called anything ‘wee’ in my life!
And I’m not learning about Scotland in school!”
“Yes, you are,” I insisted.
“What in the world are you two talking about?” Mom carried the pile of
cereal bowls to the sink.
“We did a bad thing, Mom,” Ginny blurted out. “Ow!” I kicked her again,
but that didn’t stop her.
“We sneaked out last night, Mom. We rode our bikes to Midnight Mansion
to see the magic show. We didn’t get back until after midnight. I’m sorry, Mom.
Please don’t get angry. Tim made me do it. I didn’t want to.”
I covered my face with my hands. Why does Ginny have to be such a big
mouth?
I’m doomed, I thought. Doomed!
19
“What did you say, Ginny?” Mom asked, wiping her hands on a towel. “I was
running water in the sink, and I couldn’t hear you.”
I let out a long breath. I couldn’t believe my luck. I glared at Ginny and
kicked her again—really hard this time.
“Nothing, Mom,” Ginny murmured. “I didn’t say anything.”
“You two better get ready for school,” Mom said.
I pushed my chair away from the table and dragged Ginny out of hers.
“We’ll be ready in a minute, Mom,” I said.
“What is your problem?” I whispered to Ginny in the hall. “You could’ve
gotten us in big trouble!”
“You would get in trouble. Not me,” Ginny replied. “You’re the big brother.
You made me go.”
“I didn’t make you do anything. And anyway, you promised not to tell!”
“You promised not to peek into Amaz-O’s kit until Saturday,” Ginny
reminded me. “But I sneaked up to the attic this morning—and I know you
looked! You opened that bag! You even played with some of the stuff!”
“Me? I did not!” I lied.
“Yes, you did. One of the sleeves of a jacket was sticking out of the kit.
And I found a scarf on the floor. You big fat liar!”
“So what? You’ll still get to see the stuff on Saturday.”
“You promised,” Ginny repeated. She flicked my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.”
I stormed into my room. There’s no arguing with Ginny. She does whatever
she wants—promise or no promise.
She’s always getting me into trouble, I thought angrily. She drives me
crazy! I wish there were some way I could pay her back. Some way to pay her
back for everything.
Little did I realize I would soon find it.
20
“Are you sure you kids don’t want to go to the antiques show with us?” Dad
asked. “You might see some neat old junk there.”
“We’re sure,” I insisted. Saturday morning had arrived, and all I could think
about was Amaz-O’s magic kit. I couldn’t wait to get my hands on it.
I wished my parents would hurry up and leave.
“All right,” Mom said, kissing Ginny and then me. “There’s tuna salad in
the fridge for lunch. We won’t be back until dinnertime.”
“Be good,” Dad added.
“I’ll be good,” Ginny declared. “I don’t know about Tim.”
I tried to shove her, but she dodged me. “I’ll be good,” I promised. “I’m
always good.”
Mom rolled her eyes. “Just don’t fight too much,” she said. “’Bye.”
Ah. At last. As soon as they were gone, I raced to the phone and dialed
Foz’s number.
“The coast is clear,” I told him. “Come on over.”
I’d told Foz all about the show at Midnight Mansion and Amaz-O’s magic
kit. He begged me to let him see the cool tricks in Amaz-O’s bag.
As soon as Foz arrived, we all trooped up to the attic. Ginny made a beeline
for the magic kit. I blocked her.
“Heee-ya!” She leaped into a pre-karate chop stance. “Out of my way!”
“Ginny—wait!” I pleaded. “There’s a lot of weird stuff in that bag. Let me
show it to you my way.”
“Okay.” She relaxed. “But don’t forget you’re supposed to share it with
me.”
I pulled up two chairs. “You guys sit here,” I said to Ginny and Foz. “And
get ready for the greatest magic show in the history of the world!”
I reached into the toy chest and pulled out Amaz-O’s magic kit. I held it up
in front of Foz and Ginny. “First,” I began in my magician voice, “gaze deeply
into the magic trove.”
I held the bag near their faces. They stared at it. I yanked it open.
Kaboom! It made the exploding sound, just as it did the first time I opened
it.
Ginny and Foz fell off their chairs!
“What happened?” Foz moaned, clutching his head. “That thing blew up in
my face!”
I cracked up. “It’s only a sound effect,” I explained.
“Not funny,” Ginny complained.
“You should have seen your faces,” I said gleefully. I reached into the black
sack that held the three shells and the red ball. I set the shells in a row on a small
table.
“Watch closely,” I said. I held up the red ball. “See this ball? I’ll place it
under one of these shells.” I pretended to tuck the ball under the middle shell.
But secretly I palmed the ball and flicked it up my sleeve.
I began moving the shells over the table, shifting their places.
“Keep your eyes on the middle shell,” I instructed. Then I stopped moving
the shells.
“Which shell is the ball under?” I asked.
“That one,” Ginny said, pointing to the shell on the right.
“Are you sure?” I prompted. “Foz, where do you think the ball is?”
“The same one as Ginny,” he said. “I watched it the whole time.”
“If you say so,” I said. I was sure the ball wasn’t under that shell—it wasn’t
under any of them. I felt the ball rubbing against my wrist.
I lifted the shell—and gasped. There was a ball under there. A red ball, just
like the one I’d palmed.
“I was right!” Ginny crowed. “That’s a stupid trick.”
“But this is impossible!” I cried. I let the first ball fall out of my sleeve. I
had palmed it.
“This is very strange,” I muttered. “Let me try again.”
I dropped the first ball on the floor. I picked up the second ball and
pretended to slip it under a different shell. I palmed the ball and tucked it up my
sleeve again.
“Here we go,” I said, shifting the shells all over the table. I slid the shells
around a little longer, then stopped.
“The ball is under the first shell,” Foz said.
“Yes, the first shell,” Ginny agreed.
“This time you’re wrong!” I cried. I lifted the first shell. Another red ball!
Ginny sneered. “You’re a real ace, Tim.”
“Wait a second,” I said. I lifted up the other two shells. All three of them
had red balls under them!
“This isn’t working at all,” I grumbled. I set the shells down, then lifted
them again. More balls! There were now three balls under each shell!
“This isn’t the shell game I know.” I was mystified. “This must be some
other trick.”
“It’s way better than your dumb trick,” Ginny said. “Those balls are coming
out of nowhere!”
The shells began to dance as balls bubbled out of them like popcorn. Ten
balls. Twenty balls.
Little red balls covered the table and bounced to the floor.
“They’re still coming!” Foz cried in amazement. “We’re going to be up to
our necks in red balls!”
“How do I stop this thing?” I wondered.
Can I stop it?
21
I snatched up the shells and tossed them into their black sack. Then I grabbed all
the red balls I could and stuffed them in, too.
“Help me, you guys!” I pleaded.
Ginny and Foz fell to their knees, gathering up red balls. We shoved them
all into the sack. I pulled the string that closed it and dropped it into the magic
kit.
The black sack kept bubbling. Red balls started bursting out of it.
“Stop that!” I yelled. I reached into the magic case and pulled out the first
thing I touched. Then I snapped the case shut.
“I don’t really get that trick,” Ginny complained.
“Here’s another trick,” I said. “This one will be better.” In my hand I held a
flattened top hat. “Let’s see what this does.”
I punched the top hat open and placed it on my head.
“It’s just a hat,” Foz said, fidgeting. “It’s kind of hot up here. Can we go
down to the kitchen and get something to eat?”
“You guys don’t get it,” I said. “This is Amaz-O’s magic case! Okay, so I
don’t know how anything works yet. Once we figure it out, we could put on the
best magic show ever! I could become a famous magician!”
“And I could be a famous magician’s sister.” Ginny yawned. “Big deal.”
“That hat looks way cool on you,” Foz said. “Now can we get something to
eat?”
“I’m hungry, too,” Ginny added.
“Wait!” I cried. I felt something move under the hat. I whipped it off.
“A white dove!” Foz cried.
“That’s a good trick,” Ginny admitted.
I shook the dove off my head. “How do you get it back in the hat?” I asked.
Before I had a chance to try, another dove popped out of the hat.
I set the second dove on the floor. “There’s another one!” Foz shouted.
A third dove flew out of the hat and settled on top of an old lamp. Out
popped a fourth, and a fifth…
Foz started laughing. “These tricks are totally out of control!”
“This is no joke, Foz!” I snapped.
“We’re going to be in major trouble,” Ginny warned. “We’ve got to find a
way to get rid of these birds!”
The attic was quickly filling up with flapping, fluttering doves—and they
kept coming. I knew we had to get rid of them—but how?
“Maybe there’s something in here that will help.” I ripped open the magic
case. Kaboom! It made that stupid exploding sound again. Dozens of little red
balls flew into my face.
“I’m really getting sick of this,” I muttered.
I brushed away piles of balls. I pulled out a long black stick with a white
tip. A magic wand!
“Maybe this will help!” I cried. I hoped it would. The attic was a total mess
—white doves and red balls everywhere.
“This is the answer,” I declared. “Amaz-O probably uses this wand to make
the magic stop.”
“I hope you’re right,” Ginny said. “If that doesn’t work, you and I are going
to have to run away from home.”
“It’ll work,” I insisted. “It’s got to.”
I waved the wand in the air. “Stop!” I shouted. “Everything stop!”
22
Did it work?
No.
More doves flew out of the hat. More red balls bubbled out of the black
sack.
“That magic wand is the only thing in there that doesn’t work!” Foz joked.
“Be quiet!” I snapped. “I’ve got to think!”
“Yikes!” Ginny screamed. “A snake!”
She pointed at the magic case. A snake slithered out of it. Then a second, a
third.
The mechanical snakes had come back to life!
Hissing snakes soon covered the floor, wriggling over the bouncing red
balls. Dove feathers fell from the ceiling. The attic was so crowded I could
hardly see across the room.
Ginny yelped as a snake began to crawl up her leg. “Let’s get out of here!”
she cried.
She yanked open the attic door. She and Foz hurried downstairs. I grabbed
the magic case and followed them. A snake slithered after me.
“Get back in there!” I yelled. I picked up the snake and threw it into the
attic room. I shut the door. I pushed on it to make sure it was closed. Then I ran
downstairs and out to the backyard.
A gust of March wind slapped my face. Ginny’s long hair flew out behind
her.
“Snakes—ick!” she squealed. “Tim—what are we going to do? When Mom
and Dad see the attic, we’re dead meat!”
Foz stared at the magic case. “What did you bring that out for? It’s
dangerous!”
“It’s okay if we stay outside,” I told him. “So what if a bunch of birds
comes out? They’ll fly away.”
I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But I couldn’t give Amaz-O’s case
back without seeing everything in it first. I just couldn’t.
“Hurry up, Tim,” Ginny whined. “I’m starving. It’s lunchtime!”
“Wait. Wait.” I opened the magic case. Ka-boom! It didn’t sound so loud
outside—especially with the wind blowing as hard as it was.
I held the magic wand poised between my fingers. What does this thing do?
I wondered.
I waved it around, trying out new magician names. “The Great IncredibleO. Mister Terrifico—that’s not bad. Get out of there, Ginny!” She was
rummaging through the magic kit.
“You promised we’d share it, remember?” she snapped. Then her face
brightened. “Hey! Great!”
She pulled a carrot out of Amaz-O’s bag. “Just what I needed—something
to eat.”
“Put that back!” I ordered.
“It’s still fresh,” she said. “Yum!”
She opened her mouth, ready to bite the carrot.
“Ginny—no!” I cried. “Maybe you shouldn’t eat that. Maybe—”
Ginny never listens to me.
She crunched down on the carrot.
A flash of white light blinded me for a moment.
When my eyes focused, I saw the most amazing thing I’d ever seen in my
life!
23
The carrot dropped to the grass. Ginny’s nose twitched. Then she began to
shrink.
As she shrank, her hair turned from blond to white. Her nose turned pink.
White fur and whiskers sprouted from her face. She grew smaller, furrier,
whiter….
“I don’t believe it!” Foz gasped. “Your sister—she’s a rabbit!”
Ginny sat on the grass, twitching her little pink nose. She stared at me with
her rabbity eyes. She waved her little paws and made angry, rabbity noises.
“Man, she is steamed!” Foz cried.
I was stunned. “I wished it,” I murmured. “And now it’s come true.”
“What are you talking about?” Foz demanded. He grabbed me by the
shoulders. “Get it together, Tim. We’ve got to do something! What’s going to
happen when your parents get home?”
“I told Ginny I’d turn her into a rabbit,” I explained, still dazed. “To get
back at her for ruining all my magic shows. And now she is a rabbit!”
Ginny the rabbit rose on her hind legs, gesturing angrily at me. Then she
bounced up and thumped my shin with one of her big rabbit feet.
“Ow!” I cried. “That hurts as much as one of her karate kicks!”
“Look in the kit, Tim,” Foz urged me. “There’s got to be some way to
change her back.”
“You’re right. There’s got to be!” My eyes fell on the carrot in the grass.
“The carrot,” I said. “When Ginny bit it, she turned into a rabbit. But maybe if a
rabbit bites it, it turns into a girl!”
Foz shook his head. “Huh?”
I snatched up the carrot. “We’ve got to try it. There’s nothing to lose, right?
She’s already a rabbit. What else could happen to her?”
I shoved the end of the carrot toward Ginny’s mouth. “Come on, Ginny.
Take another bite.”
She stared at the carrot suspiciously. She clamped her mouth shut and
turned her face away.
“You little brat!” I shouted. “You want me to get in trouble, don’t you! You
want to stay a rabbit just to get me in trouble!”
Foz grabbed the carrot out of my hand. “Calm down, Tim. You’re scaring
her!”
Ginny’s long rabbit ears perked up—she heard something. I heard it, too. A
car coming. Pulling into the driveway!
“Hurry, Ginny!” I cried. “I think Mom and Dad are home. Take a bite of the
carrot. It’ll turn you back into a girl. I know it will!”
Ginny eyed me suspiciously. She sniffed the carrot with her twitchy pink
nose.
“Hurry!” I shouted again.
She opened her mouth and took a nibble of carrot.
Foz and I watched her in a panic. “Please let it work,” I prayed. “Please let
it work!”
24
Ginny’s rabbit nose twitched. Her ears stood straight up. Then they flopped
down.
Nothing happened. She was still a rabbit.
“Mom and Dad!” I cried. “They’re here! Foz—stay with Ginny. If Mom
and Dad ask, say she’s your sister’s rabbit!”
I ran to the driveway. A car was backing out—not Mom and Dad. Just
somebody turning around in our driveway.
Whew. Close one.
The wind gusted as I ran back to Foz and Ginny. Foz was on his knees,
digging through the magic kit. Ginny hopped up and down impatiently.
The magic wand lay in the grass. Maybe this will work now, I hoped,
picking it up. I’ve got to change her back!
I waved the wand over Ginny. “Turn my sister back into a girl!” I cried.
Nothing.
“Maybe you need to say the spell in a rhyme,” Foz suggested. “Magicians
always do that.”
“Okay.” I waved the wand again. “Let me think…. Magic wand, winds that
whirl, turn Ginny back into a girl!”
The wand began to shake. “Something’s happening!” I shouted.
The white tip of the wand broke open. Out popped a white silk
handkerchief.
“Wow!” Foz gasped. A blue one flew out, then a red one, then a yellow one.
The wind blew them away before I could catch them.
I turned back to Ginny. Still a rabbit.
“It didn’t work,” I said unhappily. I tossed the wand into the grass. “It only
makes stupid handkerchiefs.”
I crossed over to the magic case. Ginny leaped at me, trying to bite my leg.
“Watch out!” I warned her. “I’m trying to help you!”
She twitched her nose in disgust.
Foz moved aside as I dove into the magic kit. I dumped everything out. A
slip of paper tumbled out of a pocket in the case.
I snatched it up. At the top of the paper I saw the word INSTRUCTIONS.
“Look!” I cried. “Instructions!” I patted Ginny between the ears. “I’ll have
you back to normal in a second.”
I raised the paper to read what it said. “‘Instructions. To use the magic top
hat…’ No. That’s not what I need right now….”
“Hurry, Tim!” Foz said.
I scanned the paper, searching for anything about rabbits. “Here’s
something!” I announced. “‘The magic carrot…’”
Just then a strong gust of wind blasted across the yard. The paper flew out
of my hands.
“No!” I shouted, grasping for the paper. “I need that!” I watched helplessly
as it flew out of my reach—high up into the sky.
25
“Get that paper!” I screamed. The wind blew it across the yard. I darted after it.
Foz zoomed ahead of me, yelling, “I’ve got it! I’ve got it!” The paper
floated within his reach. He dove for it.
Whoosh! Another strong gust of wind. The paper fluttered away. Foz fell
flat on his face.
I ran past him, following the paper. It blew across my neighbor’s yard.
“Get it!” Foz shouted, racing after me. “It’s headed for the woods!”
The wind died for a minute. The paper settled on the grass.
I pounced on it. But the wind picked up before I landed. The paper blew
away again.
“Rats!” I cried.
“There it goes!” Foz shouted. The paper drifted toward the stream.
The paper floated above the stream, then landed in the water. Foz zipped
across the yard to grab it.
“Don’t let it get wet!” I screamed.
Too late. The paper was soaked.
“I’ve got it!” Foz shouted. He leaned over the stream and snatched at the
paper. But the current carried it away.
Foz and I chased it down the stream, panting. But we couldn’t run as fast as
the current.
“It’s getting away,” I huffed. A few seconds later we lost sight of it.
Foz and I collapsed on the ground.
“That’s it,” I groaned. “We’ll never get it back now. So how do I turn Ginny
back into a girl?”
Foz heaved himself to his feet and pulled me up by the hand. “Don’t panic,
Tim. Panicking isn’t going to help.”
Great advice.
We hurried back to Ginny. I hoped maybe she’d magically turned back into
a girl while we were gone. No such luck.
Ginny knew we hadn’t found the instructions. She bounced around the yard,
squealing angry rabbit squeals.
Foz rubbed his short hair as he watched her. “Boy, she’s really stressed,” he
said.
I fell to my knees to talk to her. “Don’t worry, Ginny,” I soothed. “I’ve got
an idea. I’m going to take you to Amaz-O right now. He’ll turn you back into a
girl. I’m sure he will.”
With one of her long rabbit ears, Ginny flicked my nose. She couldn’t say
“Boi-oi-oing.” She didn’t have to. I knew what she meant.
“Let’s pick this stuff up,” I said to Foz. We began to gather all the tricks off
the grass and pile them into Amaz-O’s magic case. “Amaz-O won’t want to help
us if I don’t give him back his magic kit.”
Foz took my bike, balancing the magic kit on the handlebars. I picked up
Ginny. “Come on, little rabbit sister,” I cooed. She let me pull her up by the back
—then nipped me on the wrist!
“Ow!” I dropped her. “Do you want me to help you or not?”
She hopped up and down angrily. I knew what she was thinking. If I didn’t
change her back into a girl, I’d be in as much trouble as she was. I had no
choice.
I reached for her again. “Don’t bite me this time,” I warned her. “Or I’ll put
a muzzle over that little snout of yours.”
She squirmed in my arms but didn’t bite. I set her in the basket on her bike.
“To Midnight Mansion,” I told Foz. We set off, pedaling hard against the
strong wind.
I rode through town in a daze. Ginny’s long white ears waved in my face.
Amaz-O’s words rang in my ears. “Beat it, punk!” he’d said. I wondered if
he’d really help me.
He’s got to, I told myself. He’ll be glad to get his magic kit back.
I’ll make him help, I decided. I won’t give him the kit until he turns Ginny
back into a girl.
We pulled into the parking lot in front of Midnight Mansion. The old castle
looked just as scary in the daytime as it did at night. There were no floodlights
casting shadows on the stone towers. But the gray, vine-covered walls gave the
place a spooky, abandoned feeling.
I skidded to a stop in front of the mansion. Foz carried the magic kit. I
grabbed Ginny out of the bike basket.
“Behave,” I warned her as we climbed the front steps to the mansion.
“Remember, I’m trying to help you. Don’t go biting me or anything.”
She twitched her nose at me. She lifted her little rabbit lips and bared her
tiny rabbit teeth.
“Go ahead—bite me,” I whispered. “See how you like spending the rest of
your life as a rabbit. You don’t even like lettuce!”
She closed her mouth and twitched her nose again. It doesn’t matter
whether she’s a girl or a rabbit, I thought. Either way she’s a pain in the neck.
We stopped at the top of the steps.
“Oh, no!” I gasped. “I don’t believe it!”
The sign on the front door read SORRY, WE’RE CLOSED.
26
“No!” I cried. I banged my forehead against the door.
Foz said, “This place gives me the creeps. It looks like Count Dracula’s
castle.” He shivered. “Let’s get out of here.”
He set the magic case down. “Amaz-O’s magic kit is so heavy. Do you
think we can leave it by the door?”
I glared at him. “No, we can’t leave it by the door. And we’re not going
home. Not yet.”
I squeezed Ginny in my arms, thinking. “Okay, so the place is closed. But
Amaz-O could be in there, rehearsing or something. Right?”
“He could be, I guess,” Foz said. “But chances are—”
“We’ve got to take that chance,” I insisted. I tried the front door. Locked.
Of course.
“There must be another way in,” I said. “A back door or something.” I
dashed down the steps and around the side of the club.
“Bring the case, Foz!” I ordered.
He followed me, lugging the kit. I kept my eyes peeled for guards.
At the back of the mansion we found a door. I tried it. It opened easily!
We crept inside. We found ourselves in the club’s kitchen. It was long,
narrow, and shiny clean. The lights were off, but we could see by the light from a
window at one end.
Foz paused in front of a huge, stainless steel refrigerator. “I’ll bet they’ve
got some great food in here,” he whispered. “Lemon meringue pie or
something.”
I tugged at his arm. “This is no time for a snack!” I snapped. “Come on!”
We left the kitchen and entered a long, dark hallway. I recognized that hall.
It was the same hallway I’d walked down after my escape from the basement—
the first time Amaz-O let me down.
“There’d better not be a second time,” I muttered under my breath.
We tiptoed down the dark hall. Up ahead I saw the door to Amaz-O’s
dressing room. It was half-open. A dim light spilled out into the hallway.
Yes! I thought to myself. That’s a good sign.
With Ginny in my arms, I crept up to the door. Please, please let him be in
there, I prayed. Please be here, Amaz-O. Please help us.
I stopped in front of the door. I took a deep breath.
“Mr. Amaz-O? Are you here?”
27
No reply.
I tried again. “Mr. Amaz-O? Hello?”
“He’s not here,” Foz said. “Let’s go.”
“Shhh!” I pushed the door open and crept into the dressing room. One small
lamp cast a dim pool of light on the dressing table. The great Amaz-O sat on the
couch, his left side facing the door. He was staring at the wall. He didn’t seem to
notice us.
“Mr. Amaz-O?” I said politely. “It’s me again. The kid you made disappear
in your magic show.”
I thought Amaz-O would turn his head to face us now, but he didn’t. He
didn’t do anything. He just sat there.
Man, I thought. He really hates kids. Or he hates his fans. Or he hates all
people. Or something.
When I become a great magician, I vowed, I won’t be like Amaz-O. I won’t
let my fame go to my head. I’ll be nice to people. This is ridiculous.
I didn’t care what Amaz-O’s problem was. I needed his help—badly. And I
wouldn’t give up until I got it.
I stepped farther into the dressing room. “Mr. Amaz-O, I’m sorry to bother
you. But I really need your help. It’s important.”
Amaz-O didn’t move. He stared at the wall. Silent.
“Do you think he’s asleep?” Foz whispered.
I shrugged. I took another breath and crept closer to the couch.
“I know you told me to beat it,” I said. “I wouldn’t bother you if it wasn’t a
matter of life and death—I swear.”
Still no response. I turned back to Foz, who cowered in the doorway. He
looked as if he were ready to run for it. I waved him into the room.
Foz stepped in. He set the magic kit on the floor, shaking.
I stared at Amaz-O. He ignored me. Who does he think he is? I thought
angrily. He can’t treat me this way! I’m not leaving until he helps me turn Ginny
back into a girl.
I steeled myself and approached the magician. He didn’t look at me. I
tapped him on the shoulder.
He toppled over onto his side. Thunk!
Foz gasped. “Is he—? Is he—?”
I peered at the body on the couch. “He isn’t alive!” I cried. “Amaz-O isn’t
alive!”
“Oh, no!” Foz was wringing his hands in terror. “Oh, no! He’s dead! He’s
dead! Help!”
“He’s not dead,” I said. “He’s a dummy!
“Amaz-O is nothing but a big wooden puppet!”
28
How could it be possible? I stared at the puppet on the couch. I couldn’t resist
touching its cheek—then pinching it—just to be sure.
Oh, wow!
It was true. Amaz-O was made of wood.
Foz sputtered, “But—I saw him on TV. He looked totally real.”
“And I saw him live,” I said. “On stage. I stood right next to him, and he
made me disappear!”
How can this be? I wondered. How can the greatest magician in the world
be a puppet?
“This can’t be the guy you saw,” Foz insisted, poking at the dummy. “This
is probably just a dummy he keeps around for fun. The real Amaz-O has got to
be around here somewhere.”
Rabbit Ginny squirmed angrily in my arms. “Calm down,” I ordered, trying
to pet her.
She growled. I’ve never heard of a rabbit growling before. Only a Ginnyrabbit would growl.
Amaz-O, my idol, I thought bitterly. What a fake he turned out to be. Not
only was he a jerk to me—he’s not even a real person! He’s a puppet!
“What are we going to do?” Foz asked.
I shook my head. I had no idea. “Now I’ll never get Ginny changed back
into a girl,” I said. “Mom and Dad are going to murder me.”
“Why don’t you tell them she ran away?” Foz suggested. “They’ll never
believe you turned her into a rabbit, anyway.”
“Why would she run away?” I demanded. “She was their little darling. She
could do no wrong. I’m the one who should run away.”
Foz lifted the Amaz-O puppet’s head, studying it. “I wonder how this thing
works….” he said.
A low voice suddenly growled, “Hey, punk—I told you to beat it!”
I froze. “Did you say something, Foz?” I asked.
He shook his head, eyes wide. He’d heard the voice, too.
“So beat it! Get out of here!” the voice growled.
I glanced around the room. I didn’t see anyone.
“Did the puppet talk?” I asked Foz.
“I—I don’t think so,” he stammered. “The voice came from the other side
of the room.”
“The puppet didn’t talk, dummy,” the voice grumbled. I turned to find it. I
gazed across the room. Amaz-O’s white rabbit sat on a chair in front of the
dressing table.
“I told you to get lost. Now get lost!” the rabbit growled.
“Tim—did—did you see that?” Foz stammered. “I think that rabbit talked.”
“Of course I talked, stupid,” the rabbit snarled.
“You talked?” I echoed in amazement.
“I guess that thing on the couch isn’t the only dummy in this room,” the
rabbit snapped. “I can do lots of things. I’m a magician.”
Foz and I stared at the rabbit, stunned. Even Ginny stopped squirming in
my arms.
“You’re not a magician,” Foz said. “You’re a rabbit.”
The rabbit’s ears twisted. “Duh. You guys are really quick. You know that?”
“You don’t have to be so mean,” I protested.
“You don’t have to be so stupid,” the rabbit replied. “I may look like a
rabbit. But so does your little sister. Am I right?”
“He’s got a point,” Foz admitted.
“I am the great Amaz-O,” the rabbit announced. “In person. That dummy
on the couch is a puppet I had built to look like me—the old me.”
My jaw fell open. “You’re Amaz-O? What happened to you?”
The rabbit sighed. “It’s a long story. Let’s just say I had a rival—a real
powerful one. A sorcerer, actually.”
Foz gasped. “A sorcerer? Do they really exist?”
“I’m telling you about one, aren’t I?” the rabbit shouted.
“Yes, but—”
“So be quiet and listen to the story,” Amaz-O, the rabbit, grumbled. “If
you’d stop talking you might learn something.”
Amaz-O sure was a grouch.
“Anyway, long story short,” Amaz-O went on. “This sorcerer guy—Frank
—”
“A sorcerer named Frank?” I cut in. I didn’t mean to interrupt. It just
slipped out.
The rabbit glared at me. “Yes, a sorcerer named Frank. You got a problem
with that?”
I shook my head.
“Can I finish talking now? You got any more stupid questions?”
Foz and I both shook our heads.
“This guy’s named Foz—” Amaz-O gestured toward Foz “—and you want
to make fun of a guy named Frank.”
“I’m sorry,” I said. “I didn’t mean to make fun of Frank.”
“He’s a very powerful guy,” Amaz-O said. “I’m proof of that.”
The rabbit hopped out of the chair, crossed the dressing room, and sat on
the couch next to the dummy.
“Here’s what happened,” he began. “I was at the height of my fame. I was
the most brilliant magician in the world. I made appearances on all the top TV
shows. I had millions of fans. Dopey little kids like you looked up to me.”
“Hey!” I protested. “Stop calling us dopey.”
Amaz-O ignored me. He continued, “My tricks were the most amazing
anyone had ever seen. And Frank was jealous. He was a sorcerer, working alone
in a basement. He could cast amazing spells—but he was kind of ugly, with a
high-pitched voice. People didn’t take him seriously.
“He wanted to be famous like me, but he wasn’t. So he turned me into a
rabbit. Very funny, right? Ha ha. Turn the magician into a rabbit. Yuk, yuk, yuk.”
Foz and I exchanged baffled glances. Amaz-O was turning out to be a little
weird.
“I’m not powerful enough to reverse Frank’s spell,” Amaz-O went on. “I’m
a magician, not a sorcerer. But I refused to let him stop me. So I built that
mechanical dummy over there. I made him look just like me. And I kept on
doing my shows, just as before.”
“So you control the puppet?” Foz asked. “You make it look as if he’s the
magician, performing all the tricks?”
“I just said that, didn’t I?” Amaz-O snapped. “Are you hard-of-hearing,
kid?”
“You’re really rude, you know that, Amaz-O?” I said. I was getting sick of
his put-downs. “You’re the rudest person—or rabbit, or whatever—I ever met in
my life!”
Amaz-O’s long ears drooped. “Hey—I’m sorry,” he said. “Being a rabbit
gets on my nerves. But also, I can’t let people get too close—you know? I don’t
want anyone to find out my secret. It could ruin me.”
Ginny squirmed in my arms again. I’d nearly forgotten all about her. I
realized I’d better hurry up and ask Amaz-O to help me change her back.
“We’re in terrible trouble, Amaz-O,” I said, holding Ginny toward him.
“This is my sister, Ginny. She ate some of the carrot that was in your magic kit
—”
“So you confess, do you? You stole my magic kit!”
“I—I only borrowed it,” I stammered. “I brought it back—see? I’m sorry.”
“I’ll bet you are,” Amaz-O snapped.
“Can you help us, Amaz-O?” I pleaded. “Please, can you help me turn
Ginny back into a girl?”
Amaz-O studied Ginny with his beady rabbit eyes. I held my breath waiting
for his answer.
He settled deeper into the couch and shook his head. “Sorry,” he said.
“There’s nothing I can do for her.”
29
“Noooo!” I moaned, sinking into a chair. “You were my last chance. I’m
doomed!”
“You didn’t let me finish,” Amaz-O said. “There’s nothing I can do for her
—because the magic will wear off by itself.”
“Yo! All right!” Foz exclaimed happily. He shot both fists into the air.
“But when?” I asked. “My parents are coming home soon.”
“How many bites of the carrot did she eat?” Amaz-O asked.
“Two,” I replied.
“How long ago?”
“About an hour ago,” I answered.
“Okay,” Amaz-O said. “She should turn back into a girl in half an hour. Do
you feel better now?”
I nodded and sighed with relief. That was a close one, I thought. But
everything is going to be okay.
“Hey—” Foz said, jumping up. “We’d better hurry up and take Ginny home
—before she turns back into a girl. We don’t have enough bikes to go around!”
I pushed Ginny into his arms. “Take her home, Foz,” I said. “I’ll be there in
a few minutes.” I wanted to talk to Amaz-O a little longer.
Clutching Ginny in his arms, Foz hurried out of the dressing room. “Don’t
stay too long,” he called over his shoulder. “I don’t want to be alone with Ginny
when she turns back into a girl. I have a feeling she’s going to be in the mood to
karate-chop somebody!”
In reply, Ginny beat her hind legs against his chest.
“I’m right behind you,” I promised. Foz disappeared down the dark
hallway.
“Listen, Amaz-O,” I said. “I’m really sorry I stole your magic bag. I know
it was a terrible thing to do.”
“Shove this stupid dummy aside and sit down on the couch,” Amaz-O said.
I moved the dummy and sat down next to Amaz-O.
“You really love magic, don’t you?” he said.
My heart started pounding. This was the heart-to-heart magician talk I’d
been hoping to have with Amaz-O all along!
“It’s my dream to be a magician,” I told him. “A great magician like you.
I’d do anything. Anything!”
“Well, you were great in the show the other night,” Amaz-O said. “You
disappeared very well, kid.”
“Thanks.”
Amaz-O sat quietly for a moment. He seemed to be thinking.
“Say, kid—” he said at last. “How would you like to join the act? I’m
getting really tired of working with that big wooden dummy over there.”
“Me?” Now my heart was really racing. “You want me to join the act?” I
got so excited I jumped off the couch. Then I quickly sat down again. “Do you
mean it, Amaz-O? Do you think I could?”
Amaz-O hopped over to the dressing room door. He kicked it shut.
“Why don’t we give you a try….”
30
And that’s how I joined Amaz-O’s act. I was so excited about being a magician,
I said yes without even thinking about it. I guess I should’ve asked a few
questions first.
Don’t get me wrong. I love being on stage in front of clapping, cheering
audiences.
But I don’t like hiding inside the black top hat. And I hate it when the
Amaz-O dummy pulls me up too hard by the ears. That really hurts.
I also hate it when they forget to clean my cage. Sometimes they forget
about it for days!
I guess I made a little mistake. See, when Amaz-O said he was tired of
working with the big dummy, I thought he wanted me to take the dummy’s
place.
I didn’t realize he wanted to retire—and have me take his place!
I’m not complaining. Amaz-O gives me plenty of juicy lettuce and all the
carrots I can eat. I even have a stage name of my own now. At last. It may not be
my first choice, but it’s still a professional name—“Fluffy.”
The best part is, I’m on stage every night in a real magic act! My dream—
my all-time dream!
How many kids—er—I mean, rabbits—can say their all-time dream came
true at age twelve?
I’m really lucky—don’t you agree?
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

EGG MONSTERS
FROM MARS
Goosebumps - 42
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
My sister, Brandy, asked for an egg hunt for her tenth birthday party. And
Brandy always gets what she wants.
She flashes her smile, the one that makes the dimples pop up in her cheeks.
And she puts on her little baby face. Opens her green eyes wide and tugs at her
curly red hair. “Please? Please? Can I have an egg hunt at my party?”
No way Mom and Dad can ever say no to her.
If Brandy asked for a red, white, and blue ostrich for her birthday, Dad
would be out in the garage right now, painting an ostrich.
Brandy is good at getting her way. Real good. I’m her older brother, Dana
Johnson. And I admit it. Even I have trouble saying no to Brandy.
I’m not little and cute like my sister. I have straight black hair that falls over
my forehead. And I wear glasses. And I’m a little chubby. “Dana, don’t look so
serious.” That’s what Mom is always telling me.
“Dana has an old soul,” Grandma Evelyn always says.
I don’t really know what that means. I guess she means I’m more serious
than most twelve-year-olds.
Maybe that’s true. I’m not really serious all the time. I’m just curious about
a lot of things. I’m very interested in science. I like studying bugs and plants and
animals. I have an ant farm in my room. And two tarantulas.
And I have my own microscope. Last night I studied a toenail under the
microscope. It was a lot more interesting than you might think.
I want to be a research scientist when I’m older. I’ll have my own lab, and
I’ll study anything I want to.
Dad is a kind of chemist. He works for a perfume company. He mixes
things together to make new smells. He calls them fragrances.
Before Mom met Dad, she worked in a lab. She did things with white rats.
So both of my parents are happy that I’m into science. They encourage me.
But that doesn’t mean they give me whatever I ask for.
If I asked Dad for a red, white, and blue ostrich for my birthday, do you
know what he’d say? He’d say, “Go play with your sister’s!”
Anyway, Brandy asked for an egg hunt for her birthday. Her birthday is a
week before Easter, so it wasn’t a crazy idea.
We have a very large backyard. It stretches all the way back to a small,
trickling creek.
The yard is filled with bushes and trees and flower beds. And there’s a big
old doghouse, even though we don’t have a dog.
Lots of good egg-hiding places.
So Brandy got her egg hunt. She invited her entire class.
You may not think that egg hunts are exciting.
But Brandy’s was.
Brandy’s birthday came on a warm and sunny day. Only a few small cumulus
clouds high in the sky. (I study clouds.)
Mom hurried out to the backyard after breakfast, lugging a big bucket of
eggs. “I’ll help you hide them,” I told her.
“That wouldn’t be fair, Dana,” Mom replied. “You’re going to be in the egg
hunt too—remember?”
I almost forgot. Brandy usually doesn’t want me hanging around when her
friends come over. But today she said that I could be in the egg hunt. And so
could my best friend, Anne Gravel.
Anne lives in the house next door. My mom is best friends with Anne’s
mom. Mrs. Gravel agreed to let Mom hide eggs all over their backyard too. So
it’s only fair that Anne gets to join in.
Anne is tall and skinny, and has long red-brown hair. She’s nearly a head
taller than me. So everyone thinks she’s older. But she’s twelve too.
Anne is very funny. She’s always cracking jokes. She makes fun of me
because I’m so serious. But I don’t mind. I know she’s only joking.
That afternoon Anne and I stood on the driveway and watched the kids
from Brandy’s class arrive at the party. Brandy handed each one of them a little
straw basket.
They were really excited when Brandy told them about the egg hunt. And
the girls got even more excited when Brandy told them the grand prize—one of
those expensive American Girl dolls.
Of course the boys started to grumble. Brandy should have had a prize a
boy might like. Some of the boys started using their baskets as Frisbees. And
others began wrestling in the grass.
“I was a lot more sophisticated when I was ten,” I muttered to Anne.
“When you were ten, you liked Ninja Turtles,” Anne replied, rolling her
eyes.
“I did not!” I protested.
“Yes, you did,” Anne insisted. “You wore a Ninja Turtle T-shirt to school
every day.”
I kicked some gravel across the driveway. “Just because I wore the shirt
doesn’t mean I liked them,” I replied.
Anne flung back her long hair. She sneered at me. I hate it when Anne
sneers at me. “You had Ninja Turtle cups and plates at your tenth birthday party,
Dana. And a Ninja Turtle tablecloth. And we played some kind of Ninja Turtle
Pizza Pie-throwing game.”
“But that doesn’t mean I liked them!” I declared.
Three more girls from Brandy’s class came running across the lawn. I
recognized them. They were the girls I call the Hair Sisters. They’re not sisters.
But they spend all their time in Brandy’s room after school doing each other’s
hair.
Dad moved slowly across the grass toward them. He had his camcorder up
to his face. The three Hair Sisters waved to the camera and yelled, “Happy
Birthday, Brandy!”
Dad tapes all our birthdays and vacations and big events. He keeps the tapes
on a shelf in the den. We never watch them.
The sun beamed down. The grass smelled sweet and fresh. The spring
leaves on the trees were just starting to unfurl.
“Okay—everyone follow me to the back!” Brandy ordered.
The kids lined up in twos and threes, carrying their baskets. Anne and I
followed behind them. Dad walked backwards, busily taping everything.
Brandy led the way to the backyard. Mom was waiting there. “The eggs are
hidden everywhere,” Mom announced, sweeping her hand in the air.
“Everywhere you can imagine.”
“Okay, everyone!” Brandy cried. “At the count of three, the egg hunt
begins! One—”
Anne leaned down and whispered in my ear. “Bet you five dollars I collect
more eggs than you.”
I smiled. Anne always knows how to make things more interesting.
“Two—”
“You’ve got a bet!” I told her.
“Three!” Brandy called.
The kids all cheered. The hunt for hidden eggs was on.
They all began hurrying through the backyard, bending down to pick up
eggs. Some of them moved on hands and knees through the grass. Some worked
in groups. Some searched through the yard on their own.
I turned and saw Anne stooping down, moving quickly along the side of the
garage. She already had three eggs in her basket.
I can’t let her win! I told myself. I sprang into action.
I ran past a cluster of girls around the old doghouse. And I kept moving.
I wanted to find an area of my own. A place where I could grab up a bunch
of eggs without having to compete with the others.
I jogged across the tall grass, making my way to the back. I was all alone,
nearly to the creek, when I started my search.
I spotted an egg hidden behind a small rock. I had to move fast. I wanted to
win the bet.
I bent down, picked it up, and quickly dropped it into my basket.
Then I knelt down, set my basket on the ground, and started to search for
more eggs.
But I jumped up when I heard a scream.
2
“Aaaaaiiiiii!”
The scream rang through the air.
I turned back toward the house. One of the Hair Sisters was waving her
hand wildly, calling to the other girls. I grabbed up my basket and ran toward
her.
“They’re not hard-boiled!” I heard her cry as I came closer. And I saw the
drippy yellow yolk running down the front of her white T-shirt.
“Mom didn’t have time to hard-boil them,” Brandy announced. “Or to paint
them. I know it’s weird. But there just wasn’t time.”
I raised my eyes to the house. Mom and Dad had both disappeared inside.
“Be careful,” Brandy warned her party guests. “If you crack them—”
She didn’t finish her sentence. I heard a wet splat.
Then laughter.
A boy had tossed an egg against the side of the doghouse.
“Cool!” one of the girls exclaimed.
Anne’s big sheepdog, Stubby, came running out of the doghouse. I don’t
know why he likes to sleep in there. He’s almost as big as the house.
But I didn’t have time to think about Stubby.
Splat.
Another egg exploded, this time against the garage wall.
More laughter. Brandy’s friends thought it was really hilarious.
“Egg fight! Egg fight!” two boys started to chant.
I ducked as an egg went sailing over my head. It landed with a craaack on
the driveway.
Eggs were flying everywhere now. I stood there and gaped in amazement.
I heard a shrill shriek. I spun around to see that two of the Hair Sisters had
runny yellow egg oozing in their hair. They were shouting and tugging at their
hair and trying to pull the yellow gunk off with both hands.
Splat! Another egg hit the garage.
Craaack! Eggs bounced over the driveway.
I ducked down and searched for Anne. She probably went home, I figured.
Anne enjoys a good laugh. But she’s twelve, much too sophisticated for a
babyish egg fight.
Well, when I’m wrong, I’m wrong.
“Think fast, Dana!” Anne screamed from behind me. I threw myself to the
ground just in time. She heaved two eggs at once. They both whirred over my
head and dropped onto the grass with a sickening crack.
“Stop it! Stop it!” I heard Brandy shrieking desperately. “It’s my birthday!
Stop it! It’s my birthday!”
Thunk! Somebody hit Brandy in the chest with an egg.
Wild laughter rang out. Sticky yellow puddles covered the back lawn.
I raised my eyes to Anne. She was grinning back at me, about to let me
have it again.
Time for action. I reached into my basket and pulled out the one and only
egg I had picked up.
I raised it high above my head. Started to throw—but stopped.
The egg.
I lowered it and stared at it.
Stared hard at it.
Something was wrong with the egg.
Something was terribly wrong.
3
The egg was too big. Bigger than a normal egg. About the size of a softball.
I held it carefully, studying it. The color wasn’t right either. It wasn’t eggcolored. That creamy off-white. And it wasn’t brown.
The egg was pale green. I raised it to the sunlight to make sure I was seeing
correctly.
Yes. Green.
And what were those thick cracks up and down the shell?
I ran my pointer finger over the dark, jagged lines.
No. Not cracks. Some kind of veins. Blue-and-purple veins crisscrossing
the green eggshell.
“Weird!” I muttered out loud.
Brandy’s friends were shouting and shrieking. Eggs were flying all around
me. An egg splattered over my sneakers. The yellow yolk oozed over my laces.
But I didn’t care.
I rolled the strange egg over and over slowly between my hands. I brought
it close to my face and squinted hard at the blue-and-purple veins.
“Ooh.” I let out a low cry when I felt it pulsing.
The veins throbbed. I could feel a steady beat.
Thud. Thud. Thud.
“Oh wow. It’s alive!” I cried.
What had I found? It was totally weird. I couldn’t wait to get it to my
worktable and examine it.
But first I had to show it to Anne.
“Anne! Hey—Anne!” I called and started jogging toward her, holding the
egg high in both hands.
I was staring at the egg. So I didn’t see Stubby, her big sheepdog, run in
front of me.
“Whooooa!”
I let out a cry as I fell over the dog.
And landed with a sickening crunch on top of my egg.
4
I jumped up quickly. Stubby started to lick my face. That dog has the worst
breath!
I shoved him away and bent down to examine my egg.
“Hey!” I cried out in amazement. The egg wasn’t broken. I picked it up
carefully and rolled it in my hands.
Not a crack.
What a tough shell! I thought. My chest had landed on top of the egg.
Pushed it into the ground. But the shell hadn’t broken.
I wrapped my hands around the big egg as if soothing it.
I could feel the blue-and-purple veins pulsing.
Is something inside getting ready to hatch? I wondered. What kind of bird
was inside it? Not a chicken, I knew. This was definitely not a hen’s egg. Splat!
Another egg smacked the side of the garage.
Kids were wrestling in the runny puddles of yolk on the grass. I turned in
time to see a boy crack an egg over another boy’s head.
“Stop it! Stop it!”
Brandy was screaming at the top of her lungs, trying to stop the egg fight
before every single egg was smashed. I turned and saw Mom and Dad running
across the yard.
“Hey, Anne—!” I called. I climbed to my feet, holding the weird egg
carefully. Anne was frantically tossing eggs at three girls. The girls were
bombarding her. Three to one—but Anne wasn’t retreating.
“Anne—check this out!” I called, hurrying over to her. “You won’t believe
this egg!”
I stepped up beside her and held the egg out to her.
“No! Wait—!” I cried.
Too late.
Anne grabbed my egg and heaved it at the three girls.
5
“No—stop!” I wailed.
As I stared in horror, one of the three girls caught the egg in midair—and
tossed it back.
I dove for it, making a headfirst slide. And grabbed the egg in one hand
before it hit the gravel.
Was it broken?
No.
This shell must be made of steel! I told myself. I pulled myself to my feet,
gripping the egg carefully. To my surprise, it felt hot. Burning hot.
“Whoa!” I nearly dropped it.
Throb. Throb. Throb.
It pulsed rapidly. I could feel the veins beating against my fingers.
I wanted to show the egg to Mom and Dad. But they were busy breaking up
the egg fight.
Dad’s face was bright red. He was shouting at Brandy and pointing to the
yellow stains up and down the side of the garage.
Mom was trying to calm down two girls who were crying. They had egg
yolk stuck to their hair and all over their clothes. They even had it stuck to their
eyebrows. I guess that’s why they were crying.
Behind them Stubby was having a feast. He was running around in circles,
lapping up egg after egg from the grass, his bushy tail wagging like crazy.
What a party!
I decided to take my weird egg inside. I wanted to study it later. Maybe I’d
break off a tiny piece of shell and look at it under the microscope. Then I’d make
a tiny hole in the shell and try to see inside.
Throb. Throb.
The veins pounded against my hand. The egg still felt hot.
It might be a turtle egg, I decided. I walked carefully to the house, cradling
it in both hands.
One morning last fall, Anne found a big box turtle on the curb in front of
her house. She carried it into her backyard and called me over. She knew I’d
want to study it.
It was a pretty big turtle. About the size of a lunch box. Anne and I
wondered how it got to her curb.
Up in my room I had a book about turtles. I knew the book would help me
identify it. I had hurried home to get the book. But Mom wouldn’t let me go
back out. I had to stay inside and have lunch.
When I got back to Anne’s backyard, the turtle had vanished. I guess it
wandered away.
Turtles can be pretty fast when they want to be.
As I carried my treasure into the house, I thought it might be a turtle egg.
But why was it so hot? And why did it have those yucky veins all over it?
Eggs don’t have veins—do they?
I hid the egg in my dresser drawer. I surrounded it with my balled-up socks
to protect it. Then I closed the drawer slowly, carefully, and returned to the
backyard.
Brandy’s guests were all leaving as I stepped outside. They were covered in
sticky eggs. They didn’t look too happy.
Brandy didn’t look too happy, either. Dad was busy shouting at her, angrily
waving his arms, pointing to the gloppy egg stains all over the lawn.
“Why did you let this happen?” he screamed at her. “Why didn’t you stop
it?”
“I tried!” Brandy wailed. “I tried to stop it!”
“We’ll have to have the garage painted,” Mom murmured, shaking her
head. “How will we ever mow the lawn?”
“This was the worst party I ever had!” Brandy cried. She bent down and
pulled chunks of eggshell from her sneaker laces. Then she glared up at Mom.
“It’s all your fault!”
“Huh?” Mom gasped. “My fault?”
“You didn’t hard-boil the eggs,” Brandy accused. “So it’s all your fault.”
Mom started to protest—but bit her lip instead.
Brandy stood up and tossed the bits of eggshell to the ground. She flashed
Mom her best dimpled smile. “Next year for my birthday, can we have a Make
Your Own Ice-Cream Sundae party?”
That evening I wanted to study my weird green egg. But we had to go visit
Grandma Evelyn and Grandpa Harry and take them out to dinner. They always
make a big fuss about Brandy’s birthday.
First, Brandy had to open her presents. Grandma Evelyn bought her a pair
of pink fuzzy slippers that Brandy will never wear. She’ll probably give them to
Stubby as chew toys.
Brandy opened the biggest box next. She pulled out a pair of pink-andwhite pajamas. Brandy made a big fuss about them and said she really needed
pajamas. She did a pretty good acting job.
But how excited can you get over pajamas?
Her last present was a twenty-five-dollar gift certificate to the CD store at
the mall. Nice present. “I’ll go with you to make sure you don’t pick out
anything lame,” I offered.
Brandy pretended she didn’t hear me.
She gave our grandparents big hugs. Brandy is a big hugger. Then we all
went out for dinner at the new Italian restaurant on the corner.
What did we talk about at dinner? Brandy’s wild birthday party. When we
told Grandma and Grandpa about the egg fight, they laughed and laughed.
It wasn’t so funny in the afternoon. But a few hours later at dinner, we all
had to admit it was pretty funny. Even Dad managed a smile or two.
I kept thinking about the egg in my dresser drawer. When we got back
home, would I find a baby turtle on my socks?
Dinner stretched on and on. Grandpa Harry told all of his funny golfing
stories. He tells them every time we visit. We always laugh anyway.
We didn’t return home till really late. Brandy fell asleep in the car. And I
could barely keep my eyes open.
I slunk up to my room and changed into pajamas. Then, with a loud yawn, I
turned off the light. I knew I’d fall asleep the moment my head hit the pillow.
I fluffed my pillow the way I liked it. Then I slid into bed and pulled the
quilt up to my chin.
I started to settle my head on the pillow when I heard the sound.
Thump. Thump. Thump.
Steady like a heartbeat. Only louder.
Much louder.
THUMP. THUMP. THUMP.
So loud, I could hear the dresser drawers rattling.
I sat straight up. Wide awake now. I stared through the darkness to my
dresser.
THUMP. THUMP. THUMP.
I turned and lowered my feet to the floor.
Should I open the dresser drawer?
I sat in the darkness, trembling with excitement. With fear.
Listening to the steady thud.
Should I open the drawer and check it out?
Or should I run as far away as I could?
6
Thump, thump, THUMP.
I had to see what was happening in my dresser drawer.
Had the egg hatched? Was the turtle bumping up against the sides of the
drawer, trying to climb out?
Was it a turtle?
Or was it something weird?
Suddenly I felt very afraid of it.
I took a deep breath and rose to my feet. My legs felt rubbery and weak as I
made my way across the room. My mouth was suddenly as dry as cotton.
Thump, THUMP, thump.
I clicked on the light. Blinked several times, struggling to force my eyes to
focus.
The steady thuds grew louder as I approached the dresser.
Heartbeats, I told myself.
Heartbeats of the creature inside the egg.
I grabbed the drawer handles with both hands. Took another deep breath.
Dana, this is your last chance to run away, I warned myself.
This is your last chance to leave the drawer safely closed.
Thump, thump, thump, thump, thump.
I tugged open the drawer and peered inside.
I stared in, amazed that nothing had changed. The egg sat exactly where I
had left it. The blue-and-purple veins along the shell pulsed as before.
Feeling a little calmer, I picked it up.
“Ouch!”
I nearly dropped it. The shell was burning hot.
I cupped it in my hands and blew on it. “This is so totally weird,” I
murmured to myself.
Mom and Dad have to see it, I decided. Right now. Maybe they can tell me
what it is.
They were still awake. I could hear them talking in their room down the
hall.
I carried the egg carefully, cradling it in both hands. I had to knock on their
door with my elbow. “It’s me,” I said.
“Dana, what is it?” Dad demanded grumpily. “It’s been a long day. We’re
all very tired.”
I pushed open their door a crack. “I have an egg I want to show you,” I
started.
“No eggs!” they both cried at once.
“Haven’t we seen enough eggs for one day?” Mom griped.
“It’s a very strange egg,” I insisted. “I can’t identify it. I think—”
“Good night, Dana,” Dad interrupted.
“Please don’t ever mention eggs again,” Mom added. “Promise?”
“Well, I…” I stared down at the pulsing green egg in my hand. “It’ll only
take a second. If you’ll just—”
“Dana!” Dad yelled. “Why don’t you go sit on it and hatch it?”
“Clark—don’t talk to Dana that way!” Mom scolded.
“He’s twelve years old. He can take a joke,” Dad protested.
They started arguing about how Dad should talk to me.
I muttered good night and started back to my room.
I mean, I can take a hint.
Thump. Thump. The egg pulsed in my hand.
I had a sudden impulse to crack it open and see what was inside. But of
course I would never do that.
I stopped outside Brandy’s room. I was desperate to show my weird
treasure to somebody. I knocked on her door.
No answer.
I knocked again, a little harder. Brandy is a very heavy sleeper.
Still no answer.
I started to knock a third time—and the door flew open. Brandy greeted me
with an open-mouthed yawn. “What’s wrong? Why’d you wake me?”
“I want to show you this egg,” I told her.
She narrowed her eyes at me. “You’re serious? After what happened at my
party? After the worst birthday party in the history of America, you really want
to show me an egg?”
I held it up. “Yeah. Here it is.”
She slammed the door in my face.
“You mean you don’t want to see it?” I called in.
No reply.
Once again, I could take a hint. I carried the egg back to my room and set it
down carefully in the dresser drawer. Then I closed the drawer and climbed back
into bed.
Thump. Thump. Thump.
I fell asleep to the steady throbbing.
The next morning, I woke up just in time to watch the egg hatch.
7
A loud cracking sound woke me up.
Blinking, I pulled myself up on one elbow. Still half-asleep, I thought I
heard Brandy cracking her knuckles.
That’s one of Brandy’s secret talents. She never does it when adults are
around. But when we’re alone, she can crack out entire symphonies on her
knuckles.
Another loud crack snapped me alert.
The dresser. The noises were coming from my dresser.
I heard a long rip, like Velcro ripping open. Then more cracks. Like
cracking bones.
And I knew it had to be the egg.
My heart started to pound. I leaped up. Grabbed my glasses and slapped
them onto my face. My legs got tangled in the bedsheet, and I nearly went
sprawling over the floor.
I hurtled across the room. The egg was hatching—and I had to be there in
time to watch.
I grabbed the drawer handles and eagerly pulled the drawer open. I was so
eager, I nearly pulled the drawer out of the dresser!
Catching my balance, I gripped the dresser top with both hands and stared
down at the egg.
Craaaaack.
The blue-and-purple veins throbbed. A long, jagged crack split across the
green shell.
Unh unh.
I heard a low grunt from inside the egg. The grunt of a creature working
hard to push out.
Unnnnnh.
What a struggle!
It doesn’t sound like a turtle, I told myself. Is it some kind of exotic bird?
Like a parrot? Or a flamingo maybe?
How would a flamingo egg get in my backyard?
How would any weird egg get in my backyard?
Unnnh unnnnh.
Craaaaack.
The sounds were really gross.
I rubbed my eyes and squinted down at the egg. It was bouncing and
bobbing in the drawer now. Each grunt made the egg move.
The veins throbbed. Another crack split along the front of the shell. And
thick yellow goo poured out into the drawer, seeping onto my socks.
“Yuck!” I cried.
The egg shook. Another crack. More of the thick liquid oozed down the egg
and onto my socks.
The egg bobbed and bounced. I heard more hard grunting. Unnnnh.
Unnnnh. The egg trembled with each grunt.
Yellow slime oozed as the cracks in the shell grew wider. The veins pulsed.
The egg shook.
And then a large triangle of shell broke off. It fell into the drawer.
I leaned closer to stare into the hole in the egg. I couldn’t really see what
was inside. I could see only wet yellow blobby stuff.
Unnh unnnnnh.
Another grunt—and the eggshell crackled and fell apart. Yellow liquid
spilled into the drawer, soaking my socks.
I held my breath as a weird creature pushed itself out of the breaking shell.
A yellow, lumpy thing.
A baby chicken?
No way.
I couldn’t see a head. Or wings. Or feet.
I gripped the dresser top and stared down at it. The strange animal pushed
away the last section of shell. This was amazing!
It rolled wetly over my socks.
A blob. A sticky, shiny yellow blob.
It looked like a pile of very runny scrambled eggs.
Except it had tiny green veins crisscrossing all over it.
My chest felt about to explode. I finally remembered to breathe. I let out my
breath in a long whoosh. My heart was thudding.
The yellow blob throbbed. It made sick, wet sucking sounds.
It turned slowly. And I saw round black eyes near its top.
No head. No face. Just two tiny black eyes on top of the lumpy yellow
body.
“You’re not a chicken,” I murmured out loud. My voice came out in a
choked whisper. “You’re definitely not a chicken.”
But what was it?
“Hey—Mom! Dad!” I shouted.
They had to see this creature. They had to see the scientific discovery of the
century!
“Mom! Dad! Hurry!”
No response.
The lumpy creature stared up at me. Throbbing. Its tiny green veins pulsing.
Its eggy body bouncing.
“Mom? Dad?”
Silence.
I stared into my drawer.
What should I do?
8
I had to show it to Mom and Dad. I carefully closed the dresser drawer so it
couldn’t bounce out and escape. Then I went running downstairs, shouting at the
top of my voice.
My pajama pants were twisted, and I nearly fell down the stairs. “Mom!
Dad! Where are you?”
The house was silent. The vacuum cleaner had been pulled out of the closet.
But no one was around to use it.
I burst into the kitchen. Were they still having breakfast?
“Mom? Dad? Brandy?”
No one there.
Sunlight streamed in through the kitchen window. The breakfast dishes—
three cereal bowls and two coffee cups—were stacked beside the sink.
Where did they go? I wondered, my heart pounding. How could they leave
when I had the most amazing thing in the history of the known universe to show
them?
I turned to leave the kitchen when I saw the note on the refrigerator. It was
written in blue ink in Mom’s handwriting. I snatched it off the magnet and read
it:
“Dad and I took Brandy to her piano lesson. Make yourself some cereal.
Love, M.”
Cereal?
Cereal?
How could I think about cereal at a time like this?
What should I do now?
I leaned my forehead against the cool refrigerator, struggling to think. I
couldn’t leave the throbbing egg blob locked up in the dresser drawer all
morning. Maybe it needed fresh air. Maybe it needed exercise. Maybe it needed
food.
Food? I swallowed hard. What would it eat? What could it eat? It was just a
lump of scrambled eggs with eyes.
I’ve got to take it out of there, I decided. I’ve got to show it to someone.
I thought instantly of Anne.
“Yes!” I exclaimed to myself. I’ll take it next door and show it to Anne. She
has a dog. She’s really good with pets and animals. Maybe she’ll have some idea
of what I should do with it.
I hurried back upstairs and pulled on the jeans and T-shirt I had tossed on
the floor the night before. Then I made my way to the dresser and slid open the
drawer.
“Yuck!”
The egg blob sat in its own yellow slime. Its whole body throbbed. The
tiny, round eyes stared up at me.
“I’m taking you to Anne’s,” I told it. “Maybe the two of us can figure out
what you are.”
Only one problem.
How do I take it there?
I rubbed my chin, staring down at it. Do I carry it on a plate? No. It might
tumble off.
A bowl?
No. A jar?
No. It couldn’t breathe.
A box.
Yes. I’ll put it in a box, I decided. I opened my closet, dropped to my hands
and knees, and shuffled through all the junk piled on the floor.
That’s how I clean my room. I toss everything into the closet and shut the
door. I have the cleanest room in the house. No problem.
The only problem is finding things in my closet. If I’m searching for
something to wear, sometimes it takes a few days.
Today I got lucky. I found what I was looking for right away. It was a shoe
box. The box my new sneakers came in.
I picked up the shoe box from the clutter and climbed to my feet. Then I
kicked a bunch of stuff back into the closet so I could get the door closed.
“Okay!” I cried happily. I returned to the throbbing egg glob. “I’m carrying
you to Anne’s in this box. Ready?”
I didn’t expect it to answer. And it didn’t.
I pulled off the shoe box lid and set it on the dresser top. Then I lowered the
box to the drawer.
“Now what?” I asked myself out loud.
How do I get it in the box? Do I just pick it up?
Pick it up in my hand?
I held the box in my left hand and started to reach into the drawer with my
right. But then I jerked my hand away.
Will it bite me? I wondered.
How can it? It doesn’t have a mouth.
Will it sting me? Will it hurt me somehow?
My throat tightened. My hand started to tremble. It was so gross—so wet
and eggy.
Pick it up, Dana, I told myself. Stop being such a wimp. You’re a scientist
—remember? You have to be bold. You have to be daring.
That’s true, I knew. Scientists can’t back away from something just because
it’s yucky and gross.
I took a deep breath.
I counted to three.
Then I reached for it.
9
As my hand moved toward it, the creature began to tremble. It shook like a glob
of yellow Jell-O.
I pulled back once again.
I can’t do it, I decided. I can’t pick it up barehanded. It might be too
dangerous.
I watched it shake and throb. Wet bubbles formed on its eggy skin.
Is it scared of me? I wondered. Or is it trying to warn me away?
I had to find something to pick it up. I turned and glanced around the room.
My eyes landed on my baseball glove tucked on the top shelf of my bookcase.
Maybe I could pick up the egg creature in the glove and drop it into the
shoe box. I was halfway across the room when I decided I didn’t want to get my
glove all wet and gloppy.
I need to shovel it into the box, I thought.
A little shovel would make the job easy. I walked back to the dresser. The
egg creature was still shaking like crazy. I closed the drawer. Maybe the darkness
will calm it down, I thought.
I made my way down to the basement. Mom and Dad keep all their
gardening supplies down there. I found a small metal trowel and carried it back
up to my room.
When I pulled open the drawer, the eggy blob was still shaking. “Don’t
worry, fella,” I told it. “I’m a scientist. I’ll be real gentle.”
I don’t think it understood English. As I lowered the trowel into the drawer,
the green veins on the throbbing body began to pulse.
The creature started bobbing up and down. The little black eyes bulged up
at me. I had the feeling the little guy was about to explode or something.
“Easy. Easy,” I whispered.
I lowered the trowel carefully beside it. Then I slowly, slowly slid it under
the throbbing creature.
“There. Gotcha,” I said softly.
It wiggled and shook on the blade of the trowel. I began to lift it carefully
from the drawer.
The shoe box sat on the top of the dresser. I had the trowel in my right
hand. I reached for the shoe box with my left.
Up, up. Slowly. Very slowly, I raised the egg creature toward the box.
Up. Up.
Almost to the box.
And the creature growled at me!
A low, gruff growl—like an angry dog.
“Ohhh!” I uttered a startled cry—and the trowel dropped from my hand.
“Yaaiii!” I let out another cry as it clanged across the floor—and the egg
creature plopped wetly onto my sneaker.
“No!”
Without thinking, I bent down and grabbed it up in my hand.
I’m holding it! I realized, my heart pounding.
I’m holding it.
What’s going to happen to me?
10
Nothing happened.
No shock jolted my body. No rash spread instantly over my skin. My hand
didn’t fall off.
The creature felt warm and soft, like runny scrambled eggs.
I realized I was squeezing it tightly. Too tightly? I loosened my grip.
And lowered it into the shoe box. And fastened the lid over the top.
I set the shoe box down on the dresser top and examined my hand. It felt
wet and sticky. But the skin hadn’t turned yellow or peeled off or anything.
I could hear the creature pulsing inside the box.
“Don’t growl like that again,” I told it. “You scared me.”
I grabbed some tissues and wiped off my hand. I kept my eyes on the box.
The creature was bouncing around in there.
What kind of animal is it? I wondered.
I wished Mom and Dad were home. I really, really wanted to show it to
them.
I glanced at the clock radio on my bedside table. Only nine o’clock. Anne
might still be sleeping. Sometimes she slept until noon on Saturdays. I’m not
really sure why. She said it made the day go faster. Anne is a pretty weird girl.
I lifted the box with both hands. The egg creature felt surprisingly heavy. I
made sure the lid was on tight. Then I carried it down the stairs and out the back
door.
It was a sunny, warm day. A soft breeze made the fresh spring leaves
tremble on the trees. Two houses down Mr. Simpson was already mowing his
back lawn. Near the garage two robins were having a tug-of-war over a fat
brown earthworm.
I carried the box to Anne’s back door. The door was open. I peered through
the screen.
“Hi, Dana. Come in,” Anne’s mother called from in front of the sink.
Balancing the box against my chest, I pulled open the screen door and
stepped into the kitchen. Anne sat at the breakfast table. She wore a big blue Tshirt over black bike shorts. Her red-brown hair was tied behind her head in a
long ponytail.
Three guesses what she was eating for breakfast.
You got it. Scrambled eggs.
“Yo, Dana!” she greeted me. “What’s up?”
“Well—”
Mrs. Gravel moved to the stove. “Dana, have you had breakfast? Can I
make you some scrambled eggs?”
My stomach did a flip-flop. I swallowed hard. “No. I don’t think so.”
“Nice fresh eggs,” Mrs. Gravel insisted. “I could make them fried if you
don’t like scrambled.”
“No thanks,” I replied weakly.
I felt the eggy blob bounce inside the box.
“I might need some more,” Anne told her mom, shoveling in a big glob.
“These eggs are great, Mom.”
Mrs. Gravel cracked an egg on the side of the skillet. “Maybe I’ll make one
for myself,” she said.
All this egg talk was making me sick.
Anne finished her orange juice. “Hey—what’s in the box? New sneakers?”
“Uh… no,” I replied. “Check this out, Anne. You won’t believe what I
found.”
I was so eager to show it to her! Holding the box in front of me with both
hands, I started across the kitchen.
And tripped over Stubby.
Again!
That big dumb sheepdog always got underfoot.
“Whooooaaa!” I let out a cry as I fell over the dog—and watched the shoe
box fly into the air.
I landed on top of Stubby. Got a mouthful of fur.
Struggled frantically to my feet.
And saw the egg creature sail out of the box and drop onto Anne’s breakfast
plate.
Anne’s mouth dropped open. Her face twisted in disgust. “Oh, yuck!” she
wailed. “Rotten eggs! Gross! Rotten eggs!”
“No—it’s alive!” I protested.
But I don’t think anyone heard me. Stubby jumped up on me as I started to
explain, and nearly knocked me down again.
“Down, boy! Down!” Mrs. Gravel scolded. “You know better than that.”
“Get this away!” Anne demanded, shoving her plate across the table.
Her mom examined the plate, then glared at me. “Dana, what’s wrong with
you? This isn’t funny. You ruined perfectly good scrambled eggs.”
“You spoiled my breakfast!” Anne cried angrily.
“No, wait—” I protested.
But I wasn’t fast enough.
Mrs. Gravel grabbed up the plate. She carried it to the sink, clicked on the
garbage disposal—and started to empty the egg creature into the roaring drain.
11
“Nooooo!”
I let out a shriek—and dove for the sink.
I made a wild grab and pulled the creature from the drain.
No. I pulled a handful of scrambled eggs from the drain!
The egg creature rolled around the sink and started to slide toward the
gurgling drain. I tossed the scrambled eggs down and grabbed the creature as it
started to drop toward the grinding blades.
The lumpy yellow blob felt hot in my hands. I could feel the veins
throbbing. The whole creature pulsed rapidly, like a racing heart.
I raised it up to my face and examined it. Still in one piece. “I saved your
life!” I told it. “Whew! What a close one!”
I balanced it carefully in my palm. It shuddered and throbbed. Wet bubbles
rolled down its lumpy sides. The black eyes stared up at me.
“What is that thing?” Anne demanded, getting up from the breakfast table.
She straightened her long ponytail. “Is it a puppet? Did you make it out of an old
sock or something?”
Before I could answer, Mrs. Gravel gave me a gentle push toward the
kitchen door. “Get it out of here, Dana,” she ordered. “It’s disgusting.” She
pointed down. “Look. It’s dripping some kind of eggy goo all over my kitchen
floor.”
“I—I found it out back,” I started. “I don’t really know what it is, but—”
“Out,” Anne’s mom insisted. She held open the screen door for me. “Out. I
mean it. I don’t want to have to wash the whole floor.”
I didn’t have a choice. I carried the egg creature out into the backyard. It
seemed a little calmer. At least it wasn’t trembling and pulsing so hard.
Anne followed me to the driveway. The bright sun made the egg creature
gleam. My hands felt slimy and wet. I didn’t want to squeeze it too tightly. But I
also didn’t want to let it fall.
“Is it a puppet?” Anne demanded. She bent down to see it better. “Yuck. It’s
alive?”
I nodded. “I don’t know what it is. But it’s definitely alive. I found it
yesterday. At Brandy’s party.”
Anne continued to study the yellow blob. “You found it? Where?”
“I found an egg back by the creek,” I told her. “A very weird-looking egg. I
took it home, and it hatched this morning. And this is what came out.”
“But what is it?” Anne asked. She gingerly poked its side with a pointer
finger. “Oh, yuck. It’s wet and mushy.”
“It’s not a chicken,” I replied.
“Duhhh,” Anne said, rolling her eyes. “Did you figure that out all by
yourself?”
“I thought it might be a turtle egg,” I said, ignoring her sarcasm.
She squinted harder at it. “Do you think it’s a turtle without its shell? Do
turtles hatch without their shells?”
“I don’t think so,” I replied.
“Maybe it’s some kind of mistake,” Anne suggested. “A freak of nature.
You know. Like you!” She laughed.
Anne has a great sense of humor.
She poked the egg creature again. The creature let out a soft wheeze of air.
“Maybe you discovered a new species,” Anne suggested. “A whole new kind of
animal that’s never been seen before.”
“Maybe,” I replied. That was an exciting idea.
“They’ll name it after you,” Anne teased. “They’ll call it the Dodo!” She
laughed again.
“You’re not being very helpful,” I said sharply.
And then I had an idea.
“Know what I’m going to do with it?” I said, cupping it carefully between
my hands. “I’m going to take it to that little science lab.”
She narrowed her eyes at me. “What science lab?”
“You know that little lab,” I replied impatiently. “The one on Denver Street.
Just three blocks from here.”
“I don’t hang out at weird little science labs,” Anne said.
“Well, I don’t, either,” I told her. “But I’ve passed by that lab a million
times, riding my bike to school. I’m going to take this thing there. Someone will
tell me what it is.”
“I’m not going with you,” Anne said, crossing her skinny arms in front of
her chest. “I have better things to do.”
“I didn’t invite you,” I sneered.
She sneered back at me.
I think she was jealous that I found the mysterious creature and she didn’t.
“Please get me the shoe box,” I said. “I left it in your kitchen. I’m going to
ride my bike over to that lab right now.”
Anne went inside and came back with the shoe box. “It’s all sticky inside,”
she said, making a disgusted face. “Whatever that thing is, it sure sweats a lot.”
“Maybe your face scared it!” I declared. My turn to laugh. I’m usually the
serious one. I don’t get off too many jokes. But that was a pretty good one.
Anne ignored it. She watched as I lowered the creature into the box. Then
she raised her eyes to me. “You sure that isn’t some kind of wind-up toy? This
thing is all a big joke—isn’t it, Dana?”
I shook my head. “No way. It’s no joke. I’ll stop by later and tell you what
the scientists at the lab say about it.”
I fit the lid on the shoe box. Then I hurried to the garage to get my bike.
I couldn’t wait to get to the science lab.
As it turned out, I should have stayed as far away from that place as
possible.
But how could I know what was waiting for me there?
12
“Look out!”
Anne’s stupid sheepdog ran in front of my bike just as I started down the
driveway.
I jammed on the hand brake. My bike squealed to a sharp stop—and the
shoe box nearly toppled off the handlebars.
“Stubby—you moron!” I shrieked.
The dog loped off across the backyard, probably laughing to himself. I
think Stubby gets a real thrill by tripping me up whenever he sees me.
I waited for my heart to stop thudding in my chest. Then I steadied the shoe
box on the handlebars.
I started pedaling along the street, steering with one hand, keeping the other
hand on top of the box.
“The scientists at the lab have got to know what this thing is,” I told myself.
“They’ve got to.”
I usually speed down my street. But this morning I pedaled slowly. I
stopped at each corner to make sure no cars were coming.
I tried to steer away from bumps in the street. But my street has a lot of
potholes. Each time I hit a bump, I could hear the egg creature bouncing inside
the carton.
Just don’t bounce out, I thought.
I pictured it bouncing out of the box, dropping onto the street, and being run
over by a car.
I stopped to balance it better on the handlebars. Then I began pedaling
slowly again.
Some kids from school were starting up a softball game on the playground
on the next block. They called to me. I think they wanted me to join the game.
But I pretended I didn’t hear them. I didn’t have time for softball. I was on a
scientific mission. I didn’t look back. I kept pedaling.
As I turned the corner onto Denver, a city bus roared past. The whoosh of
air from the bus nearly knocked me over.
As I steadied the bike, I saw the lid push up from the shoe box.
The egg creature was trying to escape!
I grabbed the box and tried to push down the lid. I pedaled faster. The lab
was only a block away.
The creature pushed up against the lid.
I pushed back.
I didn’t want to crush it. But I didn’t want it to escape, either.
I could feel it bouncing inside the box. Pushing up against the lid.
I kept my hand on the lid, struggling to hold it down.
A station wagon filled with kids rumbled past. One of the kids yelled
something to me. I didn’t really hear him. I was concentrating as hard as I could
on keeping the egg creature inside the box.
I rolled through a stop sign. I didn’t even see it. Luckily no cars were
approaching.
The lab came into view on the next corner. It was a white shingled building.
Very low. Only one story tall. But very long. With a row of small, square
windows along the front. It looked like a very long train car.
I bumped up the curb and rode my bike onto the grass. Then I grabbed the
shoe box with both hands and hopped off. The bike fell to the ground, both
wheels spinning.
Gripping the box tightly in both hands, I ran across the front lawn, up to the
white double doors in front.
I found a doorbell on the wall to the right of the doors. I pushed it. Pushed it
again. Kept my finger on it.
When no one came to the door, I tried the knob. Pushed. Then pulled.
No. The door was locked.
I tried knocking. I pounded as hard as I could with my fist.
Then I rang the bell again.
Where was everyone?
I was about to start pounding again when I saw the sign over the door. A
small, hand-printed black-and-white sign that sent my heart sinking. It read:
CLOSED SATURDAYS AND SUNDAYS.
13
I let out a long sigh and shoved the box under my arm. I was so disappointed.
What was I going to do with this weird egg creature now?
Shaking my head unhappily, I turned and started back to my bike. I was
halfway across the grass when I heard the front door open.
I turned to see an older man in a white lab coat. He had shiny white hair,
parted in the middle and slicked down on the sides. His moustache was salt-andpepper. He had pale blue eyes that peered out at me from his pale, wrinkly face.
His smile made his eyes crinkle up at the sides. “Can I help you?” he asked.
“Uh… yeah,” I stammered. I raised the shoe box in front of me and started
back across the grass. I could feel the egg creature bouncing around in there.
“Is that a sick bird?” the man asked, squinting at the box. “I’m afraid I can’t
help you with that. This is a science lab. I’m not a vet.”
“No. It’s not a bird,” I told him. I carried the box to the doorway. My heart
was pounding. For some reason, I felt really nervous.
I guess I was excited about talking to a real scientist. I respect and admire
scientists so much.
Also, I was excited about finally finding out what had hatched from that
weird egg. And finding out what I should do with it.
The man smiled at me again. He had a warm, friendly smile that made me
feel a little calmer. “Well, if it isn’t a bird in there, what is it?” he asked softly.
“I was hoping you could tell me!” I replied. I shoved the shoe box toward
him, but he didn’t take it.
“It’s something I found,” I continued. “I mean, I found an egg. In my
backyard.”
“An egg? What kind of egg, son?”
“I don’t know,” I told him. “It was very big. And it had veins all over it.
And it kind of breathed.”
He stared at me. “An egg that breathed.”
I nodded. “I put it in my dresser drawer. And then it hatched this morning.
And—”
“Come in, son,” the man said. “Come right in.” His expression changed.
His eyes flashed. He suddenly looked very interested.
He put a hand on my shoulder and guided me into the lab. I had to blink a
few times and wait for my eyes to adjust to the dim light inside.
The walls were all white. I saw a desk and chairs. A low table with some
science magazines on it. This was a waiting room, I decided. It was all very
clean and modern-looking. A lot of chrome and glass and white leather.
The man had his eyes on the box in my hands. He rubbed his moustache
with his fingers. “I’m Dr. Gray,” he announced. “I’m the managing lab scientist
here.”
I switched the box to my left hand so I could shake hands with him. “I want
to be a scientist when I’m older,” I blurted out. I could feel my face turning red.
“What’s your name, son?” Dr. Gray asked.
“Oh. Uh. Dana Johnson. I live a few blocks away. On Melrose.”
“It’s nice to meet you, Dana,” Dr. Gray said, straightening the front of his
white lab coat. He moved to the front door. He closed it, locked it, and bolted it.
That’s weird, I thought, feeling a shiver of fear.
Why did he do that?
Then I remembered that the lab was closed on weekends. He probably bolts
the doors when the place is closed.
“Follow me,” Dr. Gray said. He led the way down the narrow white
hallway. I followed him into a small lab. I saw a long table cluttered with all
kinds of test tubes, specimen jars, and electronic equipment.
“Set the box down there,” he instructed, pointing to an empty spot on the
table.
I set the box down. He reached in front of me to remove the lid. “You found
this in your backyard?”
I nodded. “Back by the creek.”
He carefully pulled the lid off the box.
“Oh my goodness!” he murmured.
14
The egg creature stared up at us. It quivered and bubbled against the side of the
box. The bottom of the box was puddled with a sticky yellow goo.
“So you found one,” Dr. Gray murmured, tilting the box. The yellow blob
slid to the other end.
“Found one?” I replied. “You mean you know what it is?”
“I thought I rounded them all up,” Dr. Gray replied, rubbing his moustache.
He turned his pale blue eyes on me. “But I guess I missed one.”
“What is it?” I demanded. “What kind of animal is it?”
He shrugged. He tilted the box the other way, making the egg creature slide
to the other end. Then he gently poked the eggy blob in the back. “This is a
young one,” he said softly.
“A young what?” I asked impatiently.
“The eggs fell all over town,” Dr. Gray said, poking the egg creature. “Like
a meteor shower. Only on this town.”
“Excuse me?” I cried. “They fell from the sky?” I wanted desperately to
understand. But so far, nothing made sense.
Dr. Gray turned to me and put a hand on my shoulder. “We believe the eggs
fell all the way from Mars, Dana. There was a big storm on Mars. Two years
ago. It set off something like a meteor shower. The storm sent these eggs
hurtling through space.”
My mouth dropped open. I gazed down at the quivering yellow blob in the
shoe box. “This—this is a Martian?” I stammered.
Dr. Gray smiled. “We think it came from Mars. We think the eggs flew
through space for two years.”
“But—but—” I sputtered. My heart was racing. My hands were suddenly
ice cold.
Was I really staring at a creature from Mars?
Had I actually touched a Martian?
Then I had an even weirder thought: I found it. I picked it up from my
backyard.
Did that mean it belonged to me?
Did I own a Martian?
Dr. Gray bounced the creature—my creature—in the box. Its veins pulsed.
Its black eyes stared back at us. “We don’t know how the eggs made it through
the earth’s atmosphere,” the scientist continued.
“You mean they should have burned up?” I asked.
He nodded. “Most everything burns up when it hits our atmosphere. But the
eggs seem to be very tough. So tough they weren’t destroyed.”
The egg creature made a gurgling sound. It plopped wetly against the side
of the shoe box.
Dr. Gray chuckled. “This is a cute one.”
“You have a lot of others?” I asked.
“Let me show you something, Dana.” Holding the box in front of him, Dr.
Gray led the way through a large metal door. The door clanged heavily behind
us.
A long, narrow hallway—the walls painted white—led past several small
rooms. Dr. Gray’s lab coat made a starchy, scratchy sound as he walked. At the
end of the hall, we stopped in front of a wide window.
“In there,” Dr. Gray said softly.
I stared into the window.
Then I stared harder.
Was he crazy? Was he playing some kind of joke on me?
“I—I can’t see anything at all!” I cried.
15
“Hold on a second. I forgot something,” Dr. Gray said. He stepped over to the
wall and flicked a light switch.
A light above our heads in the hallway flashed on. And now I could see
through the window.
“Oh, wow!” I exclaimed as my eyes swept over the large room on the other
side of the glass. I stared at a crowd of egg creatures!
Dozens of them.
Yellow, eggy blobs. All pulsing and quivering. Green veins throbbing.
The egg creatures huddled on the white tile floor. They looked like big
globs of cookie dough on a baking sheet. Dozens of tiny, round black eyes stared
out at us.
Unreal!
As I stared at them in amazement, I kept thinking they were like stuffed
animals. But they weren’t. They were alive. They breathed. They shook and
bounced and bubbled.
“Would you like to go in?” Dr. Gray asked.
He didn’t wait for me to answer. He pulled out a small black control unit
from his pocket. He pushed a button, and the door swung open. Then he opened
the door wider and guided me inside.
“Whoa!” I uttered a cry when I felt a blast of cold air. “It’s freezing in
here!” I exclaimed.
Dr. Gray smiled. “We keep it very cold. It seems to keep them more alert.”
He held the shoe box in one hand. He motioned to the egg creatures with
the other. “Once they hatch, the creatures don’t like heat. If the temperature goes
too high, they melt,” he explained.
He lowered the box to the floor. “We don’t want them to melt,” he said. “If
they melt, we can’t study them.”
Leaning over the box, he lifted my egg creature out gently. He placed it
beside three or four other egg creatures. All of the yellow blobs began bouncing
excitedly.
Dr. Gray picked up the box and stood back up. He smiled down at the new
arrival. “We don’t want you to melt, do we?” he told it. “We want you to be nice
and alert. So we keep it as cold in here as we can.”
I shivered and rubbed my arms. I had goose-bumps all over my skin. From
the excitement? Or from the cold?
I wished I had worn something warmer than a T-shirt!
The egg creatures bobbed and bubbled. I couldn’t take my eyes off them.
Real creatures from Mars!
I watched them start to bounce toward us. They moved surprisingly fast.
They kind of rolled, kind of inched their way forward. They left slimy, yellow
trails behind them as they moved.
I wanted to ask Dr. Gray a million questions. “Do they have brains?” I
asked. “Are they smart? Can they communicate? Have you tried talking to them?
Do they talk to each other? How can they breathe our air?”
He chuckled. “You have a good scientific mind, Dana,” he said. “Let’s take
one question at a time. Which would you like me to answer first?”
“Well—” I started to reply. But I stopped when I realized what the egg
creatures had done.
While Dr. Gray and I talked, they had all moved quickly into a circle.
And now they had the two of us surrounded.
I spun around.
The egg creatures had moved behind us. They blocked the door. And now
they were closing in on us, bubbling and throbbing, leaving a trail of slime as
they slid forward.
What were they planning to do?
16
In a panic, I turned to Dr. Gray. To my shock, he was grinning.
“They—they’ve trapped us!” I stammered.
He shook his head. “Sometimes they move like that. But don’t be scared,
Dana. They’re harmless.”
“Harmless?” I cried. My voice came out shrill and tiny. “But—but—”
“What can they do?” Dr. Gray asked, placing a comforting hand on my
trembling shoulder. “They’re only blobs of egg. They can’t bite you—can they?
They don’t appear to have mouths. They can’t grab you. Or punch you. Or kick
you. They have no hands or legs.”
The egg creatures moved their circle closer. I watched them, my throat still
tight, my legs shaking.
I knew that what Dr. Gray was telling me was true.
But why were they doing this?
Why did they form a circle? Why were they closing in on us?
“Sometimes they form triangles,” Dr. Gray told me. “Sometimes rectangles
or squares. It’s as if they’re trying out different shapes they’ve seen. Maybe this
is a way they’re trying to communicate with us.”
“Maybe,” I agreed softly. I wished the egg creatures would back up. They
were little, wet blobs. But they were really giving me the creeps!
I shivered again. My breath steamed up in front of me.
It was so cold, my glasses started to fog!
I stared down at the egg creature I had brought. It had joined the circle. It
bobbed and bounced with all the others.
Dr. Gray turned and started to the door. I turned with him. I wanted to get
out of that freezer as fast as I could!
“Thank you for bringing that one in,” Dr. Gray said. He shook his head. “I
thought I had collected them all. What a surprise that I missed one.” He
scratched his hair. “You say you found it in your backyard?”
I nodded. “It was an egg. But then it hatched in my dresser drawer.” My
teeth chattered. I was so cold!
“Does that mean it’s mine?” I asked Dr. Gray. “I mean, does it belong to
me?”
His smile faded. “I’m not really sure. I don’t know what the law is about
alien creatures from outer space.” He frowned. “Maybe there is no law.”
I glanced down at the little blob. The green veins along its side were
bulging. Its whole body was throbbing like crazy.
Was it sorry to see me go?
No way. That’s really dumb, I told myself.
“I guess you’ll want to keep it for a while and study it,” I said to Dr. Gray.
He nodded. “Yes. I’m doing every kind of test I can think of.”
“But can I come back and visit it?” I asked.
Dr. Gray narrowed his eyes at me. “Come back? Dana, what do you mean
by come back? You’re not leaving.”
17
“Excuse me?” I choked out. I knew I hadn’t heard him correctly.
My whole body shook in a wild shiver. I rubbed my bare arms, trying to
warm them.
“Did you say I’m not leaving?” I managed to ask.
Dr. Gray locked his pale blue eyes on mine. “I’m afraid you can’t leave,
Dana. You must stay here.”
A frightened cry escaped my throat. He wasn’t serious! He couldn’t be
serious.
He can’t keep me here, I told myself.
No way. He can’t keep me here against my will. That’s against the law.
“But… why?” I demanded weakly. “Why can’t I go home?”
“You can understand—can’t you?” Dr. Gray replied calmly. “We don’t want
anyone to know about these space aliens. We don’t want anyone to know that
we’ve been invaded by Martians.”
He sighed. “You don’t want to throw the whole world into a panic—do you,
Dana?”
“I—I—I—” I tried to answer. But I was too frightened. Too startled. Too
cold.
I glared angrily at Dr. Gray. “You have to let me go,” I insisted in a
trembling whisper.
His expression softened. “Please don’t stare at me like that,” he said. “I’m
not a bad guy. I don’t want to frighten you. And I don’t want to keep you in this
lab against your will. But what choice do I have? I’m a scientist, Dana. I have to
do my job.”
I stared back at him, my whole body shaking. I didn’t know what to say.
My eyes moved to the metal door. It was shut. But he hadn’t bolted it.
I wondered if I could get to the door before he did.
“I have to study you too,” Dr. Gray continued. He tucked his hands into the
pockets of his lab coat. “It’s my job, Dana.”
“Study me?” I squeaked. “Why?”
He motioned to my egg creature. “You touched it—didn’t you? You
handled it? You picked it up?”
I shrugged. “Well, yeah. I picked it up. So what?”
“Well, we don’t know what kind of dangerous germs it gave you,” he
replied. “We don’t know what kind of germs or bacteria or strange diseases these
things carried with them from Mars.”
I swallowed hard. “Huh? Diseases?”
He scratched his moustache. “I don’t want to scare you. You’re probably
perfectly okay. You feel okay—right?”
My teeth chattered. “Yeah. I guess. Just cold.”
“Well, I have to keep you here and study you. You know. Watch you
carefully. Make sure that touching the egg creature didn’t harm you or change
you.”
No way, I thought.
I don’t care about strange germs from Mars. I don’t care about egg diseases.
I don’t care about science.
All I care about is getting out of here. Getting home to my family.
You’re not keeping me here, Dr. Gray. You’re not studying me.
Because I’m outta here!
Dr. Gray was saying something. I guess he was still explaining why he
planned to keep me prisoner in this freezing cold lab.
But I didn’t listen to him. Instead, I took off.
I ran toward the big metal door.
The circle of egg creatures blocked my way. But I leaped over them easily.
And kept running.
Gasping for breath, shivering, I reached the door.
I grabbed the handle. And glanced back.
Was Dr. Gray chasing after me?
No. He hadn’t moved.
Good! I thought. I caught him by surprise.
I’m gone!
I turned the door handle. Pulled hard.
The door didn’t open.
I pulled harder.
It didn’t budge.
I tried pushing it.
No go.
Dr. Gray’s voice rang in my ears. “The door is controlled electronically,” he
said calmly. “It’s locked. It cannot be opened unless you have the control unit.”
I didn’t believe him. I tugged again. Then I pushed again.
He was telling the truth. The door was electronically sealed.
I gave up with a loud cry of protest. I spun around to face him. “How long
do I have to stay here?” I demanded.
He replied in a low, icy voice. “Probably for a very long time.”
18
“Step away from the door, Dana,” Dr. Gray ordered. “Try to calm down.”
Calm down?
“You’ll be okay,” the scientist said. “I take very good care of my
specimens.”
Specimens?
I didn’t want to calm down. And I didn’t want to be a specimen.
“I’m a boy. Not a specimen,” I told him angrily.
I don’t think he heard me. He lifted me out of the way. Then he clicked the
small remote unit in his hand. The door opened just long enough for him to slide
through.
It made a loud click as it snapped shut behind him.
Locked in. I was locked in this freezer with three dozen Martians.
My heart pounded. I heard a shrill whistle in my ears. My temples throbbed
with pain. My whole head felt ready to explode!
I’d never been so angry in my life.
I let out a cry of rage.
The egg creatures all began to chatter. I spun around in surprise. They
sounded a little like chimps.
A roomful of chimps, chattering away.
Only they weren’t chimps. They were monsters from Mars. And I was
locked in, all alone with them.
A specimen.
“Noooo!” I let out another howl and ran to the long window.
“You can’t leave me here!” I shrieked. I pounded on the glass with both
fists.
I wanted to cry. I wanted to scream until my throat was raw. I’d never felt
so angry and so frightened all at once.
“Let me out! Dr. Gray—let me out of here! You can’t keep me here!” I
screamed. I banged on the window as hard as I could.
I’ll pound till I break the glass, I told myself.
I’ll break through. Then I’ll climb out and escape.
I beat my fists frantically against the glass. “Let me out of here! You can’t
do this!”
The glass was thick and hard. No way I could break through.
“Let me out!” I uttered a final scream.
When I turned back into the room, the egg creatures stopped chattering.
They stared up at me with their black, button eyes.
They didn’t quiver or bounce. They stood totally still. As if they had frozen.
I’m going to freeze! I realized. I rubbed my bare arms. But it didn’t help
warm me. My hands were ice cold.
Icicles are going to form on me, I thought. I’m going to freeze to death in
here. I’m going to turn into a human Popsicle.
The egg creatures stood so still. Their eyes were all locked on me. As if
they were studying me. As if they were trying to decide what to do about me.
Suddenly my egg creature broke the silence. I recognized it by the blue
veins down its front. It started to chatter loudly.
The other egg creatures turned, as if listening to it.
Was it talking to them? Was it communicating in some weird Martian
chatter language?
“I hope you’re telling them all how I saved your life!” I called to it. “I hope
you’re telling them what a good guy I am. You almost went down the drain—
remember?”
Of course the egg creature couldn’t understand me.
I don’t know why I was shouting at it like that. I guess I was totally losing
it. Totally freaked.
As the egg creature chattered on, I stared at the others. They all listened in
silence. I started to count them. There were so many of them—and so few of me!
Were they friendly? Did they like strangers? Did they like humans?
How did they feel about being locked up in this freezing cold room?
Did they feel anything at all?
These were questions I didn’t really want to know the answers to.
I just wanted to get out of there.
I decided to try the window again. But before I could move, my egg
creature stopped talking.
And the others started to move.
Silently, they huddled together. Pressed together into a wide yellow wedge.
And rolling faster than I could imagine, they attacked.
19
“Hey—!” I uttered a startled cry and backed up.
The wedge of egg creatures rolled forward. Their bodies slapped the floor
wetly as they bounced toward me.
I retreated until my back hit the window.
Nowhere to run.
“What do you want?” I screamed. My voice came out high and tight in
panic. “What are you going to do?”
I turned and banged on the window again, pounding with open hands. “Dr.
Gray! Dr. Gray! Help me!”
Did they plan to roll over me? To swallow me up?
To my surprise, the egg creatures stopped a few inches in front of me. They
twirled and bounced until they had formed a circle once again.
Then, moving quickly and silently, they shifted back into a big yellow
triangle.
I stared down at them, shivering, my teeth chattering.
They’re not attacking, I decided.
But what are they doing?
Why are they forming these shapes? Are they trying to talk to me?
I took a deep breath, trying to calm my panic.
You’re a scientist, Dana, I reminded myself. Act like a scientist. Not a
frightened kid. Try to talk back to them.
I thought hard for a few seconds. Then I raised my hands in front of me.
And I formed a circle with my pointer fingers and thumbs.
I held the circle up so the egg creatures could all see it. And waited to see if
they did anything.
The yellow blobs had formed a wide triangle that nearly filled the room. I
saw their round black eyes go up to the circle I had formed.
And then I watched them bounce and roll—into a circle!
Were they copying me?
I straightened my fingers and thumbs into a triangle.
And the egg creatures formed a triangle.
Yes!
We’re communicating! I realized. We’re talking to each other!
I suddenly felt really excited. I felt like some kind of pioneer.
I’m the first person on earth to communicate with Martians! I told myself.
These creatures are friendly, I decided. They’re not dangerous.
I didn’t really know that for sure. But I was so excited that I had
communicated with them, I didn’t want to think anything bad about them.
Dr. Gray has no right to keep them prisoner here, I thought.
And he has no right to lock me up with them.
I didn’t believe his excuse for keeping me here. Not for a minute.
Just because I touched one? Just because I handled one?
Did he really expect me to believe that touching an egg creature could harm
me?
Did he really think it would rot my skin off or something?
Did he really think that touching an egg creature would give me a weird
disease or change me in some way?
That was just stupid.
I carried that little yellow blob in my hands—and I felt perfectly fine.
These creatures are my friends, I told myself. Touching them isn’t going to
harm me in any way.
But I’m a scientist. At least, I want to be a scientist. So I have to be
scientific, I realized.
I decided to check myself out—just to make sure.
I raised my hands and inspected them carefully, first one, then the other.
They looked okay to me. No strange rashes. No skin peeling off. I still had four
fingers and a thumb on each hand.
I rubbed my arms. They were the same too. Perfectly okay.
Might as well check myself out all over, I told myself.
I reached down and grabbed my left leg.
Soft and mushy!
“Oh no!” I wailed.
I squeezed my leg again. Soft and lumpy.
I didn’t have to look. I knew what was happening.
I was slowly turning into one of them. I was turning into a lump of
scrambled eggs!
20
“No. Oh, please—no.”
I squeezed my mushy ankle. I couldn’t bear to look down. I didn’t want to
see what was happening to me.
But I had to.
Slowly, I lowered my gaze.
And saw that I was squeezing one of the egg creatures. Not my leg.
I let go instantly and raised my hand. A relieved laugh escaped my throat.
“Oh wow!”
How could I think that mushy blob was my leg?
I watched the little Martian scurry back to its pals.
I shook my head. Even though no one else was around, I felt like a total
jerk.
Just calm down, Dana, I scolded myself.
But how could I?
The air in the lab seemed to get colder. I couldn’t stop shivering. I clamped
my jaws tightly. But I couldn’t stop my teeth from chattering.
I squeezed my nose. Cold and numb. I rubbed my ears. They were numb
too.
This is no joke, I thought, my throat tightening. I’m going to get frostbite.
I’m really going to freeze.
I tried thinking warm thoughts. I thought about the beach in summer. I
thought about a blazing fire in the fireplace in our den.
It didn’t help.
A hard shiver made my whole body twitch.
I’ve got to do something to take my mind off the cold, I decided.
The egg creatures had spread out over the room. I raised my hands again
and formed a triangle.
They stared up at it, but didn’t move.
I curled my fingers into a circle.
They ignored this one too.
“I guess you guys got bored, huh?” I asked them.
I tried to bend my fingers and thumbs into a rectangle. But it was too hard.
Fingers and thumbs can’t really bend into a rectangle.
Besides, the egg creatures weren’t paying much attention to me.
I’m going to freeze, I told myself again. Freeze. Freeze. Freeze. The word
repeated in my mind until it became an unhappy chant.
I lowered myself to the floor and pressed into the corner. I curled up, trying
to save body warmth. Or what was left of it.
A sound on the other side of the window made me jump up.
Someone was coming. Dr. Gray? To let me out?
I turned eagerly to the door. I heard footsteps out in the hall. Then a clink of
metal.
A slot opened just above the floor to the left of the door. A food tray slid in.
It plopped onto the floor.
I hurried over to it. Macaroni and cheese and a small container of milk.
“But I hate macaroni and cheese!” I screeched.
No reply.
“I hate it! I hate it! I hate it!” I wailed.
I was starting to lose it again. But I didn’t care.
I leaned over the tray and held my hands over the plate of macaroni. The
steam warmed my hands.
At least it’s hot, I thought.
I sat down on the floor and lifted the tray to my lap. Then I gulped down the
macaroni, just for the warmth.
It tasted horrible. I hate that wet, clotted, cheesy taste. But it did warm me
up a little.
I didn’t open the milk. Too cold.
Feeling a little better, I shoved the tray aside and climbed to my feet. I
strode over to the window and started pounding the glass with my fists.
“Dr. Gray—let me out!” I shouted. “Dr. Gray—I know you can hear me.
Let me out! You can’t lock me in here and make me eat macaroni and cheese!
Let me out!”
I screamed until my voice was hoarse. I didn’t hear a reply. Not a sound
from the other side of the glass.
I turned away from the window in disgust.
“I’ve got to find a way out of here,” I said out loud. “I’ve got to!”
And then, I had an idea.
21
Sad to say, it was a bad idea.
The kind of idea you think of when you’re freezing to death in a total panic.
What was the idea? To call home and tell Mom and Dad to come get me.
The only problem with that idea was that there were no phones in the room.
I searched carefully. There were metal shelves up to the ceiling against the
back wall. They contained only scientific books and files. There was a desk in
one corner. The desktop was bare.
Nothing else.
Nothing else in the whole room. Except for the dozens of egg creatures and
me.
I needed another idea, an idea that didn’t call for a telephone.
But I was stumped. I tried the door again. I thought Dr. Gray might have
gotten careless and left it unlocked.
No such luck.
I checked out the slot where my food tray had been delivered. It was only a
few inches tall. Way too narrow for me to slip through.
I was trapped. A prisoner. A specimen.
I dropped glumly down to the floor and rested my back against the wall. I
pulled up my knees and wrapped my arms around them. I curled into a ball,
trying to stay warm.
How long did Dr. Gray plan to keep me here?
Forever?
I let out a miserable sigh. But then a thought helped to cheer me. I suddenly
had a little hope.
I remembered something I had forgotten. I had told Anne where I was
going!
This morning in her backyard, I had told Anne I was going to take the egg
creature to the science lab.
I’m going to be rescued! I realized.
I leaped to my feet and shot both fists into the air. I opened my mouth in a
happy cheer. “Yesssss!”
I knew exactly what would happen.
When I don’t show up for dinner, Mom or Dad will call Anne. Because
that’s where I’m always hanging out when I should be home for dinner.
Anne will tell them I went to the science lab on Denver.
Mom will say, “He should be back by now.”
Dad will say, “I’d better go get him.”
And Dad will come and rescue me.
Only a matter of time, I knew. Only a matter of a few hours, and Dad will
be here to get me out of this freezer.
I felt so much better.
I lowered myself back to the floor and leaned against the wall to wait. The
egg creatures all stared at me. Watched me in silence. Trying to figure me out, I
guess.
I didn’t realize that I fell asleep. I guess I was worn out from all the
excitement—and the fear.
I’m not sure how long I slept.
Voices woke me up. Voices from out in the hall.
I sat up, instantly alert. And I listened.
And heard Dad’s voice.
Yes!
He was here. He was about to rescue me.
Yes!
I climbed to my feet. I stretched. I got ready to greet Dad.
And then, from the front hall, I heard Dr. Gray say, “I’m sorry, Mr. Johnson.
Your son never stopped here.”
22
“Are you sure?” I heard Dad ask.
“Very sure,” Dr. Gray replied. “I’m the only one here today. We’re closed.
We had no visitors.”
“He’s about this tall,” I heard Dad say. “He has dark hair, and he wears
glasses.”
“No. Sorry,” Dr. Gray insisted.
“But he told his friend that he was coming here. He had something he
wanted to show to a scientist. His bike is gone from the garage.”
“Well, you can check outside for your son’s bike,” Dr. Gray told Dad. “But
I don’t think you’ll find it.”
He moved it! I realized. Dr. Gray moved my bike so no one would find it!
I let out a shout of rage and ran to the window. “Dad—I’m in here!” I
shouted. I cupped my hands around my mouth so my voice would be even
louder. “Dad! Can you hear me? I’m in here! Dad?”
I took a deep breath and listened. My heart was thudding so loudly, I could
barely hear their voices from the front.
Dad and Dr. Gray continued talking in low, calm voices.
“Dad! Can’t you hear me?” I screamed. “It’s me, Dana! Come back here,
Dad! I’m here! Come let me out!”
My voice cracked. My throat ached from screaming so loud.
“Dad—please!”
My chest heaving, I pressed my ear against the window and listened again.
“Well, it’s very strange, Mr. Johnson,” Dr. Gray was saying. “The boy never
came here. Would you like to look around the lab?”
Yes, Dad! I pleaded silently. Say yes.
Tell him that you’d like to look around the lab, Dad! Please!
“No, thanks,” I heard Dad say. “I’d better keep searching. Thank you, Dr.
Gray.”
I heard Dad say good-bye.
I heard the front door close.
And I knew I was doomed.
23
“I don’t believe this,” I murmured out loud. “Dad was so close. So close!”
I sank back to the floor. I felt as if my heart were sinking too. I wanted to
keep dropping, down onto the floor, into the ground. Just keep sinking till I
disappeared forever.
My throat ached from screaming. Why couldn’t Dad hear me? I could hear
him.
And why did he believe Dr. Gray’s lies? Why didn’t Dad check out the lab
for himself?
He would see me through the window. And I would be rescued.
Dr. Gray is evil, I realized. He pretends to be interested only in science. He
pretended to be worried about my health, about my safety. He said that’s why he
was keeping me here—to make sure I was safe.
But he lied to my father.
And he was lying to me.
Crouched on the floor, I shivered as the frigid air seemed to seep right
through my skin. I shut my eyes and lowered my head.
I wanted to stay calm. I knew I had to stay calm to think clearly. But I
couldn’t. The chills I felt running down my back weren’t just from the cold.
They were also from terror.
Voices in the front snapped me to attention. I held my breath and listened.
Was that my dad?
Or was I starting to hear things?
“Maybe I will take a look around.” That’s what I thought I heard Dad say.
Was I dreaming it?
No. I heard Dr. Gray mumble something. Then I heard Dad say,
“Sometimes Dana sneaks into places where he doesn’t belong. He’s so interested
in science, he may have sneaked in through a back door, Dr. Gray.”
“Yes!” I cried happily. Every time I lost all hope, I somehow got another
chance.
I jumped up and hurried to the window. I crossed my fingers and prayed
Dad would walk to the back and see me.
After a few seconds, I saw Dad and Dr. Gray at the far end of the long,
white hall. Dr. Gray was leading him slowly, opening doors. They peered into
each lab, then moved on.
“Dad!” I called. “Can you hear me? I’m back here!”
Even though I had my face pressed up to the window glass, he couldn’t hear
me.
I banged on the glass. Dad kept walking with Dr. Gray. He didn’t look up.
I waited for them to come closer. My heart was banging against my chest
now. My mouth was dry. I pressed up close to the window.
In a few seconds, Dad would peer into the window and see me standing
here.
And then I would be out—and Dr. Gray would have some real explaining to
do.
With my hands and nose pressed against the glass, I watched them move
forward. The hall was dark on this end. But I could see them clearly as they
peeked into the labs at the other end.
“Dad!” I shouted. “Dad—over here!”
I knew he couldn’t hear me. But I had to shout anyway.
The two men disappeared into a lab for a few seconds. Then they came out
and stepped toward me.
They were talking in low tones. I couldn’t hear what they were saying.
Dad had his eyes on Dr. Gray.
Turn this way, Dad, I silently urged. Please—look to the end of the hall.
Look in the window.
Chatting softly, they disappeared through another door.
What on earth are they talking about? I wondered.
A few seconds later, they were back in the hall. Moving this way.
Dad—please! Here I am! I pressed up eagerly against the glass.
I pounded my fists on the window.
Dad looked up.
And stared into the window.
He stared right at me.
I’m rescued! I realized.
I’m outta here!
Dad stared at me for a few seconds.
Then he turned back to Dr. Gray. “Thanks for showing me around,” he said.
“Dana definitely isn’t here. Sorry I wasted your time.”
24
“Dad—I’m right here!” I shrieked. “You’re looking right at me!”
Was I invisible?
Why didn’t he see me?
“Sorry I wasted your time, Dr. Gray,” I heard Dad say again.
“Good luck in finding Dana,” Dr. Gray replied. “I’m sure he’ll turn up
really soon. He’s probably at a friend’s house and forgot the time. You know
how kids are.”
“Nooooooo!” I let out a long wail. “Dad—come back! Dad!”
As I stared in horror, Dad turned away and started back down the long hall.
With another cry, I began to pound on the window glass with both fists.
“Dad! Dad! Dad!” I chanted with each slam of my fist.
Dad turned around. “What’s that noise?” he asked Dr. Gray.
Dr. Gray turned too.
I pounded the glass even harder. I pounded until my knuckles were raw and
throbbing. “Dad! Dad! Dad!” I continued to chant.
“What’s that pounding noise?” Dad demanded from halfway down the hall.
“It’s the pipes,” Dr. Gray told him. “I’ve been having a lot of trouble with
the pipes. The plumber is coming on Monday.”
Dad nodded.
He kept walking. I heard him say good-bye to the scientist. Then I heard the
door close behind him.
I knew that this time he wouldn’t come back.
I didn’t move from the window. I stared through the glass down the long
hall.
A few seconds later, I saw Dr. Gray coming toward me. He had an angry
scowl on his face.
I’m his prisoner now, I thought glumly.
What does he plan to do?
25
He stopped outside the window. He clicked on the hall light.
In the bright light, I could see beads of sweat on his forehead. He frowned
and stared in at me with those cold blue eyes.
“Nice try, Dana,” he said sourly.
“Huh? What do you mean?” I choked out. My legs were trembling. Not
from the cold. I was really terrified now.
“You almost got your father’s attention,” Dr. Gray replied. “That wouldn’t
have been nice. That would have spoiled my plans.”
I pressed both palms against the glass. I tried to force myself to stop
trembling.
“Why couldn’t Dad see me?” I demanded.
Dr. Gray rubbed a hand over his side of the window. “It’s one-way glass,”
he explained. “No one can see into the room from the hall—unless I turn on the
bright hall light.”
I let out a long sigh. “You mean—?”
“Your father saw only blackness,” the scientist said with a pleased grin. “He
thought he was staring into an empty room. Just the way you did—until I turned
on the light.”
“But why didn’t he hear me?” I demanded. “I was shouting my head off.”
Dr. Gray shook his head. “A waste of time. The room you are in is totally
soundproof. Not a sound escapes into the hall.”
“But I can hear you!” I declared. “I could hear every word you and Dad
said. And now you can hear me.”
“There is a speaker system in the wall,” he explained. “I can turn it on and
off with the same control unit that locks the door.”
“So I could hear you, but you couldn’t hear me,” I murmured.
“You’re a very smart boy,” he replied. His blue eyes flashed. “I know
you’re smart enough not to try any more tricks in there.”
“You have to let me out!” I screamed. “You can’t keep me here!”
“Yes, I can,” he replied softly. “I can keep you here as long as I like, Dana.”
“But—but—” I sputtered. I was so frightened, I couldn’t speak.
“It’s my duty to keep you in there,” Dr. Gray said calmly. He didn’t care
that I was so scared and upset. He didn’t care about me at all, I realized.
He must be crazy, I decided.
Crazy and evil.
“It’s my duty to keep you here,” he repeated. “I must make sure that the egg
creatures haven’t harmed you. I must make sure that the egg creatures haven’t
given you strange germs that you might pass on to others.”
“Let me out!” I shrieked. I was too frightened and angry to argue with him
now. Too angry and frightened to think clearly. “Let me out! Let me out!” I
demanded, pounding on the glass with my aching fists.
“Get some rest, Dana,” he instructed. “Don’t tire yourself out, son. I want to
start doing tests on you in the morning. I have many, many tests to perform.”
“But I’m f-freezing!” I stammered. “Let me out of here. At least let me stay
somewhere warm. Please?”
He ignored my plea. He clicked off the hall light and turned away.
I watched him make his way down the long hall. He disappeared through a
door in front. And closed the door hard behind him.
I stood there, trembling, my heart pounding.
I was cold—and very scared.
I had no way of knowing things were about to get a lot scarier!
26
I was so desperate to get Dad’s attention, I nearly forgot about the egg creatures.
Now I turned from the window to find them scattered around the room.
They stood still as statues. They didn’t bounce or quiver. They all seemed to
be staring at me.
Dr. Gray had turned off all the lights except for a tiny, dim bulb in the
ceiling. The little egg blobs appeared pale and gray in the dim light.
I felt a chill at the back of my neck.
Was it safe to go to sleep in the same room with them?
I suddenly felt exhausted. So tired that all my muscles ached. My head
spun.
I needed sleep.
I knew I had to rest so I could be alert and sharp tomorrow. Alert and sharp
so I could find a way to escape.
But if I fell asleep, what would the egg creatures do?
Would they leave me alone? Would they sleep too?
Or would they try to harm me in some way?
Were they good? Were they evil?
Were they intelligent at all?
I had no way of knowing.
I only knew I couldn’t stay awake much longer.
I dropped down to the floor and curled up in the corner. I tried to stay warm
by tucking myself into a ball.
But it didn’t help. The cold swept over me. My nose was frozen. My ears
were numb. My glasses were frozen to my face.
Even wrapped up tightly, I couldn’t stop shaking.
I’m going to freeze to death, I realized.
When Dr. Gray comes back tomorrow morning, he’ll find me on the floor.
A solid lump of ice.
I gazed at the egg creatures. They stared back at me in the dim light.
Silence.
Such heavy silence in the room that I wanted to scream.
“Aren’t you cold?” I cried out to them. My voice came out hoarse, weak
from all the screaming I had done. “Aren’t you freezing to death too?” I asked
them. “How can you guys stand it?”
Of course they didn’t reply.
“Dana, you’re totally losing it,” I scolded myself out loud.
I was trying to talk to a bunch of egg lumps from another planet! Did I
really expect them to answer me?
They stared back in silence. None of them quivered. None of them moved.
Their little dark eyes glowed in the dim light from the ceiling.
Maybe they’re asleep, I thought.
Maybe they sleep with their eyes open. That’s why they’re not moving.
That’s why they’ve stopped bouncing. They’re sound asleep.
That made me feel a little better.
I tucked myself into a tighter ball, and I tried to fall asleep too. If only I
could stop shivering.
I closed my eyes and silently repeated the word, “sleep, sleep, sleep” in my
mind.
It didn’t help.
And when I opened my eyes, I saw the egg creatures start to move.
I was wrong. They weren’t asleep.
They were wide awake. And they were all moving together. All moving at
once.
Coming to get me.
27
“Ohhh.” A low moan escaped from my throat.
I was already shaking all over from the cold. But now my entire body
shuddered from fear.
The egg creatures moved with surprising speed.
They were bunching together in the center of the room. Pressing into each
other, making wet smacking sounds.
I tried to climb to my feet. But my legs didn’t work.
My knees bent like rubber, and I landed back on the floor. I pressed back
into the corner—and watched them move.
They slapped up against each other. Loud, wet slaps.
And as they pushed together, they rolled forward. Rolled toward me.
“What are you doing?” I cried in a high, shrill voice. “What are you going
to do to me?”
They didn’t reply.
The wet smacks echoed through the room as the eggy creatures threw
themselves into each other.
“Leave me alone!” I shrieked. Once again I tried to stand. I made it to my
knees. But I was trembling too hard to balance on two feet.
“Leave me alone—please! I’ll help you guys escape too!” I promised.
“Really. I’ll help you escape—tomorrow. Just let me make it through the night.”
They didn’t seem to understand.
They didn’t seem to hear me!
What are they doing? I asked myself, watching them creep forward. Why
are they doing this?
They had waited until I nearly fell asleep, I realized.
That means they wanted to catch me off guard. They wanted to sneak up on
me.
Because they were about to do something I wasn’t going to like. Something
I wasn’t going to like at all.
I pressed my back against the wall.
The egg creatures moved quickly now, pale in the gray light.
Squinting hard at them, I realized to my horror that they had all stuck
themselves together.
They were no longer dozens of little egg creatures.
Now they had joined together to form one enormous egg creature!
I was staring at a big, quivering wall of egg! A wall so big it nearly covered
the floor of the room.
A wall that was rolling toward me. Rolling to get me.
“Whoa! Please—whoa!” I choked out.
I knew I should climb to my feet. I knew I should try to run.
But where could I run?
How could I escape from this huge, solid egg wall?
I couldn’t.
So I lay there and watched it come. Too frozen. Too frozen to move.
“Ohhhh.” I moaned as the front of the wall of eggs rose up over my shoes.
It was moving so fast now. Crawling somehow.
Crawling over me.
The egg wall swept over my shoes. Over the legs of my jeans. Over my
waist.
I lay there helpless as it swept over me.
Too frozen. Too frozen.
Helpless, as it poured over me.
Trapping me beneath it.
Smothering me.
28
I should have moved.
I should have fought it.
Too late. Too late now.
The sticky, warm egg creatures—all glued together—rolled over me like a
heavy carpet.
I pushed up both arms. I raised my knees. I tried to squirm away.
Too late.
I tried to roll out from underneath. But the heavy, living carpet had me
pinned on my back. Pinned to the floor.
It rolled over my waist. And then quickly, over my chest.
Was it going to sweep over my head? Was it going to smother me?
I punched at it with both fists.
But it was too late to push it away. Too late to do it any harm.
Too late to stop it as it crept closer to my neck. So warm and heavy.
I twisted my head from side to side. I tried to roll away.
But it was no use.
Too late. Too late to fight back.
And now I lay there, trapped. And felt it creep up to my chin.
Felt it throbbing. Pulsing.
Dozens of eggy monsters all pressed together. Alive. A living sheet of egg
creatures. Covering me.
Covering me.
I took a deep breath and held it as the heavy, warm carpet pressed itself
against my chin. My arms and legs were pinned to the floor. I couldn’t squirm
away.
I couldn’t move.
To my surprise, the egg carpet stopped under my chin.
I let out a long whoosh of air.
And waited.
Had it really stopped?
Yes.
It didn’t crawl over my head. It rested heavily on top of me. Throbbing
steadily, as if it had two dozen heartbeats.
So warm.
I felt so warm beneath it. Almost cozy.
I let out a sigh. For the first time, I had stopped shivering. My hands and
feet were no longer frozen. No chills ran down my back.
Warm. I felt toasty and warm.
A smile spread over my face. I could feel my fear fading away with the
cold.
The egg creatures weren’t trying to harm me, I realized.
They wanted to help me.
They pressed themselves together to form a blanket. A warm and cozy
blanket.
They worked together to keep me from freezing.
They saved my life!
With the warm, pulsing blanket on top of me, I suddenly felt calm. And
sleepy. I drifted into a peaceful, dreamless sleep.
Such a wonderful, soothing sleep.
But it didn’t help get me ready for the horrors of the next morning.
29
I awoke a couple of times during the night. At first, I felt alarmed and frightened
when I saw that I wasn’t home in bed.
But the pulsing, warm egg blanket relaxed me. I shut my eyes and drifted
back to sleep.
Some time in the morning, I was aroused from a deep sleep by an angry
voice. I felt hands grab my shoulders roughly.
Someone was shaking me hard. Shaking me awake.
I opened my eyes to find Dr. Gray bending over me in his white lab coat.
His face was twisted in anger. He shook me hard, shouting furiously.
“Dana—what have you done? What have you done to the egg monsters?”
“Huh?” I was still half asleep. My eyes struggled to focus. My head bobbed
loosely on my shoulders as the angry scientist shook me.
“Let go!” I finally managed to choke out.
“What have you done to them?” Dr. Gray demanded. “How did you turn
them into a blanket?”
“I—I didn’t!” I stammered.
He uttered a furious growl. “You’ve ruined everything!” he shrieked.
“Please—” I started, struggling to wake up.
He let go of me and grabbed the egg blanket in both hands. “What have you
done, Dana?” he repeated. “Why did you do this?”
With another cry of rage, he ripped the blanket off me—and heaved it
against the wall.
The egg creatures made a soft splat as they hit the lab wall. I heard them
utter tiny squeals of pain. The blanket folded limply to the floor.
“You shouldn’t do that, Dr. Gray!” I screamed, finally finding my voice. I
jumped to my feet. I could still feel the warmth of the egg blanket on my skin.
“You hurt them!” I shrieked.
I gazed down at the yellow blanket. It bubbled silently where it had been
thrown. It didn’t move.
“You let them touch you?” Dr. Gray demanded, twisting his face in disgust.
“You let them cover you up?”
“They saved my life!” I declared. “They pushed together to make a warm
blanket—and they saved my life!”
I glanced down again. The egg creatures remained stuck together. The
blanket appeared to be seething now. Throbbing hard. As if excited. Or angry.
“Are you crazy?” Dr. Gray cried, his face red with anger. “Are you crazy?
You let these monsters rest on top of you? You touched them? You handled
them? Are you trying to destroy my discovery? Are you trying to destroy my
work?”
He’s the crazy one, I realized. Dr. Gray isn’t making any sense. He isn’t
making any sense at all.
He moved quickly—and grabbed me again. Held me in a tight grip so I
couldn’t escape. And pulled me to the door.
“Let go of me! Where are you taking me?” I demanded.
“I thought you could be trusted,” Dr. Gray replied in a menacing growl.
“But I was wrong. I’m so sorry, Dana. So sorry. I had hoped to keep you alive.
But I see now that is impossible.”
30
He dragged me to the door. He stopped and reached into the pocket of his lab
coat. Reached for the control unit to open the door.
I saw my chance. He had me by only one hand.
With a hard burst of strength, I pulled away.
He let out a cry. Reached both hands for me.
Missed.
I ran to the other side of the lab. I turned at the wall to face him.
He had a strange smile on his face. “Dana, there’s nowhere to run,” he said
softly.
My eyes flashed around the room. I don’t know what I was searching for. I
had seen it all. And I knew that he was telling the truth.
Dr. Gray stood blocking the only door. The long window was too heavy and
thick to break through. And it didn’t open.
There were no other windows. No other doors.
No ways to escape.
“What are you going to do now, Dana?” Dr. Gray asked softly, the strange
smile stuck on his face. His blue eyes locked coldly on mine. “Where are you
going to go?”
I opened my mouth to reply. But I had nothing to say.
“I’ll tell you what’s going to happen,” Dr. Gray said softly, calmly. “You’re
going to stay in here. In this cold, cold room. I’m going to leave you now and
make sure you’re locked in.”
His smile grew wider. “Then do you know what I’m going to do? Do you?”
“What?” I choked out.
“I’m going to make it colder in here. I’m going to make it colder than a
freezer.”
“No—!” I protested.
His smile faded. “I trusted you, Dana. I trusted you. But you broke that
trust. You let them touch you. You let them form this—this carpet! You ruined
them, Dana! You ruined my egg monsters!”
“I—I didn’t do anything!” I stammered. I balled my hands into fists. But I
felt so helpless. Helpless and afraid.
“You can’t freeze me in here!” I cried. “I didn’t do anything! You can’t
leave me in here to freeze!”
“Of course I can,” Dr. Gray replied coldly. “This is my lab. My own little
world. I can do whatever I want.”
He pulled the little black remote unit from his lab coat pocket. He pointed it
at the door and pushed a button.
The door swung open.
He started to leave. “Good-bye, Dana,” he called.
31
“No—stop!” I called.
Dr. Gray turned from the doorway.
And as he turned, the blanket of egg creatures rose up.
It stood straight up—and flung itself over him. It dropped on top of the
scientist with a hard thud.
“Hey—” He let out an angry cry. The cry was muffled by the heavy yellow
blanket of egg creatures.
The egg blanket covered him. I watched him struggle underneath it. And I
listened to his muffled cries.
He was squirming and twisting beneath the blanket. But he couldn’t toss it
off. And he couldn’t slide out from under it.
He crumpled to the floor, and the blanket crumpled with him.
I watched it seething and bubbling on top of him.
Then I didn’t wait another second. I took a deep breath—and I ran across
the room. I darted past the egg blanket with Dr. Gray twisting and thrashing
underneath it.
Out the door.
Down the long hall to the front of the lab.
Yes! A few seconds later, I pushed open the front door and burst outside.
Breathing hard, sucking in the sweet, fresh air.
A beautiful morning. A red ball of a sun still rising over the spring-green
trees. The sky clear and blue.
I glanced around. I could see a paperboy on his bike halfway up the block.
No one else on the street.
I turned and ran around to the side of the building. The grass smelled so
wonderful! The morning air so warm and fresh. I was so thrilled to be outside!
I had to get home.
I had a hunch—and the hunch was right. I spotted my bike, resting against
the back wall of the lab, hidden by a large Dumpster.
I leaped onto it and started to pedal. Riding a bike never felt as exciting, so
thrilling!
I was getting away, away from the horror of crazy Dr. Gray and his freezing
lab.
I pedaled faster. I rode without stopping. Without seeing! The world was a
blur of green.
I must have set a speed record for getting home.
I roared up the driveway, the tires sending gravel flying on both sides.
Then I jumped off my bike and let it topple to the grass. I dove for the
kitchen door and burst into the kitchen. “Mom!” I cried.
She jumped up from the breakfast table. I caught the worried expression on
her face. It melted away as I ran into the room.
“Dana!” she cried. “Where were you? We’ve all been so terrified. The
police are looking for you and—and—”
“I’m okay!” I told her. I gave her a quick hug.
Dad ran in from the hallway. “Dana—you’re okay? Where were you all
night? Your mother and I—”
“Egg monsters!” I cried. “Egg monsters from Mars! Hurry!” I grabbed
Dad’s hand and tugged. “Come on!”
“Huh?” Dad spun around. He narrowed his eyes, studying me. “What did
you say?”
“No time to explain!” I gasped. “They’ve got Dr. Gray. He’s evil, Dad. He’s
so evil!”
“Who has what?” Mom demanded.
“The egg creatures! From Mars! Hurry! There’s no time!”
They didn’t move. I saw them exchange glances.
Mom stepped forward and placed a hand on my forehead. “Do you have a
fever, Dana? Are you sick?”
“No!” I screamed. “Listen to me! Egg creatures from Mars! Follow me!”
I know I wasn’t explaining myself too well. But I was frantic.
“Dana—come lie down,” Mom instructed. “I’ll call Dr. Martin.”
“No—please! I don’t need a doctor!” I protested. “Just follow me—okay?
You’ve got to see them. You’ve got to see the egg creatures. You’ve got to
hurry.”
Mom and Dad exchanged worried glances again.
“I’m not crazy!” I shrieked. “I want you to come with me to the science
lab!”
“Okay, okay,” Dad finally agreed. “You were in that lab last night?”
“Yes,” I told him, shoving him to the kitchen door. “I called and called. But
you couldn’t hear me.”
“Oh, wow,” Dad murmured, shaking his head. “Wow.”
The three of us climbed into the car.
It took about three minutes to drive to the lab. Dad parked in front. I
jumped out of the car before he stopped.
The front door to the lab stood wide open, as I’d left it.
I ran inside with Mom and Dad close behind me.
“They’re egg creatures,” I told them breathlessly. “They dropped down
from Mars. They captured Dr. Gray.”
I led the way down the long hall.
I pushed open the door to the freezing back room.
Mom and Dad stepped in behind me.
I gazed around the room—and gasped in amazement!
32
I saw Mom and Dad staring at me. They had worried expressions on their faces.
“Where are the egg creatures?” Mom demanded softly.
Dad rested a hand gently on my shoulder. “Where are they, Dana?” he
asked in a whisper.
“Uh… they’re gone,” I choked out.
The lab stood empty.
No Dr. Gray. No egg creatures. No one.
Bare white walls. Nothing on the floor.
Nothing.
“Maybe they went back to Mars,” I murmured, shaking my head.
“And Dr. Gray? What about Dr. Gray?” Dad asked.
“Maybe they took Dr. Gray with them,” I replied.
“Let’s go home,” Mom sighed. “Let’s get you into bed, Dana.”
Dad guided me from the room, his hands on my shoulders. “I’ll call Dr.
Martin,” he said softly. “I’m sure we can get him to come to the house this
morning.”
“I—I do feel a little strange,” I admitted.
So they drove me home and tucked me into bed.
The doctor came later that morning and examined me. He didn’t find
anything wrong. But he said I should stay in bed and rest for a while.
I knew that Mom and Dad didn’t believe my story. I felt bad about that. But
I didn’t know how to convince them I was telling the truth.
I did feel a little weird.
Just tired, I guess.
I dozed off and woke up and dozed off again.
In the afternoon, I woke up to hear my sister Brandy talking to some friends
outside my room. “Dana totally freaked out,” I heard Brandy say. “He says he
was kidnapped by egg monsters from Mars.”
I heard Brandy’s friends giggling.
Oh great, I thought bitterly. Now everyone thinks I’m a nut case.
I wanted to call Brandy into my room and tell her what really happened. I
wanted to make her believe me. I wanted to make someone believe me.
But how?
I fell asleep again.
I was awakened by a voice calling my name. I sat up in bed. The voice
floated in from my open bedroom window.
I climbed out of bed and made my way to the window. Anne was calling me
from the driveway. “Dana—are you okay? Do you want to come over? I got a
new CD-ROM version of Battle Chess.”
“Cool!” I called down to Anne. “I’ll be right over.”
I pulled on a T-shirt and a pair of jeans. I was feeling pretty good. Rested.
Like my old self.
So happy that everything was back to normal.
I hummed to myself as I brushed my hair. I stared at myself in the mirror.
You had an amazing adventure, Dana, I told myself. Imagine—you spent a
night with egg creatures from Mars!
But now you’re okay, and your life is back to normal.
I felt so happy, I gave Brandy a hug on my way down the stairs. She stared
at me as if I truly were crazy!
Humming loudly, I made my way out the kitchen door and started across
the yard to Anne’s house.
Everything looked so beautiful to me. The grass. The trees. The spring
flowers. The sun setting behind the trees.
What a day! What a beautiful, perfect, normal day!
And then halfway across Anne’s lawn, I stopped.
I crouched down on the grass—and I laid the biggest egg you ever saw!
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

THE BEAST
FROM THE EAST
Goosebumps - 43
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
When I was a really little girl, my mom would tuck me into bed at night. She
would whisper, “Good night, Ginger. Good night. Don’t let the bedbugs bite.”
I didn’t know what bedbugs were. I pictured fat red bugs with big eyes and
spidery legs, crawling under the sheet. Just thinking about them made me itchy
all over.
After Mom kissed me on the forehead and left, Dad would step into my
room and sing to me. Very softly. The same song every night. “The Teddy Bears’
Picnic.”
I don’t know why he thought that song made a good lullaby. It was about
going into the woods and finding hundreds and hundreds of bears.
The song gave me the shivers. What were the bears eating at their picnic?
Children?
After Dad kissed me on the forehead and left the room, I’d be itching and
shaking for hours.
Then I’d have nightmares about bedbugs and bears.
Until a few years ago, I was afraid to go into the woods.
I’m twelve now, and I’m not scared any longer.
At least, I wasn’t scared until our family camping trip this summer. That’s
when I discovered that there are a lot scarier creatures than bears in the woods!
But I guess I’d better begin at the beginning.
The first thing I remember about our camping trip is Dad yelling at my
brothers. I have two ten-year-old brothers—Pat and Nat. You guessed it. They’re
twins.
Lucky me—huh?
Pat and Nat aren’t just twins. They’re identical twins. They look so much
alike, they confuse each other!
They are both short and skinny. They both have round faces and big brown
eyes. They both wear their brown hair parted in the middle and straight down the
sides. They both wear baggy, faded jeans and black-and-red skater T-shirts with
slogans no one can understand.
There is only one way to tell Pat from Nat or Nat from Pat. You have to ask
them who they are!
I remember that our camping trip began on a beautiful, sunny day. The air
smelled piney and fresh. Twigs and dead leaves crackled under our shoes as we
followed a twisting path through the woods.
Dad led the way. He carried the tent over his shoulder, and he had a bulging
backpack on his back. Mom followed him. She was also loaded down with stuff
we needed.
The path led through a grassy clearing. The sun felt hot on my face. My
backpack began to feel heavy. I wondered how much deeper into the woods
Mom and Dad wanted to go.
Pat and Nat followed behind us. Dad kept turning around to yell at them.
We all had to yell at Pat and Nat. Otherwise, they never seemed to hear us. They
only heard each other.
Why was Dad yelling?
Well, for one thing, Nat kept disappearing. Nat likes to climb trees. If he
sees a good tree, he climbs it. I think he’s part chimpanzee.
I tell him that as often as I can. Then he scratches his chest and makes
chimp noises. He thinks he’s really funny.
So there we were, hiking through the woods. And every time we turned
around, Nat would be up a tree somewhere. It was slowing us down. So Dad had
to yell at him.
Then Dad had to yell at Pat because of his Game Boy. “I told you not to
bring that thing!” Dad shouted. Dad is big and broad, kind of like a bear. And he
has a booming voice.
It doesn’t do him much good. Pat and Nat never listen to him.
Pat walked along, eyes on his Game Boy, his fingers hammering the
controls.
“Why are we hiking in the woods?” Dad asked him. “You could be home in
your room doing that. Put it away, Pat, and check out the scenery.”
“I can’t, Dad,” Pat protested. “I can’t quit now. I’m on Level Six! I’ve never
made it to Level Six before!”
“There goes a chipmunk,” Mom chimed in, pointing. Mom is the wildlife
guide. She points out everything that moves.
Pat didn’t raise his eyes from his Game Boy.
“Where’s Nat?” Dad demanded, his eyes searching the clearing.
“Up here, Dad,” Nat called. I shielded my eyes with one hand and saw him
on a high branch of a tall oak tree.
“Get down from there!” Dad shouted. “That branch won’t hold you!”
“Hey—I made it to Level Seven!” Pat declared, fingering frantically.
“Look—two bunny rabbits!” Mom cried. “See them in the tall grass?”
“Let’s keep walking,” I groaned. “It’s too hot here.” I wanted to get out of
the clearing and back under the cool shade of the trees.
“Ginger is the only sensible one,” Dad said, shaking his head.
“Ginger is a freak!” Nat called, sliding down from the oak tree.
We made our way through the woods. I don’t know how long we walked. It
was so beautiful! So peaceful. Beams of sunlight poked through the high
branches, making the ground sparkle.
I found myself humming that song about the bears in the woods. I don’t
know what made it pop into my head. Dad hadn’t sung it to me in years and
years.
We stopped for lunch by a clear, trickling stream. “This would make a nice
camping spot,” Mom suggested. “We can set up the tent on the grass here by the
shore.”
Mom and Dad started to unpack the equipment and set up the tent. I helped
them. Pat and Nat threw stones into the stream. Then they got into a wrestling
match and tried to shove each other into the water.
“Take them into the woods,” Dad instructed me. “Try to lose them—okay?”
He was joking, of course.
He had no way of knowing that Pat, Nat, and I would soon be lost for real
—with little hope of ever returning.
2
“What do you want to do?” Nat demanded. He had picked up a thin tree branch
to use as a walking stick. Pat kept slapping at it, trying to make Nat stumble.
We had followed the stream for a while. I saw a million tiny, silver
minnows swimming near the surface. Now we were making our own path
through the tangle of trees, low shrubs, and rocks.
“Hide-and-seek!” Pat declared. He slapped Nat. “You’re It!”
Nat slapped him back. “You’re It.”
“You’re It!”
“You’re It!”
“You’re It!”
The slaps kept getting harder.
“I’ll be It!” I cried. Anything to keep them from murdering each other.
“Hurry. Go hide. But don’t go too far.”
I leaned against a tree, shut my eyes, and started to count to one hundred. I
could hear them scampering into the trees.
After thirty, I counted by tens. I didn’t want to give them too big a head
start. “Ready or not, here I come!” I called.
I found Pat after only a few minutes. He had crouched behind a large white
mound of sand. He thought he was hidden. But I spotted his brown hair poking
up over the top of the sand.
I tagged him easily.
Nat was harder to find. He had climbed a tree, of course. He was way up at
the top, completely hidden by thick clumps of green leaves.
I never would have found him if he hadn’t spit on me.
“Get down, creep!” I shouted angrily. I waved a fist up at him. “You’re
disgusting! Get down—right now!”
He giggled and peered down at me. “Did I hit you?”
I didn’t answer. I waited for him to climb down to the ground. Then I
rubbed a handful of dried leaves in his face until he was sputtering and choking.
Just a typical Wald family hide-and-seek game.
After that, we chased a squirrel through the woods. The poor thing kept
glancing back at us as if he didn’t believe we were chasing after him. He finally
got tired of the race and scurried up a tall pine tree.
I glanced around. The trees in this part of the woods grew close together.
Their leaves blocked most of the sunlight. The air felt cooler here. In their shade,
it was nearly as dark as evening.
“Let’s go back,” I suggested. “Mom and Dad might be getting worried.”
The boys didn’t argue. “Which way?” Nat asked.
I glanced around, making a complete circle with my eyes. “Uh… that way.”
I pointed. I was guessing. But I felt ninety-nine percent sure.
“Are you sure?” Pat asked. He eyed me suspiciously. I could see he was a
little worried. Pat didn’t like the outdoors as much as Nat and me.
“Sure I’m sure,” I told him.
I led the way. They followed close behind. They had both picked up
walking sticks. After we had walked a few minutes, they started fighting a duel
with them.
I ignored them. I had my own worries. I wasn’t sure we were walking in the
right direction. In fact, I felt totally turned around.
“Hey—there’s the stream!” I cried happily.
I immediately felt better. We weren’t lost. I had picked the right direction.
Now all we had to do was follow the stream back to the clearing where we
had set up camp.
I began to hum again. The boys tossed their sticks into the stream. We
began to jog along the grassy shore.
“Whoa!” I cried out when my left boot started to sink. I nearly fell into a
deep mud patch. I pulled my hiking boot up. Soaked in wet, brown mud up over
the ankle.
Pat and Nat thought that was a riot. They laughed and slapped each other
high fives.
I growled at them, but I didn’t waste any words. They’re both hopeless. So
totally immature.
Now I couldn’t wait to get back to camp and clean the thick mud off my
boot. We jogged along the shore, then cut through the skinny, white-trunked
trees and into the clearing.
“Mom! Dad!” I called, hurrying over the grass. “We’re back!”
I stopped so short, both boys tumbled into me.
My eyes searched the clearing.
“Mom? Dad?”
They were gone.
3
“They left us!” Pat exclaimed. He ran frantically around the clearing. “Mom!
Dad!”
“Earth to Pat,” Nat called. He waved his hand in front of Pat’s face. “We’re
in the wrong place, you wimp.”
“Nat is right,” I replied, glancing around. There were no footprints, no tent
markers. We were in a different clearing.
“I thought you knew the way, Ginger,” Pat complained. “Didn’t they teach
you anything at that nature camp?”
Nature camp! Last summer my parents forced me to spend two weeks at an
“Explore the Great Outdoors” camp. I got poison ivy the first day. After that, I
didn’t listen to anything the counselors said.
Now I wished I had.
“We should have left markers on the trees,” I said, “to find our way back.”
“Now you think of it?” Nat groaned, rolling his eyes. He picked up a long,
crooked stick and waved it in my face.
“Give me that,” I ordered.
Nat handed me the stick. Yellow sap oozed onto my palm. It smelled sour.
“Gross!” I shouted. I tossed the stick away. I rubbed my hands on my jeans.
But the yellow stain wouldn’t come off my palm.
That’s weird, I thought. I wondered what the stuff was. I definitely didn’t
like it on my skin.
“Let’s follow the stream,” I suggested. “Mom and Dad can’t be too far.”
I tried to sound calm. But I was totally twisted around. In fact, I had no idea
where we were.
We headed out of the clearing and back to the shore. The sun fell lower in
the sky. It prickled the back of my neck.
Pat and Nat tossed pebbles into the water. After a few minutes, they tossed
them at each other.
I ignored them. At least they weren’t throwing anything at me.
As we walked along, the air became cooler. The path grew narrower.
The water turned dark and murky. Silvery-blue fish snapped at the air. The
skinny branches of the tall trees reached down toward us.
A feeling of dread swept over me. Nat and Pat grew quiet. They actually
stopped picking on each other.
“I don’t remember any of these bushes near our campsite,” Pat said
nervously. He pointed to a short, squat plant. Its strange blue leaves looked like
open umbrellas stacked one on top of the other. “Are you sure we’re going the
right way?”
By now I was sure we weren’t headed in the right direction. I didn’t
remember those strange bushes, either.
Then we heard a noise on the other side of the shrubs.
“Maybe that’s Mom and Dad!” Pat exclaimed.
We pushed our way through the plants. And ran into another deserted
clearing.
I glanced around. This grassy field was enormous. Large enough for a
hundred tents.
My heart hammered against my chest.
We stood on rust-colored grass. It stuck up over my ankle. A clump of
gigantic purple cabbage plants grew to our right.
“This place is cool!” Nat cried. “Everything is so big.”
To me, the clearing wasn’t cool at all. It gave me the creeps.
Strange trees surrounded us on all sides. Their branches shot out at right
angles to the trunk. They resembled stairs going up and up and up. Up into the
clouds.
They were the tallest trees I’d ever seen. And perfect for climbing.
Red moss clung to the branches. Yellow gourds hung from braided vines,
swaying in the air.
Where were we? This looked like a weird jungle—not the woods! Why
were all the trees and plants so strange?
A knot formed in the pit of my stomach.
Where was our clearing? Where were Mom and Dad?
Nat jogged over to a tree. “I’m climbing up,” he said.
“No, you don’t,” I protested. I rushed over and pulled his arm from the
branch.
The red moss rubbed against my palm. My skin turned red where I touched
it. Now I had a yellow-and-red design on my hand.
What’s going on here? I wondered.
Before I could show my hand to my brothers, the tree started to shake.
“Whoa! Watch out!” I cried.
A small furry animal jumped out of the branches and landed at my feet. I
had never seen anything like it before. It was the size of a chipmunk, brown all
over except for a white patch around one eye.
It had a bushy tail and floppy ears like a bunny. And two big front teeth like
a beaver. Its flat nose twitched. It stared at me with gray eyes, round with fear. I
watched it scurry away.
“What was that?” Pat asked.
I shrugged. I wondered what other kinds of weird creatures lived in these
woods.
“I’m kind of scared,” Pat admitted, huddling close to me.
I felt scared too. But I knew I was the big sister. So I told him everything
was okay.
Then I glanced down. “Nat! Pat!” I shouted. “Look!”
My muddy boot stood inside a footprint three times the size of mine. No—
even bigger. What kind of animal had a footprint that huge?
A bear? A giant gorilla?
I didn’t have time to think about it.
The ground started to tremble.
“Do you feel that?” I asked my brothers.
“It’s Dad!” Pat shouted.
It definitely was not Dad. He’s a big guy. But no way could he make the
ground shake that way!
I heard grumbles and growls from somewhere in the distance. And then a
roar. Twigs and branches snapped loudly in the air.
All three of us gasped as a tall beast stomped through the trees. It was huge.
So tall that its head touched the middle branches.
It had a narrow, pointy head over a long neck. Its eyes shone like bright
green marbles. Shaggy blue fur covered every part of its body. Its long, furry tail
thumped heavily on the ground.
The weirdest creature I’d ever seen in my life!
The beast entered the far side of the clearing.
I sucked in my breath as it drew closer. Close enough for me to see its long
snout. Its nostrils flared in and out as it sniffed the air.
My brothers hung back, hiding behind me. We huddled together. Trembling.
The beast opened its mouth. Two rows of sharp, yellow teeth rose up from
purple gums. One long, jagged fang slid down over the creature’s chin.
I crouched on my hands and knees. Pulled my brothers down with me.
The beast spun around in circles. It sniffed the air and wiggled its hairy,
pointed ears. Had it smelled us? Was it searching for us?
I couldn’t think. I couldn’t move.
The beast turned its ugly head. It stared at me.
It saw me.
4
My eyes on the creature, I grabbed my brothers by their T-shirts. I dragged them
behind some of the huge cabbage plants.
The beast stayed on the other side of the clearing, sniffing the air. It
stomped back and forth, sniffing hard. The ground seemed to shake each time
one of its furry paws hit the ground. I could feel Nat and Pat shiver with fear.
The beast turned away from us.
Whew! I thought. It hasn’t seen us. I bit my bottom lip and held onto Pat
and Nat.
“Argggh,” the beast grunted. It dropped to all fours. It pressed its snout to
the ground and crept along, making loud snuffling noises.
I didn’t tell Pat or Nat what I was thinking. The beast hadn’t seen us—but
there was no way we could keep it from smelling us.
Its long tail swished back and forth. The tail banged against the trees.
Gourds fell to the ground.
The beast crawled into the center of the clearing. Closer.
I dug my fingernails into my palm.
Turn around, beast, I prayed. Go back into the woods. The blue creature
stopped. It sniffed again. And then it turned. It began to creep in our direction.
I swallowed. Hard. My mouth suddenly felt so dry.
The creature’s tail pushed against one of the cabbage plants near us. The
leaves rustled.
“Get down!” I whispered, shoving my brothers. We stretched out flat on the
ground.
The beast stopped a few feet from our hiding place.
Its tail brushed my arm. The fur felt rough and scratchy.
I jerked my arm away. Could he feel me? Was I like a tiny animal to him?
One he could pick up and squeeze the way my brothers teased our dog?
The beast rose up on its hind legs and sniffed. It towered over the cabbage
plant. It had to be at least eight feet tall!
It picked at its fur with a clawed thumb—and placed whatever it found in
his mouth.
A pleased grin formed under its twitching snout. It peered around the
clearing.
Don’t look down, I prayed. Don’t see us.
My body tensed.
The creature growled and ran its long tongue over its fang. Then it tromped
off into the trees.
I let out a sigh of relief.
“We’d better wait a few minutes,” I told my brothers. I counted to one
hundred. Then I crawled out from behind the plant. No sign of the creature.
But then I felt the earth shake.
“Oh, no!” I gasped. “Here it comes again!”
5
The beast’s enormous blue head bobbed up between the trees. How had it come
back so fast? And from the other direction?
We scrambled back to our hiding place behind the huge cabbage plant.
“We have to get away from here,” I whispered. “If it keeps searching back
and forth, it’s bound to find us.”
“How do we get away?” Nat demanded.
I picked up a gourd from the ground. “I’ll throw this gourd. The beast will
turn its head to see what the noise is. Then we’ll run—in the other direction.”
“But, what if it sees us? What if it chases us?” Nat asked. He didn’t seem
happy about my plan.
Nat and Pat exchanged nervous glances.
“Yeah. What if it runs faster than us?” Pat demanded.
“It won’t,” I said. I was bluffing. But my brothers didn’t know that.
I peeked over the top of the cabbage. The creature stood closer than ever. It
sniffed the air, its pink snout coiling like a snake.
I glanced at the gourd in my hand, then brought my arm back, ready to
throw.
“Wait!” Pat whispered. “Look!”
My arm froze where it was. Another beast had tromped into the clearing.
And another.
And another.
I gulped. More blue beasts clomped into the clearing.
No way could we make a run for it now.
The enormous creatures tromped around the clearing. They growled and
grunted to each other.
One stopped and jabbered loudly in a deep and gravelly voice. The folds of
hairless skin under its chin wobbled back and forth.
“Look at them all!” Nat murmured. “There must be at least two dozen.”
A small beast jogged into the clearing. Its fur shone a brighter blue than the
rest. It stood only about three feet tall.
Was it a child? A young beast?
The tiny beast placed its short, pink snout on the ground and sniffed. Dirt
and dried-up bits of leaves stuck to its snout.
“It looks hungry,” Pat whispered.
“Shhh!” I warned.
The tiny beast glanced up eagerly. In our direction.
It did look hungry. But for what?
I held my breath.
The small beast suddenly scooped a gourd off the ground. It shoved the
whole thing into its mouth and crunched down. Yellow juice squirted between its
lips and soaked down its shaggy blue fur.
It eats fruit! I cheered silently. That was a good sign. Maybe they are
vegetarians, I thought. Maybe they don’t eat meat.
I knew that most wild animals ate only one type of food. Either meat, or
else fruits and vegetables.
Except for bears, I suddenly remembered. Bears will eat both.
A large beast thudded over to the kid. It yanked the little creature to its feet
and began jabbering angrily at it. It dragged the kid back toward the woods.
The beast with the hairless folds of skin stepped into the center of the
clearing.
“Ghrugh!” It snorted at the others. It waved a furry paw in a circle. It
waved and grunted and jabbered.
The other creatures nodded and grunted to one another. They seemed to
understand each other. They seemed to be grunting some kind of language.
The big beast gave a final grunt. The other creatures turned back toward the
woods. They spread out and began to creep silently into the trees. I felt the earth
trembling under the pounding of their feet. Twigs and leaves crackled and
cracked.
In a few seconds, they had vanished. The clearing stood empty.
I let out another long sigh of relief.
“What are they doing, anyway?” Pat asked.
Nat wiped sweat off his forehead. “They act as if they’re searching for
something,” he answered. “Hunting.”
I swallowed hard.
I knew what they were hunting for.
They were hunting for us.
And now there were so many of them. Spreading out in every direction.
We don’t stand a chance, I realized.
They’re going to catch us.
And then what?
6
I stood up slowly. I turned in a full circle, checking everywhere for a sign of the
hairy creatures.
Their low grumbles and growls faded into the distance. The ground stopped
shaking.
A gust of cool wind blew through the clearing. It made the gourds in the
trees knock against each other. An eerie melody whistled through the trees.
I shuddered.
“Let’s get out of here. Now!” Nat cried.
“Wait!” I told him. I grabbed his arm and held him back. “Those beasts are
too near. They’ll hear us or see us.”
“Yeah, well, I’m not going to stick around. I’m going to run as hard as I
can. I’m outta here!”
“I’m with you.” Pat leaped to his feet. “But which way do we go?” he
asked.
“We can’t go anywhere now,” I argued. “We’re lost. We don’t know which
way to go. So we have to stay right here. Mom and Dad will come find us. I
know they will.”
“And what if they don’t? What if they’re in trouble, too?” Nat asked.
“Dad knows how to survive in the woods,” I said firmly. “And we don’t.”
At least I didn’t. If only I had listened at that outdoors camp.
“I do, too!” Pat whined. “I can take care of myself. Right Nat? Let’s get
going!”
Who was he kidding? Pat didn’t even like the woods.
But he’s stubborn. When he gets an idea, no one can change his mind. And
Nat always agrees with him. Twins!
“Ginger—are you coming or not?” Pat demanded.
“You’re crazy,” I told him. “We have to stay here. That’s the rule,
remember?”
Mom and Dad always told us, if we ever get lost, stay where we are.
“But there are only two of Mom and Dad—and there’s three of us,” Pat
argued. “So we should go find them.”
“But they’re not the ones who are lost!” I cried.
“I think we should go,” Pat repeated. “We have to get away from those ugly
creatures!”
“Okay,” I told them. “We’ll go. At least we’ll be together.”
I still thought they were wrong. But I couldn’t let them go off without me.
What if something horrible happened to them?
Besides, I didn’t want to stay in these strange woods alone.
As I turned to follow them, I glimpsed something move in the tall grass.
“It’s… it’s… them!” Nat stammered. “They’re back!”
I stared at the grass in horror.
“Run!” Pat shrieked. He bolted across the clearing.
A squirrel scurried out of the grass.
“Pat, wait!” Nat yelled.
“It’s only a squirrel!” I shouted.
He didn’t hear us.
Nat and I took off, chasing after Pat.
“Pat! Hey—Pat!”
I didn’t see the thick, twisted root that poked out of the ground. I tripped
over it and hit the ground hard. I lay there stunned.
Nat knelt down beside me. He grabbed my arm and helped me to my feet.
I glanced up ahead. Pat had already vanished into the woods. I couldn’t see
him anywhere.
“We have to catch up to him,” I told Nat breathlessly. I straightened up,
brushing dirt off my knees.
The earth started to tremble again.
“Oh, no!” Nat moaned.
The creatures were back.
I whirled around. Big blue beasts pushed back through the trees. I counted
four behind us. Three on my left. Five to our right.
I gave up counting.
There were too many of them.
The big one grunted and raised its furry paws high in the air. It pointed at
us. The other creatures grunted and uttered cries of excitement.
“They’ve caught us!” I groaned.
“Ginger…” Nat whimpered. His eyes opened wide with terror. I clutched at
his hand and held it tight.
The beasts drew closer. And formed a circle around us.
Nowhere to run now.
“We’re trapped,” I whispered.
The beasts began to growl.
7
Over the drone of their low growls, I heard the eerie melody whistling through
the gourds again.
Nat huddled close to me. “They’ve got us,” he whispered. “Do you think—
do you think they got Pat?”
I couldn’t answer. I couldn’t talk.
I felt weak and helpless. Sweat ran down my face into my eyes. I wanted to
wipe the sweat away, but I couldn’t lift my hand to do it.
I was too scared to move.
Then the beast with the flabby chin stepped forward. It stopped a few
inches away from me.
I slowly raised my eyes. I stared at its furry belly. Then its broad chest. I
saw shiny, black insects crawling in its fur.
I raised my eyes to its face. Its green eyes glared down at me. It opened its
mouth. I stared helplessly at its long fang, chipped on the end.
You don’t need a tooth like that for eating fruit! I thought.
The beast stretched to its full height. It raised a furry paw high above us.
Ready to strike.
Nat huddled closer to me. I could practically feel his heart beating through
his T-shirt. Or maybe it was my own heart that was pounding.
The creature growled and swung.
I squeezed my eyes shut.
I felt a slap on my shoulder—so hard it knocked me backwards.
“You’re It!” the creature bellowed.
8
Huh? My mouth dropped open in astonishment.
“You’re It,” the beast repeated.
I gaped at Nat. His eyes bulged in surprise.
“It… it talked!” Nat stammered to me. “In our language.”
The creature scowled at Nat. “I talk in many languages,” he growled. “We
have a universal language adaptor.”
“Oh,” Nat said weakly. He and I exchanged stunned glances.
The creature growled again and took a step closer to me. “Did you hear
me?” he growled. “You’re It!”
His marble eyes glared into mine. He tapped a paw impatiently on the
ground.
“What do you mean?” I asked.
The creature grunted. “You’re the Beast from the East,” he said.
“What are you talking about? I’m not a beast. I’m a girl!” I declared.
“Ginger Wald.”
“I am Fleg,” the beast replied, pounding himself on the chest. He waved a
paw at the creature beside him, a beast with one eye missing. “This is Spork,”
Fleg announced. Fleg pounded the other beast on the back.
Spork grunted at Nat and me. I stared at his dark, empty eye socket. And I
spotted a deep black scar on the side of Spork’s nose.
An eye missing and a scar. The big creature had been in a pretty nasty fight.
I hoped it wasn’t a fight with a human. Because if Spork was the winner, I would
hate to see the loser!
Nat gaped at Spork.
“Uh, this is my brother Nat,” I said quickly.
Spork growled in reply.
“Have you seen our mom and dad?” I asked Fleg. “See, we’re all here
camping, and we got separated. But we’re trying to get back together and go
home. So, we’d better go—”
“There are others?” Fleg glanced sharply around the clearing. “Where?”
“That’s the problem,” Nat answered. “We can’t find them.”
Fleg grunted. “If you can’t find them, they can’t play.”
“Right. That’s the rule,” Spork agreed. He scratched at the insects that
climbed around in his fur.
“Now start moving,” Fleg demanded. “It’s getting late. And you’re It.”
I stared at Nat. This was too weird. What did he mean—they can’t play?
And why did he keep saying I was It? Did they want to play tag or something?
The circle of beasts began stomping their paws, shaking the forest ground.
“Play… play…” they chanted.
“Play what?” I demanded. “Is this really some kind of game?”
Spork’s eye bulged and a big smile spread under his ugly, pink snout. “The
best game,” he said. “But you are too slow to win.”
Spork rubbed his paws together. He ran his tongue over the tops of his
teeth. “You should run.” He grunted.
“Yes, run,” Fleg ordered. “Before I count to trel.”
“Hold on,” I protested. “What if we don’t want to play?”
“Yeah—why should we?” Nat demanded.
“You have to play,” Fleg replied. “Read that sign over there.”
He pointed to a cardboard sign tacked to one of the gourd trees. The sign
read: GAME IN SEASON.
Fleg stared down at me. His eyes narrowed menacingly. His wet nose
flared.
He grinned. Not a friendly grin.
“Game in season?” Nat read the sign in a trembling voice.
“You have to tell us how to play,” I declared. “I mean, we can’t play a game
without knowing what it is.”
Spork growled deep in his throat and moved closer to me. So close I could
smell his fur. What a sour stench!
Fleg reached out a paw and held Spork back.
“It’s a good game,” Fleg told us. “It’s very exciting.”
“Uh… why is it so exciting?” I asked.
His eyes narrowed. “It’s a game of survival!” he replied with a grin.
9
Survival?
Oh, no! No way I wanted to play!
“You have until the sun sinks behind the Gulla Willow,” Fleg declared.
“What’s a Gulla Willow?” Nat asked.
“And where is it?” I wanted to know.
“At the edge of the woods,” Fleg replied. He waved a paw to the trees.
“Which edge? Where? How will we know which tree?” I demanded.
Fleg flashed Spork a grin. They both made weird choking sounds in their
throats.
I could tell they were laughing. All the other creatures started laughing, too.
Such an ugly sound. More like gagging than laughing.
“We can’t play the game unless we know more,” I shouted.
The laughter stopped.
Spork scratched the bugs on his chest. “It’s simple. If you’re It when the
sun goes down, you lose,” he told me.
The others grunted in agreement.
“And what happens to the losers?” I asked in a trembling voice.
“We nibble on them,” Fleg replied.
“Excuse me?” I asked. “You nibble?”
“Yes, we nibble on them. Until dinnertime. Then we eat them.”
10
The creatures around us exploded into more laughter. The sick gagging sound
made me feel like puking.
“It’s not funny!” Nat shrieked.
Fleg narrowed his eyes at us. “It’s our favorite game.”
“Well, I don’t like your game!” Nat cried.
“We’re not going to play. We don’t want to,” I added.
Spork’s eye lit up. “You mean you surrender? You give up?” He smacked
his lips hungrily.
“NO!” I shouted. Nat and I jumped back. “We’ll play. But by the rules. You
have to tell us the rules. All of them.”
A cloud rolled overhead. It cast a shadow over the clearing. I shivered.
Were they going to attack us because we didn’t want to play?
“Made in the Shade!” Spork cried suddenly.
“Made in the Shade,” Fleg repeated.
Huh?
“What’s going on?” I demanded.
The cloud slowly passed.
“No time to explain,” Fleg said. He waved a paw at the other creatures.
“Let’s go,” he insisted. “This time-out has been too long.”
“This isn’t fair!” Nat protested. “Please. We need to know the rules.”
“Okay,” Fleg said as he turned to go. “Gling—you must always attack from
the east.”
“The east,” I mumbled. I raised a hand to shade my eyes as I scanned the
clearing.
East. North. South. West. I pictured a map. East was to my right. West to
my left. But which direction was east out here in the woods? Why hadn’t I
listened at that outdoors camp?
“Proo—the brown squares are Free Lunch squares,” Fleg continued.
“You mean they’re for resting? They’re safe?” I asked. I liked that rule.
Maybe we could find a brown square and stay there until sunset.
Fleg snorted.
“No. Free Lunch. It means anyone can eat you!” He glared down at me.
“Rule Zee,” he announced. “You must be three feet tall to play.”
I glanced at the beasts. They were at least ten feet tall! So much for Fleg’s
rules.
“Well, thanks for explaining,” I said, shaking my head. “But we really can’t
play this game. We have to find our parents and—”
“You must play,” Fleg growled. “You’re It. You’re the Beast from the East.
Play—or surrender.”
“The sun will be down soon,” Spork added, licking his fang.
“You have until the sun goes down behind the Gulla Willow tree,” Fleg
said. “Then, the Beast from the East is the loser.”
Spork made a choking sound, his ugly laugh. “You will make a delicious
loser. I’m thinking maybe a sweet-and-sour sauce. Or perhaps you’d go better
with something a little more spicy.”
The creatures all gagged and choked. They thought Spork was a riot.
Fleg turned to the woods. He stopped. “Oh,” he added with an evil grin.
“Good luck.”
“Good luck,” Spork repeated. He poked a finger into his open eye socket
and scratched inside it. Then he turned and lumbered after Fleg.
The other creatures followed. The earth trembled under their heavy feet. In
a few moments, the clearing stood empty again.
I gaped at Nat.
This wasn’t a game! These evil monsters searched the woods for lost kids.
And then they—
“What are we going to do?” Nat cried. “Maybe they already ate Pat. Maybe
they found him on a brown Free Lunch square.”
“And Mom and Dad, too,” I murmured.
He let out a frightened gasp.
“There has to be someplace safe!” I told him. “The way we use the porch at
home when we play tag.”
Nat swallowed nervously. “What’s safe here?”
I shrugged. “I don’t know,” I admitted.
“We can call time-out,” Nat suggested. “You’re always allowed a time-out
in every game.”
“This is different. This is for our lives,” I said softly.
The leaves rustled in the trees above us. The wind made the gourds whistle.
I heard a low growl. Then a creature laughed. That ugly gagging sound.
Twigs crackled. Bushes swayed. I heard low grunts.
“We’d better start playing,” Nat urged. “They sound hungry.”
11
“How can we play?” I cried. “There’s no way we can win. There are too many of
them. And we don’t even know where that Gulla tree is.”
“So what?” Nat demanded. “We don’t have a choice—do we?”
The leaves in a tree branch over our heads rustled. The branch started
thrashing around.
Thud.
I shrieked and leaped back.
Something small and brown hit the ground at my feet.
One of those small, brown animals we had seen earlier. It rubbed up against
my leg, and made a gurgling sound.
“At least these little guys aren’t mean,” Nat said. He reached down to pet it.
The animal snapped at Nat’s hand, clamping four rows of tiny, sharp teeth.
“Whooa!” Nat jerked his hand away and leaped back. The animal scurried
into the underbrush.
Nat swallowed hard. “Weird,” he murmured. “What kind of forest is this?
How come there aren’t any normal animals?”
“Shhh!” I placed my finger over my lips and scowled. “Listen.”
“I don’t hear anything,” Nat complained.
“Exactly,” I answered.
The grunts and growls and choking laughter had vanished. The woods were
quiet. Really quiet.
“Now’s our chance!” I cried. “Let’s run for it.” I grabbed his hand.
“Wait!” Nat cried. “Which way?”
I squinted around the clearing. “Back to the stream,” I declared. “We’ll try
to follow it back to Mom and Dad. Maybe we’ll hear their voices along the
water.”
“Okay,” Nat agreed.
We raced across the clearing. We plunged into the woods and pushed
through the thick line of trees.
I peered ahead into the forest. “This way!” I shouted, pointing to my left.
“Why?” Nat asked.
“Because,” I said impatiently. “I see light through the trees up ahead. That
means the woods thin out. There were fewer trees near the stream, remember?”
I hurried on. Nat followed. We ran silently for a while. The trees did begin
to thin out. Soon, scraggly bushes dotted the ground.
“There!” I stopped. Nat nearly crashed into me. “Up ahead.”
“The stream!” Nat exclaimed. He slapped me a high five.
Excited now. we began to run. We reached the water at about the same time.
“Now what?” Nat asked.
“Let’s head left again,” I suggested. “The sun was in our eyes when we
started. So now we want it on our backs.”
Yes! I thought. We were definitely headed back the way we came. All we
had to do now was follow the stream back to the right clearing. Back to our
parents.
“Stay low,” I told Nat. “Try not to make any noise, just in case.” In case the
beasts were following us. “And keep an eye out for Pat,” I added.
I had no idea if Pat was still in the woods or not. I hoped he had made it
back to our camp. But he could be anywhere. Maybe hiding someplace nearby,
alone and scared.
Thinking about how scared Pat might be made me feel braver. We had to
stay calm so we could help Pat.
Nat and I crouched down. We scooted along the stream, pushing through
the umbrella bushes that grew close to the water’s edge.
I could still see the silvery-blue fish circling below the surface of the water.
Gazing at the fish, I stumbled. I grabbed at a leaf on an umbrella bush to
steady myself. The leaf shredded in my hand. Blue sap smeared over my fingers.
Not again! Another color. Yellow. Red. And now blue. “Ginger! Come
here!”
Nat’s cry startled me. I rushed to his side.
Nat pointed to the ground.
I glanced down, afraid of what I would see.
“A footprint,” I said, frowning. Then I let out a loud whoop.
Nat’s boot rested inside the footprint perfectly. It was exactly the same size
as his.
“Pat!” we said together.
“He has been here!” Nat cried joyfully.
“Yes!” I shouted. Pat had found his way back to the stream.
“Maybe he already made it back to camp,” Nat said excitedly. “We can
follow his footprints.”
We started out eagerly. With each step I pictured Mom and Dad and Pat’s
smiling faces when Nat and I showed up at camp.
Pat’s footprints marched along the stream for a while. Then they veered into
the woods.
We followed them through the trees and found ourselves on a narrow path.
The trees grew closer together here.
Overhead, the sun disappeared from view.
The air grew damp and cold.
I heard a familiar growl.
Right behind us.
The ground shook.
“Beasts!” I screamed. “Run!”
I pushed Nat forward. We sprinted down the path. It curved to the right and
then back to the left. I had no idea which direction we were going now.
Branches of trees whipped our faces. I struggled to shove them aside. The
trees swayed and shook above our heads. Gourds hit the ground all around us.
Something warm and wet tangled itself around my arm. I yanked free.
Another wet thing grabbed me.
Vines.
Thick yellow vines.
Some draped over the branches of the trees, dangling onto the forest floor.
Others sprouted from the tree trunks. They wrapped around each other, weaving
thick nets from tree to tree.
Some vines stretched across the path. Nat and I had to jump and twist,
leaping over the vines in our way.
It was hard work. I could hear Nat breathing hard.
My side ached. My breath came in short, sharp bursts.
I longed to rest. But we couldn’t rest. The ground was shaking under our
feet. The woods echoed with thunderous cries.
The beasts were coming. And they were gaining on us.
“Watch out!” Nat warned.
I spotted a tangled web of vines strung across the path.
Nat jumped the web. He cleared it. I gathered myself and leaped. I jumped
high.
But not high enough.
Vines wrapped around my ankles. I fell to the ground.
More thick yellow vines twisted around my legs. Frantically, I grabbed at
them and tried to pull them off.
The vines tugged back.
Hard.
“Nat!” I shrieked. “Help!”
“I’m stuck!” he cried. His voice cracked. “Help me, Ginger!”
I couldn’t help him. I couldn’t move.
I glanced down at my legs. The vines were tugging tighter and tighter.
Another vine inched around my waist.
I gaped down at it.
What were those shiny things?
Eyes?
“Eyes!” I cried out.
Vines don’t have eyes!
And then I realized what I was staring at.
The vines weren’t vines.
They were snakes.
12
I screamed.
“Ginger!” Nat cried behind me. “These aren’t vines. They’re—snakes!”
“Tell me something I don’t know!” I groaned.
The snake around my waist uncoiled and slithered onto my right arm. It was
covered with thick scales that felt rough against my bare skin.
I took a deep breath. Then I wrapped my left hand around the snake’s body.
It was warm.
I yanked hard. Tried to pull it off.
No way.
The snake coiled tighter around my arm. Its hard, cold eyes stared up at me.
Its tongue flicked in and out.
I felt something brush against my thigh. I glanced down.
Another snake climbed up my body.
Sweat ran down my forehead.
“Ginger! Help!” Nat wailed. “They’re climbing all over me.”
“M-me, too!” I stammered. I glanced at my brother. His eyes bulged in
terror. He twisted and squirmed, trying to free himself.
The snake around my thigh pulled back its head. And stared at me with
those piercing eyes.
The snake around my arm wound tighter and tighter—until my fingers
turned numb. It hissed. A long, slow hiss. As if it had all the time in the world.
“They’re going to attack!” Nat cried in a strangled voice.
I didn’t answer. I felt a wiry tongue flick against my neck.
Cold.
Their tongues were cold.
And prickly.
I squeezed my eyes shut and held my breath.
Don’t bite. Please don’t bite, I prayed.
A growl disturbed the bushes around us.
“Grrougggh!”
Fleg jumped out of the bushes. He stared at Nat and me, his mouth open.
I gasped.
I saw Fleg’s eyes bulge in surprise as he spotted the snakes. “Double Snake
Eyes!” he called out.
My entire body trembling, I gaped at him in horror.
Double Snake Eyes?
Was that good—or bad?
13
“Congratulations! Double Snake Eyes!” Fleg cried. He shook his head in
wonder. “And you said you never played this game before!”
The snakes tightened around me.
I stared at him. “What are you talking about?” I choked out.
“Twenty points—that’s what I’m talking about.” The Huge beast grunted.
“I’d better play harder. Or you’re going to win!”
“Who cares about winning!” I screamed. “I can’t breathe! Get these snakes
off!”
Fleg grinned. “Off!” he screamed with laughter. The folds of skin under his
jaw flapped up and down. “That’s a good one.”
“We mean it,” Nat pleaded. “Get them off us!”
Fleg seemed confused. “Why?” He asked. “They might bite you.”
“We know!” I screamed. “Help us—please!”
The snakes flicked their tongues against my cheek. My stomach lurched.
Fleg grinned. “If they bite you, you could be awarded a Triple Hisser,” he
explained. “Worth sixty points.”
Points for getting bitten. Some game!
“Forget the points!” I shrieked. “Get—them—off. Now!”
Fleg shrugged. “Okay.”
He stepped up to me. Then he pushed a claw under the snake that was
coiled around my arm. “You need claws to do this right,” he bragged.
Fleg scratched his claw along the snake’s skin.
I could feel the snake loosen its grip.
“They’re ticklish,” Fleg explained. He yanked the snake away and tossed it
into the woods.
He tickled the other snake, then pulled it from around my leg. Then he
turned to Nat and repeated the same motions, tickling the snakes and prying
them loose.
When Fleg was done, he leaped toward the edge of the woods.
I struggled to my feet and rubbed my arms and legs. My whole body itched
and tingled. I knew I’d see those snakes in my dreams!
Fleg stuck his furry head out from behind a tree.
“You could have tagged me,” he called. “Too bad!”
He opened his mouth in a gagging laugh. Then he plunged into the woods
and disappeared.
My mouth dropped open. I stared after him in disbelief.
“Tag!” Nat cried. “Now I get it. It’s just like tag. The rules are easy,
Ginger.” He turned to face me. “Touch one of the beasts, and you won’t be It
anymore. You won’t be the Beast from the East!”
Nat took off, running after Fleg.
“Wait, Nat!” I started after him. I stepped on something hard. I heard a
crunch.
Another crunch. I glanced down.
“Nat! Stop!” I screamed. I spotted an orange rock at my feet. I picked it up
and hurled it after Nat. “Hey—stop!”
I glanced down at my hand. Orange. My fingers had turned orange where
they had grasped the rock.
The rock smacked into a tree trunk. Nat stopped. Whirled around. “What
did you do that for?” he cried.
“To stop you,” I answered.
“Listen, Ginger,” Nat urged. “You have to tag one of the beasts. It’s the only
way to win the game. To stay alive.”
“I don’t think so,” I said as calmly as I could.
Nat scowled. “What’s your problem? It’s just like tag.”
“No,” I said. “This is not just like tag. Not the game that we used to play.”
I pointed at the ground.
Nat stepped closer. He gazed down to where I was pointing.
He gasped. “What is that?” he asked.
14
“Bones,” I murmured. “A pile of animal bones.”
Nat and I stared. The bones gleamed coldly in the sunlight. Picked clean.
“Notice anything else?” I pointed to the ground beside the bones.
“What?” Nat frowned.
“It’s brown,” I said. “The grass under the bones. It’s a square brown patch.”
Free Lunch.
Nat swallowed hard.
“A beast ate it,” he murmured. “Whatever it was.”
I wrapped my arms around my chest. “This is not like tag, Nat,” I told him
solemnly. I couldn’t take my eyes off the poor animal’s bones. “This game is
deadly.”
“Only if we lose,” Nat said. “Ginger, we just saw Fleg. He helped us.”
“So?” I asked.
“So, we’ll make him help us again.”
“How can we do that?”
Nat grinned. “Easy. We’ll trick him. Pretend to need help. Pretend you have
another snake on you or something.”
“Right,” I replied, rolling my eyes. Like I was really going to let Fleg near
me again.
Nat grabbed my arm. “It’ll work. You scream for help. Fleg gets close. You
jump out and tag him. Easy.” Nat snapped his fingers.
I shook my head. “Forget it. I’m going to find the stream again and get out
of here.”
“Why are you so stubborn?” Nat cried.
“Because I’m It!” I screamed. “I’m the one they’re going to eat!”
“I-I know we can win if we try,” Nat stammered.
I took a few deep breaths and tried to get rid of the panic in my chest.
“Okay,” I said finally. “Okay. Okay. I’ll try it. What should I do?”
15
Nat beamed at me. “First I’ll climb a tree,” he said. “I can spot the beasts’ hiding
places from up there.”
I gazed up at the tall, leafy trees around us.
I thought about it. All we needed was to tag one beast. Any beast.
“Do it,” I told Nat. “But don’t stay up there too long.”
Nat searched the woods for the best tree. “That one,” he said finally.
The tree was tall. Dozens of sturdy branches sprang from its sides. In the
center of each branch was a big, strong knot. Tiny golden leaves covered the
branches. The tree looked strong, strong enough to hold Nat.
“This is a cinch,” he assured me. “As easy as climbing a ladder. I’ll be able
to see everything from up there.”
I waited near the base of the tree.
Nat placed his foot on the lowest branch and hoisted himself up.
He climbed slowly. Steadily.
“See anything yet?” I called anxiously.
“I see a weird nest,” he shouted down. “With big eggs.”
“What about the beasts?” I yelled. “Do you see them?”
“Not yet.” Nat climbed higher. A few seconds later, he disappeared from
view.
“Nat! Can you hear me?” I called. I cupped my hands around my mouth.
“Nat! Where are you? Answer me!”
I rushed around the tree, peering up through the branches. I spotted Nat
near the very top.
Nat was moving carefully. He let go of one branch and pulled himself onto
the next highest branch. The top of the tree swayed dangerously.
I caught my breath.
Maybe this wasn’t such a good idea.
Not if I had to climb up and rescue him.
“Nat!” My throat hurt from shouting so loud. “Be careful!”
The trunk swayed back and forth. Slowly at first. Then faster.
Bits of loose bark broke off and fell in slow spirals toward the ground.
The thick branches swished back and forth. Each branch started to bend in
the middle.
At the knots.
I stared. The branches reminded me of something. Something familiar.
Arms, I thought. The knots were like elbows. And the branches were like
big arms, reaching…
I blinked. Was I seeing things?
The branches were reaching.
They were reaching for Nat.
“Nat!” I screamed.
High above me, I saw him grasp onto a slender branch.
“Nat!” I ran frantically around the base of the tree, pounding my fists on the
trunk. “Nat! Come down!” I yelled. “The tree is alive!”
16
Nat peered down at me from the top of the tree. “What’s wrong?” he called
down.
“Come down!” I screamed. “The branches—”
I was too late.
The upper branches grabbed at Nat’s arms. Pinned them to his side. I saw
him gasp in shock.
Other branches lashed out, slapping at him.
Slapping him. Whipping him.
“Ginger!” Nat screamed. “Help me!”
What could I do?
I gazed up in horror as two lower branches reached up toward Nat. The top
branches passed him down to the lower branches.
The branches wrapped around him, hugging tight.
This isn’t happening! I told myself. This can’t be happening!
Nat’s feet dangled in the air. He kicked furiously at the tree. “Let me go!
Let me gooooo!”
More branches lashed out. Some held him tight. Others swiped at him,
slapping at him.
The branches passed Nat down.
They were carrying him lower, down to the center of the tree.
Where the branches were the thickest.
Where the tree’s arms were strongest.
Nat cried out. He kicked out again and again. The branches wrapped around
his legs.
No way to climb up to him. Every branch was thrashing wildly. Even the
little thin ones that couldn’t reach Nat were clawing upwards. Straining to take a
swipe at him.
As I watched helplessly, the thickest branches pulled Nat into the center.
He disappeared.
“Help!” His muffled cry drifted down to me. “Ginger—it’s going to
swallow me!”
I had to do something. Had to pull him away somehow. Had to free him
from the living tree.
But how?
We had gotten rid of the snakes. We had to get rid of the branches, too. If
only…
That’s it!
I had a crazy idea. But maybe, just maybe it would work.
If the tree is alive, maybe it has feelings, I thought.
And if it has feelings, maybe it’s ticklish—just as the snakes were!
“Ginger! Help!” Nat’s cries grew weaker.
I knew I didn’t have much time.
I leaped at the tree. A branch dipped down and slapped at me.
I jumped back and scrambled around the trunk. I ducked as a thick branch
swung at me.
The tree was trying to keep me away while it swallowed up my brother. But
I ducked beneath the slapping limbs and branches.
Reached out. And began to tickle the rough bark.
Tickled it with one hand. Then with both.
Was that a shiver? Did the tree actually shiver?
Or did I imagine it?
Please! I silently begged. Please, please, let go of my brother.
I tickled furiously with both hands. “Nat!” I called. “Nat! Can you hear
me?”
Silence.
“Nat? Nat?”
No answer.
17
I didn’t give up. I tickled harder.
The trunk started to jiggle.
Bunches of leaves shook free and floated down. They landed in my hair and
covered my arms as I jabbed and scratched at the tree trunk.
I tickled harder. The branches shook and swayed. The trunk wriggled.
Yes! I thought excitedly. It’s working! I think it is ticklish!
I’ll make this tree collapse with laughter!
I tickled harder. The trunk squirmed under my fingertips.
I glanced up. Nat’s boots poked through the leaves.
Then his legs. His arms. His face.
The branches were shaking. Quivering and shaking.
Nat swung free. He leaped from branch to branch. His tree-climbing skills
were finally coming in handy!
“Hurry!” I shouted up to him. “I can’t keep this up much longer. Jump!”
Nat wriggled down the tree trunk.
“Here goes!” Nat cried. He let go of the trunk and leaped into the air.
He landed in a crouched position at my feet. “Whoa! Good job, Ginger!”
I grabbed his hand and we hurtled away from the tree.
Nat brushed twigs and leaves from his hair. “I saw some beasts!”
I bit my lip. In all the excitement over the living tree, I had forgotten we
were playing a deadly game.
“I saw three of them,” Nat reported. “Fleg, Spork, and another one with a
smashed tail. That way.” He pointed to the right.
“What were they doing?” I asked.
“They are all hiding behind a big, gray boulder. You can sneak up on them,
easy.”
“Right.” I rolled my eyes. “Piece of cake.”
“You can do it.” Nat’s dark eyes locked on mine. “I know you can, Ginger.”
Nat led the way. We crept slowly through the woods toward the boulder.
The sky dimmed overhead and the air grew cooler. I knew that it was nearly
evening. Soon the sun would disappear behind the Gulla Willow tree.
I hoped I had enough time.
“There’s the rock!” Nat whispered.
I saw a small clearing in the trees. In the middle of the clearing a craggy,
gray boulder rose up from the flat ground.
It was big enough to hide a dozen beasts.
My heartbeat quickened.
“I’ll hide behind this cabbage plant,” Nat said.
He ducked behind the plant. I followed. I wasn’t quite ready to face the
beasts alone.
I bent down and tightened my bootlace, trying to ignore the fluttering in my
stomach.
“Just sneak up on them,” Nat whispered.
“Come with me,” I begged.
Nat shook his head. “Too noisy if we both go,” he said. “It’s safer if you go
alone.”
I knew he was right.
Besides, I told myself, it was pretty easy. The beasts behind the big rock
had no idea I was coming. All I had to do was tag one of them.
I felt a thrill of excitement. I could do it.
And the game would be over. We’d be safe.
I took a deep breath. “Ready or not, here I come,” I whispered.
I crept toward the boulder. I glanced back. Nat poked his head from behind
the cabbage and flashed me a thumbs-up sign.
A few more steps and I’d be at the rock. I held my breath.
The gray rock rose up in front of me.
I reached out. My fingers were trembling with excitement. I leaped behind
the rock. “Gotcha,” I cried. “You’re It!”
18
“Huh?”
My hand swiped empty air.
They were gone!
No beasts. Only a pile of broken gourds scattered over the ground.
I blinked in surprise. And scrambled to the front of the rock.
No beasts. They had moved on.
“Nat!” I called. “Nat!”
My brother came jogging to the boulder. “What happened?”
“Nothing happened. They’re gone,” I told him. “Now what?”
“Hey,” Nat snapped. “It’s not my fault.”
I stared at him, feeling totally disappointed. And afraid.
A sharp gust of wind kicked up. I glanced at the sky. Shades of pink
streaked overhead. The sun was setting.
My chest tightened in despair.
“It’s hopeless,” I muttered.
Nat shook his head. “Do you know what we need?” he asked.
“No. What?” I replied.
“We need another plan.”
I had to laugh. Nat was such a jerk!
He leaned against the boulder and wrinkled his nose. “What kind of rock is
this anyway?” he asked.
“A creepy one,” I answered.
Nat peered at the huge rock. “Something’s growing on it,” he said.
“Well, don’t touch anything,” I warned.
But telling Nat not to do something only makes him want to do it more.
Nat stuck his finger into a hole in the boulder.
The big rock trembled.
A crack appeared at its top and spread quickly.
Nat pulled his finger away.
“What’s happening?” I yelled.
A cloud of gray smoke shot up from inside the boulder.
KERPLOOM!
Nat and I ducked, clapping our hands over our ears.
The explosion roared like a million firecrackers going off at once.
More gray smoke billowed out of the boulder.
I could barely see Nat. I started to cough. My eyes burned.
The smoke filled the clearing around us and drifted above the treetops. A
few seconds later, it faded away.
And I saw Fleg standing in the clearing.
Spork appeared behind him, scratching at his open eye socket.
Another beast followed. And then another. They stared at Nat and me.
“You touched the Penalty Rock!” Fleg cried.
Nat took a step closer to me. “Huh?”
Fleg nodded to the beast with the smashed tail. “Get him, Gleeb,” Fleg
growled.
Gleeb’s snout tensed. His eyes bulged. He reached out for Nat’s arm.
“Wait! Stop,” I yelled. “Nat didn’t know it was a penalty.”
“No fair! No fair!” Nat cried.
The beasts ignored us.
Gleeb scooped Nat up and lifted him high in the air. “Let’s go,” Gleeb
grunted.
Gleeb balanced Nat on both paws. Then he pretended to drop him.
Nat shrieked.
Gleeb and the other beasts snorted their ugly laughter, clapping their hairy
paws together.
“Stop it!” I screamed. “Let him go!”
“Yes, go,” the beasts echoed. They clapped their paws again. “Let’s go!
Let’s go!” they chanted.
I glared at Fleg. “Tell him to put my brother down.”
“He touched the Penalty Rock,” Fleg explained. “He must have his
penalty.”
“But we didn’t know about it!” I protested. “We don’t know any of your
dumb rules. That isn’t fair.”
I tried to grab Nat’s dangling legs.
“Let me see your hand,” Fleg demanded. He snatched at my arm and lifted
my hand up to his eyes. He studied my palm.
“Nubloff colors!” he exclaimed. He studied me. “That’s fifty points. You
can’t trick me. You’ve played this game before. You already know the rules.”
I stared at my hand. Yellow sap from the stick. Blue from the leaf of the
umbrella plant. Orange from the rock. Nubloff colors?
“But… but…” I stammered. “I didn’t get these colors on purpose. They just
happened.”
Fleg and Spork exchanged glances.
“Come,” Fleg ordered, waving to Gleeb.
Gleeb tossed Nat over his shoulder and followed Fleg to the woods. The
others stomped after them.
“Ginger!” Nat wailed as the beast carried him away.
I ran after them, feeling totally helpless.
“Stop! Where are you taking him?” I shrieked. “What are you going to do
to him?”
19
I chased after them. Down a wide path lined with more giant rocks.
More penalty boulders?
I stayed in the center of the path, afraid to touch them.
The beasts stopped at the entrance to a tunnel. It was carved into the side of
the largest rock I had seen. They ducked their heads and hurried inside.
I followed behind, my heart pounding.
“Ginger!” Nat’s cry echoed off the tunnel walls.
The beasts growled and grunted, jabbering in excitement. Some pounded
their paws on the ceiling as they moved.
Everything shook. The walls. The ceiling. The ground.
“Nat!” I cried. I couldn’t hear my own voice over the noise.
I followed the beasts out of the tunnel and into another large clearing.
“What’s that?” I gasped.
In the center of the clearing, a large wooden box hung from a tree. It looked
like an enormous bird house. I saw a tiny door on one side.
A sign above the door read: PENALTY CAGE.
Gleeb raised Nat high in the air. He held him up for all the beasts to see and
spun him around and around.
Nat screamed.
Spork and the other beasts stomped and clapped.
“NO!” I shouted. “You can’t do this!”
“He must go in the box,” Fleg declared. “He touched the Penalty Rock. It’s
in the rules.”
Gleeb tossed Nat inside the Penalty Cage. He slammed the door. Fleg
dropped a large twig into the rough wooden latch to lock the door.
Nat reached through the slats. “Ginger,” he cried. “Get me out of here.” The
penalty box swung in the air.
“Don’t worry, Nat,” I called. “I’ll get you out.” I shivered. He seemed so
small and helpless.
“You can’t keep him in there forever,” I told Fleg. “When does he get out?”
“When we eat him,” Fleg replied softly.
20
“But I’m the Beast from the East!” I protested. “You said you would eat me.” I
took a step closer to him.
“Players in the Penalty Cage get eaten, too.” Fleg snorted in disgust. “Don’t
pretend you forgot. Everyone knows that. It’s a basic rule.”
“There must be another way to get him out,” I said, edging closer.
“Only if he eats a Free Escape Tarantula,” Fleg explained. He scratched the
flab under his chin.
“Huh? He has to eat a tarantula?” I demanded, taking another step toward
the beast.
Fleg narrowed his eyes. “Don’t pretend you don’t know that,” he said,
beginning to turn away.
I hurled myself at Fleg’s hairy chest.
I slapped him hard.
“You’re It!” I screamed. I lifted both fists in triumph. “You’re It! I tagged
you!”
Fleg raised an eyebrow. “Sorry,” he said calmly. “I paused the game. It
doesn’t count.”
“No!” I shrieked. “You can’t! You can’t keep changing the rules!”
“I didn’t. Rules are rules.” Fleg reached over me and checked the lock on
Nat’s cage. It held fast.
“Try again,” Spork grunted. “You can always try again.”
The rest of the beasts nodded in agreement, grinning and snorting in
excitement. They were enjoying themselves. They rumbled away from the
clearing.
“Ginger!” Nat cried. He pounded on the box. “Get me out of here!”
I gazed at him in despair. No way could I reach him up there.
He stared down at me through the slats. His brown hair fell into his eyes.
“Do something,” he pleaded.
“I’ll try again,” I said.
It was the only thing to do.
“Can you see them?” I called up to him. “Which way did they go?”
Nat pointed. “I see a few beasts hiding over there.”
“I’ll be back,” I promised. “After I tag one of them.”
I tried to sound as if it was a sure thing. I wished I could believe my own
words.
“Hurry!” Nat called after me.
A strong wind blew through the clearing, rocking the cage from side to side.
Nat hunched down, hugging his knees.
I gave him one last look and took off.
Long shadows fell across the ground. I gazed at the sky. The orange was
turning into deep pink. Almost sundown.
I plunged into the darkening woods.
All around me I could hear small animals skittering through the carpet of
leaves on the forest floor. As if hurrying home before sunset.
Home. Where they were safe.
The wind howled loudly through the trees. I stumbled and almost fell over a
rotted tree stump.
The woods were closing in on me. Time was closing in on me.
And then I saw a beast hiding behind an umbrella bush. His shoulders
slumped forward. His head bobbed gently up and down.
He was sound asleep.
Here’s my chance, I thought.
I moved slowly toward him. The beast shifted position.
I stopped. Held my breath.
He quieted down again. He must have moved in his sleep.
This is it, I thought. My chance. In a second, he’ll be the Beast from the
East.
I rushed forward.
And gasped.
The earth dropped away.
Nothing under me.
Nothing but air.
I fell quickly. Sank straight down.
Down… down… down…
Screaming all the way.
21
I hit solid ground.
Hard.
The air burst from my lungs.
My shoulder jammed against a sharp rock.
I cried out. Rubbed my arm.
Struggling to catch my breath, I pulled myself up and stared around me.
Too dark. I couldn’t see a thing.
It’s over, I thought. The game is over.
“Hey—is anyone up there?” I called. “Can anyone hear me?”
I stopped and listened for an answer. Any answer.
Silence.
I forced myself to my feet. My shoulder ached. I rolled it back and forth a
couple of times to keep it from getting stiff.
I reached out and patted the walls around me. Solid dirt. I was in some sort
of deep pit. The kind people dig to trap animals.
Now I was the trapped animal.
I ran my hands quickly over the walls. Maybe I could find something to
hold onto. Some way to climb out.
Yuck! What was that?
My hand touched something cold sticking out of the side of the pit.
I clenched my teeth and forced myself to touch it again. It stayed firm under
my fingers. A root, I thought excitedly.
It’s not alive.
I ran my hand further up the wall. The roots were everywhere. As high up
as I could feel. Perfect!
I raised my foot and stepped onto the lowest root. It held.
Footholds! I could climb out of the pit.
My hands grabbed the highest root I could reach. I pulled myself up. I heard
a crumbling of loose dirt.
I pressed myself against the wall as more dirt sifted down the side of the pit,
spraying my face.
I squeezed my eyes shut. Waited for the dirt to stop falling. Then I found
the next root and began climbing again.
How much time did I have left? How much time before the sun went down?
My shoulder ached. But I had a long way to go. I rested briefly against the
wall. Then I continued climbing.
Snap!
The root shattered under my right foot. My leg dangled in the air.
Snap!
The root under my right hand popped loose.
“Hey!” I cried out as I felt myself fall.
I landed hard on the floor of the pit. I lay still for a moment, trying to catch
my breath.
I gazed up. A last bit of pink sky glowed over the mouth of the pit.
In the fading light, I looked around. I saw the useless roots on the sides of
the deep hole. I glanced down.
Oh, no.
There was just enough sunlight to see the ground beneath me.
It was brown.
And square.
A Free Lunch square.
I was trapped. Trapped on a Free Lunch square. The beasts could eat me—
anytime they wanted.
I froze in panic. And heard rumbling footsteps above me.
I huddled in a corner of the pit. Pressed my back against the dirt.
“This way!” I heard Fleg shout. “She’s down here!”
22
Fleg appeared in the opening above me. His flabby chin hung down. His eyes
locked onto mine.
“Found you!” he cried.
Spork slid next to Fleg. He grinned down at me and drooled yellow drool. It
splattered beside my boot.
“Something down there smells delicious!” Spork cried. “I’m soooo
hungry!”
Gleeb shoved his furry face between Fleg’s and Spork’s.
He smacked his lips. I heard his stomach growl.
“Finally!” Spork grunted. “Pull her out! Let’s eat!”
I covered my face with my hands. “Please. Don’t hurt me,” I cried. “I
haven’t done anything to you.”
Fleg shrugged. “You play the game. Sometimes you win. Sometimes you
lose.”
Spork and Gleeb reached down into the pit. Their big paws swiped at me.
I pressed my back tighter against the wall. “Please,” I begged. “Please go
away and leave me alone. You win, okay? You can have all my points.”
“Points can’t be given away,” Fleg scolded. “You know that.”
The others grunted in agreement. They reached down for me.
My eyes searched the pit.
I needed a weapon.
The roots?
I yanked a fat one out of the dirt.
“Stay back!” I shouted, whipping the root at their paws.
The beasts slapped each other on the back and laughed their ugly laugh.
“You’ll be sorry,” I threatened.
Who was I kidding? This stupid root couldn’t hurt them. And they knew it.
I was the Beast from the East. I was dinner.
Fleg leaned into the pit and snarled. His claws were only inches from my
face.
I ducked.
His paw brushed against the back of my neck. I felt claws scratch my skin.
I jerked away. The hair on my arms stood straight up.
If only I could burrow into the earth like an animal, I thought.
Fleg’s paw swiped the air in front of my face.
“Stop ducking away,” he shouted. “You’re just making me hungrier.”
“This isn’t fair!” I screamed.
He turned to Spork and Gleeb. “I’m tired of this,” he complained. “Enough
stalling.”
His round eyes gleamed down hungrily at me.
“Get her!” he bellowed.
Spork leaned down and grabbed my arm. I felt his claws dig into my skin.
He pulled me up and yanked me to my feet.
It’s all over, I thought sadly. The game is over.
23
A cloud passed overhead, throwing the pit into deep shadow.
Fleg howled. He slapped his broad forehead. “Made in the Shade!” he
cried.
Spork opened his paw and let go of my arm.
I dropped to the ground. Fell to my knees.
“Made in the Shade!” Spork cried.
“Made in the Shade!” Gleeb echoed.
I climbed to my feet. The angry voices of the beasts made my head throb.
They stomped their feet loudly.
“What’s going on?” I demanded.
“You’re safe,” Spork replied, sneering in disgust. “This time.”
Safe? I breathed a sigh of relief.
“But… why?” I asked, amazed.
“You’re Made in the Shade,” Fleg explained.
“We can’t touch you. It’s a free pass. But you can only use it once.”
Once was enough, I hoped. I didn’t plan to play this game forever.
“We have to let you go this time,” Fleg growled. “But you’re still the Beast
from the East.”
“You still have to tag someone before sundown,” Spork agreed.
Gleeb sighed. The three beasts turned to the woods. “We’ll go now,” Fleg
announced.
“Wait!” I scrambled to my feet. “How do I get out of here? How can I tag
someone if I’m stuck in this pit?”
Fleg rolled his eyes. He reached down and pressed one paw against a purple
rock on the ground near the edge of the pit.
The pit floor creaked and groaned.
Then it rose up. Higher and higher.
Finally it jerked to a halt a few feet below the ground.
I was close enough to stare at the beasts’ ankles. I could see shiny black
bugs crawling in their fur. I swallowed nervously. Was this some kind of trick?
Or was I really safe?
“I still need help to climb out of here,” I told Fleg.
Fleg pounded on the purple rock again.
The floor started moving. This time it stopped level with the ground.
I hopped off the Free Lunch square. The beasts circled me.
“The sun is almost down,” Fleg warned. “The game is almost over.”
“You don’t have much time,” Spork added.
Fleg snorted. Then he turned and lumbered away.
“Good luck,” Spork cried as he hurried after Fleg. Gleeb followed. They
raced back toward the stone tunnel.
“Wait!” I yelled. I ran after them as fast as I could.
I raced into the rock tunnel. I could hear the beasts up ahead of me. They
growled and grunted, scraping their claws across the walls and ceiling again.
Making a racket.
I saw them burst through the other side of the tunnel. They split up, running
in different directions.
Which way should I go? I knew I couldn’t waste time.
I followed Fleg.
He wove in and out between the trees. He leaped over some scraggly
bushes.
I panted, straining to keep up.
Fleg picked up the pace.
Faster and faster.
I could barely keep up now. I was gasping for air.
“Wait!” I shouted desperately. “Wait!”
Fleg glanced once over his shoulder. He disappeared into the trees. I
stopped running after him.
Overhead, the sky turned to purple. Soon it would be completely dark.
I spun around, searching desperately for a beast to tag.
“Yoo-hoo! Over here!” I heard a call.
I whirled around.
Spork. He waved to me from between two tall trees.
I raced toward him.
Spork lumbered down a twisting path. I followed him.
What else could I do?
Suddenly, my foot caught on a rock. I sprawled into the dirt.
I forced myself to get up. The woods were quiet around me.
No beasts.
I wanted to scream! So I did.
“Fleg! Spork! Gleeb! Where are you?” I shouted. How could I tag them? I
couldn’t even find them.
My eyes scanned the area.
What was that? I squinted harder.
Yes! A blue furry head! It popped up behind a bush.
My last chance.
I gathered my energy and sprinted toward the bush. My hand reached out.
“Tag!” I yelled. “You’re—”
24
“Gurraugh!” The tiny beast pawed the air.
The baby beast! The only beast under three feet tall. Too short to play the
game.
No fair! I thought.
My hopes were crushed. Again.
I picked up a rock and heaved it angrily into the woods.
“Where is everyone?” I screamed. “Come out and play!”
The little beast patted its claws together and gurgled happily.
I stared at it. Why was it here all alone?
Then it hit me. Of course.
There must be another beast nearby. A grownup beast to watch the kid. One
over three feet tall.
One I could tag.
I checked out the area. Trees and large rocks. I would have to search behind
every one of them.
Taking a deep breath, I tiptoed silently through the trees. Stopped to peer
behind each rock.
Crunch. My foot cracked a pile of twigs.
I stood completely still. And waited.
Silence.
I moved forward.
I listened carefully.
Silence.
I crept forward. A beast had to be here somewhere.
But where?
Then I heard a noise.
Mumbling.
I crept behind a bush and inched closer to the sound. It came from behind a
tall, jagged rock.
I peeked out.
Spork!
Yes! Spork stood behind the rock, talking to himself. He scratched the
lumpy scar on his nose.
I could easily tag him.
But was this another penalty rock?
Would it go up in smoke?
I didn’t want to end up in a cage dangling above the ground.
Like Nat. Poor Nat.
I took another deep breath and inched closer to Spork.
Spork turned and searched the woods behind him. “Little beast,” he called
out. “Is that you?”
I dropped to the ground and waited.
My heart pounded in my ears. I forced myself to stay quiet.
Spork didn’t move from his spot. He sighed and started mumbling again.
Three more steps and I could tag him.
Two more.
I wiped my forehead. One more.
It was too good to be true. Spork had no idea I was behind him.
I smacked him hard. “You’re It!” I shrieked.
Spork gasped in surprise. His big paws shot up into the air. I thought he was
about to faint!
“I’ve done it! I’ve done it!” I cried happily.
I was free!
Nat was free!
Spork grunted and raised himself up. He towered over me. He didn’t seem
the least bit upset. But he had just lost the game.
“You’re It!” I repeated. “You’re the Beast from the East!”
Spork raised a paw lazily and scratched his open eye socket.
I felt a chill of fear. What if Spork refused to obey the rules?
“Sorry,” Spork said softly. “Not this time.”
“Hey—!” I shouted angrily. “You have to obey the rules! I tagged you, fair
and square!”
Spork stared at me as if I were being very funny. Something was wrong.
But what? What was it? Why didn’t he say something? Spork’s lips curled into a
nasty grin.
25
“You tagged me from the west,” Spork whispered. “It doesn’t count.”
I could feel the blood rush to my face. “No fair! I tagged you! I tagged
you!” I wailed.
Spork shrugged.
“You have to tag me from the east. Remember?” Spork’s little eyes nearly
disappeared as his face crumpled in laughter. “You’re still the Beast from the
East!”
I groaned.
How could I have forgotten? That was the most important rule of all.
How was I supposed to know which way was east? I couldn’t even see the
sun anymore!
My head throbbed. My whole body ached. I was sore and hungry.
Spork stood there, shaking with silent laughter.
I glanced at the darkening sky.
Wait a minute!
I climbed up on the boulder. The sun was setting behind me. That was the
west. In front of me was east.
I studied Spork. Without Fleg around, the big beast seemed less menacing.
Harmless almost.
After all, he was supposed to be baby-sitting. And what had happened?
He’d lost the little beast.
And now he was so busy laughing at my mistake, he had practically
forgotten about me.
“Hey, Spork,” I called. “Do you want to play one of my games now?”
“But we’re still playing this one.” Spork blinked in surprise.
“I’ll pause it. It’s kind of boring anyway, isn’t it?” I asked. “My game is lots
more fun.”
Spork scratched the hole where his eye used to be. He pulled a big, black
bug out of it, and tossed the bug away. “What’s your game called?”
“Freeze Frame,” I answered quickly.
Nat and Pat loved to play this game.
“We spin around and when I say stop, we freeze—and see if one of us can
keep our balance and not fall over.”
“Sounds fun,” Spork agreed. “Why not?”
“Okay then,” I said. “Let’s try it. Spin!” I shouted.
We both started to spin.
I peeked at Spork. His arms swung out as he whirled around.
“Faster!” I called out. “Much faster.”
Spork whirled faster and faster as he turned around in circles.
His tail swished against the bushes. I jumped out of the way.
Spork started to wobble.
“Game—unpaused!” I shouted.
Spork didn’t seem to hear me. He teetered and stumbled into a tree.
“Freeze!” I shouted.
Spork froze in place.
I leaped at him and tagged him. Hard.
From the east.
“You’re It!” I shouted. I backed away. “I tagged you from the east! This
time you’re really It!”
Spork placed both paws against his head and closed his eyes. I could tell he
was still dizzy. He spread his legs and balanced himself against the tree.
He bopped himself in the face with his paw. “You did it,” he agreed. He ran
his bumpy tongue over his lips. He exhaled a deep breath. “I’m It,” he admitted.
“Yes. Yes. Yes!” I cried. I jumped up in excitement.
Spork plopped down against the boulder.
“I’m free!” I shrieked. “The game is over.” I clenched my hand into a fist
and pumped my arm.
“I’m going to rescue Nat,” I said. “Which way is he?”
Spork pointed his clawed finger to my right.
“We’re outta here!” I shouted.
I’d never been so happy in all my life.
“Well, Spork old pal,” I said, beaming at him. “This is good-bye. See you!”
“Not so quick,” Spork said. “I’m afraid you can’t leave.”
26
“Forget it,” I said. “You can’t change the rules again! No way.”
“You can’t leave,” he repeated. “The game continues until sunset.” He
glared at me stubbornly.
I gazed at the sky. The purple was fading to gray. Not much time left. But
enough.
I wasn’t going to be It again.
I could hide until dark. But where?
“Don’t just stand there,” Spork warned. “You could be tagged again.”
“Never,” I insisted. “I won’t let that happen.”
Before I could move, Fleg stomped from behind a tree. The flabby skin
under his chin swung from side to side.
Gleeb crept behind him.
“She tagged me!” Spork told them.
“I knew it!” Fleg stared at me. “I knew you played this game before.”
I balled my hands into fists. I was angry. I’d had enough.
They forced me to play their stupid game. But I wasn’t going to lose now.
Fleg waved me away. “You have until I count to trel,” he said. “Then we’re
allowed to come after you again.”
He turned his back and covered his eyes. “Gling… proo… zee… freen…
trel,” he counted.
I had no choice. I ran.
Don’t stop, I told myself. Don’t think about anything. Run. Find a place to
hide.
“Ready or not—here we come!” I heard Fleg cry.
Behind me, the beasts growled and grunted in excitement.
I hurled myself off the path and pushed through the tall, scratchy grass
between the trees. I jumped over a clump of cabbage plants.
My legs ached. My feet burned.
But I couldn’t stop.
Not until I reached a hiding place.
I skidded to a stop when I heard rushing water. I nearly fell into the stream.
A large blue fish leaped out of the water and snapped at my ankles.
This was no place to hide. I turned back into the woods.
A cold wind blew in my face. The gourds whistled their strange melody.
“Here I come!” Spork shouted off to my left.
I pushed myself faster. No way he was going to tag me.
I glanced around. Which way?
The rock tunnel! I saw it only a few feet away.
I darted into the darkness. Without the beasts yelling and shouting, it was
eerily quiet inside. I slowed down and tiptoed through the tunnel.
When I reached the other side, I crept into the dense trees. I slumped
against a tree and waited, trying to keep quiet. I was breathing so hard I was
afraid the beasts could hear me!
A moment passed.
I felt the trembling that meant the beasts were approaching.
I held my breath and ducked beneath an umbrella plant.
Seconds later, Fleg, Spork, and Gleeb burst out of the tunnel and raced
down the path. Four more beasts followed behind them. They passed the bush
where I hid. Crashed into the woods. And kept going.
I waited to make sure they were gone.
Silence.
I breathed a sigh of relief.
I scrambled to my feet and stretched.
Something rushed at me from behind.
“No!” I cried in terror.
Two arms wrapped around my waist. And a creature threw me to the
ground.
27
I thrashed and kicked wildly.
“Stop it. Cut it out!” a familiar voice demanded.
“Nat!” I screamed. I whirled around. “Nat! You’re safe! How did you get
out of the cage?”
“Cage? What cage?” My brother squinted at me.
“The penalty cage,” I declared. “Nat—how did you escape? Did they let
you go?”
“I’m not Nat. It’s me. Pat.”
“Pat?” I stared at him in confusion. Then I threw my arms around his neck.
I’d never been so happy to see him.
“Where have you been?” I demanded.
“Where have I been?” Pat cried. “Where have you been? I’ve been
searching everywhere for you guys. These woods are creepy.”
He glanced around. “Where’s Nat, anyway?”
“Trapped.” I started to explain. “See, the beasts got him. After you ran into
the woods, we had to play this game and…”
“A game?” Pat cried. He shook his head in disbelief. “I was lost in the
woods—and you two are playing a game?”
“It’s not what you think,” I said.
I checked the trees around us for any sign of the creatures.
“They forced us to play,” I told Pat, lowering my voice to a whisper. “It’s
like tag—only they play for keeps. I was the Beast from the East and—”
“Right.” Pat rolled his eyes.
“Really,” I insisted. “This game is deadly. You have to believe me.”
“Why?” Pat shrugged. “You never believe me. Why should I believe you?”
“Because if we lose, they’ll eat us!” I told him.
Pat burst out laughing.
“I’m serious!” I grabbed Pat’s shoulders and shook him hard. “I’m telling
the truth! It’s dangerous here. Fleg and Spork are after me, right now.”
Pat twisted out of my grasp. “Right. Fleg and Spork. Woof woof!” Pat
barked.
“Shhh,” I hissed. “Keep quiet!” I pulled him behind an umbrella plant. “Pat,
you have to believe me. They’re all around us. They could get us if we’re not
careful.”
“And I suppose this game was their idea?” he asked.
“Yes,” I answered.
“And I suppose they can talk,” Pat went on. “In English.”
“Yes. Yes. Yes,” I insisted.
“You’re weirder than I thought,” Pat said, shaking his head. “So where’s
Nat? For real?”
“Grrravgh!”
A deep growl echoed off the nearby rocks. “This way!” A beast bellowed.
“Near the tunnel!”
Heavy footsteps pounded closer. The ground shook under our feet.
Pat’s eyes widened in shock. He reached for my arm.
“It’s them!” I exclaimed. “Now do you believe me?”
Pat swallowed hard and nodded his head. “Yes. I believe you,” he choked
out.
“She’s over here!” a beast shouted.
“He heard us,” I whispered in Pat’s ear. “Run!”
Pat and I took off.
We raced through the woods, leaping over fallen logs, pushing sharp
branches out of our faces.
“This way!” I called. I grabbed Pat’s hand. “Stay low.”
We ducked into a thick clump of trees.
Spork thudded past us.
I could hear him sniffing the air.
“Can he smell us?” Pat asked in a whisper.
“Sshh!” I pressed my finger to my lips.
We crept between the bushy plants.
Fleg appeared, stomping in our direction.
I dropped to my hands and knees. I pulled Pat down beside me.
Fleg thudded past us.
I knew we weren’t safe. More beasts would follow. And one of them might
find us.
I motioned for Pat to follow me.
We scrambled deeper into the woods.
The trees were close together here. The bushes were so thick I couldn’t see
between them. I flung out an arm, feeling my way.
My hand brushed against something.
Something big.
And warm.
And furry.
28
I leaped back. Crashed into Pat.
What had I touched?
The bushes parted and a strange creature bounced out.
I had never seen anything like it.
It had the body of a dog, as big as a German shepherd, and the face of a
squirrel.
I don’t believe this! I thought.
It could talk, too. “In here! Quick!” the creature urged in a scratchy,
squeaky voice.
Its squirrel-nose twitched. Its bushy dog tail thrashed from side to side.
Could we trust it?
“In here!” it squeaked.
It waved a paw in the air. Pointed to a bush of big orange leaves.
Pat held back, but I crept forward. I spotted the entrance to a cave hidden
behind the leaves.
“It’s a good hiding place,” I told Pat.
“It’s the Hiding Cave,” the squirrel-dog announced. “The Hiding Cave is
the place to hide. Quick!” The animal held the leaves aside for us.
The ground shook. I turned and saw furry blue beasts in the distance. They
were moving quickly toward us.
“Better do it, Pat,” I said.
Pat hesitated.
I yanked his hand and pulled him after me. I bent down to enter the Hiding
Cave.
I suddenly remembered what happened when Nat touched the penalty rock.
The thought made me shiver. Would we really be safe in the Hiding Cave?
Thump. Thump.
The beasts drew closer.
Pat hesitated and held back.
“Where are they?” a beast shouted. I recognized Fleg’s voice.
“They must be nearby,” Spork answered.
The squirrel-dog stayed outside. It let go of the orange leaves. They sprang
back into place, hiding the entrance to the cave.
Pat and I crouched inside, hidden from view.
We huddled close together. The air felt damp inside. It had a sour smell that
I tried to ignore.
I slumped against the wall of the cave and wiped the sweat off my forehead.
I tucked my feet under me. “Try to get comfortable,” I whispered to Pat. “We
might be here for a long time.”
Something tickled my neck. I reached to scratch it.
Something tickled my ear.
I shivered.
I brushed my hand against my ear and felt something crawl onto my cheek.
“Ow!” I cried out as I felt a sharp bite on my shoulder.
I turned to Pat. He was slapping at his ears and neck.
Something buzzed past my ear.
Something skittered through my hair. I shook my head hard.
My whole body itched and tingled. Every inch of me!
Beside me, Pat squirmed, and wriggled, scratched and slapped at himself.
I leaped to my feet. “Help!” I cried. “What is happening? What is going on
in here?”
29
“Help!” I cried, scratching desperately. “Help us!”
The squirrel-dog’s face poked into the entrance.
“What is happening to us?” I cried, squirming and scratching.
“I forgot to tell you,” the strange creature whispered. “The Hiding Cave is
also a hiding place for bugs!”
Bugs!
“Ohhh!” Pat let out a low moan. He rubbed his back against the cave wall.
Scratched his hair.
The bugs were everywhere. Crawling on the walls. Flying through the air.
Buzzing. Whistling. Clicking.
They crawled up and down my legs and arms. Over my face. In my hair.
I picked some kind of worm off my cheek. I dragged my hand down my
arms and my bare legs, brushing bugs onto the cave floor.
Pat squirmed next to me. “Get them off me, Ginger,” he wailed. “Helllp!”
“Sshhh!” The squirrel-dog stuck his nose back into the cave. “Quiet! Here
comes the Beast from the East. Don’t make a sound or he’ll find you!”
Pat and I drew closer together.
I held my breath and tried not to move.
I counted to ten. Silently. I pretended there were no bugs on me.
I shut my eyes and pictured my bedroom. The posters on the wall. My
comfortable canopy bed. I thought of being under the covers. Going to sleep.
And then I thought about bedbugs!
I couldn’t ignore the insects crawling over me. It was impossible not to
think about them.
I couldn’t stand it. I needed to scratch. I needed to scream!
I couldn’t sit there another second.
I heard a beast stomp close to the cave opening.
I recognized Spork’s voice. “Hey—!” he snarled at the squirrel-dog. “Have
you seen strangers here?”
Did Spork know this creature?
Were they friends?
“Answer me,” Spork demanded.
I waited for the squirrel-dog’s answer. Please don’t tell them we’re hiding in
here, I prayed. Please.
A fat, wet bug landed on my face. I picked at it with my fingers. It clung to
my cheek. I pulled harder. I couldn’t tug it loose.
I felt a scream building up inside me.
I couldn’t take it another second.
My mouth opened.
I had to scream. I had to!
30
“Ah—”
I clamped my hand over my mouth.
I let out a tiny squeak.
The orange leaves rustled. Fleg’s paw pushed into the cave entrance.
I froze. I heard Pat gasp.
“What’s in there?” I heard Fleg ask the squirrel-dog.
“Bugs,” the squirrel-dog replied. “Thousands of them.”
Millions! I thought bitterly. The bugs crawled over my face, my arms, my
legs. They buzzed in my ears.
Fleg pushed his nose into the cave.
I stopped breathing.
Fleg sniffed. “What’s that awful smell?” he complained.
“Insects,” I heard the squirrel-dog answer.
“They stink!” Fleg muttered. He let go of the leaves and they snapped back
into place. “Only bugs in there,” Fleg reported to Spork. “No humans.”
“Of course not,” the squirrel-dog said calmly. “The humans went the other
way.”
“Why didn’t you say so?” Fleg exploded.
Spork shouted to the other beasts. “They’re not here! The other way, quick!
Only trel minutes left to play.”
“I’ll find her,” I heard Spork tell the others. “I have to tag her back! No
human is going to make me Beast from the East!”
I heard their footsteps pound in the other direction.
Only trel minutes! I didn’t exactly know what trel meant. But I knew the
game was nearly over. If Spork didn’t tag me back, my brothers and I would be
free!
But I couldn’t take another second in this bug-infested cave.
I moved to the entrance on trembling legs. I itched so badly, I could barely
control my muscles!
I peered out of the cave. “Are they all gone?” I whispered to the squirreldog.
“For now,” he answered.
“Let’s get out of here!” I called back to Pat. I sprang out of the cave. He
jumped out after me.
We frantically brushed bugs off our skin and clothes. I scratched my head
and rubbed my back up against a tree.
Pat stomped his feet. “They’re even in my boots!” he wailed. He untied his
laces and pulled off his boot. He shook it upside down. A hundred black bugs
poured onto the ground and scurried away.
“I’m never going to stop itching!” I wailed. “I’m going to itch for the rest of
my life!”
“You’d better hide,” the squirrel-dog warned. “They could be back. And
you’re only allowed to use the Hiding Cave once a game.”
Pat and I thanked the strange creature. Then we plunged back into the
woods.
I hadn’t been in this part of the forest before. Pat and I pushed our way past
a row of high bushes. I stopped.
A giant willow tree stood up ahead. Its branches spread low, sweeping
against the ground.
The Gulla Willow?
It had to be.
I glanced around, searching for a hiding place. A long, low rock stretched
beyond the tree.
Only a few minutes left.
“Quick,” I whispered, grabbing Pat. I pulled him behind the rock.
“That must be the Gulla Willow,” I told him. “When the sun sets behind it,
we’ll be safe.”
Pat nodded but didn’t reply. He was breathing hard. He scratched his
cheeks. Still itchy. We were both still itchy.
“Stay down,” I warned him. “And don’t touch the rock.”
We crouched together in silence.
And waited.
My heart slammed against my chest. My skin tingled. I huddled beside my
brother—and listened.
Silence.
The whisper of the wind through the trees. No other sound.
“Are we safe now?” Pat asked in a trembling whisper.
“Not yet,” I answered. I raised my eyes to the charcoal gray sky. A last ray
of purple light spread over the top of the willow.
Hurry! I urged the sun. Go down! What are you waiting for?
The sky darkened. The purple light faded behind the Gulla Willow.
Only gray sky now. Night sky.
The sun was down.
“We’re safe!” I cried, jumping to my feet. I turned and hugged Pat. “We’re
safe! We made it.”
I stepped out from behind the rock.
A heavy hand slapped me hard. On the shoulder.
“You’re It!” Spork bellowed. “You’re the Beast from the East!”
31
“Huh?”
I gasped in shock. I could still feel the beast’s stinging slap on my shoulder.
“No fair!” Pat cried. “No fair!” He stared as the beasts circled us. Pat had
never seen them close-up before.
“It’s dark! The sun is down!” I protested. “You can’t tag me now!”
“Game Over! Game Over!” Fleg shouted. He stepped out of the woods and
hurried toward the circle of beasts.
I pointed angrily at the Gulla Willow. “The sun set behind the tree. You
can’t tag me!”
“The game hadn’t been called yet,” Spork said calmly. “You know the rule.
Fleg has to shout out ‘Game Over’ before the game can end.”
The beasts all murmured agreement.
I clenched my fists. “But… but…” I stammered. I lowered my head in
defeat. I knew they wouldn’t listen to me.
Pat gulped. “What will they do now, Ginger?” he whispered softly. “Will
they hurt us?”
“I already told you,” I whispered back. “They’re going to eat us.”
Pat let out a cry. He started to say something. But there wasn’t time.
Fleg stepped forward and grabbed me by the waist. He tossed me over his
shoulder.
The blood rushed to my head and I felt dizzy. The ground was so far away!
Spork hoisted Pat over his shoulder.
“Hey—whoa!” I protested. “Put my brother down!”
“He was your Helper,” Spork replied. “We always eat the Helper, too!”
“Put me down!” Pat shrieked. “Let me go.”
But the huge beast ignored him.
They carried us both into a small clearing.
A large stone pit sat in the center. A raging fire burned inside the pit. Yellow
and blue flames leaped at the sky.
Fleg lowered me onto a tree stump. Spork set Pat down beside me.
The beasts circled around us. Drooling. Licking their lips.
I thought I heard thunder. But I soon realized it was the sound of their
stomachs growling.
“It’s Flelday,” Spork said, smiling. “On Flelday we always barbecue.”
I swallowed hard. And stared at the flames leaping against the sky. I
wrapped my arms around my chest and hugged myself.
Spork poked at the fire with a long metal rod.
He pointed the rod at me. “Yum yum.” He grinned, rubbing his stomach.
I felt sick.
Gleeb lugged a huge pot over to the fire. He set it down in the middle of the
flames.
Fleg pulled some gourds off the nearby trees. He cracked them open and
poured their yellow juice into the pot. He collected sticks and leaves and tossed
them in, too.
Gleeb stirred and stirred. A sour, rotting stench rose up from the pot.
“The broth is ready,” Gleeb announced.
I turned to Pat. “I’m sorry,” I said in a trembling voice. “Sorry I lost the
game.”
“I’m sorry, too,” he whispered, his eyes on the flames.
The beasts began chanting. “Flelday. Flelday. Flelday.”
“Who brought the barbecue sauce?” Spork asked. “I’m starving!”
Fleg lifted me in his arms. And carried me toward the cooking pot.
32
“Whoa! Wait! Stop!”
A familiar voice shouted across the clearing.
I jerked my head around. “Nat!” I screamed.
“Ginger!” Nat cried. He ran toward us, waving his arms. “What’s going on?
What are they doing?”
Fleg lowered me to the ground. “Nat—!” I screamed. “Run! Find help!
Hurry!”
He stopped halfway across the clearing. “But, Ginger—”
“They’ll eat you, too,” I shrieked. “Run!”
“Capture him!” Spork shouted to the other beasts.
Gleeb and several others took off after Nat.
Nat spun around. He darted for the woods and disappeared into the trees.
I watched helplessly as the beasts plunged into the woods after him.
Don’t find him, I prayed, crossing my fingers. All ten of them!
Nat will escape, I told myself. He’ll climb a tree. He’ll get away from them.
Then he’ll run and find help.
Pat and I stared at the dark trees. And waited.
“Oh, nooo!” I uttered a long wail when the beasts returned from the woods.
And one of them carried Nat over his shoulder.
Nat kicked and punched. But he couldn’t free himself.
The beast dumped Nat beside Pat and me. Nat landed hard, face-down on
the ground.
Now they had all three of us. A feast!
Spork and Fleg gazed at us hungrily. Gleeb ran his tongue over his long
fang.
I dropped down beside Nat. “How did you get out?” I asked him. “How did
you get out of that cage?”
Nat rolled over and sat up. “It wasn’t that hard,” he said, groaning. “The
boards were weak. I worked and worked—until I pushed enough boards out.
Then I broke out.”
“You should have stayed away,” I told him. “You should have run. Now
they’re going to eat you, too.”
Nat raised his eyes to the cook pot and the blazing fire. “I—I don’t want to
play anymore,” he stammered.
“Nat,” I whispered sadly, “I’m afraid the game is just about over.”
33
“Quiet!” Fleg demanded. “Dinner—stop talking!” He stared at Nat.
Fleg’s eyes narrowed. He tilted his head. He whispered to Spork and Gleeb.
The other beasts moved closer. They were all moving their eyes from Pat to
Nat. They began murmuring to each other, shaking their big, furry heads. Their
snouts waved up and down as they talked.
“You doubled!” Spork said to Pat. “You did a Classic Clone!”
I stared at the beasts. Studied their startled expressions. Hadn’t they ever
seen twins before?
“You doubled yourselves!” Fleg declared. “That’s a Classic Clone. Why
didn’t you tell us?”
“Uh… tell you what?” I asked.
Fleg glared at me. “Why didn’t you tell us that you are Level Three
players?”
My brothers and I exchanged confused glances.
“You’re in the wrong game,” Spork announced, shaking his head.
“If you can double yourselves, that means you belong in Level Three,” Fleg
said. He slapped his furry forehead. “I’m so embarrassed! Why didn’t you tell us
sooner?”
“Well, I told you we didn’t want to play,” I replied sharply. “But you
wouldn’t listen.”
“I’m so sorry,” Fleg apologized. “We’re only Level One players. We’re just
beginners. We’re not experts like you.”
“Experts?” Pat muttered. He turned to me and rolled his eyes.
“That’s why we have to play in the daytime,” Fleg explained. “We’re not
ready to play at night.”
All around us, the beasts were muttering and shaking their heads.
“Of course, we’ll have to let you go now,” Fleg said. He scratched at his
flabby chin.
“Well, of course,” I cried. I wanted to jump up and down and shout for joy.
But somehow I kept myself in control.
“That’s it?” Nat cried to Fleg. “We’re free?”
“Yes. Good-bye.” Fleg scowled. He rubbed his belly. I heard it growl.
“Don’t ask again,” I told Nat. “Let’s just get out of here!”
“Good-bye,” Fleg repeated. He waved his paws as if he were trying to shoo
us away.
I jumped to my feet. I didn’t feel tired or scared or itchy or dirty anymore.
This time the game was really over!
“How do we find our parents?” I asked.
“That’s easy,” Fleg replied. “Follow that path.” He pointed. “Follow it
through the trees. It leads back to your world.”
We shouted good-bye—and took off. The narrow dirt path twisted through
the trees. Silvery moonlight danced over the ground.
“I am so glad you guys are twins!” I exclaimed.
I had never said that before! But I really meant it. They had saved our lives!
The trees thinned out. I could see a full moon climbing up over the dark
treetops. I felt as if we were running to it, running into its warm, white light.
“Mom and Dad will never believe this story,” I said. I planned to tell them
every gory detail.
“They have to believe us,” Pat declared. “It’s all true.”
I put on a burst of speed. My brothers ran harder to keep up with me.
I couldn’t wait to get back. Mom and Dad must be so worried.
“Oh!” I gasped and skidded to a stop.
Pat and Nat stumbled into me. All three of us struggled to stay on our feet.
A huge beast had stepped out from behind a tree, blocking the path.
He crossed his furry arms over his enormous chest. His snout flared as he
stared down at us with cold marble eyes. He opened his lips and growled,
exposing his long fang.
I wasn’t afraid. Not this time.
“Step aside,” I ordered him. “You have to let us go by. My brothers and I
are Level Three players.”
“You’re Level Three? Hey—that’s great! So am I!” the beast exclaimed.
“Tag! You’re It.”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.



SAY CHEESE AND
DIE—AGAIN!
Goosebumps - 44
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
1
“Greg Banks!”
A shiver ran down the back of my neck as Mr. Saur called my name. I had been
slumping low in my seat in the last row of the classroom. I tried to hide behind
Brian
Webb, the big gorilla of a kid who sits in front of me.
And I folded my hands and prayed that Mr. Saur wouldn’t call on me to give my
report next.
“Greg Banks!” he called.
I felt another cold shiver. Then my legs started to shake as I climbed to my feet.
Then my throat tightened until I could barely breathe.
I hate giving reports in front of the whole class.
Especially when I haven’t had much time to practice. Especially when we’re not
allowed to have notes. Especially when half of our grade in English depends on
how
we do on this report.
I cleared my throat and made my way up to the front of the classroom. I was
halfway there when Donny Greene stuck his big white sneaker into the aisle and
tripped me.
I stumbled—but didn’t fall. The whole class exploded in laughter, anyway.
Mr. Saur frowned at Donny. “Donny, do you have to trip every person who walks
by you?” he demanded.
“Yes,” Donny replied with a straight face.
And once again, the whole class burst out laughing.
Everyone thinks Donny is a riot. Everyone but Mr. Saur.
Mr. Saur doesn’t think anyone is funny. That’s why we call him Sourball Saur.
He probably wouldn’t think that was funny, either!
Mr. Saur is tall and thin and nearly bald. He never kids around. He never smiles.
His mouth is always puckered, as if he’s just bitten into a lemon.
Sourball Saur.
He’s sort of a legend at Pitts Landing Middle School. Everyone tries not to get
him. My best friends—Michael, Bird, and Shari—were lucky. They’re in Miss
Folsom’s class. I was the only one who got stuck with the Sourball.
I stepped up beside his desk and cleared my throat again. I wondered if everyone
could see my knees shaking. My face felt burning hot. My hands were cold as
ice.
Does everyone get this nervous when they stand in front of the class?
Mr. Saur folded his pale, skinny hands on his desk and cracked his knuckles.
“Okay, Greg, let’s hear your true story,” he said.
I cleared my throat for the thousandth time. I took a deep breath. Then I started
to
tell the story of what happened to my friends and me last summer….
2
“I was hanging out with my friends. Bird, Michael, and Shari. We had nothing to
do, and we were kind of bored. So we dared each other to do something exciting.
We
dared each other to sneak into the Coffman house.”
Mr. Saur raised a hand to interrupt me. He frowned his sour frown. “What’s the
Coffman house?”
“It’s a haunted house!” Donny Greene called out.
“It’s where Donny lives!” Brian Webb mumbled, loud enough for everyone to
hear. It got a big laugh.
Mr. Saur raised both hands for quiet and gave everyone his lemon expression.
“It’s a deserted, old house in my neighborhood,” I told him. “We went inside.
Down to the basement. And we found an old camera. And that’s what my true
story
is about. Because the camera had evil powers.”
Mr. Saur groaned and rolled his eyes. Some kids laughed. But I took another
deep
breath and continued my story.
“It was an instant camera. The picture popped right out. But it was never the
picture we snapped. It always showed something terrible happening.
“I took the old camera home. I snapped a photo of my dad’s new station wagon.
The photo slid out. In the photo, the station wagon was totaled. Completely
wrecked.
And then, a few days later, my dad was in a terrible accident. The photo came
true.”
I glanced around the room to see how my story was going over. A few kids were
laughing. Others were staring at me hard. Trying to decide if I was for real.
Brian Webb tried to make me lose it. He stuck his two pointer fingers into his
nostrils and twirled them around. He thinks he’s funny, but he’s just gross.
“I took a snapshot of my friend Bird Arthur,” I continued. “At his Little League
game. Bird smiled and posed for the camera. But the photo showed him lying
unconscious on the ground.
“Then, a few minutes later, a kid hit a line drive. It smacked Bird in the head.
And Bird fell unconscious on the ground. Just like in the photo.”
I heard some nervous giggles from the back of the room. I glanced up to see
puzzled expressions on a lot of faces. Brian still had his fingers in his nose. I
turned
away. No way was I going to laugh at that.
Mr. Saur had his elbows on the desk and his round, bald head buried in his
hands.
His face was hidden. So I couldn’t tell if he liked my report or not.
“Then something even more scary happened,” I continued. “I brought the
camera
to Shari Walker’s birthday party. I snapped Shari’s picture, standing next to a
tree.
“When the photo popped out, it showed the tree—but no Shari. It was like she
was invisible or something. And then, a few minutes later, Shari disappeared.”
A few kids gasped. Some others laughed. Mr. Saur still had his face buried in his
hands.
“A couple of days later, Shari came back,” I told them. “But now we were too
frightened to keep the camera. So we took it back to the Coffman house. And we
met
this strange guy, dressed all in black. He was the inventor of the camera. He told
us
that the camera had a curse on it, and—”
To my surprise, Mr. Saur jumped to his feet. “That will be enough,” he snapped.
“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I heard him correctly.
3
The room went silent.
Mr. Saur shook his head. Then he narrowed his watery brown eyes at me.
“Greg,”
he said, “I have some very bad news for you.”
4
2
The lunch bell rang.
“We’ll hear more reports tomorrow,” Mr. Saur announced. “Class dismissed.”
Chairs scraped the floor as everyone stood up. I watched the other kids gather up
their books and backpacks and head for the door. Freedom.
I had an urge to run after them. But Mr. Saur kept his eyes locked on me, holding
me in place with those cold eyes.
I waited until the classroom had emptied out. Then I turned to the lemon-faced
teacher. “What’s the bad news?” I gritted my teeth.
“I’m giving you an F,” Sourball said.
“Huh?”
“I’m failing you on that report, Greg.”
I felt my knees give. I had to grab the chalk tray to keep myself from collapsing
in a quivering heap on the floor. “B—but—but— why?” I choked out.
He crossed his bony arms over the front of his yellow alligator-shirt. I wished the
alligator would reach up and bite him.
“You didn’t do the assignment,” he said.
“But—but—but—” I still gripped the chalk tray. My legs were shaking too hard
to stand up.
“Greg, you were supposed to share a true story,” Mr. Saur scolded. “Instead, you
came in here with that wild tale. It was completely silly. I don’t know what you
were
thinking!”
“But it’s true!” I wailed. “The camera—”
He waved a hand in my face. “Silly,” he repeated. “You came in here with a
wild,
silly story. Something you probably read in a comic book.”
“Mr. Saur—!” I started. I let go of the chalk tray and balled my hands into tight
fists. “You have to believe me. The camera is real. I didn’t make up the story.”
I took a deep breath. Then I struggled to keep my voice low and calm. “You can
ask my friends,” I told him. “They’re in Miss Folsom’s class. They’ll tell you it
really
happened.”
“I’m sure they will.” He smirked at me. “I’m sure your friends will tell me
whatever you want them to tell me.”
“No. Really—!” I protested.
Mr. Saur shook his head. “You didn’t take the assignment seriously, Greg. You
treated it like a big joke. So I have to give you an F.”
I raised my fists and let out a loud groan.
Greg, get control, I warned myself. Get control.
5
But how could I get control? The grade was so unfair. And it meant so much to
me.
It was a matter of life or death!
“Mr. Saur—you can’t give me an F!” I wailed. I felt like dropping to my knees
and begging for mercy. “You will ruin my life!”
He stared coldly at me. He didn’t say a word.
“If I don’t get better grades, I can’t visit my cousins this summer,” I explained.
“You see, my cousins live near Yosemite. In California. And my parents said that
if I
get a better grade in your English class, I can spend the summer with them.”
He didn’t move. His cold frown didn’t budge. His eyes didn’t blink.
“If you give me an F, I’ll be stuck all summer in Pitts Landing!” I cried.
Finally, Mr. Saur moved. An unpleasant smile spread over his face. His wet
brown eyes flashed. “Then you’ll have plenty of time to make up more crazy
stories,”
he said.
He turned away from me and started scribbling notes in his black grade book.
“Mr. Saur—please!” I begged. “You’ve got to believe me. My story is true. I
didn’t make it up. Please—”
He raised his eyes from the grade book. “Okay. Prove it.”
My mouth dropped open. “Huh?”
“Bring in the camera,” he said. “Bring it in and prove that it’s evil. Prove that
your story is true—or else I have to fail you.”
I stared at him, studying his face. Was he serious?
He stared back for a moment, daring me with his eyes. Then he shooed me away
with both hands. “Go to lunch, Greg. Maybe next time you’ll take my
assignment
seriously.”
I gathered up my backpack and slung it over my shoulder. Then I slumped out of
the room, thinking hard.
Could I go back to that creepy old house and dig out that camera?
No. No way.
The camera was too dangerous. Too frightening. Too evil.
But I needed a good grade. I needed it desperately.
What should I do?
6
3
I found my friends at our usual table in the corner of the lunchroom. I dropped
my
tray down with a sigh, and spilled half my drink.
“Greg—what’s your problem?” Bird looked up from his sandwich. He had egg
salad all over his chin and cheeks.
“Are you eating that sandwich or wearing it?” Shari asked him.
“Excuse me?” Bird didn’t understand.
Michael inflated his brown paper sandwich bag and popped it between his
hands.
Then he crushed his chocolate milk carton flat. He always gulps his milk down
first,
then crushes the carton. We’re not sure why.
Michael is a little weird.
I dropped into my chair. I didn’t start to eat. I didn’t even look at my food tray. I
just stared at the wall until the tiles became a green blur.
“What’s your problem?” Bird repeated. Now he had egg salad on his forehead,
too! I don’t know how he does it.
Bird’s real name is Doug Arthur. But he looks so much like a bird, everyone
calls
him Bird. Even his parents.
He has small, birdlike brown eyes, close together over a long, beak-shaped nose.
And he has a short tuft of feathery brown hair on top of his head. He’s tall and
thin
and sort of bobs up and down like a flamingo when he walks.
Michael poked a finger through his sandwich. He always makes a hole in the
center of his sandwich and eats it inside out. “Bad day, Greg?”
“For sure,” I muttered. I sighed again.
Shari wore a pale blue T-shirt over faded jeans. She tossed back her black hair.
She was busy pulling the bright red pepperoni off her pizza slice. “Come on,
Greg.
Spill,” she urged without looking up.
I took a deep breath. Then I told them what had happened to me in English class.
Bird dropped his sandwich onto the table. “Sourball didn’t believe you?” he
cried. He slapped his forehead. When he pulled his hand away, his fingers were
smeared with egg salad.
“Well, we could all go tell him it’s true,” Shari suggested.
I shook my head. “He won’t believe you, either,” I moaned.
“But we all saw it!” Michael protested. “We all know it’s true.”
“Yeah. It’s four against one,” Bird added. He was wiping egg salad off the front
of his shirt. “He’ll have to believe us.”
“He won’t,” I sighed. “You know Sourball. He said I have to bring in the camera
and prove to him that it’s evil.”
“But you can’t!” Michael and Shari cried together.
7
I glanced over their shoulders. Brian and Donny were grinning at me from the
next table. Brian and Donny are the two biggest guys at Pitts Landing Middle
School.
We call them Sumo One and Sumo Two—because they’re both shaped a little
like
sumo wrestlers.
Of course, no one has ever called them Sumo One or Sumo Two to their faces.
When Donny and Brian get angry, they sit on kids and squash them like bugs.
And now, they had followed me from Mr. Saur’s class and were grinning at me
from the next table. When they saw me watching, they formed little square
cameras
with their fingers and raised them in front of their eyes.
“Click! Click!” Brian called. “I’ve got an evil camera here!”
“Say cheese!” Donny shouted. “Say cheese—and die! Ha-ha-ha!”
“Click. Click. Click.” They clicked their air cameras.
“Watch the birdie!” Donny cried.
“Watch the birdbrain!” Brian yelled.
They both tossed back their heads and laughed like lunatics, slapping each other
high fives.
“Funny, guys,” I said, rolling my eyes. “Real funny.”
“You two should do stand-up,” Michael told them. “You should stand up in the
corner!”
No one laughed. No one ever laughs at Michael’s jokes. His jokes are never
funny. In fact, they are embarrassing.
Michael has short red hair, blue eyes, and a face full of freckles. He isn’t exactly
fat—but no one would ever call him skinny.
One of these days, he’s going to surprise us and make a joke that isn’t totally
lame.
But I was in no mood for jokes, anyway. My summer was about to be ruined.
My
three friends all had plans to go away. No way I wanted to be left all alone in
Pitts
Landing with nothing to do for three months!
If I had to bring in that camera to prove to Mr. Saur that I was telling the truth…
I’d do it!
Shari must have read my thoughts. She reached across the table and grabbed my
arm. “Greg—you can’t,” she said. “That camera is too dangerous.”
Bird agreed. “I’m not going back to that weird house,” he said, shaking his head.
“Never again.”
“Hey—what about your brother?” Michael asked me.
I turned to him, confused. “What about my brother?”
“Isn’t he working in a camera store?” Michael demanded.
I nodded. My older brother, Terry, was working at Kramer’s Photo Store after
school. “Yeah. He’s at Kramer’s. He works in the developing lab. So what?”
“Maybe Terry could borrow an old camera from the store,” Michael suggested.
“You can bring it in and tell Mr. Saur it’s the evil camera.”
“Just one problem,” I told Michael. “I have to prove the camera is evil. How do I
do that?”
Michael thought about it. And thought.
8
“It won’t work,” I sighed. “We have to go get the real camera.” I glanced around
the table. “Who will go with me?”
No one answered. Bird concentrated on getting the egg salad out from under his
fingernails. Shari twisted a lock of black hair around one finger. Michael stared
at the
floor.
“Don’t all volunteer at once,” I grumbled.
They still didn’t move.
“I just need the camera for one day,” I added. “Then we’ll return it and never
take
it out again.”
No one replied. Bird raised his beady little eyes to the ceiling and started
whistling to himself.
I sneered at them. “Okay, wimps. I’ll go by myself.”
“Don’t do it,” Shari warned again. “Not even for a day. Something horrible will
happen. I know it will.”
If only I had listened to her.
9
4
The rest of the afternoon, I barely heard a word anyone said. I think I had a
spelling
quiz. I think we played volleyball in gym. I think someone slammed the ball
onto my
head.
Did it hurt? Did I have to leave the game for a while?
I really don’t remember.
In music class, Miss Jakes caught me staring out the window, a dazed look on
my
face. She thought it was because of the volleyball accident. She wanted to send
me to
the nurse.
But I explained that I was okay. I told her I wasn’t hurt—I was only
daydreaming.
I didn’t explain that I was thinking hard. Thinking about that evil camera hidden
away in the Coffman house.
Thinking about how I was going to sneak out after dinner. Ride my bike up the
hill to the deserted old house. Creep down to the basement—and pull the camera
from its hiding place in the wall.
I’m going to prove the camera is evil, Sourball. I’m going to prove you’re wrong
and unfair! I thought bitterly.
I’m going to prove it to Brian and Donny and all the other kids who laughed at
my story.
I’m going to get an A for my report. Not an F.
I thought about all that. And I thought about Shari, Michael, and Bird.
I didn’t blame my friends for being scared. I was scared, too. I promised myself
I’d be really careful.
I’ll bring it to school. But I won’t take anyone’s picture with it, I decided.
Then how would I prove to Mr. Saur that the camera is evil?
I thought hard. I’ll take a snapshot of the empty classroom, I decided. Or maybe
the lunchroom or the gym when no one is there.
As soon as Mr. Saur changes my grade to an A, I’ll return the camera, I promised
myself. I’ll shove it back into its hiding place. And I’ll never take it out again.
After school, I searched for Shari. She lives next door, so we usually walk home
together. But I didn’t see her anywhere.
I crossed the street, kicking a bottle cap I found at the curb. Thinking about my
plan. Thinking about the camera.
I had walked about half a block when I heard voices behind me. “Greg! Hey—
Greg!”
Two hands grabbed my shoulders and spun me around hard.
Brian Webb!
10
“Greg—Donny and I went to the Coffman house!” he exclaimed, grinning,
holding me in place. “We found the evil camera!”
“Say cheese!” Donny cried.
He pointed the camera and flashed it in my face.
11
5
I uttered a hoarse cry.
And shut my eyes against the white flash.
Something horrible is going to happen to me now, I realized.
The picture is going to show me in pain. In agony. In terrible trouble. And then
it’s going to come true!
When I opened my eyes, Brian and Donny were laughing. They slapped each
other a high five.
I stared at the camera in Donny’s hand.
A yellow cardboard camera. One of those cheap throwaway cameras.
Not the evil camera. Not the old camera from the Coffman house.
“Good joke, guys!” I said sarcastically. I blinked several times, trying to make
the
yellow dots disappear. “You guys are a riot.”
“You’re the funny one!” Brian shot back. “That was such a funny story you told
in class!”
“Yeah. It had us all laughing,” Donny chimed in.
I stared angrily at them. My heart thumped loudly. Sumo One and Sumo Two.
They were so big, they nearly blocked out the sunlight!
I knew they wanted to keep on teasing me. Have some more laughs at my
expense. Maybe get into a fight.
But I didn’t have time to fight with them.
“Maybe you won’t be laughing tomorrow,” I murmured. Then I turned, jogged
across the street, and headed for home.
At dinner, I stared down at my plate. I was too nervous to eat. My stomach felt
as if it
were tied in a tight knot.
“Pass the potatoes,” my brother, Terry, said with a mouth full of chicken.
“It’s not potatoes. It’s turnips,” Mom corrected him.
Terry shrugged. “Whatever.” He scooped a pile onto his plate and began
spooning them quickly into his mouth.
“Slow down, Terry,” Dad scolded. “You’re eating so fast, you don’t know what
you’re eating!”
“Sure, I do,” Terry protested. “I’m eating dinner!”
Mom and Dad laughed.
Terry looks a lot like me—blond hair, green eyes, kind of a goofy smile. We
could almost be twins, except that he’s sixteen, four years older than me.
“Why are you in such a hurry?” Mom asked him.
12
Terry burped. “Excuse me.” He licked chicken grease off his fingers. “I have to
get back to work. A lot of special orders came in today. So I promised Mr.
Kramer
I’d put in a few extra hours in the developing lab.”
“You’re learning a lot about photography—aren’t you?” Dad said.
“Yeah. A lot.”
Oh, please! I thought. Please don’t talk about photography!
I knew that soon after dinner, I’d be sneaking out to that creepy old deserted
house. I didn’t want to think about cameras or photography.
Terry’s chair scraped the floor as he jumped to his feet. He tossed his greasy
napkin onto the table. “Got to run. See you later.” He loped to the door.
“Don’t you have any homework tonight?” Mom called after him.
“No,” he shouted from the front hall. “They don’t give homework in high
school!” The front door slammed behind him.
“What a comedian,” Dad muttered, shaking his head.
They both suddenly remembered that I was at the table, too. “Greg—you haven’t
touched your chicken!” Mom said, staring at my full plate.
“I ate too much junk after school,” I lied. “I’m not too hungry.”
“Your mom and I are going over to Alana’s after dinner,” Dad told me. Alana is
Mom’s sister. “Alana still isn’t feeling well. Do you want to come with us?”
“Uh… no,” I replied, thinking hard. “I’ve got too much homework. I’m going to
be studying all night.”
I don’t like to lie to Mom and Dad—if I can help it.
Tonight I couldn’t help it.
“How are your grades this semester?” Mom asked.
“Yes, how are they?” Dad repeated, leaning closer. “Pete and Alice out in
Yosemite called me this afternoon. They asked if you are coming to visit them
this
summer. I told them we’d know as soon as your next report card arrives.”
“Uh… I’m doing real well,” I told them, staring down at my chicken and turnips.
I’ll be doing real well after tomorrow, I thought. My stomach knotted even
tighter.
Mom and Dad stood up to clear the table. “Pete and Alice said to be sure to bring
a camera,” Dad said. “It’s such beautiful country out there.”
“Maybe Terry can get you a good camera at the store,” Mom suggested.
Please stop talking about cameras! I thought, gritting my teeth. “Maybe he can,”
I said.
I waited till Mom and Dad drove off for Alana’s house. Then I waited ten
minutes
more. Sometimes they forget something, turn around, and come back home.
I peered out the window. Under the white moonlight, the bare trees were bending
and shaking. A breezy night. Still cold even though spring was only a few weeks
away.
I pulled a long-sleeved flannel shirt over my T-shirt. Tucked a pocket flashlight
into my jeans. And headed out to the garage to get my bike.
The swirling wind felt heavy and wet. I glanced up at the sky, hoping it wasn’t
getting ready to rain. A pale half-moon floated over the quivering trees.
13
The front tire on my bike was a little low. But I guessed I could make it up the
hill to the Coffman house. I walked the bike out of the garage, then climbed on.
I’d left all the lights on in the house. From the driveway, it looked so bright and
warm and safe. For a moment, I was tempted to go back inside and forget about
the
evil camera.
But my mind was made up. I desperately wanted to visit my cousins this
summer.
No way I could do that if I got an F from Mr. Saur on my report.
I took a deep breath. Clicked on the bike headlight. And pedaled down to the
street.
It was lucky that Mom and Dad had to go away, I told myself. At least I didn’t
have to sneak out of the house.
“That’s it, Greg,” I said out loud, pedaling harder. “Look on the bright side.”
The street seemed darker than usual. Glancing up, I saw that two streetlights
were
out.
The wind swept toward me. On both sides, the trees appeared to be shivering. I
swerved to miss a sheet of old newspaper fluttering across the street.
I shifted gears as the street sloped uphill. I pictured the ramshackle old Coffman
house. Hidden behind ancient oak trees at the top of a weed-choked lawn.
I remembered that it stood three stories tall, gray shingle, with a wraparound
screened porch, a sloping red roof, and tall chimneys on either end.
Many years ago, it must have been a really fancy house. But no one had lived in
it for dozens of years. And the house had crumbled and decayed until it looked
like a
wreck.
I crossed a street, pedaling smoothly and steadily uphill. Familiar houses rolled
past in the darkness. And then a small wooded area.
I felt my throat tighten. And my hands grow cold.
The house—the Coffman house—stood just beyond the woods.
The tree branches swayed, glowing gray—the color of bone—under the cold
moonlight.
I squeezed the brake as I rolled past the woods.
Past the sloping lawn. Past the ancient oak trees.
Up to the old house—and gasped in shock.
14
6
The house was gone.
I jumped off my bike and let it fall to the sidewalk. I uttered a low cry of
surprise.
Then I blinked several times. Tried to make the big, old house appear where it
belonged behind the oak trees.
But no.
The trees rose up over the lawn, silvery-gray in the moonlight. Now they
protected only scattered piles of boards and shingles.
The house had been torn down.
Totaled.
Dazed, I stood at the curb, staring up to where the house should be. Staring hard.
Trying to force it to come back.
A minute or two later, I felt a stab of pain—and slapped a mosquito on my
forehead. It’s too early in the spring for mosquitoes, I thought. I felt wet blood
on my
forehead.
Rubbing the bite, I turned to the gravel driveway. And saw a stenciled sign near
the street: SOLD.
So the Coffman house had been sold.
And the new owner tore it down.
I rubbed the mosquito bite, thinking hard. The house was gone. But what about
the basement?
What about the basement workshop? I remembered it so well. I remembered the
worktable. And I remembered the hiding place in the wall above it. The small
compartment where the camera lay hidden away.
What about the basement?
Before I even realized it, my feet were carrying me up the hill. My sneakers slid
over the slick, tall grass. I inhaled the fresh dew. I kept my eyes locked on the
trembling silver trees.
I stepped around a pile of rusted nails and bolts. Jumped over a low stack of
rotted shingles. Shingles that had been pulled off the house.
Halfway up the lawn, I could see what else was left of the house. Wooden doors
stacked in a high pile. Broken glass over the ground. Window frames leaning
against
a wall of rotting boards. Cracked shingles everywhere. A white sink on its side
against a tree. An old washtub resting beside it.
But what about the basement?
I crept closer. My legs suddenly felt heavy. My whole body felt heavy—as if
some invisible force were pushing me back, pushing me away.
15
A deep shadow ran along the ground behind the round, old oaks. At first glance,
I
thought I was staring at a pool of water. A small lake.
But as I made my way closer, I saw that the deep shadow was a hole. A huge,
square pit in the ground.
The basement.
Nothing but a hole now.
I stopped at the edge, my body feeling even heavier. Heavy with disappointment.
I stopped and stared down into the deep hole.
The trees shut out most of the moonlight. With a trembling hand, I pulled out my
pocket flashlight and clicked it on. I aimed the narrow beam of yellow light into
the
hole.
Empty down there. The light slid over the dirt. On one side, thick tree roots
poked
into the open square.
I ran the light over the pit walls. Tangles of roots spread over the smooth, black
dirt.
Nothing left. The basement had been completely cleared out. Even the concrete
floor had been broken up and carted away.
And where was the camera?
Where?
Had someone found it? Pulled it out and kept it?
Or had it been crushed when the workers smashed the concrete? Crushed and
destroyed forever?
I moved the beam of light back and forth along the far wall. I’m not sure what I
expected to see.
Did I think I’d find the camera hidden in its square hole in the pit wall? Did I
think I would see it in a corner of the muddy floor?
The light swept over dirt and knots of tree roots.
Nothing else.
I clicked off the flashlight and shoved it into my pocket.
I turned away from the hole, side-stepping a pile of broken shingles.
A strong gust of wind made the old trees groan and creak. I barely noticed the
eerie sounds.
I’m going to get an F, I thought unhappily.
The camera is gone forever, and I’m going to get an F.
My summer is ruined. And the other kids in class will never believe me. They
will laugh at me and click cameras at me forever.
I let out a long, glum sigh.
Angrily, I kicked a broken board out of my path and started down the lawn to my
bike.
I had taken four or five steps when a shrill voice yelled, “Caught you! You’re not
going anywhere!”
16
7
The high voice in the night air startled me. Without thinking, I started to run.
Then
stopped.
I spun around, my heart heaving against my chest.
And saw a boy. About my age. He had picked up a board from the ground and
held it high, as if ready to swing it.
He wore a black sweatshirt over faded jeans, holes in both knees. His dark hair
was cut very short. He glared at me with dark, tense eyes.
“Dad—I caught him!” he shouted. He had a high, shrill voice that made him
sound like a little kid.
“Whoa. What do you mean?” I cried. “Caught me?”
“Don’t move,” he ordered me, raising the board higher. He took a step closer.
Then another. His eyes burned hard into mine.
“I wasn’t doing anything!” I told him. “I—I was just looking.”
As he stepped up to me, I saw his expression change. The anger faded from his
eyes. His mouth slid open.
“You—you’re not him!” he stammered.
“Huh? Who?” I cried. “I’m not who?”
“Hey—I’m sorry,” he said, shaking his head. “I thought you were someone
else.”
“Well… I’m not someone else!” I replied. “I’m me.”
“There’s a kid who lives down the block,” the boy explained, scratching his dark
crew cut. “He’s been sneaking over here at night and stealing stuff from the
yard.”
My eyes wandered over the cluttered lawn. “What was he stealing? There isn’t
much left.”
The boy nodded. He tossed away the board he planned to use as a weapon. It
clattered against a pile of boards beside me. “He was taking lumber and stuff. I
thought you were him.”
“Did your family buy the Coffman house?” I asked. Even though it was such a
cool, windy night, my forehead was all sweaty. I reached up and mopped the
sweat
with the back of my hand.
“Yeah. We bought it,” he replied. “But Dad said the house was too wrecked to
fix
up. So he had it torn down. We’re going to build a new house.”
The wind made the trees creak again. I glanced down to the street and saw the
back wheel of my bike spinning.
“People told us the Coffman house was haunted,” the boy said. “So I’m glad
Dad
tore it down.” He kicked at a shingle on the ground. “My name is Jon. What’s
yours?”
“Greg. I—I live down at the bottom of the hill. A few blocks past the school.”
17
I gazed to where the house had stood. “My friends and I used to sneak into the
old house,” I told him. “You know. Just for fun. For excitement. I think it was
haunted. Really.”
He narrowed his eyes at me, studying me. “What were you doing here?” he
demanded. “Why did you come up here tonight?”
I decided to tell him the truth. “I was looking for something,” I said. “A camera.”
He scratched his short hair again. “An old camera?”
“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “An old camera. It was hidden down in the basement.
Did you see it?”
“Yeah,” Jon replied. “The men dug it up when they pulled out the basement.”
“Oh, wow!” I cried. I couldn’t hide my excitement. “Where is it, Jon? I mean—
what did they do with it? Do you know where it is?”
He pointed over my shoulder toward the street. “Probably over there,” he said. “I
don’t think they emptied it yet.”
I spun around and saw a big Dumpster on the other side of the driveway. “They
threw it in there?” I demanded.
I didn’t wait for him to answer. I started running full speed through the tall
weeds
to the street. I stopped in front of the big steel Dumpster. I could see all kinds of
junk
piled over the top.
“Is it okay to look for it?” I called back to Jon.
He came walking slowly down to me, hands shoved in his pockets. “Sure. Go
ahead. Why do you want a stupid old camera, anyway?”
I didn’t answer him. No time for answering questions.
I lifted both hands to the top of the Dumpster. It was pretty high. It took me three
tries to pull myself up and in.
A street lamp across the street cast a glow of dim yellow light over the
Dumpster.
My eyes wandered quickly over the trash. All stuff from the basement, I
realized.
I saw rusted old tools from the workshop. Part of an ancient vacuum cleaner. The
spin cylinder from a dryer. Old clothes. Torn suitcases.
Is it here? I asked myself. Is the camera in here?
I pulled away a broken suitcase and tossed it aside. I grabbed stacks of old
magazines and shoved them out of the way.
I’m going to search every inch of this Dumpster till I find it, I told myself.
I pulled away a torn section of a garden hose. Then I pawed through a pile of old
clothes.
Where is it? Where?
I dropped onto my hands and knees and dug deeper into the garbage. The stale
odor of dust and decay floated up to me, swept over me. I held my breath and
kept
pawing away.
I had to find it. I had to.
I didn’t stop until I saw the two eyes staring up at me.
Two eyes. Yellow in the pale light.
Staring up at me from the trash. Staring up at me without blinking.
I’m not alone in here! I realized.
And then I opened my mouth in a shrill, terrified scream.
18
19
8
The eyes stared up at me without blinking. Yellow and cold.
A chill tightened the back of my neck.
I stared down at them, waiting for them to move. Waiting for something to jump
up at me.
“What’s wrong? Did you find the camera?” Jon called from the sidewalk.
“No. I—uh—I—”
I reached my hand down toward the glassy yellow eyes. And felt bristly fur.
My heart pounding, I pushed some junk aside.
And without thinking, I picked up the staring creature.
Felt its body, stiff and hard beneath bristly brown and black fur.
A dead raccoon.
Its sour odor reached my nostrils. “Oooooh, yuck!” I let out a groan—and
heaved
the smelly creature out of the Dumpster.
“Hey, Greg—” Jon called up to me.
“I found a dead raccoon,” I told him, holding my nose. “It smelled so bad, I—”
I stopped when I saw the camera.
It had been hidden beneath the raccoon’s body. The glow from the street lamp
spilled over it. The glass of the camera lens reflected the light like a single,
shining
eye.
I grabbed it. Pulled it up from the trash.
Then I climbed to my feet. Leaning over the Dumpster, I held it up to Jon. “I
found it!” I cried happily. “Here it is. I can’t believe I found it!”
Jon wrinkled his face up at me. “Great,” he said, without enthusiasm.
I strapped the camera around my neck. Then, holding on to the top of the
Dumpster, I lowered myself to the ground.
My shirt and jeans were covered with dust and sticky grease. But I didn’t care. I
had the camera in my hands.
“What’s so great about it?” Jon demanded. He squinted down at it. Rubbed a
hand over the top. “Does it work?”
I didn’t want to tell him the story of the camera. I knew he wouldn’t believe it,
anyway. I didn’t want to scare him. And mainly, I wanted to get home with it as
fast
as I could.
“Yeah. It works,” I replied, dusting off the back with my hand. “It takes pretty
good pictures.”
“But why do you want it so much?” Jon asked, studying it as I worked to clean
the dust off.
20
“Oh… well. I promised to show it to someone. In school,” I told him. “I kind of
need it for a project.”
Jon scratched his short, dark hair. “Maybe I should show the camera to my dad,”
he said, motioning behind him. “He might not want you to take it.”
“But you threw it in the trash!” I cried. I held the camera tightly in both hands,
afraid he was going to try to grab it away.
“But we didn’t know it works,” Jon replied in his high, shrill voice. “Is it
valuable? Maybe it’s valuable. An antique or something.”
“No way. It’s not valuable,” I insisted. “Please, Jon. I—”
“We’d better show it to Dad,” Jon said. He reached for the camera.
I pulled away.
I grabbed the camera tighter.
Heard a click.
A white flash of light startled us both.
“Oh, noooo!” I let out a cry, realizing I had pushed the shutter.
And snapped a picture of Jon.
21
9
“Hey—why did you do that?” Jon demanded.
“It—it was an accident,” I stammered. I pulled the picture from the slot at the
bottom of the camera. “I didn’t mean to. Really.”
Jon and I both blinked several times, trying to get the flashing lights to fade from
our eyes. “It’s an instant camera?” Jon demanded. “It looks too old to be an
instant
camera.”
“Yeah. I know,” I replied. I held up the photo to watch it develop. Silently, I
prayed that the photo wouldn’t show anything terrible.
Please, please—let Jon be okay in the snapshot, I pleaded.
With my free hand, I pulled the little flashlight from my pocket. I beamed it
down
on the photo as it slowly developed.
As I stared at the small, square snapshot, I could see Jon’s face come into view.
His eyes were closed. His mouth was open, twisted in a strange expression.
Before I could really see what was going on, Jon grabbed the photo away from
me. He raised it close to his face and studied it.
“Hey—what’s with this camera?” he demanded.
I stepped up behind him to see the snapshot. “Oh, nooooo,” I groaned.
The photo came out very clear and bright. It showed Jon howling in pain. His
eyes shut. His mouth open in a scream.
His leg was raised. He was holding on to his sneaker with both hands.
He was holding on to his sneaker because a huge nail was sticking up from the
top. An enormous carpenter’s nail—nearly as big as a pencil—shoved up
through the
center of Jon’s foot!
Jon laughed. He turned to me. “What is this? Some kind of joke camera?”
I swallowed hard. I knew it wasn’t a joke.
The horrifying photos always came true.
How could I keep Jon from having a nail jammed in his foot? What could I do?
I decided I had to warn him. I had to tell him the truth about the camera.
“This is cool!” Jon exclaimed, studying the photo. “It really looks like me. I
wonder how it works.”
“It—it isn’t cool,” I stammered. “It’s really kind of scary, Jon. The camera is
evil.
It has a curse on it. The photos always come true.”
He laughed. “For sure!”
I knew he wouldn’t believe me.
“Well, just be careful—okay?” I insisted. “The photo isn’t a joke.”
He laughed again.
22
A gust of wind sent the tall weeds swaying. Snakes of black cloud slithered over
the moon. Darkness swept over us.
“I need to borrow the camera,” I told Jon. “Just for one day.”
“It’s such a cool camera,” he replied. “I don’t know. Maybe I should take it
home.”
“I’ll bring it back tomorrow afternoon,” I promised. “I just have to take it to
school.”
He twisted his mouth, thinking hard. “I’d better ask my dad.” He pointed to a
wall of lumber under the trees. “He’s back there with the architect, talking about
the
new house.”
“No. Wait!” I cried.
But Jon took off, running up the hill through the swaying weeds.
I started after him—but stopped when I heard a shrill bleat. And then Jon’s
horrifying roar of pain soared out over the lawn.
23
10
My breath caught in my chest. I stumbled forward through the weeds.
And saw Jon holding his sneaker, his face twisted in pain.
Even in the dim moonlight, I could see the huge nail pushing up through his
foot.
“Jon!” I shouted. “I’ll get your dad!”
I didn’t need to find him. Two men—one tall and thin, the other chubby and
short—rushed out from behind the lumber pile. I guessed they were the architect
and
Jon’s dad.
“Jon? What’s wrong?” the chubby one—Jon’s dad—called.
Jon tossed back his head in another scream of pain.
“He’s got a nail in his foot!” I shouted, running up to them, pointing frantically.
Both men ran past me. “Oh, good heavens!” Jon’s dad moaned.
They grabbed Jon under the arms. The tall man held Jon’s injured foot above the
ground. “Into my car,” he urged. “I have a towel. We can wrap the foot. He’s
losing a
lot of blood.”
“Should we pull out the nail?” Jon’s dad asked in a quivering voice.
“No. Too dangerous,” the other man replied.
“Don’t pull it out! Don’t!” Jon pleaded. “It’ll hurt too much!”
“We can’t even take off the sneaker!” Jon’s dad cried.
“The hospital is that way,” the architect said, pointing. “Only a few minutes
away.”
“Owwww. It hurts! It hurrrrts!” Jon wailed.
The two men lifted him off the ground. And half-walking, half-running, they
carried him down to a car parked across from the Dumpster.
I watched from the weeds as they gently lowered Jon into the backseat. I saw
them struggle with a long white towel. Finally, they had it tightly wrapped
around the
foot and sneaker.
They closed Jon’s car door. Then they quickly slid into the front. A few seconds
later, the car roared off into the darkness.
I stood in the middle of the yard, feeling the swaying weeds brush against my
jeans legs. I swallowed hard. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton.
“Poor Jon,” I murmured out loud.
The camera was as evil as ever. Tonight it had found another victim.
It’s all my fault, I thought sadly. It was an accident. I didn’t mean to press the
shutter. But I pressed it.
The two men hadn’t even looked at me. They were so upset about Jon, I don’t
think they saw me.
24
I glanced down and realized that I still gripped the camera in my hands. I had a
strong urge to heave it to the ground. To stomp on it again and again until I
smashed
it forever.
My eye caught something fluttering in the tall grass. I bent and picked it up. The
snapshot.
I squinted once again at Jon, holding his foot, shrieking in pain.
I tucked the snapshot into the pocket of my flannel shirt. I’ll bring it in to Mr.
Saur, I decided. I’ll bring in the camera and the photo of Jon. I’ll tell him exactly
what happened to Jon tonight.
I won’t have to snap a picture in school.
I have this picture as proof.
So it won’t be dangerous. It won’t be dangerous at all.
25
11
The next morning, I gulped down my breakfast. Then I pulled on my backpack,
strapped the camera around my neck, and hurried out the door.
I left the house fifteen minutes early. I didn’t want to run into Shari, or Michael,
or Bird.
I stepped out into a warm day. The air smelled fresh and sweet. I saw a row of
tulips poking up through the ground along the side of the house. First flowers of
spring.
I loped down the driveway and turned at the sidewalk. The camera felt heavy
against my chest. I reached up to adjust the strap—and heard a voice calling me.
“Greg! Hey, Greg—wait up!”
Shari.
I spun the camera behind me and tried to hide it under my arm.
Too late. She had already spotted it.
“I don’t believe you!” Shari cried, running up beside me. “You’re unreal! You
pulled that thing from the Coffman house?” She stared at the camera, shaking
her
head.
“Well… not exactly,” I replied. “How come you’re so early, Shari?”
“I was watching out the window for you,” she confessed. “I wanted to see if you
were crazy enough to get that camera.”
I frowned at her. “You were spying on me? Why?”
“Because I’m not letting you take that evil thing to school.” She stepped in front
of me, blocking my way.
I snickered. “Who made you queen of the world?” I sneered. “It’s a free country,
you know.”
She crossed her arms over the front of her plaid vest. “I’m serious, Greg. You
can’t take it. I won’t let you.”
I faked to the left and tried to edge past her on the right.
But she stayed in front of me. I bumped into her—then backed up a step.
“I’m serious,” she repeated. “Take the camera home.”
“Shari, you’re being a real jerk,” I muttered. “You can’t tell me what to do.”
Her expression changed. She uncrossed her arms and tugged her black hair back
over her shoulders. “Don’t you remember how dangerous that camera is? Don’t
you
remember all the horrible things it did to us?”
I gripped the camera in both hands. It suddenly felt very heavy. The metal felt
cold against the front of my T-shirt.
26
“Don’t you remember, Greg?” Shari pleaded. “I disappeared because of that
camera. Disappeared into thin air! You don’t want that to happen to someone
else—
do you? Think how terrible you’d feel.”
I swallowed hard, remembering the night before.
The camera had already injured someone.
“I’m not going to take any pictures,” I told her. “Really. I’m just going to show it
to Mr. Saur so he’ll change my grade.”
“Why will seeing an old camera make him change your grade?” Shari
demanded.
“Because I have a photo to show him, too,” I declared. I pulled the snapshot of
Jon out of my pocket and flashed it in front of her face.
“Oooh—gross!” she cried, shoving the photo away with both hands. “That is
sick!”
“I know,” I agreed, sliding the photo back in my pocket. “The poor kid. I took
this picture. Then, a minute later, it really happened to him.”
“So I’m right!” Shari declared, her eyes narrowed at the camera in my hands.
“You just proved my point—didn’t you, Greg! I’m right!”
A car rumbled past, filled with kids on their way to school. A small brown dog
stuck its head out the back window and barked at us.
I glanced at my watch. If we stayed here arguing another few minutes, Shari and
I
would be late for school.
“We’ve got to go,” I told her. I started walking, taking long strides. But she
hurried to block my way.
“No, Greg. I can’t let you. I can’t.”
I rolled my eyes. “Shari, give me a break.”
“It’s too dangerous,” she insisted. “I know I’m right. I know it will get you into
big trouble.”
“Get out of my way, Shari.”
“Give me the camera.”
“No way!” I cried.
She grabbed for it with both hands. And yanked it off my shoulder.
I grabbed it back.
And the camera flashed in Shari’s face.
27
12
Shari blinked. Her hands shot away from the camera. She let out a startled cry.
“Oh! Sorry!” I cried, backing away. “Sorry! Really! I’m sorry! I didn’t mean to
—
”
The camera felt warm in my hands. I reached for the square photo that slid from
the slot.
“Give me that!” Shari demanded. She swiped the snapshot away from me.
“What
have you done to me?”
“It was an accident!” I shouted. “You know I didn’t mean to snap it.”
Shari stared down at the square as it started to develop. “What have you done?
What have you done?” she repeated. Her voice trembled more each time she said
it. I
saw that her hand was shaking.
“I told you not to bring out the camera,” Shari cried. “I begged you to leave it at
home.”
“Shari, I’m sorry,” I apologized again. “Maybe it won’t be so bad. Maybe—”
She swallowed hard. “Maybe I’ll disappear again, Greg. Maybe I’ll disappear
forever.”
“No!” I cried. “Don’t say that. Please—”
We both stared down at the photo. It developed so slowly. First, the yellow
darkened over the white square. I began to see Shari’s face.
Was she screaming? Was she howling in pain?
I couldn’t tell.
The blue tint filled in over the yellow. I could see Shari’s face outlined in green.
“You look okay,” I told her. “I think you’re okay.”
“Wait,” she said softly. She bit her lower lip. She didn’t blink. Her eyes squinted
hard as the red and blue tints spread.
The picture darkened. Darkened to black.
I could see Shari’s face clearly now. She wasn’t smiling. She didn’t look happy.
But she wasn’t screaming, either.
Darker.
“Hey!” Shari cried. “It’s a negative.”
“Huh?” I didn’t understand.
“It’s not a photo,” Shari replied, holding the square up to me. “It’s a negative.
The photo didn’t come out. It’s all reversed.”
I stared at it. She was right. Everything was reversed.
“Maybe the camera is broken,” I said. I let out a long sigh of relief. “You’re
okay,
Shari. The camera doesn’t work.”
28
“Maybe,” she said. She handed me the negative. I slid it into my pocket. When I
looked up, she had a strange smile on her face.
An evil smile.
“Shari—what’s your problem?” I asked.
I should have known. I should have guessed what she planned to do. I should
have moved faster.
She grabbed the camera with both hands. Spun it around. Pointed it in my face.
And flashed a picture.
“Hey!” I tried to duck away from the lens.
Too late. She caught me.
“Shari—that’s not funny!” I cried.
“It won’t hurt you,” she replied. “The camera is broken—remember?”
I pulled the square from the slot in front of the camera.
My throat suddenly felt dry. Is it broken? I wondered. Will this one be a
negative,
too?
Or will it show me howling in pain with a nail through my foot—or something
even worse?
As I stared at the small square, my imagination ran wild. I pictured my body
stretched out like a rubber band. I pictured myself tugging at an arrow through
my
chest. I pictured myself lying mashed under a huge steamroller.
“Shari—how could you do this to me?” I groaned, watching the colors darken.
Her dark eyes flashed. “You’re really scared,” she said. “Admit it, Greg. You’re
really scared. Now maybe you get it. Maybe you see why I didn’t want you to
bring
the camera to school.”
My hand trembled. I gripped the snapshot with both hands.
The colors darkened.
“It’s not a negative,” I said.
Shari stepped up behind me and stared down at the photo.
“Oh, noooo!” we both cried at the same time.
Shari started to laugh.
“I don’t believe this!” I wailed.
29
13
“This is horrible!” I shrieked.
I recognized my face. But I didn’t recognize my body.
At first, I thought my head was resting on top of a giant balloon. Then I realized
that the giant balloon was me.
In the photo, I weighed about four hundred pounds!
No joke. Four hundred pounds!
I gaped at the photo, studying my round face and my even rounder body. I had
about eight chins. My cheeks were puffed way out. The collar of my T-shirt was
hidden under one of my flabby chins. The shirt was stretched tight over my chest
and
only came down to my belly, which bulged nearly to the ground.
I looked like a really gross mountain of pudding!
“Stop laughing!” I snapped at Shari. “It isn’t funny!”
“It’s very funny,” she insisted. She grabbed the photo, raised it to her face, and
started laughing all over again. “You’re bigger than Sumo One and Sumo Two!”
she
exclaimed.
I grabbed the photo back. I stared at the folds of flab hanging down from my
cheeks. My face was so huge and puffy, my eyes looked like tiny pig eyes.
And my stomach! My stomach hung down over my fat knees!
“Are you still going to bring the camera to school?” Shari asked. “You won’t
change your mind?”
“I have to show it to Mr. Saur,” I told her. “I’m just going to show him the
camera. And the picture of Jon.”
“And the picture of you?” she asked, grinning.
“No way.” I shoved it into my jeans pocket. “I don’t want anyone to see it.
Ever.”
Shari glanced at her watch. “Come on,” she said. “We’d better hurry! We’re
late.”
She started to run down the sidewalk, and I followed her.
All the way to school, I kept picturing my photo. Kept picturing my flabby face,
my enormous four-hundred-pound body.
Don’t worry about it, I told myself.
The camera is broken. There’s nothing to worry about.
Nothing to worry about.
But guess what? I was worried.
The halls were nearly empty when Shari and I arrived at school. The first bell
had
already rung.
30
I hid the camera under a bunch of stuff on the floor of my locker. I didn’t have
Mr. Saur’s English class until just before lunch. And I didn’t want to take a
chance of
Brian or Donny or somebody else grabbing the camera and messing around with
it.
I slammed the locker shut and locked it. Then I waved to Bird and Michael, who
were hurrying into their classroom.
I wanted to tell them I had the camera. And I wanted to tell them about Jon and
the nail in his foot.
But I decided I’d better keep quiet.
Michael and Bird agreed with Shari. They didn’t want me to take the camera out
again. They were too afraid of it.
And, they were probably right.
I slid into class just as the final bell rang. I ducked low in my seat, trying not to
be noticed. I had a long time to wait until Mr. Saur’s class.
Today was the first day ever that I couldn’t wait for Sourball’s class to begin!
Once again, I didn’t hear a word my other teachers said. In social studies, Mrs.
Wackman was rattling on about bauxite production in South America. I wanted
to
raise my hand and ask her what bauxite is! I’ve always wondered about bauxite.
I
think it’s some kind of South American car. But I’m not sure.
Her voice faded into the background. My mind was busy practicing my speech
to
Mr. Saur.
“Mr. Saur,” I planned to say, “you made a terrible mistake yesterday. But I’m not
going to hold it against you. I know you will be fair and change the grade on my
report as soon as I show you this.”
Whoa.
That’s too stiff, I told myself. That doesn’t sound like me at all. I’ll never be able
to get those words out.
I tried a different approach. “Here’s the evil camera, Mr. Saur. And here’s a
picture it took of a boy I met. A minute later, the picture came true. You asked
me to
bring in proof—and here it is.”
That’s better, I decided. It’s straight to the point.
Will he believe me?
He’ll have to, I thought. Photos don’t lie.
He’ll have to change my grade.
I stared at the wall clock over the chalkboard. Why was it moving so slowly?
Why?
Finally, the bell rang. I jumped up, ran out the door, and dove for my locker. Bird
called to me from down the hall. But I pretended I didn’t hear him.
I pulled the camera from its hiding place and slammed the locker door shut. I
tucked it carefully under my arm, protecting it.
I saw Sumo One and Sumo Two across the hall. They were shoving a fifth
grader
up against a locker. Making him bounce back like a yo-yo. That’s their hobby.
Making kids bounce.
And guess who is one of their favorite bouncers?
That’s right. Me.
31
I spun around and hurried the other way. I didn’t feel like bouncing today. And I
didn’t want Brian and Donny to set their eyes on the camera.
I took the long way around to Mr. Saur’s class, jogging the whole way. I held the
camera snugly and practiced my speech.
A group of kids were talking in front of the classroom, blocking the door. “Make
way!” I cried, pushing through them. I wanted to see Mr. Saur before the bell
rang.
I stepped into the room. Blinked against the bright sunlight streaming through
the
windows.
I turned and ran breathlessly toward Mr. Saur’s desk.
But I stopped halfway there.
My heart skipped a beat. And I let out a cry of dismay.
32
14
“May I help you?” asked the young woman sitting behind Mr. Saur’s desk. “Are
you
okay?”
I stared at her with my mouth hanging open to my knees. I didn’t answer her
questions. I gripped the camera tightly in both hands, afraid I might drop it.
“Where—where’s Mr. Saur?” I finally managed to choke out.
“He’s not feeling well,” she replied, studying me. “I’m Ms. Rose. I’m
substituting today.”
“He—he’s not here?” I stammered in a high, shrill voice.
She nodded. “I’ll be teaching the class today. Is there anything I can help you
with?”
I glanced down at the camera. “No,” I muttered unhappily. “No. You can’t help
me.”
The room was never this noisy when Mr. Saur sat behind the desk. Kids were
shouting and laughing. Someone tossed a balled-up piece of paper at me. It
bounced
off my shoulder and onto Ms. Rose’s desk. I heard loud laughter from the back
of the
room.
We always give substitutes a really hard time.
When a teacher doesn’t show up, it’s always time to celebrate. But I didn’t feel
like celebrating today. I was so disappointed.
I started to my seat—then turned back to Ms. Rose. “Can I put this in my
locker?” I asked, holding up the camera. “It will only take a second. My locker is
right out there.” I pointed to the hall.
The final bell rang. She held her hands over her ears. The bell was on the ceiling
right over her desk.
“Okay,” she said when the clanging stopped. “But hurry back. I’m going to be
talking about the subjunctive tense today. And you don’t want to miss that.”
Thrills and chills, huh?
I thanked her and hurried to the door. The long hall stood empty. Everyone was
in class.
My sneakers thudded loudly on the hard floor. My mind was racing. Thinking
about Mr. Saur. And about the camera. I’ll have to leave it in my locker until he
gets
back, I decided.
I promised Jon I’d keep it only for one day.
But what choice did I have?
I turned the corner—and bumped into Brian and Donny.
“Hey—” Brian grunted.
“Hey—” Donny greeted.
33
They say “Hey” a lot. I think it’s their favorite word.
“You guys are late,” I said, trying to hurry past them.
But they blocked my way with their big, wide bodies.
“Sourball isn’t here,” Donny said, grinning. “He’s sick or something. So we’ve
got a substitute.”
“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered.
“So we’re in no hurry,” Brian said. “Why should we hurry for a substitute?”
I tried to slip between them. But they were too quick for me. They squeezed
together, and I bounced back off them.
“We’re going to switch places.” Brian grinned. “I’m going to tell her I’m Donny.
And Donny is going to say he’s me.”
“Good joke,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “Very original. Now, can I get by?”
“No way,” Donny said, puffing up his big chest and leaning over me menacingly.
“You have to pay a toll if you want to pass,” Brian demanded. He stuck out his
big paw for money.
“How much is the toll?” I sighed.
“How much have you got?” Brian shot back.
They both guffawed and slapped high fives. They really think they’re funny.
“I’ve got to get to my locker,” I insisted.
I tried once again to push past them—and Brian grabbed the camera.
“Hey!” I reached for it with both hands. But Brian raised it high over his head.
“Look—Greg brought his magic camera to school,” he told Donny.
“Oooh—I’m scared!” Donny replied sarcastically. He pretended to shiver and
shake.
“But the camera is bad!” Brian exclaimed, holding it out of my frantic reach.
“It’s
cursed, Donny! You remember Greg’s report.”
Donny’s ugly grin grew wider. “You mean the report he got an F on?”
They both had another good laugh.
“Let’s check it out,” Brian declared. “Say cheese, Greg.”
He lowered the camera to his eye and aimed it at me.
“No—please!” I pleaded. I made another grab for the camera.
But Donny grabbed me and pinned my arms behind my back. “Go ahead. Snap
it,” he told Brian. “Let’s put a curse on Greg. Snap his picture.”
34
15
“No—please!” I begged.
Donny wrapped his huge paws tightly around me and pinned my arms against
my
back.
“The camera really is cursed!” I protested. “You don’t know what you’re doing!
Stop!”
Brian ignored me, of course. He held the camera to his eye—and raised his
finger
over the shutter button.
“Brian—please!” I wailed.
I saw his finger lower over the button.
Then a loud voice called, “What’s going on here, guys?”
Brian cried out and nearly dropped the camera. Donny dropped my arms and
stumbled back against the wall.
“Mr. Grand!” I exclaimed.
He’s the principal of Pitts Landing Middle School. Mr. Grand is young and has
blond wavy hair and a really good tan. He looks more like a surfer than a
principal.
The girls in our school all have crushes on him.
For once, I was glad to see him.
“Where should you guys be right now?” he asked, glancing up at the clock on
the
wall.
“Uh… we’re going to Mr. Saur’s class,” Donny replied, turning bright red.
“We were just helping Greg with his camera,” Brian added. He handed the
camera back to me.
“That looks like a valuable old camera,” Mr. Grand said to me. “You should be
careful with that, Greg.”
“I’m trying,” I said. “I’m going to lock it in my locker right now.”
I pushed past Sumo One and Sumo Two and hurried down the hall. As I reached
my locker, I heard Mr. Grand scold them: “Get to class, guys. And don’t give
your
substitute a hard time—okay?”
“Okay,” Brian promised.
“No problem,” Donny agreed.
I met Shari after school, and we walked home together. “What’s up?” I asked.
“I got an A on my math test,” she announced.
“Big surprise. You always get As in math,” I reminded her.
“So? Maybe I like to brag.”
I felt a little strange. Tired. Kind of weak. I stopped about half a block from my
house and tugged off my backpack.
35
“What’s your problem?” Shari demanded. “Why do you keep fiddling with that
backpack?”
“I think someone messed with it,” I said, loosening the straps. “I had it just right.
And now it’s too tight.”
“Why would anyone mess with your backpack?” Shari demanded. She blew a
bubble-gum bubble nearly as big as her head.
I stuck out a finger and popped it.
“Yuck!” she cried out as it stuck all over her face. “Are you impressed? That was
my biggest one ever,” she declared. “Wish I had a picture of it.”
“Don’t say picture,” I grumbled. “Don’t say the words picture or camera.” I had
already told her at lunch about Mr. Saur not showing.
“Where is the camera?” she asked, pulling gum from her hair.
“Locked up safe in my locker,” I said. I turned and saw Michael and Bird
running
down the sidewalk toward us.
“Did you tell Michael and Bird I have the camera?” I asked Shari.
She shook her head. “No. They’d be too upset. After all the horrible things it did
last summer, they never want to see that camera again. And neither do I,” she
added,
glaring at me.
“Hey—what’s up?” Bird called. He slapped me on the back so hard, I stumbled
off the curb.
Michael laughed. “You guys doing anything?”
“Not much,” I replied, straightening my backpack. I still couldn’t get it
comfortable.
“Get your bikes,” Michael urged. “Come on. It’s a great day to ride around.”
“Sounds good,” I agreed. Anything to get my mind off Mr. Saur and that stupid
camera.
“Let’s meet at my house,” Shari suggested. “I have to ask my mom first.”
Michael and Bird jogged toward their houses. Shari and I crossed the street and
headed to our homes, which are side by side.
Mom and Dad were at work. Terry wasn’t home from high school yet. I dropped
the backpack in the front hall. Pulled a box of juice from the refrigerator and
drank it
in two long sips from the straw.
I still felt weak. Kind of lifeless. I thought maybe a long bike ride would help get
my energy back.
My jeans felt uncomfortable. A little tight. I ran to my room and pulled on my
pair of really baggy shorts. Mom and Dad always teased me about these shorts.
They
say there’s room enough for a friend inside them.
But I like them. I think they’re cool. And they’re really comfortable. I usually
don’t wear them when I ride my bike. They’re so long and baggy, sometimes the
cuffs get caught in the chain.
I hurried outside and found Shari, Michael, and Bird waiting for me on their
bikes. “Let’s go, Greg,” Bird urged. “It’s starting to get cloudy.”
I pulled open the garage door and stepped inside, careful to walk around the
black
oil stains on the concrete floor. I took my bike from against the wall and walked
it
out onto the driveway.
36
Then, I did my high-flying circus riding trick. It’s my favorite way of getting on
my bike. I lean on the handlebars and heave myself up in the air. Then I come
flying
down on the seat.
Up I went. Pushed my body into the air.
Swung my legs in the air. Dropped onto the seat.
And both tires popped.
I heard the explosion and then a whoosh of air as the tires flattened against the
drive.
“Hey—what’s going on?” I cried.
37
16
“Whoa!” Shari cried.
Michael and Bird burst out laughing.
“Nice tires,” Michael said.
“Maybe you should go on a diet!” Bird exclaimed.
“Huh? A diet?” I repeated, swallowing hard. I knew that Bird was only joking.
But his words sent a chill down my back.
The snapshot flashed into my mind. The ugly snapshot from the evil camera.
I saw myself all bloated and huge. Like an enormous saggy water balloon.
I felt my face go hot and knew that I was blushing. I saw my friends staring at
me. I climbed off my bike. “Guess I jumped too hard,” I murmured.
“Maybe you need a tricycle,” Michael cracked.
No one laughed. Michael’s jokes never make any sense.
I squatted down and examined the tires. I ran my hands along the rubber—and
found two big holes. Two blowouts. And they were new tires, too.
I dragged the bike back into the garage. “I’ll take Terry’s old bike,” I told my
friends.
I actually like my brother’s bike better than mine. It’s a twelve-speed, and mine
is
only ten. He hardly ever rides it now that he’s got his driver’s license. But he
doesn’t
like me riding it.
“Better not sit on it!” Bird suggested. “Maybe you should just walk it!” He and
Michael laughed and slapped each other’s hands.
“Ha-ha,” I said. “You guys are as funny as a flat tire.”
“No. We’re as funny as two flat tires!” Michael joked.
“Maybe you need a mountain bike,” Bird said. “Something sturdy.”
“Maybe you need a sturdy punch in the face,” I threatened.
“Just don’t sit on me!” Michael exclaimed, raising both hands in front of him as
if
to shield himself from me.
“Are we going to ride or not?” Shari demanded, sighing. She glanced up at the
graying sky. “If we don’t hurry, we’re going to get caught in the rain.”
I eased myself carefully onto Terry’s bike. Then I followed them down the
driveway and into the street.
We rode aimlessly around town. When we reached the long, narrow park a few
blocks from school, we bumped onto the grass and raced as fast as we could.
Bird has the best bike and the longest legs. So he always wins our races.
After about an hour, it started to drizzle, so we turned for home. I was glad. My
legs felt heavy. My muscles ached.
As we pedaled through the raindrops, I caught Shari watching me. Studying me.
38
Despite the sweat rolling down my forehead, I suddenly felt cold all over. Why
is
she staring at me like that? I wondered.
Why?
The next morning, I woke up with two words on my lips: Mr. Saur.
Today is the day I show him the camera, I told myself, stretching and yawning.
And today is the day I get my grade changed.
I stood up, still yawning. Rubbed my eyes. And saw that my pillow had fallen to
the floor during the night.
When I bent over to pick it up, I felt a tug on the front of my pajama shirt. The
buttons all popped off and scattered over the floor.
“Huh?” I opened my mouth in surprise—and heard a long rrrrrrip. It took a few
seconds to realize that my pajama bottoms had ripped right up the back.
“Oh, nooooo.” I opened my mouth in a long, low moan.
The collar of the pajama shirt dug tightly into my neck. I tried to loosen it—and
both sleeves ripped at the shoulder!
My heart pounding, I straightened up and crossed the room to the mirror.
My whole body was trembling as I stepped up to the mirror.
I shut my eyes. I couldn’t bear to look.
But I had no choice. I had to see. I had to know.
Slowly, slowly, I opened one eye, then the other. I took a deep breath and gazed
at my reflection.
Had the snapshot come true? Did I weigh four hundred pounds?
39
17
I leaned into the mirror and stared at myself.
No. Not four hundred pounds.
I didn’t look too different. A little puffy. My cheeks were a little rounder. My
shoulders were broader.
I stepped back to check out the rest of my body—and Mom came walking into
the room. “Greg, what are you doing? You’re going to be late for school.”
I spun away from the mirror. “Mom—I grew last night!” I blurted out. “I—I
ripped my pajamas.”
She narrowed her eyes at the torn pajama top. “Greg, you didn’t grow
overnight,”
she said calmly. “Those pajamas always were a little small on you.”
I turned back to the mirror. “They were?”
Maybe Mom was right. Maybe I wasn’t growing huge. Maybe it was all in my
imagination.
I turned back to her. “How do I look?”
She shrugged. “You look fine.”
“I mean, do I look fatter to you?”
She studied me for a moment. “Well, actually…” Her voice trailed off.
“Actually what?” I demanded.
“Maybe I’ll put skim milk on your cereal this morning,” she replied.
“Hi, Greg. Putting on a little weight?”
That’s how Mr. Saur greeted me when I hurried up to his desk before English
class.
His words sent a cold shiver down the back of my neck. But I ignored them. I
held up the camera. “Mr. Saur, I want to show you something.”
He lowered his eyes to the camera and frowned at it. “You want to take my
picture? I already had my photo taken for the yearbook, Greg.”
“No,” I replied. “This is the camera, Mr. Saur. This is the camera that—”
He raised a hand to tell me to stop talking. “Not right now, Greg,” he said,
climbing up from his desk chair.
“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested.
He was gazing over my shoulder. I turned and saw Mr. Grand standing in the
classroom doorway. Mr. Saur hurried over to talk to him.
They talked until the bell rang. Then Mr. Saur returned to the front of the room
to
begin class. “I’m sorry I wasn’t here yesterday,” he announced. “I understand
you
had a wonderful time learning the subjunctive tense.”
40
I was still standing beside his desk, the camera in my hands. He stepped up to
the
chalkboard, turned, and saw me.
“Greg, take your seat, please,” he said. “We have a lot to do today.”
“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. I raised the camera.
“Take your seat,” he insisted.
I had no choice. I sighed and trudged to my chair near the back of the room.
How can I prove that my report was true if he won’t even listen to me? I asked
myself unhappily.
“Today, we’re going to hear more of your reports about true things that happened
to you,” Mr. Saur told the class. He turned to a girl in the front row. “Marci, I
believe
it is your turn. What is your report about?”
Marci Ryder stood up. “It’s about my cat, Waffles. It’s about all the funny things
Waffles does around the house.”
I groaned. Bor-ring! I thought. A few other kids groaned, too.
But Mr. Saur actually smiled. The first time ever!
He practically purred! “I like cats,” he told Marci. “I have six of them myself.”
Oh, yuck! I thought. Six cats!
I can’t sit through a boring report about a boring cat! I told myself.
I shot my hand into the air and waved it frantically. “Mr. Saur? Mr. Saur?”
The teacher’s smile faded. “Greg—now what?” he demanded.
“Uh… before Marci starts,” I said, “can I show you the camera? You know. The
one from my report? You said if I brought it in and proved that it’s evil, you’d
change my grade.”
Mr. Saur rubbed his chin and frowned at me. “It’s Marci’s turn,” he replied
coldly. “I know we all want to hear about Waffles.”
“But, Mr. Saur—you promised!” I cried.
A few kids snickered. My voice was so high, only dogs could hear it.
“Greg, you’re not going to change my mind,” Mr. Saur insisted.
“But I can prove it!” I pleaded. “I can prove the camera is evil.”
A few more kids snickered.
“Greg is evil!” Donny shouted.
It got a big laugh.
“Greg is baaaaad!” some other kid shouted.
Another big laugh.
Mr. Saur slammed the chalkboard with his wooden pointer. “Quiet, everyone.”
He sighed and motioned me forward. “Okay, Greg. One minute. It isn’t fair to
the
others to give you extra time. But I’ll give you one minute to show off your
camera.”
One minute!
I knew that’s all I needed.
I felt my shirt pocket to make sure I had the snapshot of Jon inside. I knew that
once Sourball saw that photo and heard what happened to Jon that night, he’d
believe
me.
“Come on, Greg,” the teacher urged. “Get up here. One minute.”
“Coming,” I said. I eagerly tried to stand up.
41
Tried again.
Again.
We have those chairs with the desk attached to the front.
And I was stuck in the chair. Too fat to get out!
42
18
What is happening to me? I wondered, feeling panic creep up from my stomach.
My
big blobby stomach.
I climbed into this chair without any problem. That was less than an hour ago.
And now I’m stuck in here. I must have put on a hundred pounds while I was
sitting
here!
“Greg, we’re waiting.” Mr. Saur rolled his eyes and tapped the chalkboard
impatiently with the pointer.
On the fourth try, I finally managed to slide out of the seat. Carrying the camera
carefully, I tromped up to the front of the room.
“This is the camera,” I told Mr. Saur. “My friends and I found it in a deserted
house. Just as I said in my report. The camera has a curse on it, and—”
He took the camera from my hands and examined it. He rolled it over and over.
He brought it up close to his face. He raised the viewfinder to his eye.
“No—don’t!” I shrieked. “Don’t take a picture!”
He lowered the camera. “If I don’t take a picture, how will I know if the camera
is evil or not?”
I reached into my shirt pocket. “I brought a photo,” I told him. “This will prove
I’m telling the truth.”
My fingers were so fat, I had trouble poking them into the pocket. My hands felt
like squishy balls of dough. They were too blobby to make a fist!
I nearly pulled the pocket off as I struggled to take out the snapshot of Jon.
Finally, I pulled it out and shoved it in Mr. Saur’s face. “Here. Look!”
He took the snapshot and studied it.
“That boy is named Jon,” I told him. “I took his picture two nights ago. He was
perfectly okay. But the photo showed him with a nail through his foot. Two
minutes
later, it came true. Jon got a nail in his foot, and his dad had to rush him to the
hospital.”
Mr. Saur burst out laughing.
Another first. The first time he’d ever laughed in class!
“It’s not funny,” I insisted. “Poor Jon was in so much pain. He—”
“I’ve seen those trick nails,” Mr. Saur said, his eyes on the photo.
“Huh?” I didn’t understand him.
He handed the photo back to me. “I used to have a fake arrow,” he said. “When I
slid it on, it looked as if I had an arrow going straight through my head. So I
understand how you made it appear that this boy has a nail through his foot.”
“No! It’s real! It’s real!” I cried. “Look how much pain Jon is in! Look at his
face!”
43
“Your friend is a good actor,” Mr. Saur replied.
“No!” I shrieked. “He isn’t my friend! I don’t even know him! You’ve got to
believe me! You’ve got to!”
Mr. Saur glanced up at the clock. “Your minute is up.”
“But you promised—!” I cried.
“Greg, go sit down,” he ordered. “You’re not going to fool me with an old
camera and a joke snapshot.”
“You lose, Greg!” Donny shouted.
“You’re evil, Greg!” Brian chimed in.
Everyone laughed. I could feel my face growing hot. I knew I must be beet-red.
I felt ready to explode. I was embarrassed and hurt and angry—all at the same
time.
“I’d give you an A for effort,” Mr. Saur said cruelly. “But I’m still giving you an
F for your report. F for fake!”
Everyone laughed again.
I couldn’t take it anymore.
I let out a cry of fury—and went running for the door.
At least, I tried to run. But I was too heavy to move fast. I could only waddle.
“Greg—where are you going?” I heard Mr. Saur call.
I pretended I didn’t hear him and lumbered to the door. I had the camera tucked
under one flabby arm. I pulled the door open with the other.
And bounced out into the silent, empty hall.
I could hear Mr. Saur calling me from the classroom. And I could hear the kids
laughing and talking excitedly.
I slammed the door shut behind me and kept moving.
I didn’t know where I was going. I didn’t have a plan. I was so angry. I wanted
to
scream and cry and punch the walls.
I turned the corner—and saw Shari down the hall.
“Greg!” she called, surprised to see me. “What’s going on?”
She was wearing a short black skirt over blue tights. She started to run down the
hall toward me.
She took about four steps—and then cried out as her skirt fell down!
44
19
“I don’t believe this!” Shari wailed.
We both stared down at her skirt, which had fallen around her ankles.
She dropped her books and bent to pull it up.
Normally, I would have burst out laughing. But she seemed so upset, I just stood
there.
“I—I’m losing weight,” she stammered, straightening the skirt around her waist.
“I weighed myself this morning. I’ve lost eight pounds!”
“Oh, wow!” I shook my head. Why was she losing weight?
I tried to cheer her up. “Uh… eight pounds isn’t so much,” I said. I knew it was
lame. But I couldn’t think of anything else.
“Greg—I only weighed ninety to start!” she replied sharply. “Now I’m down to
eighty-two. I can’t keep my skirt up. All my clothes hang on me!”
“Maybe if you eat a really big lunch…” I started.
“You’re no help!” she snapped.
“Look at me!” I cried, holding my arms out so she could see my big stomach. “I
think I put on two hundred pounds overnight! A few minutes ago, I couldn’t get
out
of my chair!”
Her eyes checked me out. She was so upset about being skinny, she hadn’t even
looked at me.
She squinted hard at me. Then she burst out laughing. “Oh, gross. You look
really
weird!”
“Thanks a bunch,” I sighed.
“What are we going to do?” she demanded. “Why is this happening to us?”
I started to answer—but I heard footsteps approaching from down the hall.
Shari heard them, too. “Let’s go,” she urged. “Quick—help me pick up my
books.”
I bent to pick up the books—and the back of my jeans burst open with a loud
rrrrrrip.
After school, Bird and Michael and some other kids started up a softball game
on the
diamond behind school. I didn’t want to play. I didn’t want them to see how
huge I
was getting.
But they pulled me onto the diamond and forced me to play first base.
Maybe they won’t notice anything different, I thought. I crossed my fingers and
hoped. Maybe they won’t notice that I’ve filled out a bit—since this morning!
My T-shirt was stretched against my bulging stomach. The shirt was so tight, I
could barely move my arms. My ripped jeans fit over my legs like tights.
45
Maybe they won’t notice, I told myself as I tried to trot out to first base. Maybe
they won’t notice.
“Hey, Greg—” Bird called from the pitcher’s mound. “Have you been supersizing all your meals?”
Everyone whooped and laughed. A few guys rolled around on the grass, giggling
like hyenas.
Michael pointed at me. “Hey—it’s Sumo Three!” he yelled.
“It’s Sumo Three and Four!” someone else called out.
More loud whooping and laughing.
“Give me a break,” I muttered angrily.
“Give him a lunch break!” Michael called.
It wasn’t funny. But everyone laughed, anyway.
They gathered around me in a wide circle. They shook their heads. “Weird,”
Bird
muttered. “How did you put on two hundred pounds since yesterday?”
I didn’t want to talk about it. “Are we going to play ball or what?” I demanded.
I had a strong urge to tell Bird and Michael why I was ballooning up so fast. I
wanted to tell them that I had taken out the evil camera. That Shari had taken my
picture. That it showed me weighing at least four hundred pounds.
And now it was coming true.
But I didn’t dare tell them. They had warned me not to go back to the Coffman
house. And they had begged me not to take out the camera.
If I told them the truth, they’d think I was a total jerk.
So I kept my mouth shut and tried to concentrate on the game.
I did pretty well until I went to bat in the third inning. I hit the ball over the
second baseman’s head and trotted to first base with a single.
I was totally out of breath by the time I reached the base. But the ball was still
rolling around in the outfield. “Keep running!” my teammates shouted. “Greg—
go to
second!”
So, huffing and puffing, I lifted my heavy legs and made my way to second.
“Slide! Slide!” everyone was shouting.
So I slid into second. Safe!
And then I couldn’t get off my back.
I wasn’t strong enough to pick up my heavy body. I must look like HumptyDumpty! I realized.
I tried rolling. I tried rocking back and forth.
And then I tried calling my friends for help.
* * *
I was exhausted by the time I pulled my huge body to my house. Sweat poured
off
my forehead and rolled down my round cheeks and chins.
My clothes were stretched so tight, I could barely breathe. My jeans were ripped.
My shirt pressed against my skin. Even my sneakers pinched my feet!
This is horrible! I’ve got to get into something comfortable, I decided.
46
I remembered my huge, baggy shorts. The ones I wore to go bike riding the
other
day.
I carried my bulky body over to the dresser. Bent over with a groan and pulled
out the big shorts.
I tugged them on, eager to get comfortable.
Tugged. Tugged harder. Then gasped in horror.
The huge, baggy shorts were skintight!
47
20
I put on nearly three hundred pounds that day. By evening, I could barely walk.
“It’s an allergic reaction,” Mom said.
I stared at her. “Excuse me? What’s that?”
“You ate something you’re allergic to,” she answered. “A person doesn’t swell
up
like a balloon overnight.”
Dad squinted at me. He was trying to look calm, but I could see how worried he
was. “Do you eat a lot of candy bars after school?” he asked.
Mom shook her head at Dad. “He could eat a thousand candy bars a day! They
wouldn’t make him this huge!” she declared.
“We’d better take him to an allergy doctor,” Dad murmured, rubbing his chin.
“We’ll take him to Dr. Weiss first,” Mom argued. “Dr. Weiss can tell us what
kind of doctor to take him to.”
They started to argue about what kind of doctor I needed.
I waddled out of the room. It took all my strength just to raise my enormous legs.
My chins sagged down over my neck. My big stomach bounced out of the room
ahead of me.
I knew that no doctor could help me. I knew I didn’t have an allergy. And I knew
I didn’t become a blimp because of candy bars.
The snapshot from the evil camera made me look as big as a mountain. And the
snapshot had come true.
No doctor could slim me down. No diet would work.
Later, I begged Mom and Dad to let me stay home. “Please don’t make me go to
school tomorrow like this,” I pleaded. “The kids will laugh at me. I’ll be so
embarrassed.”
“You can’t miss school,” Dad insisted. “What if it takes weeks and weeks to get
you back to normal?”
“The kids won’t laugh at you,” Mom added. “Your friends will understand that
you’re sick.”
I begged and whined. I even got down on my fat knees to plead with them.
But would they listen? No.
“Don’t be embarrassed,” Dad said as I waddled out the door to go to school the
next
morning.
Don’t be embarrassed?
I wore one of his baggy running suits—and it was tight on me!
48
I felt embarrassed just walking down the street. When cars drove past, I knew
the
people inside were staring at me. Laughing at the big mound of Jell-O bouncing
along the sidewalk.
I didn’t want to walk to school. But my parents have a Honda Civic—and I
didn’t
fit in the car!
Kids were staring as I squeezed through the front door of Pitts Landing Middle
School. But everyone was kind. No one made jokes. In fact, no one said a word
to
me.
I think they were afraid to come up to me. Afraid I might fall on them! I really
did look like one of the balloons in the Thanksgiving Day parade!
The morning went pretty well. I kept to myself and tried to hide in corners. It
wasn’t easy to hide. But everyone left me alone.
Until I stepped into Mr. Saur’s class.
He was as sour as ever. And he embarrassed me in front of the whole class.
“Greg, I don’t think you’ll fit into a chair,” he said, rolling his wooden pointer
between his hands. “Why don’t you just stand by the window.”
I didn’t say anything. I waddled over to the side of the room.
The room fell silent. The other kids didn’t laugh. They could see that there was
something seriously wrong with me.
But Mr. Saur insisted on giving me a hard time.
“Greg, forget the window,” he said. “If you stand there, I’m afraid you’ll block
out all the sunlight.” Then he smiled.
Again, no one laughed. I think the other kids felt sorry for me. Even Donny and
Brian weren’t cracking jokes.
“Greg, I want you to go see the nurse,” Mr. Saur ordered. “I want her to discuss
the four food groups with you. I think you’ve been eating too much of all four!”
I think that was supposed to be a cruel joke. But no one laughed.
I turned my bulk around and stared at him. Was he serious? Was he really
sending me to the nurse?
“Get going,” he said, pointing to the door.
I turned and shuffled heavily out of the classroom. I expected Donny to stick out
his big foot and try to trip me, the way he always does.
But he stared straight ahead, as silent and still as everyone else in the class.
I was glad. If he tripped me, I knew I’d never be able to get up.
I pulled myself down the hall, thinking angry thoughts about Mr. Saur. Why did
he make fun of me in front of everyone? Why was he so cruel?
I couldn’t answer my questions. Besides, I felt too angry to think clearly. I’ll pay
him back some day. That’s what I told myself. I’ll do something mean to him.
I’ll
embarrass old Sourball in front of everyone.
My angry thoughts followed me to the nurse’s office. But I instantly forgot them
when I saw the girl huddled in the chair in the waiting room. I stopped outside
the
door and gaped at her in shock.
Shari!
It took me a few seconds to recognize her.
49
Her jeans and T-shirt appeared to be about ten sizes too big! Her arms were as
thin as toothpicks. Her face was pale and puckered. Her head had shrunk. It
looked
like a tiny lemon on her frail, noodlelike body.
“Greg,” she whispered weakly. “Is that you in that big body?”
“Shari!” I cried. “How much weight have you lost?”
“I—I don’t know,” she stammered. “Look at me! I’m shrinking away. I’m so
light. It took me hours to walk to school this morning because the wind kept
pushing
me back!”
“Are you sick?” I cried.
She frowned at me. “I’m not sick, and neither are you,” she replied in a tiny, frail
voice. “I’m shrinking away, and you’re bloating up—and it’s because of those
photos
we took.”
I sighed and lifted my huge stomach with both hands so that I could get through
the doorway. “What are we going to do, Shari?” I whispered. “It’s those photos.
You’re right. But what are we going to do?”
50
21
Dad picked me up after school. He had rented a van since I couldn’t fit into the
car.
Dad helped me squeeze through the door. My body took up the entire backseat.
The seat belt wouldn’t stretch over my stomach. So we had to forget about it.
“I’m sure Dr. Weiss will have you back to normal in no time,” Dad said. He was
trying to be cheerful. But I could tell he was really upset and worried.
He drove slowly to Dr. Weiss’ office across town. The van couldn’t pick up
speed because of all the weight it carried—me!
Dr. Weiss is a nice elderly man with bright blue eyes and a long mane of white
hair. He talks to all the kids as if they’re two years old. He still gives me a
lollipop
after each visit, even though I’m twelve!
But I didn’t think he’d give me a lollipop today.
He tsk-tsked as I climbed on the scale. But he couldn’t get my weight. The scale
didn’t go high enough!
He had trouble listening to my heartbeat. His stethoscope got stuck in the folds
of
flab over my chest.
He took all kinds of tests, his expression tense and thoughtful. “We’ll send the
blood samples to the lab,” he told me. “We should have some answers in a few
days.”
He shook his head and frowned. His blue eyes appeared to fade. “I’ve never seen
anything like it, Greg,” he said softly. “I’m completely stumped.”
I wasn’t stumped. I knew exactly what the problem was.
As soon as I got home, I lumbered to my room and grabbed the phone. It took all
my strength to raise my huge, flabby arm and hold the receiver up to the bulging
flesh of my face.
I punched in Shari’s number. It took three tries. My finger was so fat, it kept
hitting two numbers at once.
She answered on the third ring. “Hello?” Her voice floated out so tiny and weak,
I could barely hear her.
“I’m coming over,” I announced. “And I’m bringing the camera.”
“You don’t have to shout!” she squeaked. And then she added, “Hurry, Greg.
I’ve
lost five more pounds. I’m so light, I’m afraid I’m going to float away.”
“I’ll be right there,” I told her. “We’ll figure out a way to save ourselves.”
I hung up the phone. Then I carefully dug the camera out from its hiding place in
my underwear drawer. I had to bend over to reach into the drawer. I was huffing
and
puffing, gasping for breath.
If I get any fatter, I’ll explode, I thought unhappily.
51
Carefully gripping the camera, I lowered my bulk down the stairs. “I’m going to
Shari’s,” I called to my parents.
They were in the den, discussing what Dr. Weiss had told Dad.
“It started to rain,” Mom called. “Take an umbrella.”
“I’m only going next door!” I shouted back.
Besides, an umbrella wouldn’t cover all of me.
I peeked outside. It was only drizzling. Not much of a rain at all.
I tucked the camera under the folds of my arm, pulled open the front door, and
started to step out. But I stopped when I saw the dark-haired boy walking up the
driveway.
Jon!
“Oh, no!” I murmured. I knew why he had come. He wanted his camera back.
But I couldn’t give it back. I needed it to save Shari and me.
I watched him walking slowly, his head down because of the rain.
What am I going to do? I asked myself. I can’t let him take back his camera. I
can’t!
I’ll duck back inside and hide, I decided.
I tried to back up. Tried to back my heavy bulk into the house.
Too late.
Jon saw me.
52
22
He waved to me and started jogging toward the house.
I had the camera in my hand. I carefully lowered it to the porch and stepped in
front of it. I knew it would be hidden behind my enormous body.
But what was I going to say to Jon? How could I convince him to let me keep
the
camera for a while longer?
“Hi!” he called.
“Hi,” I answered, my voice muffled by the thick folds of flab around my face.
“I’m looking for a boy who lives around here,” Jon said, stepping up to the
porch.
“His name is Greg, and he’s blond, and he’s about my age. Do you know him?
He
has a camera of mine.”
I stared at him. My mouth dropped open. I could feel my chins drop onto my
chest.
“What’s his name?” I choked out.
“Greg,” Jon repeated. “I don’t know his last name. Does he live around here?”
He doesn’t recognize me! I realized. I’m so huge, he doesn’t know that I’m me!
“Uh… yeah. I think I know who you mean,” I told him. “There’s a kid named
Greg who lives over there.” I pointed up the street.
“Do you know which house?” Jon asked, turning to where I pointed.
“It’s about four blocks that way,” I lied. “A big redbrick house. You can’t miss it.
It’s the only brick house on the block.”
“Hey, thanks,” Jon said. The rain started to come down harder. He turned quickly
and jogged down the driveway.
A close call, I thought.
I felt bad about lying to Jon. But I had to lie. I couldn’t give him back the
camera—ever. It was too dangerous.
I watched him until he disappeared behind some hedges. Then, I reached my
flabby hand down, picked up the camera, and bounced across the front yard to
Shari’s house.
Shari greeted me at her front door. I could see the shock in her eyes when she
saw
how huge I had become.
I was shocked, too. I cried out in surprise. She was starting to look like a stick
figure!
As she led the way to her room, she kept tripping over the cuffs of her jeans,
which sagged down over her feet. She had tied a knot in the belt around her tiny
waist, an attempt to keep the jeans from falling off.
“If I get any smaller, I’ll have to wear doll clothes!” she wailed.
53
“Did your parents take you to a doctor?” I asked, huffing and puffing as I tried to
drag my weight after her.
“Of course,” she replied in her tiny, weak voice. “The doctor said to make me
drink milk shakes five times a day!”
“I wish my doctor said that.” I sighed.
I lowered myself carefully onto her bed. I didn’t want the bed to collapse under
me. But as soon as I sat down, I heard a crunching sound. The sound of wood
splintering.
And the bed crashed loudly to the floor.
“Don’t worry about it,” Shari said softly. “I don’t have the strength to climb up
to
bed, anyway.”
“If I get any bigger,” I moaned, “I won’t be able to get out of the house. I really
won’t fit through the door.”
She folded her hands in front of her. Her fingers were so skinny, they looked like
bird claws. With her black hair hanging down from her tiny, round head, and her
straight pole of a body, she looked more like a mop than a person!
“What are we going to do?” she wailed.
I patted the camera with a fat, spongy hand. “I brought this,” I said. “I thought
maybe—”
“What good will that stupid camera do?” Shari cried. “I wish I’d never seen it!
Never! Never!”
“I have an idea,” I told her. I flicked a fly off one of my chins.
She hugged herself, wrapping her skinny arms around her toothpick body. “What
kind of an idea?”
“Let’s take new pictures of ourselves,” I said. “Maybe the new pictures will
show
us looking normal. Maybe the new pictures will change us back to the way we
were
before.”
She raised her eyes to mine. I could see her thinking about it, thinking hard. “It’s
kind of risky—isn’t it?” she said finally.
“Do you have a better idea?” I asked.
She thought hard again. Then she lowered her eyes to the camera. “Okay,” she
agreed. “Let’s do it.”
54
23
I struggled to climb to my feet. But my arms and legs were barely strong enough
to
push up my huge body.
Before I could move, Shari flew across the room. She grabbed the camera from
my lap.
“Oh!” she cried out as she nearly dropped it. “It feels so heavy!”
“That’s because you’re so light,” I told her. I tried again to lift my bulk off the
bed. And failed again.
“Sit still,” Shari ordered. “I’ll take your picture first.”
“Okay,” I agreed. “I hope the new photo shows me skinny.” I tried to cross my
fingers. But they were too fat to cross!
“Say cheese,” Shari said, aiming the camera at me.
“Don’t be funny,” I snapped. “Just take the picture.”
She stared through the viewfinder. Raised her finger over the shutter button.
Then she lowered the camera with a sigh. “It—it’s too dangerous,” she
stammered.
“Shari—take my picture!” I insisted. “Look at us! We couldn’t be any worse
off—could we?”
She nodded in agreement. Then, with a sigh, she raised the camera to her eye
again. It felt so heavy in her skinny arms, she had to hold it up with both hands.
“Here goes,” she said softly. “I hope it shows you normal again, Greg.”
She snapped the picture. The flash made me blink.
A second later, the white square slid out from the front of the camera. She
carried
it over to the bed and dropped lightly down beside me.
“Let’s see it!” I cried, eagerly grabbing for it.
“Careful!” Shari warned. “If you fall over, you’ll crush me!”
I gasped. She was right. Sitting next to me could be extremely dangerous.
“Maybe you’d better stand up,” I suggested.
She climbed to her feet, swaying because she wasn’t used to being so light. “It’s
starting to develop,” she announced.
She held the snapshot in front of me so we could both watch it. The yellow filled
in first. I squinted to see if I could make out my face.
Was it fat in the photo? Or back to normal?
The yellow was too pale. I couldn’t see my face at all.
Shari and I both were frozen there, staring at the small square. Not moving a
muscle. Not blinking. Watching it darken.
And suddenly, I could see myself.
My huge blobby face. My round, balloon body.
55
Still enormous. Still enormously fat.
“Noooooooo!” I let out a long cry of horror. “Noooooooo! I want to be changed
back!”
Shari was shaking her tiny head sadly, still staring at the darkening photo.
“What’s that on your face?” she cried. “Yuck!”
I grabbed the snapshot from her and held it close. “Oh, no!” I groaned. “My
skin—it’s all scaly. I look like an alligator or something!”
Shari grabbed back the photo and studied it. “The scaly stuff is on your arms,
too,” she said. “It looks like reptile skin or something.”
And as she said that, I started to itch.
I glanced down and saw red scales covering my arms. Itchy red patches. I started
to scratch. But the scratching made the scales itch even more.
My skin flaked off under my fingernails.
“Oh, yuck!” I moaned. “It itches so bad!”
I scratched my arms. Then I scratched my face. More dry skin peeled off as I
scratched. Chunks of skin.
Shari took a step back. She let the new photo fall to the carpet. “Oh, this is so
horrible!” she declared. “You’re still huge—and now all your skin is cracking
off!”
“Ohh! My back itches so bad!” I wailed. “But I can’t reach it.”
“I’m not going to scratch it for you!” Shari declared. “It—it’s too gross!”
I pulled a chunk of scaly, red skin off the back of my hand. “Do you want me to
take a new picture of you?” I asked Shari. “Maybe you’ll have better luck.”
“No! No way!” she cried. She took another few steps back. “No new picture. It
will only make things worse.”
Her face twisted in disgust. She swallowed hard. “I’m sorry, Greg,” she choked
out. “But you look so gross, I think I’m going to be sick.”
I tried to scratch the back of my neck. But my arms were too fat. I couldn’t reach
back there.
I rubbed my forehead. A big chunk of skin dropped off and bounced on the
carpet.
“Let’s just rip up the photos!” Shari declared.
“Huh?” I gaped at her.
She bent to pick up the scaly new picture of me. “Let’s rip them all up,” she
urged. “I’ll bet as soon as we rip them up, our bodies will return to normal.”
I stopped my frantic scratching for a moment. “Do you think so? Do you think
that’s all we have to do?”
“Maybe,” Shari replied. “It’s worth a try—don’t you think?”
I pulled the first two photos from my pocket. The negative of Shari and the first
fat photo of me.
“I’ll rip these two up,” I said. “You tear that one. We’ll see what happens.”
We both held the photos up. I started to tear mine—then stopped.
“Maybe if we rip them up, we’ll disappear completely!” I exclaimed.
Shari and I stared at each other. Our hands stayed in the air, ready to tear the
snapshots to pieces.
56
Should we do it?
57
24
“No!” Shari cried. “Don’t do it!”
We both lowered the snapshots.
“You’re right,” I said. My whole body was shaking. “It’s too dangerous.”
“If we tear the photos to pieces, we might be torn to pieces, too,” Shari said. “Or
we might disappear completely and never come back.”
I shuddered. “Let’s not talk about what might happen to us,” I moaned. “Look at
us. What could be worse?”
“A lot of things,” Shari sighed. “We’ll think of something to save ourselves,
Greg. We just have to think positive.”
I stared at her. “What did you say?”
“I said, think positive,” she repeated.
Think positive.
“Shari—you just gave me a really good idea!”
I cried.
* * *
We carried the snapshots to Kramer’s, the photo store where my brother works.
It wasn’t easy to walk there. I had to stop to catch my breath every few steps.
And I had to scratch my scaly, peeling skin. And I had to hold on to Shari to
keep the
wind from blowing her away.
The walk was only about eight blocks. But it took us more than an hour.
When we finally stepped inside the store, my heart sank to my knees. I didn’t see
Terry.
“He’s in the developing lab,” Mr. Kramer told me. He kept staring at Shari and
me. I guess we looked pretty weird. A stick figure and an elephant.
I pulled Shari to the lab in the back of the store and knocked on the door. You
can’t just open the door and walk into the developing lab. If you let in the light,
you
destroy the film in there.
We waited about five minutes. Then Terry came out. At first, he didn’t recognize
me. I think he forgot that I had put on four hundred pounds in the past few days.
“Yuck. What happened to your skin, Greg?” he demanded, making a disgusted
face. “Have you got a rash or something?”
“I don’t know,” I replied glumly. “Can you do me a favor, Terry?”
He shrugged. “What’s the favor?”
I held up the first two snapshots. The negative of Shari, and the positive of me
weighing a ton. “Can you reverse these for us?” I asked.
58
He squinted at the two squares for a long while. “I don’t get you,” he said finally.
I sighed. “Can you take the negative and make a positive of it? And can you take
the positive and make a negative?”
Shari let out a sharp cry. She realized what my plan was.
Maybe if we reversed the pictures, it would reverse our bodies.
Terry would make a positive of Shari’s negative, and she’d grow back to her
normal size. Then he’d make a negative of my picture, and I’d shrink the way
Shari
had.
It seemed to make sense. Was it worth a try?
Definitely.
Terry took the two snapshots. He studied them closely. He scratched his head. “I
guess I could do it,” he said. “But I’m really busy in there. When do you need
it?”
“NOW!” Shari and I both cried.
Terry stared at us, then down at the two photos.
I scratched the back of my neck. My arms were so fat, I could barely lift them
that high. In a few hours, I knew, I’d be too heavy to walk. Someone would have
to
wheel me around in a wheelbarrow. No—make that two wheelbarrows!
“Please!” I begged.
“I just don’t have time,” Terry said.
“I’ll give you my allowance for the next two months!” I cried.
“Okay. I guess I can find the time. It’s a deal,” Terry replied. “Wait out here.”
He disappeared into the lab. We stood outside the door and waited.
And waited.
And waited.
The longest half hour of my life.
Mr. Kramer kept staring back at us from the front counter. Shari and I tried to
ignore him.
I wanted to sit down. Carrying so much weight made my feet hurt. But I was
afraid if I took a seat, I’d break it. And I wouldn’t be able to get back up.
So Shari and I stood outside the door to the lab. And thought about this new
plan.
Would it work? Would reversing the photos reverse us?
Finally, the door swung open and Terry stepped out. “Here,” he grunted. He
handed me the new prints. “Don’t forget what you said about your allowance.”
“I won’t,” I promised. “Thanks, Terry.”
I gazed at the new prints. Terry had done it right. A positive of Shari, smiling
into
the camera. A negative of me, weighing four hundred pounds.
“Now, get lost,” Terry said, glancing up to the front desk. “Go ahead. Beat it.
Before you make me lose my job.”
I took Shari’s hand and started to pull her to the front of the store.
Poor Shari. She really did feel light as a feather. She looked even paler and
skinnier than when we came into the store. Her hand felt like brittle bones.
We stepped out of the store and stopped on the corner. I held the new prints up
so
we both could see them.
“Is it working?” I asked her. “Do you feel any different?”
59
“Not yet,” she replied softly.
“Neither do I,” I moaned.
We stared at the new prints. And waited.
We stood on that corner for at least half an hour. Staring and waiting.
Waiting to feel different. Waiting for our bodies to change.
But nothing happened.
We didn’t change at all.
“We’re doomed,” I murmured sadly. “Doomed.”
A chunk of skin peeled off my forehead and dropped to the sidewalk.
60
25
The next morning, I woke up early, before my alarm. I stretched and yawned.
Then I
turned and struggled to pull my huge body out of bed.
“Heave-ho!” I cried, straining every muscle.
And I went flying across the room!
“Oww!” I groaned as I hit the wall. I bounced off. Dropped to the floor. Bounced
up again.
“What’s going on?” I cried out loud.
And scrambled to the mirror. And stared at the reflection of my old face. My old
body.
No folds of sagging flesh. No puffed-out cheeks or bulging balloon of a belly.
Me!
I was back!
I squeezed my arms. I rubbed my face. I pulled my hair.
I felt so happy to see myself!
I leaped onto the bed and started jumping up and down, tossing up my arms, and
whooping and cheering at the top of my lungs.
“It worked! It worked!”
Reversing the photo had reversed me!
“Yaaaaay!” I let out a cheer for myself.
Mom and Dad burst into the room, still in their bathrobes. Frightened
expressions
on their faces. “Greg—what’s wrong?”
And then they both froze with bulging eyes and opened mouths.
Mom uttered a squeak of surprise. Dad goggled at me in shocked silence.
“You—you’re you again!” Mom stammered finally.
“You—you—you—” Dad struggled to say something, but he couldn’t. He
pointed a finger at me and stuttered.
And then they both rushed over and wrapped me in a tight hug.
“I knew it was something you ate,” Mom said happily. “Some kind of food
poisoning.”
“Just an allergic reaction,” Dad added, finally able to speak. “I knew you’d be
fine in a day or two.”
“We knew you’d be fine,” Mom declared.
“Yeah. Me, too,” I said.
What a lie!
“You were very good during all this trouble, Greg,” Mom said, wiping away a
tear from her eye with the back of her hand. “You had such a good attitude.”
61
“Yeah. Well… I always try to think positive,” I told her.
I gobbled down my breakfast and hurried next door to Shari’s house. As I ran up
to
the back door, she stepped out, grinning, waving her arms in the air in triumph.
“It worked! It worked, Greg!” she cried happily.
She came running toward me, her black hair flying behind her head, laughing
and
cheering. Back to normal.
Back to normal!
Whooping and shouting, the two of us did a wild “Back to Normal” dance in her
backyard.
When we stopped to catch our breath, Shari turned to me. “We’d better hurry.
We’re going to be late for school. I can’t wait to show everyone that I’m me
again.”
“Me, too!” I cried. “But wait right here. I have to get something in my room. I’ll
be right back.”
I turned and started jogging quickly across the grass to my house.
“What are you getting?” Shari called, following me.
“The camera,” I shouted back.
She ran faster. Caught up with me. Grabbed my shoulders and pulled me to a
stop. “Greg—the camera? Why do you need the camera?”
I narrowed my eyes at her. My expression turned serious. I lowered my voice to
a
whisper.
“For revenge,” I replied.
62
26
“Greg—don’t!” Shari pleaded.
I ignored her. I knew what I wanted to do. I knew what I had to do.
I ran into the house. Took the stairs two at a time up to my room. Pulled the
camera from its hiding place. And hurried back outside.
Shari was waiting for me on the sidewalk. “Greg—this is crazy,” she insisted.
“What are you going to do?”
I couldn’t stop an evil smile from spreading across my face. “I’m going to take
Mr. Saur’s picture,” I told her.
“NO!” she gasped. “Greg—you can’t!”
“Watch me,” I replied, still grinning.
“But—but—but—” she sputtered.
I started walking toward school, taking long strides. I gripped the camera tightly
in both hands.
“Greg—something terrible will happen!” Shari protested.
“I know,” I said, unable to stop grinning. “Old Sourball deserves it.”
“But, Greg—” She tried to stop me. But I jogged faster, moving away from her.
“He deserves it,” I repeated. “He refused to believe a true story. He called me a
liar in front of the whole class. And he gave me an F. An F for a really good
report.”
“But, Greg—” Shari started.
I didn’t let her get a word in. I was too worked up. The closer we came to school,
the more excited I got about my revenge plan.
“He’s going to ruin my whole summer,” I continued. “And he’s wrong, wrong,
wrong! And then, when I got so huge, Sourball was really cruel. He made jokes
about
me in front of everyone. He embarrassed me, Shari. He totally embarrassed me.”
“Greg—”
“He wanted to hurt my feelings,” I declared. I could see our school through the
trees in the next block. “He wanted to embarrass me in front of the whole class.
He
deserves what he’s going to get.”
“So what are you going to do?” she demanded breathlessly.
I stopped at the corner. “He dared me to prove that the camera is evil. So I’m
going to prove it—and get my revenge at the same time.”
* * *
I slipped into class just as the final bell rang. The other kids were already in their
seats, just getting quiet.
Mr. Saur had his back turned. He was writing something on the chalkboard.
63
I stepped up behind him. And waited for him to turn around.
My heart thudded in my chest. My hands were shaking so much, I could barely
hold the camera.
I took a deep breath and held it.
This was my big moment. My big chance.
“Mr. Saur—?” I called softly.
He spun around, as if I had shouted. “Greg!” he cried. “You’re looking very
slender.”
I ignored his words. I raised the camera to my eye.
Time for revenge, I thought.
“I brought the camera,” I told him. My voice came out high and shrill.
“Remember? The camera from my report? You asked me to prove that it’s evil.
So
here goes!”
I centered his startled face in the viewfinder.
I raised my finger over the shutter button.
He grabbed the camera from my hands.
“Oh, yes! The evil camera!” he declared, staring down at it. “Don’t waste it on
me. Let’s take everyone’s picture!”
“No!” I cried.
He waved his hand. “Donny and Brian—move in closer.” Then he shoved me in
front of him. “Get in the shot, Greg.”
“No!” I pleaded. “Mr. Saur—no!”
“Say cheese, everyone!”
The camera flashed.
The white square photo slid out.
Mr. Saur smiled at me. “I think I got everyone in class in the shot,” he said.
“Now
what’s going to happen?”
I swallowed hard. “Uh… we’ll see,” I replied. “We’ll see.”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.
64

GHOST CAMP
Goosebumps - 45
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
“You know I get bus sick, Harry,” Alex groaned.
“Alex, give me a break.” I shoved my brother against the window. “We’re
almost there. Don’t start thinking about getting bus sick now!”
The bus rumbled over the narrow road. I held onto the seat in front of me. I
gazed out the window.
Nothing but pine trees. They whirred past in a blur of green. Sunlight
bounced off the dusty glass of the window.
We’re almost to Camp Spirit Moon, I thought happily.
I couldn’t wait to get off the bus. My brother, Alex, and I were the only
passengers. It was kind of creepy.
The driver was hidden in front of a green curtain. I had glimpsed him as
Alex and I climbed on board. He had a nice smile, a great suntan, curly blond
hair, and a silver earring in one ear.
“Welcome, dudes!” he greeted us.
Once the long bus ride began, we didn’t see him or hear from him again.
Creepy.
Luckily, Alex and I get along okay. He’s a year younger than me. He’s
eleven. But he’s as tall as I am. Some people call us the Altman twins, even
though we’re not twins.
We both have straight black hair, dark brown eyes, and serious faces. Our
parents are always telling us to cheer up—even when we’re in really good
moods!
“I feel a little bus sick, Harry,” Alex complained.
I turned away from the window. Alex suddenly looked very yellow. His
chin trembled. A bad sign.
“Alex, pretend you’re not on a bus,” I told him. “Pretend you’re in a car.”
“But I get carsick, too,” he groaned.
“Forget the car,” I said. Bad idea. Alex can get carsick when Mom backs
down the driveway!
It’s really a bad-news habit of his. His face turns a sick yellow. He starts to
shake. And then it gets kind of messy.
“You’ve got to hold on,” I told him. “We’ll be at camp soon. And then
you’ll be fine.”
He swallowed hard.
The bus bounced over a deep hole in the road. Alex and I bounced with it.
“I really feel sick,” Alex moaned.
“I know!” I cried. “Sing a song. That always cures you. Sing a song, Alex.
Sing it really loud. No one will hear. We’re the only ones on the bus.”
Alex loves to sing. He has a beautiful voice.
The music teacher at school says that Alex has perfect pitch. I’m not sure
what that means. But I know it’s a good thing.
Alex is serious about his singing. He’s in the chorus at school. Dad says
he’s going to find a voice teacher for Alex this fall.
I stared at my brother as the bus bounced again. His face was about as
yellow as a banana skin. Not a good sign.
“Go ahead—sing,” I urged him.
Alex’s chin trembled. He cleared his throat. Then he began to sing a Beatles
song we both really like.
His voice bounced every time the bus bumped. But he started to look better
as soon as he started to sing.
Pretty smart idea, Harry, I congratulated myself.
I watched the pine trees whir past in the sunlight and listened to Alex’s
song. He really does have an awesome voice.
Am I jealous?
Maybe a little.
But he can’t hit a tennis ball the way I can. And I can beat him in a swim
race every time. So it evens out.
Alex stopped singing. He shook his head unhappily. “I wish Mom and Dad
signed me up for the music camp.” He sighed.
“Alex, the summer is half over,” I reminded him. “How many times do we
have to go over this? Mom and Dad waited too long. It was too late.”
“I know,” Alex said, frowning. “But I wish—”
“Camp Spirit Moon was the only camp we could get into this late in the
summer,” I said. “Hey, look—!”
I spotted two deer outside the window, a tall one and a little baby one. They
were just standing there, staring at the bus as it sped by.
“Yeah. Cool. Deer,” Alex muttered. He rolled his eyes.
“Hey—lighten up,” I told him. My brother is so moody. Sometimes I just
want to shake him. “Camp Spirit Moon may be the coolest camp on earth,” I
said.
“Or it may be a dump,” Alex replied. He picked at some stuffing that poked
up from a hole in the bus seat.
“The music camp is so great.” He sighed. “They put on two musicals each
summer. That would have been so awesome!”
“Alex, forget about it,” I told him. “Let’s enjoy Camp Spirit Moon. We only
have a few weeks.”
The bus suddenly screeched to a stop.
Startled, I bounced forward, then back. I turned to the window, expecting to
see a camp out there. But all I could see were pine trees. And more pine trees.
“Camp Spirit Moon! Everybody out!” the driver called.
Everybody? It was just Alex and me!
The driver poked his blond head out from behind the curtain. He grinned at
us. “How was the ride, dudes?” he asked.
“Great,” I replied, stepping into the aisle. Alex didn’t say anything.
The driver climbed out. We followed him around to the side of the bus.
Bright sunlight made the tall grass sparkle all around us.
He leaned into a compartment and pulled out our bags and sleeping bags.
He set everything down on the grass.
“Uh… where’s the camp?” Alex asked.
I shielded my eyes with my hand and searched around. The narrow road
curved through a forest of pine trees as far as I could see.
“Right through there, dudes,” the driver said. He pointed to a dirt path that
cut through the trees. “It’s a real short walk. You can’t miss it.”
The driver shut the baggage compartment. He climbed back onto the bus.
“Have a great time!” he called.
The door shut. The bus roared away.
Alex and I squinted through the bright sunlight at the dirt path. I swung my
duffel bag over my shoulder. Then I tucked my sleeping bag under one arm.
“Shouldn’t the camp send someone out here to greet us?” Alex asked.
I shrugged. “You heard the driver. He said it’s a very short walk.”
“But still,” Alex argued. “Shouldn’t they send a counselor to meet us out
here on the road?”
“It’s not the first day of camp,” I reminded him. “It’s the middle of the
summer. Stop complaining about everything, Alex. Pick up your stuff, and let’s
get going. It’s hot out here!”
Sometimes I just have to be the big brother and order him around.
Otherwise, we won’t get anywhere!
He picked up his stuff, and I led the way to the path. Our sneakers crunched
over the dry red dirt as we made our way through the trees.
The driver hadn’t lied. We’d walked only two or three minutes when we
came to a small, grassy clearing. A wooden sign with red painted letters
proclaimed camp spirit moon. An arrow pointed to the right.
“See? We’re here!” I declared cheerfully.
We followed a short path up a low, sloping hill. Two brown rabbits scurried
past, nearly in front of our feet. Red and yellow wildflowers swayed along the
side of the hill.
When we reached the top, we could see the camp.
“It looks like a real camp!” I exclaimed.
I could see rows of little white cabins stretching in front of a round blue
lake. Several canoes were tied to a wooden dock that stuck out into the lake.
A large stone building stood off to the side. Probably the mess hall or the
meeting lodge. A round dirt area near the woods had benches around it. For
campfires, I guessed.
“Hey, Harry—they have a baseball diamond and a soccer field,” Alex said,
pointing.
“Excellent!” I cried.
I saw a row of round red-and-white targets at the edge of the trees. “Wow!
They have archery, too,” I told Alex. I love archery. I’m pretty good at it.
I shifted the heavy duffel bag on my shoulder. We started down the hill to
the camp.
We both stopped halfway down the hill. And stared at each other.
“Do you notice anything weird?” Alex asked.
I nodded. “Yeah. I do.”
I noticed something very weird. Something that made my throat tighten and
my stomach suddenly feel heavy with dread.
The camp was empty.
No one there.
2
“Where is everyone?” I asked, moving my eyes from cabin to cabin. No one in
sight.
I squinted at the lake behind the cabins. Two small, dark birds glided low
over the sparkling water. No one swimming there.
I turned to the woods that surrounded the camp. The afternoon sun had
begun to lower itself over the pine trees. No sign of any campers in the woods.
“Maybe we’re in the wrong place,” Alex said softly.
“Huh? Wrong place?” I pointed to the sign. “How can we be in the wrong
place? It says Camp Spirit Moon—doesn’t it?”
“Maybe they all went on a field trip or something,” Alex suggested.
I rolled my eyes. “Don’t you know anything about camp?” I snapped. “You
don’t go on field trips. There’s nowhere to go!”
“You don’t have to shout!” Alex whined.
“Then stop saying such stupid things!” I replied angrily. “We’re all alone in
the woods in an empty camp. We’ve got to think clearly.”
“Maybe they’re all in that big stone building over there,” Alex suggested.
“Let’s go check it out.”
I didn’t see any signs of life there. Nothing moved. The whole camp was as
still as a photograph.
“Yeah. Come on,” I told Alex. “We might as well check it out.”
We were still about halfway down the hill, following the path through the
tangles of pine trees—when a loud cry made us both stop and gasp in surprise.
“Yo! Hey! Wait up!”
A red-haired boy, in white tennis shorts and a white T-shirt, appeared beside
us. I guessed he was sixteen or seventeen.
“Hey—where did you come from?” I cried. He really startled me. One
second Alex and I were alone. The next second this red-haired guy was standing
there, grinning at us.
He pointed to the woods. “I was gathering firewood,” he explained. “I lost
track of the time.”
“Are you a counselor?” I asked.
He wiped sweat off his forehead with the front of his T-shirt. “Yes. My
name is Chris. You’re Harry and you’re Alex—right?”
Alex and I nodded.
“I’m sorry I’m late,” Chris apologized. “You weren’t worried, were you?”
“Of course not,” I replied quickly.
“Harry was a little scared. But I wasn’t,” Alex said. Sometimes Alex can
really be a pain.
“Where is everyone?” I asked Chris. “We didn’t see any campers, or
counselors, or anyone.”
“They all left,” Chris replied. He shook his head sadly. When he turned
back to Alex and me, I saw the frightened expression on his face.
“The three of us—we’re all alone out here,” he said in a trembling voice.
3
“Huh? They left?” Alex cried shrilly. “But—but—where did they go?”
“We can’t be all alone!” I cried. “The woods—”
A smile spread over Chris’ freckled face. Then he burst out laughing.
“Sorry, guys. I can’t keep a straight face.” He put his arms around our shoulders
and led us toward the camp. “I’m just joking.”
“Excuse me? That was a joke?” I demanded. I was feeling very confused.
“It’s a Camp Spirit Moon joke,” Chris explained, still grinning. “We play it
on all the new campers. Everyone hides in the woods when the new campers
arrive at camp. Then a counselor tells them that the campers all ran away. That
they’re all alone.”
“Ha-ha. Very funny joke,” I said sarcastically.
“You always try to scare the new campers?” Alex asked.
Chris nodded. “Yeah. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. We have a lot of
great traditions here. You’ll see. Tonight at the campfire—”
He stopped when a big black-haired man—also dressed in white—came
lumbering across the grass toward us. “Yo!” the man called in a booming, deep
voice.
“This is Uncle Marv,” Chris whispered. “He runs the camp.”
“Yo!” Uncle Marv repeated as he stepped up to us. “Harry, what’s up?” He
slapped me a high five that nearly knocked me into the trees.
Uncle Marv grinned down at Alex and me. He was so huge—he reminded
me of a big grizzly bear at the zoo back home.
He had long, greasy black hair that fell wildly over his face. Tiny, round
blue eyes—like marbles—under bushy black eyebrows.
His arms bulged out from under his T-shirt. Powerful arms like a wrestler’s.
His neck was as wide as a tree trunk!
He reached down and shook Alex’s hand. I heard a loud crunch and saw
Alex gasp in pain.
“Good firm handshake, son,” Uncle Marv told Alex. He turned to me. “Did
Chris play our little ‘Alone in the Woods’ joke on you guys?” His voice boomed
so loud, I wanted to cover my ears.
Does Uncle Marv ever whisper? I wondered.
“Yeah. He fooled us,” I confessed. “I really thought there was no one here.”
Uncle Marv’s tiny blue eyes sparkled. “It’s one of our oldest traditions,” he
said, grinning. What a grin! It looked to me as if he had at least six rows of teeth!
“Before I take you to your cabin, I want to teach you the Camp Spirit Moon
greeting,” Uncle Marv said. “Chris and I will show it to you.”
They stood facing each other.
“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Uncle Marv bellowed.
“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Chris boomed back.
Then they gave each other a left-handed salute, placing the hand on the
nose, then swinging it straight out in the air.
“That’s how Camp Spirit Moon campers greet each other,” Uncle Marv told
us. He pushed Alex and me together. “You two try it.”
I don’t know about you, but this kind of thing embarrasses me. I don’t like
funny greetings and salutes. It makes me feel like a jerk.
But I had just arrived at camp. And I didn’t want Uncle Marv to think I was
a bad sport. So I stood in front of my brother. “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” I shouted.
And I gave Alex a sharp nose salute.
“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Alex showed a lot more enthusiasm than I did. He
likes this kind of thing. He flashed me a sharp salute.
Uncle Marv tossed back his head in a loud, bellowing laugh. “Very good,
guys! I think you’re both going to be great Camp Spirit Moon campers.”
He winked at Chris. “Of course, the campfire tonight is the real test.”
Chris nodded, grinning.
“The campfire tonight?” I asked. “A test?”
Uncle Marv patted my shoulder. “Don’t worry about it, Harry.”
Something about the way he said that made me worry a lot.
“All new campers come to a Welcoming Camp-fire,” Chris explained. “It’s
a chance to learn our Camp Spirit Moon traditions.”
“Don’t tell them any more about it,” Uncle Marv told Chris sharply. “We
want them to be surprised—don’t we?”
“Surprised—?” I choked out.
Why did I suddenly have such a bad feeling? Why did my throat tighten up
again? Why did I have a fluttering feeling in my chest?
“Do we sing camp songs at the Welcoming Campfire?” Alex asked. “I’m
really into singing. I take voice lessons back home and—”
“Don’t worry. You’ll sing. Plenty,” Uncle Marv interrupted in a low, almost
menacing voice.
I caught the cold look in his tiny eyes—cold as blue ice. And I felt a shiver
roll down my back.
He’s trying to scare us, I thought. It’s all a joke. He’s having fun with us. He
always tries to scare new campers. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition.
“I think you boys will enjoy the campfire tonight,” Uncle Marv boomed. “If
you survive it!”
He and Chris shared a laugh.
“Catch you later,” Chris said. He gave Alex and me a nose salute and
vanished into the woods.
“This will be your bunk,” Uncle Marv announced. He pulled open the
screen door of a tiny white cabin. “Whoa!” He nearly pulled the door off its
hinges.
Alex and I dragged our duffels and sleeping bags into the cabin. I saw bunk
beds against three of the walls. Narrow wooden chests of drawers. Cubbyholes
for storing things.
The walls were white. A light dangling from the ceiling cast a bright glow.
The afternoon sun sent orange rays through a small window above one of the
bunk beds.
Not bad, I thought.
“That bunk is free,” Uncle Marv told us, pointing to the bed against the
window. “You can decide who gets the top and who gets the bottom.”
“I need the bottom,” Alex said quickly. “I toss and turn a lot at night.”
“And he sings in his sleep,” I told Uncle Marv. “Do you believe it? Alex is
so into singing, he doesn’t even stop when he’s sleeping!”
“You will have to try out for the talent show,” Uncle Marv told Alex. And
then he repeated in a low voice, “If you survive tonight.” He laughed.
Why did he keep saying that?
He’s kidding, I reminded myself. Uncle Marv is just kidding.
“The boys’ cabins are on the left,” Uncle Marv told us. “And the girls’
cabins are on the right. We all use the lodge and mess hall. It’s that big stone
building near the woods.”
“Should we unpack now?” Alex asked.
Uncle Marv pushed back his greasy black hair. “Yes. Use any cubbies that
are empty. You’d better hurry, guys. The rest of the campers will be back from
the woods soon with firewood. It will be time for our campfire.”
He gave us a “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” and a sharp nose salute.
Then he turned and lumbered away. The screen door slammed hard behind
him.
“Fun guy,” I muttered.
“He’s kind of scary,” Alex admitted.
“He’s just joking,” I said. “All summer camps try to terrify the new
campers. I think.” I dragged my duffel bag over to the bed.
“But it’s all in fun. There’s nothing to be scared about, Alex,” I told my
brother. “Nothing at all.”
I tossed my sleeping bag into the corner. Then I started toward the low
dresser to see if I could find an empty drawer.
“Whoa—!” I cried out as my sneaker stuck on something.
I peered down.
A blue puddle.
My sneaker had landed in a sticky blue puddle.
“Hey—” I tugged my sneaker out. The blue liquid was thick. It stuck to the
bottom and sides of my shoe.
I glanced around the room.
And saw more blue puddles. A sticky blue puddle in front of every bed.
“What’s going on here? What is this stuff?” I cried.
4
Alex had his bag open and was pulling stuff out and spreading it on the bottom
bed. “What’s your problem, Harry?” he called without turning around.
“It’s some kind of blue slime,” I replied. “Check it out. There are puddles
all over the floor.”
“Big deal,” Alex muttered. He turned and glanced at the blue liquid stuck to
my sneaker. “It’s probably a camp tradition,” he joked.
I didn’t think it was funny. “Yuck!” I exclaimed. I reached down and poked
my finger into the tiny, round puddle.
So cold!
The blue slime felt freezing cold.
Startled, I pulled my hand away. The cold swept up my arm. I shook my
hand hard. Then I rubbed it, trying to warm it.
“Weird,” I muttered.
Of course, everything got a lot weirder. In a hurry.
“Campfire time!”
Uncle Marv’s cry through the screen door shook our cabin.
Alex and I spun to face the door. It had taken us forever to unpack our stuff.
To my surprise, the sun had lowered. The sky outside the door was evening gray.
“Everyone is waiting,” Uncle Marv announced. A gleeful smile spread over
his face. His tiny eyes practically disappeared in the smile. “We all love the
Welcoming Campfire.”
Alex and I followed him outside. I took a deep breath. The air smelled fresh
and piney.
“Wow!” Alex cried out.
The campfire was already blazing. Orange and yellow flames leaped up to
the gray sky.
We followed Uncle Marv to the round clearing where the fire had been
built. And saw the other campers and counselors for the first time.
They sat around the fire, all facing us. Watching us.
“They’re all dressed alike!” I exclaimed.
“The camp uniform,” Uncle Marv said. “I’ll get you and Alex your camp
uniforms tonight after the campfire.”
As Alex and I neared the circle, the campers and counselors rose to their
feet. A deafening “YOHHHHHHHHHH, SPIRITS!” shook the trees. Then a
hundred left-handed nose salutes greeted us.
Alex and I returned the greeting.
Chris, the red-haired counselor, appeared beside us. “Welcome, guys,” he
said. “We’re going to roast hot dogs on the fire before the campfire activities
begin. So grab a stick and a hot dog, and join in.”
The other kids were lining up in front of a long food table. I saw a huge
platter of raw hot dogs in the center of the table.
As I hurried to get in line, several kids said hi to me.
“You’re in my cabin,” a tall boy with curly blond hair said. “It’s the best
cabin!”
“Cabin number seven rules!” a girl shouted.
“This is an awesome camp,” the kid in front of me turned to say. “You’re
going to have a great time, Harry.”
They seemed to be really nice kids. Up ahead, a boy and a girl were having
a playful shoving match, trying to knock each other out of line. Other kids began
cheering them on.
The fire crackled behind me. The orange light from its flames danced over
everyone’s white shorts and shirts.
I felt a little weird, not being dressed in white.
I was wearing an olive-green T-shirt and faded denim cutoffs. I wondered if
Alex felt weird, too.
I turned and searched for him in the line. He was behind me, talking
excitedly to a short blond boy. I felt glad that Alex had found a friend so fast.
Two counselors handed out the hot dogs. I suddenly realized I was starving.
Mom had packed sandwiches for Alex and me to eat on the bus. But we were too
excited and nervous to eat them.
I took the hot dog and turned to the crackling fire. Several kids were
already huddled around the fire, poking their hot dogs on long sticks into the
flames.
Where do I get a stick? I asked myself, glancing around.
“The sticks are over there,” a girl’s voice called from behind me—as if she
had read my mind.
I turned and saw a girl about my age, dressed in white, of course. She was
very pretty, with dark eyes and shiny black hair, pulled back in a ponytail that
fell down her back. Her skin was so pale, her dark eyes appeared to glow.
She smiled at me. “New kids never know where to find the sticks,” she
said. She led the way to a pile of sticks leaning against a tall pine tree. She
picked up two of them and handed one to me.
“Your name is Harry, right?” she asked. She had a deep, husky voice for a
girl. Like she was whispering all the time.
“Yeah. Harry Altman,” I told her.
I suddenly felt very shy. I don’t know why. I turned away from her and
shoved the hot dog onto the end of the stick.
“My name is Lucy,” she said, making her way to the circle of kids around
the fire.
I followed her. The kids’ faces were all flickering orange and yellow in the
firelight. The aroma of roasting hot dogs made me feel even hungrier.
Four girls were huddled together, laughing about something. I saw a boy
eating his roasted hot dog right off the stick.
“Gross,” Lucy said, making a disgusted face. “Let’s go over here.”
She led me to the other side of the campfire. Something popped in the fire.
It sounded like a firecracker exploding. We both jumped. Lucy laughed.
We sat down on the grass, raised the long sticks, and poked our hot dogs
into the flames. The fire was roaring now. I could feel its heat on my face.
“I like mine really black,” Lucy said. She turned her stick and pushed it
deeper into the flames. “I just love that burnt taste. How about you?”
I opened my mouth to answer her—but my hot dog fell off the stick. “Oh
no!” I cried. I watched it fall into the sizzling, red-hot blanket of flames.
I turned to Lucy. And to my surprise—to my horror—she leaned forward.
Stuck her hand deep into the fire.
Grabbed my hot dog from the burning embers and lifted it out.
5
I jumped to my feet. “Your hand!” I shrieked.
Yellow flames leaped over her hand and up her arm.
She handed me the hot dog. “Here,” she said calmly.
“But your hand!” I cried again, gaping in horror.
The flames slowly burned low on her skin. She glanced down at her hand.
Confused. As if she didn’t know why I was in such a panic.
“Oh! Hey—!” she finally cried. Her dark eyes grew wide. “Ow! That was
hot!” she exclaimed.
She shook her hand hard. Shook it until the flames went out.
Then she laughed. “At least I rescued your poor hot dog. Hope you like
yours burned!”
“But—but—but—” I sputtered. I stared at her hand and arm. The flames
had spread all over her skin. But I couldn’t see any burns. Not a mark.
“The buns are over there,” she said. “You want some potato chips?”
I kept staring at her hand. “Should we find the nurse?” I asked.
She rubbed her arm and wrist. “No. I’m fine. Really.” She wiggled her
fingers. “See?”
“But the fire—”
“Come on, Harry.” She pulled me back to the food table. “It’s almost time
for the campfire activities to start.”
I ran into Alex at the food table. He was still hanging out with the short
blond boy.
“I made a friend already,” Alex told me. He had a mouthful of potato chips.
“His name is Elvis. Do you believe it? Elvis McGraw. He’s in our cabin.”
“Cool,” I muttered. I was still thinking about the flames rolling up and
down Lucy’s arm.
“This is a great camp,” Alex declared. “Elvis and I are going to try out for
the talent show and the musical.”
“Cool,” I repeated.
I grabbed a hot dog bun and tossed some potato chips on my plate. Then I
searched for Lucy. I saw her talking to a group of girls by the fire.
“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” a deep voice bellowed. No way anyone could
mistake that cry. It had to be Uncle Marv.
“Places around the council fire, everyone!” he ordered. “Hurry—places,
everyone!”
Holding plates and cans of soda, everyone scurried to form a circle around
the fire. The girls all sat together and the boys all sat together. I guessed each
cabin had its own place.
Uncle Marv led Alex and me to a spot in the middle.
“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” he cried again, so loud the fire trembled!
Everyone repeated the cry and gave the salute.
“We’ll begin by singing our camp song,” Uncle Marv announced.
Everyone stood up. Uncle Marv started singing, and everyone joined in.
I tried to sing along. But of course I didn’t know the words. Or the tune.
The song kept repeating the line, “We have the spirit—and the spirit has
us.”
I didn’t really understand it. But I thought it was pretty cool.
It was a long song. It had a lot of verses. And it always came back to: “We
have the spirit—and the spirit has us.”
Alex was singing at the top of his lungs. What a show-off! He didn’t know
the words, either. But he was faking it. And singing as loud as he could.
Alex is so crazy about his beautiful singing voice and his perfect pitch. He
has to show it off whenever he can.
I gazed past my brother. His new friend, Elvis, had his head tossed back and
his mouth wide open. He was singing at the top of his lungs, too.
I think Alex and Elvis were having some kind of contest. Seeing who could
sing the leaves off the trees!
The only problem? Elvis was a terrible singer!
He had a high, whiny voice. And his notes were all coming out sour.
As my dad would say, “He couldn’t carry a tune in a wheelbarrow!”
I wanted to cover my ears. But I was trying to sing along, too.
It wasn’t easy with the two of them beside me. Alex sang so loud, I could
see the veins in his neck pulsing. Elvis tried to drown him out with his sour, offkey wails.
My face felt hot.
At first, I thought it was the heat from the blazing campfire. But then I
realized I was blushing.
I felt so embarrassed by Alex. Showing off like that on his first night at
camp.
Uncle Marv wasn’t watching. He had wandered over to the girls’side of the
fire, singing as he walked.
I slipped back, away from the fire.
I felt too embarrassed to stay there. I’ll sneak back into place as soon as the
song is over, I decided.
I just couldn’t sit there and watch my brother act like a total jerk.
The camp song continued. “We have the spirit—and the spirit has us,”
everyone sang.
Doesn’t the song ever end? I wondered. I backed away, into the trees. It felt
a lot cooler as soon as I moved away from the fire.
Even back here, I could hear Alex singing his heart out.
I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself. I’ve got to tell him it isn’t cool to
show off like that.
“Ohh!” I let out a sharp cry as I felt a tap on my shoulder.
Someone grabbed me from behind.
“Hey—!” I spun around to face the trees. Squinted into the darkness.
“Lucy! What are you doing back here?” I gasped.
“Help me, Harry,” she pleaded in a whisper. “You’ve got to help me.”
6
A chill ran down my back. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered.
She opened her mouth to reply. But Uncle Marv’s booming voice
interrupted.
“Hey, you two!” the camp director shouted. “Harry! Lucy! No sneaking off
into the woods!”
The campers all burst out laughing. I could feel my face turning hot again.
I’m one of those kids who blushes very easily. I hate it—but what can I do?
Everyone stared at Lucy and me as we made our way back to the fire. Alex
and Elvis were slapping high fives and laughing at us.
Uncle Marv kept his eyes on me as I trudged back. “I’m glad you make
friends so easily, Harry,” he boomed. And all the campers started laughing at
Lucy and me again.
I felt so embarrassed, I wanted to shrivel up and disappear.
But I was also worried about Lucy.
Had she followed me to the woods? Why?
Why did she ask me to help her?
I sat down between Lucy and Elvis. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered.
She just shook her head. She didn’t look at me.
“Now I’m going to tell the two ghost stories,” Uncle Marv announced.
To my surprise, some kids gasped. Everyone suddenly became silent.
The crackling of the fire seemed to get louder. Behind the pop and crack of
the darting flames, I heard the steady whisper of wind through the pine trees.
I felt a chill on the back of my neck.
Just a cool breeze, I told myself.
Why did everyone suddenly look so solemn? So frightened?
“The two ghost stories of Camp Spirit Moon have been told from
generation to generation,” Uncle Marv began. “They are tales that will be told
for all time, for as long as dark legends are told.”
Across the fire, I saw a couple of kids shiver.
Everyone stared into the fire. Their faces were set. Grim. Frightened.
It’s only a ghost story, I told myself. Why is everyone acting so weird?
The campers must have heard these ghost stories already this summer. So
why do they look so terrified?
I snickered.
How can anyone be afraid of a silly camp ghost story?
I turned to Lucy. “What’s up with these kids?” I asked.
She narrowed her dark eyes at me. “Aren’t you afraid of ghosts?” she
whispered.
“Ghosts?” I snickered again. “Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts,” I told her.
“And ghost stories never scare us. Never!”
She leaned close to me. And whispered in my ear: “You might change your
mind—after tonight.”
7
The flames flickered, crackling up to the dark, starry sky. Uncle Marv leaned
into the orange firelight. His tiny, round eyes sparkled.
The woods suddenly became quiet. Even the wind stopped whispering.
The air felt cold on my back. I scooted closer to the campfire. I saw others
move closer, too. No one talked. All eyes were on Uncle Marv’s smiling face.
Then, in a low voice, he told the first ghost story….
A group of campers went into the woods for an overnight. They carried tents and
sleeping bags. They walked single file along a narrow dirt path that twisted
through the trees.
Their counselor’s name was John. He led them deeper and deeper into the
woods.
Dark clouds floated overhead. When the clouds covered the full moon, the
darkness swept over the campers. They walked close together, trying to see the
curving path.
Sometimes the clouds moved away, and the moonlight poured down on
them. The trees glowed, silvery and cold, like ghosts standing in the forest.
They sang songs at first. But as they moved deeper into the woods, their
voices became tiny and shrill, muffled by the trees.
They stopped singing and listened to the scrape of their footsteps and the
soft rustlings of night animals scampering through the weeds.
“When are we going to stop and set up camp?” a girl asked John.
“We have to go deeper into the woods,” John replied.
They kept walking. The air became colder. The trees bent and shivered
around them in a swirling breeze.
“Can we set up camp now, John?” a boy asked.
“No. Deeper,” John replied. “Deeper into the forest.”
The path ended. The campers had to make their way through the trees,
around thorny bushes, over a deep carpet of crackling dead leaves.
Owls hooted overhead. The campers heard the flutter of bat wings.
Creatures scratched and slithered around their feet.
“We’re really tired, John,” a boy complained. “Can we stop and set up the
tents?”
“Deeper into the woods,” John insisted. “An overnight is no fun unless you
are deep, deep in the woods.”
So they kept walking. Listening to the low hoots and moans of the night
animals. Watching the old trees bend and sway all around them.
Finally they stepped out into a smooth, wide clearing.
“Can we set up camp now, John?” the campers begged.
“Yes,” John agreed. “We are deep in the woods now. This is the perfect
place.”
The campers dropped all the bags and supplies in the middle of the clearing.
Silvery moonlight spilled all around them, making the smooth ground shimmer.
They pulled out the tents and started to unfold them.
But a strange sound made them all stop their work.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
“What was that?” a camper cried.
John shook his head. “Probably just the wind.”
They went back to the tents. They pushed tent poles into the soft, smooth
ground. They started to unfold the tents.
But the strange sound made them stop again.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
A chill of fear swept over the campers.
“What is that sound?” they asked.
“Maybe it’s some kind of animal,” John replied.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
“But it sounds so close!” a boy cried.
“It’s coming from right above us,” another boy said. “Or maybe beneath
us!”
“It’s just a noise,” John told them. “Don’t worry about it.”
So they set up the tents. And they spread sleeping bags inside the tents.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
They tried to ignore the sound. But it was so close. So close.
And such a strange—but familiar—sound.
What could it be? the campers wondered. What on earth makes a sound like
that?
Ka-thump ka-thump.
The campers couldn’t sleep. The noise was too loud, too frightening—too
near.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
They burrowed deep into their sleeping bags. They zipped themselves in
tight. They covered their ears.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
It didn’t help. They couldn’t escape the sound.
“John, we can’t sleep,” they complained.
“I can’t sleep, either,” John replied.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
“What should we do?” the campers asked the counselor.
John didn’t get a chance to answer.
They heard another Ka-thump ka-thump.
And then a deep voice growled: “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY
HEART?”
The ground shook.
The campers suddenly realized what the frightening sound was. And as the
ground rose up, they realized—too late—they had camped on the smooth skin of
a hideous monster.
“I guess we went too deep into the woods!” John cried.
His last words.
Ka-thump ka-thump.
The monster’s heartbeat.
And then its huge, hairy head lifted up. Its mouth pulled open. And it
swallowed John and the campers without even chewing.
And as they slid down the monster’s throat, the sound of the heartbeat grew
louder and louder.
Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-THUMP!
Uncle Marv shouted the last Ka-thump at the top of his lungs.
Some campers screamed. Some gazed at Uncle Marv in silence, their faces
tight with fear. Beside me, Lucy hugged herself, biting her bottom lip.
Uncle Marv smiled, his face flickering in the dancing orange flames.
Laughing, I turned to Elvis. “That’s a funny story!” I exclaimed.
Elvis narrowed his eyes at me. “Huh? Funny?”
“Yeah. It’s a very funny story,” I repeated.
Elvis stared hard at me. “But it’s true!” he said softly.
8
I laughed. “Yeah. For sure,” I said, rolling my eyes.
I expected Elvis to laugh. But he didn’t. The firelight flickered in his pale
blue eyes as he stared at me. Then he turned to talk to my brother.
A chill ran down my back. Why was he acting so weird?
Did he really think I’d believe a crazy story like that was true?
I’m twelve years old. I stopped believing in things like the Easter Bunny
and the Tooth Fairy a long time ago.
I turned to Lucy. She was still hugging herself, staring intently into the fire.
“Do you believe him?” I asked, motioning to Elvis. “Is he weird or what?”
Lucy stared straight ahead. She seemed so deep in thought, I don’t think she
heard me.
Finally she raised her head. She blinked. “What?”
“My brother’s new friend,” I said, pointing to Elvis again. “He said that
Uncle Marv’s story was true.”
Lucy nodded, but didn’t reply.
“I thought it was a funny story,” I said.
She picked up a twig and tossed it on the fire. I waited for her to say
something. But she seemed lost in thought again.
The flames of the campfire had died down. Sparkling red embers and
chunks of burning wood spread over the ground. Chris and another counselor
carried fresh logs into the meeting circle.
I watched them rebuild the fire. They piled armfuls of twigs and sticks onto
the burning embers. When the sticks burst into flames, the two counselors
lowered logs over them.
Then they stepped back, and Uncle Marv took his place in front of the fire.
He stood with his hands in the pockets of his white shorts. The full moon floated
behind his head, making his long black hair shine.
He smiled. “And now I will tell the second traditional story of Camp Spirit
Moon,” he announced.
Once again, the circle of campers grew silent. I leaned back, trying to get
my brother’s attention. But Alex was staring across the fire at Uncle Marv.
Alex probably thought the first ghost story was kind of dumb, I knew. He
hates ghost stories even more than I do. He thinks they’re silly baby stuff. And
so do I.
So what was Elvis’ problem?
Was he goofing? Just teasing me? Or was he trying to scare me?
Uncle Marv’s booming voice interrupted my thoughts. “This is a story we
tell every year at Camp Spirit Moon,” he said. “It’s the story of the Ghost
Camp.”
He lowered his deep voice nearly to a whisper, so that we all had to lean
closer to hear him. And in hushed tones, he told us the story of the Ghost Camp.
The story takes place at a camp very much like Camp Spirit Moon. On a warm
summer night, the campers and counselors met around a blazing council fire.
They roasted hot dogs and toasted marshmallows. They sang the camp
songs. One of the counselors played a guitar, and he led them in singing song
after song.
When they were tired of singing, the counselors took turns telling ghost
stories. And telling the legends of the camp, legends that had been passed on
from camper to camper for nearly a hundred years.
The evening grew late. The campfire had died low. The moon floated high
in the sky, a pale full moon.
The camp director stepped forward to end the council meeting.
Suddenly, darkness swept over the circle of campers.
They all looked up—and saw that the moon had been covered by a heavy
blanket of black clouds.
And swirls of fog came drifting over the camp. A cold, wet fog. Cloudy
gray at first. Then darkening.
And thickening.
Until the fog swept over the camp, billowing like black smoke.
Tumbling and swirling, the cold wet fog rolled over the dying campfire.
Rolled over the campers and counselors. Over the cabins and the lake and the
trees.
A choking fog, so thick and dark the campers couldn’t see each other.
Couldn’t see the fire. Or the ground. Or the moon in the sky.
The fog lingered for a short while, swirling and tossing, low over the
ground. Wet, so wet and silent.
It moved on just as silently.
Like smoke blown away.
The moonlight shone through. The grass sparkled as if a heavy dew had
settled.
The fire was out. Dark purple embers sizzled over the ground.
The fog swirled away. Swept over the trees. And vanished.
And the campers sat around the dead campfire. Their eyes blank. Their
arms limp at their sides.
Not moving. Not moving. Not moving.
Because they were no longer alive.
The fog had left a ghost camp in its wake.
The campers, the counselors, the camp director—they were all ghosts now.
All spirits. All ghosts. Every last one of them.
They climbed to their feet. And returned to their bunks.
They knew the ghost camp was their home now—forever!
With a smile, Uncle Marv stepped back from the fire.
I glanced around the circle. The faces were so solemn. No one smiled or
laughed.
It’s a pretty good story, I thought. Kind of scary.
But it doesn’t have much of an ending.
I turned to see what Alex thought.
And gasped when I saw the terrified expression on his face. “Alex—what?”
I cried, my voice cutting through the silence of the circle. “What’s wrong?”
He didn’t reply. His eyes were raised to the sky. He pointed up.
I gazed up too—and let out a cry of horror.
As a black, swirling fog came sweeping over the camp.
9
My mouth dropped open as I watched the fog roll closer. It darkened the ground
as it moved steadily toward us.
Darkened the trees. Darkened the sky.
This is crazy, I told myself.
This is impossible!
I scooted next to Alex. “It’s just a coincidence,” I told him.
He didn’t seem to hear me. He jumped to his feet. His whole body
trembled.
I stood up beside him. “It’s only fog,” I said, trying to sound calm. “It gets
foggy out here in the woods all the time.”
“Really?” Alex asked in a tiny voice.
The black smoky fog swirled over us.
“Of course,” I replied. “Hey—we don’t believe in ghosts, remember? We
don’t think ghost stories are scary.”
“But—but—” Alex stuttered. “Why is everyone staring at us?” he finally
choked out.
I turned and squinted through the thick fog.
Alex was right. All around the circle, the other campers had their eyes on
Alex and me. Their faces appeared to dim behind the curtain of dark mist.
“I—I don’t know why they’re watching us,” I whispered to my brother.
Fog billowed around us. I shivered. It felt cold against my skin.
“Harry—I don’t like this,” Alex whispered.
The fog was so thick now, I could barely see him, even though he stood
close beside me.
“I know we don’t believe in ghosts,” Alex said. “But I don’t like this. It—
it’s too creepy.”
From the other side of the circle, Uncle Marv’s voice broke the silence. “It’s
a beautiful fog tonight,” he said. “Let’s all stand up and sing the Camp Spirit
Moon song.”
Alex and I were already standing. The other campers and counselors
obediently climbed to their feet.
Their pale faces shimmered in and out of the fog.
I rubbed my arms. Cold and wet. I dried my face with the front of my Tshirt.
The fog grew even heavier and darker as Uncle Marv began to sing.
Everyone joined in. Beside me, Alex began to sing, quieter this time.
Our voices were muffled by the heavy mist. Even Uncle Marv’s booming
voice sounded smaller and far away.
I tried to sing too. But I didn’t know the words. And my own voice came
out choked and small.
As I stared into the swirling fog, the voices faded. Everyone sang, but the
sound sank into the fog.
The voices vanished. All of them. All except for Alex’s.
He seemed to be the only one still singing, his voice pure and soft beside
me in the dark mist.
And then Alex stopped singing, too.
The fog swept on. The darkness lifted.
Silvery moonlight washed down on us once again.
Alex and I gazed around in surprise.
No one else remained.
Alex and I were all alone. All alone in front of the dying fire.
10
I blinked. And blinked again.
I don’t know what I expected. Did I think they would all appear again?
Alex and I gazed across the circle in stunned silence.
They had vanished with the fog. The campers. The counselors. Uncle Marv.
A chill ran down my back. My skin still felt damp and cold from the heavy
mist.
“Wh-where—?” Alex choked out.
I swallowed hard.
A burned log crumbled into the purple embers. The soft thud startled me.
I jumped.
And then I started to laugh.
Alex squinted at me, studying me. “Harry—?”
“Don’t you see?” I told him. “It’s a joke.”
He squinted at me harder. “Huh?”
“It’s a camp joke,” I explained. “It’s a joke they probably always play on
new campers here.”
Alex twisted up his whole face. He was thinking about it. But I don’t think
he believed me.
“They all ran off into the woods,” I told him. “They hid behind the fog and
ran away. They were all in on the joke. I’ll bet they do it to every new kid.”
“But—the fog—” Alex choked out.
“I’ll bet the fog was a fake!” I exclaimed. “They probably have some kind
of smoke machine. To help them with the joke.”
Alex rubbed his chin. I could still see the fear in his eyes.
“They probably do this all the time,” I assured him. “Uncle Marv tells the
story. Then somebody turns on the smoke machine. The black smoke rolls over
the campfire circle. And everyone runs and hides.”
Alex turned and stared into the woods. “I don’t see anyone hiding back
there,” he said softly. “I don’t see anyone watching us.”
“I’ll bet they’re all back at the cabins,” I told him. “I’ll bet they’re waiting
for us. Waiting to see the looks on our faces.”
“Waiting to laugh at us for falling for their dumb joke,” Alex added.
“Let’s go!” I cried. I slapped him on the shoulder. Then I started running
across the wet grass toward the row of cabins.
Alex ran close behind. The moon sent a silvery path across the grass in
front of us.
Sure enough—as we came near the cabins, the campers all came running
out. They were laughing and hooting. Slapping each other high fives.
Enjoying their joke. A joke they play on new campers when the fog rolls in,
they told us.
I saw Lucy laughing along with a bunch of girls.
Elvis grabbed Alex and wrestled him playfully to the ground.
Everyone teased us and told us how scared we looked.
“We weren’t scared even for a second,” I lied. “Alex and I figured it out
before the fog cleared.”
That made everyone start laughing and cheering all over again.
“Owoooooooh!”
Some of the kids cupped their hands around their mouths and made ghost
howls.
“Owoooooooh!”
That led to more laughing and joking.
I didn’t mind the teasing. Not a bit.
I felt so relieved. My heart was still pounding like crazy. And my knees felt
kind of weak.
But I felt so happy that it was all a joke.
Every summer camp has its jokes, I told myself. And this is a pretty good
one.
But it didn’t fool me. Not for long, anyway.
“Lights Out in five minutes,” Uncle Marv’s booming command stopped the
fun. “Lights Out, campers!”
The kids all turned and scurried to their bunks.
I stared down the row of cabins, suddenly confused. Which one was ours?
“This way, Harry,” Alex said. He tugged me toward the third cabin down
the path. Alex has a better memory than I do for things like that.
Elvis and two other guys were already in the cabin when Alex and I came
in. They were getting changed for bed. The other guys introduced themselves.
Sam and Joey.
I made my way to the bunk bed and started to undress.
“Owoooooooh!” A ghostly howl made me jump.
I spun around and saw Joey grinning at me.
Everyone laughed. Me, too.
I like camp jokes, I thought. They’re mean. But they’re kind of fun.
I felt something soft and gooey under my bare foot. Yuck! I glanced down.
And saw that I had stepped in a fresh puddle of blue slime.
The cabin lights went out. But before they did, I saw blue puddles—fresh
blue puddles—all over the floor.
The cold blue stuff stuck to the bottom of my foot. I stumbled through the
dark cabin and found a towel to wipe it off.
What are these blue puddles? I asked myself as I climbed up to my top
bunk.
I glimpsed Joey and Sam in the bunk against the wall.
I gasped.
They stared back at me, their eyes shining like flashlights!
What is going on here? I wondered.
What are the sticky blue puddles all over the floor?
And why do Sam and Joey’s eyes glow like that in the dark?
I turned my face to the wall. I tried not to think about anything.
I had almost drifted to sleep—when I felt a cold, slimy hand sliding down
my arm.
11
“Huh?”
I shot straight up. Still feeling the cold, wet touch on my skin.
I stared at my brother. “Alex—you scared me to death!” I whispered. “What
do you want?”
He stood on his mattress, his dark eyes staring at me. “I can’t sleep,” he
moaned.
“Keep trying,” I told him sharply. “Why are your hands so cold?”
“I don’t know,” he replied. “It’s cold in here, I guess.”
“You’ll get used to it,” I said. “You always have trouble sleeping in new
places.”
I yawned. I waited for him to drop back onto the bottom bunk. But he didn’t
move.
“Harry, you don’t believe in ghosts—do you?” he whispered.
“Of course not,” I told him. “Don’t let a couple of silly stories creep you
out.”
“Yeah. Right,” he agreed. “Good night.”
I said good night. He disappeared back to his bed. I heard him tossing
around down there. He had a very squeaky mattress.
Poor guy, I thought. That dumb Ghost Camp joke with the fog really
messed him up.
He’ll be fine in the morning, I decided.
I turned and gazed across the dark cabin toward Joey and Sam’s bunk. Were
their eyes still glowing so strangely?
No.
Darkness there.
I started to turn away—then stopped.
And stared hard.
“Oh no!” I murmured out loud.
In the dim light, I could see Joey. Stretched out. Asleep.
Floating two feet above his mattress!
12
I scrambled to climb out of bed. My legs tangled in the blanket, and I nearly fell
on my head!
“Hey—what’s up?” I heard Alex whisper below me.
I ignored him. I swung myself around, and leaped to the floor.
“Ow!” I landed hard, twisting my ankle.
Pain shot up my leg. But I ignored it and hobbled to the door. I remembered
the light switch was somewhere over there.
I had to turn on the light.
I had to see for sure that I was right. That Joey slept floating in the air
above his bed.
“Harry—what’s wrong?” Alex called after me.
“What’s up? What time is it?” I heard Elvis groan sleepily from the bunk
against the other wall.
I pulled myself across the cabin. My hand fumbled against the wall until I
found the light switch.
I pushed it up.
The overhead light flashed on, flooding the tiny cabin in white light.
I raised my eyes to Joey’s bunk.
He lifted his head from the pillow and squinted down at me. “Harry—
what’s your problem?” he asked. He was sprawled on his stomach, on top of his
blanket.
Not floating in the air. Not floating.
Resting his head in his hands, yawning and staring down at me.
“Turn off the light!” Sam barked. “If Uncle Marv catches us with the light
on…”
“But—but—” I sputtered.
“Turn it off!” Elvis and Sam both insisted.
I clicked off the light.
“Sorry,” I muttered. “I thought I saw something.”
I felt like a jerk. Why did I think I saw Joey floating in the air?
I must be as creeped out as Alex, I decided. Now I’m seeing things!
I scolded myself and told myself to calm down.
You’re just nervous because it’s your first day in a new camp, I decided.
I started slowly across the cabin to my bed. Halfway there, I stepped in a
cold, sticky puddle of goo.
The next morning, Alex and I found our white Camp Spirit Moon uniforms—
white shorts and T-shirts—waiting for us at the foot of our beds.
Now we won’t stand out like sore thumbs, I thought happily.
Now we can really be part of Camp Spirit Moon.
I quickly forgot about my fears from the night before. I couldn’t wait for the
camp day to get started.
That afternoon, Alex tried out for the Camp Spirit Moon talent show.
I had to be at the soccer field. A bunch of us were supposed to practice
putting up tents. We were getting ready for an overnight in the woods.
But I stopped in front of the outdoor stage at the side of the lodge to listen
to Alex sing.
A counselor named Veronica, with long, copper-colored hair all the way
down her back, was in charge of the tryouts. I leaned against a tree and watched.
A lot of kids were trying out. I saw two guitar players, a boy with a
harmonica, a tap dancer, and two baton twirlers.
Veronica played a small upright piano at the front of the stage. She called
Alex up and asked him what song he wanted to sing.
He picked a Beatles song he likes. My brother doesn’t listen to any new
groups. He likes the Beatles and the Beach Boys—all the groups from the
sixties.
He’s the only eleven-year-old I know who listens to the oldies station. I feel
kind of sorry for him. It’s like he was born in the wrong time or something.
Veronica played a few notes on the piano, and Alex started to sing.
What a voice!
The other kids had all been laughing and talking and messing around. But
after Alex sang for a few seconds, they got real quiet. They huddled close to the
stage and listened.
He really sounded like a pro! I mean, he could probably sing with a band
and make a CD.
Even Veronica was amazed. I could see her lips form the word “Wow!” as
she played the piano for Alex.
When Alex finished singing, the kids all clapped and cheered. Elvis slapped
Alex a high five as he hopped off the small stage.
Veronica called Elvis up next. He told her he wanted to sing an Elvis song,
since he was named after Elvis Presley.
He cleared his throat and started to sing a song called “Heartbreak Hotel.”
Well… it really was a heartbreak—because Elvis couldn’t sing a single note
on key!
Veronica tried to play along with him. But I could see that she was having
trouble. I think she probably wanted to stop playing the piano and cover her
ears!
Elvis had a high, scratchy voice. And the notes came out really sour. Sour
enough to make your whole face pucker up.
The kids around the stage started grumbling and walking away.
Elvis had his eyes shut. He was so wrapped up in his song, he didn’t even
see them!
Doesn’t he know how bad he is? I wondered. Why does he want to enter a
talent show when he sounds like a squealing dog?
Elvis started to repeat the chorus. I decided I had to get away from there
before my eardrums popped.
I flashed Alex a thumbs-up and hurried to the soccer field.
Sam, Joey, and a bunch of other kids were already unfolding tents, getting
ready for tent-raising practice. Chris, the counselor, was in charge.
He waved to me. “Harry—unroll that tent over there,” he instructed. “Let’s
see how fast you can put it up.”
I picked up the tent. It was bundled tightly, no bigger than a backpack. I
turned it over in my hands. I’d never set up a tent before. I wasn’t even sure how
to unwrap it.
Chris saw me puzzling over it and walked over. “It’s easy,” he said.
He pulled two straps, and the nylon tent started to unfold. “See? Here are
the poles. Just stretch it out and prop it up.”
He handed the bundle back to me.
“Yeah. Easy,” I repeated.
“What’s that noise?” Joey asked, looking up from his tent.
I listened hard. “It’s Elvis singing,” I told them.
The sour notes floated over the soccer field from the stage.
Sam shook his head. “It sounds like an animal caught in a trap,” he said.
We all laughed.
Joey and Sam took off their sneakers and went barefoot. I took mine off,
too. The warm grass felt good under my feet.
I unfolded the tent and spread it out on the grass. I piled the tent poles to the
side.
The sun felt hot on the back of my neck. I slapped a mosquito on my arm.
I heard a shout and glanced up to see Sam and Joey wrestling around. They
weren’t fighting. They were just goofing.
They both picked up tent poles and started dueling with them, having a wild
sword fight. They were laughing and having fun.
But then Sam tripped over a tent.
He lost his balance. Stumbled forward. Fell hard.
I let out a scream as the tent pole went right through his foot.
13
My stomach lurched. I felt sick.
The pointed pole had pierced the top of Sam’s foot, nailing his foot to the
ground.
Joey gaped, openmouthed, his eyes wide with surprise.
With a gasp, I searched for Chris. I knew Sam needed help.
Where had Chris wandered off to?
“Sam—” I choked out. “I’ll get help. I’ll—”
But Sam didn’t cry out. He didn’t react at all. Didn’t even grimace.
He calmly reached down with both hands—and pulled the pole from his
foot.
I let out a groan. My foot ached! In sympathy, I guess.
Sam tossed the pole aside.
I stared down at his foot. No cut. No blood.
It wasn’t bleeding!
“Sam!” I cried. “Your foot. It’s not bleeding!”
He turned and shrugged. “It missed my toes,” he explained.
He dropped onto his knees and started propping up the tent.
I swallowed hard, waiting for my stomach to stop churning.
Missed his toes? I thought. Missed his toes?
I saw the pole sink right into his foot!
Or was I seeing things again?
For the rest of the afternoon, I tried not to think about it. I worked on the tent.
Once I got it spread out, it was easy to set up.
Chris had us fold and unfold them a few times. Then we had a race to see
who could set up a tent the fastest.
I won easily.
Sam said it was beginner’s luck.
Chris said I was definitely ready for the overnight.
“Where do we go for the overnight?” I asked.
“Deep, deep into the woods,” Chris replied. He winked at Sam and Joey.
I felt a chill, thinking about Uncle Marv’s ghost story.
I shook the chill away. No way I was going to let myself get scared by a
silly camp story.
We had instructional swim at the waterfront. The lake was clear and cold.
I’m up to Junior Lifesaver. Joey and I took turns rescuing each other.
I didn’t think about Sam driving the pole through his foot. I forced it from
my mind.
After the swim, I returned to the bunk to get changed for dinner. There were
fresh puddles of blue goo on the cabin floor.
Nobody made a big deal about them. I didn’t want to, either. So I tried hard
not to think about them.
Alex came in, very excited. “I’m going to be the first act in the talent
show!” he announced. “And Veronica liked my singing so much, she wants me
to star in the camp musical.”
“Way to go!” I cried. I slapped him a high five. Then I asked, “What about
Elvis?”
“He’s going to be in the show, too,” Alex replied. “He’s going to be stage
manager.”
I pulled on my white Camp Spirit Moon shorts and T-shirt and headed to
the mess hall for dinner.
I saw a group of girls come out of the cabins on the other side. I searched
for Lucy, but didn’t see her.
I was feeling pretty good.
Not thinking about the strange things I’d seen.
Not thinking about the blue puddles of slime. The mysterious black fog.
Not thinking about the ghost story that Elvis said was true.
Not thinking about Lucy sticking her hand into the fire and pulling out my
flaming hot dog.
Not thinking about Joey floating above his bed. Or Sam jamming a thick
pole through his foot.
And not bleeding. Not crying out.
So totally calm about it. As if he couldn’t feel it, couldn’t feel any pain.
I was starving. Looking forward to dinner. Not thinking about any of these
puzzling things.
Feeling really good.
But then Joey ruined my good mood at dinner. And forced all the scary
thoughts back into my mind.
The food had just been served. Chicken in some kind of creamy sauce,
spinach, and lumpy mashed potatoes.
I didn’t care what it was. I was so hungry, I could eat anything!
But before I had a chance to eat, Joey called out to me from across the
table. “Hey, Harry—look!”
I glanced up from my plate.
He picked up his fork—and jammed it deep into his neck!
14
“Ohhh.” I let out a groan. My fork fell from my hand and clattered to the floor.
Joey grinned at me. The fork bobbed up and down, stuck in his neck.
I felt sick. My heart started to pound.
He pulled the fork out with a hard tug. His grin didn’t fade. “You try it!” he
called.
“Joey—stop it!” Elvis cried from across the table.
“Yeah. Give us a break,” Sam agreed.
I stared at Joey’s neck. No cut. No fork marks. No blood.
“How—how did you do that?” I finally stammered.
Joey’s grin grew wider. “It’s just a trick,” he replied.
I glimpsed Alex at the end of the table. Had he seen Joey’s “trick”?
Yes. Alex looked green. His mouth had dropped open in horror.
“Here. I’ll show you how to do it,” Joey offered.
He raised the fork again—but stopped when he saw Uncle Marv leaning
over his shoulder.
“What’s going on, Joey?” Uncle Marv demanded sharply.
Joey lowered the fork to the table. “Just kidding around,” he replied,
avoiding the camp director’s hard stare.
“Well, let’s eat our dinner, guys,” Uncle Marv said sternly. “Without
kidding around.” His stubby fingers tightened over Joey’s shoulders. “We have a
night soccer game, you know. Boys against the girls.”
Uncle Marv loosened his grip on Joey’s shoulders and moved on to the next
table. A food fight had broken out there. And the mashed potatoes were flying.
Joey mumbled something under his breath. I couldn’t hear him over all the
noise.
I turned to see how Alex was doing at the end of the table. He had his fork
in his hand, but he wasn’t eating. He was staring hard at Joey. My brother had a
very thoughtful expression on his face.
I knew he was wondering exactly the same thing I was.
What is going on here?
Joey said the fork-stabbing was just a trick. But how did he do it? Why
didn’t it hurt? Why didn’t he bleed?
“Night soccer games are cool!” Elvis declared. He was stuffing chicken into
his mouth. The cream sauce ran down his chin.
“Especially boys against the girls,” Sam agreed. “We’ll kill them! They’re
pitiful.”
I glanced at the girls’ table across the room. They were chattering noisily.
Probably about the soccer game.
I saw Lucy in the shadows near the wall. She didn’t seem to be talking to
anyone. She had a solemn expression on her face.
Did she keep looking over at me?
I couldn’t really tell.
I ate my dinner. But my appetite had disappeared.
“How did you do that fork thing?” I asked Joey.
“I told you. It’s just a trick,” he replied. He turned away from me to talk to
Sam.
Dessert was little squares of red, yellow, and green Jell-O. It was okay. But
it needed some whipped cream.
As I was finishing my dessert, I heard some squeals from the front of the
big room. I turned toward the cries—and saw a bat swooping wildly back and
forth over the mess hall.
Some of the younger kids were screaming. But everyone stayed calm at my
table.
The bat fluttered noisily, swooping and diving, darting from one end of the
hall to the other.
Uncle Marv followed it with a broom. And after only a minute or two, he
gently pinned the bat to the wall with the straw broom head.
Then he lifted the bat off the wall, carrying it in one hand.
It was so tiny! No bigger than a mouse.
He carried it out the door and let it go.
Everyone cheered.
“That happens all the time,” Sam said to me. “It’s because there aren’t any
screens on the mess hall doors.”
“And the woods are full of bats,” Joey added. “Killer bats that land in your
hair and suck the blood out of your head.”
Sam laughed. “Yeah. Right.” He grinned at me. “That’s what happened to
Joey. That’s why he acts so weird now.”
I laughed along with everyone else.
But I wondered if Sam was really joking.
I mean, Joey did act weird.
“Soccer field, everyone!” Uncle Marv boomed from the mess hall door.
“Check with the sports counselors. Alissa and Mark will set up the teams.”
Chairs scraped over the stone floor as everyone jumped up.
I saw Lucy waving to me. But Sam and Joey pulled me away.
Into a cool, cloudy night. The full moon hidden behind low clouds. The
grass already wet with a heavy dew.
The counselors divided up the teams. Alex and I were on the second team.
That meant we didn’t play the first period. Our job was to stand on the sidelines
and cheer on the boys’ first team.
Two floodlights on tall poles sent down wide triangles of white light over
the field. It wasn’t really enough light. Long shadows spread over the field.
But that was part of the fun.
Alex stood close beside me as the game began. The girls’ team scored a
goal in less than a minute.
Girls on the sidelines went wild.
The players on the boys’ team stood around, scratching their heads and
muttering unhappily.
“Lucky break! Lucky break!” yelled Mark, a tall, lanky boys’ counselor.
“Go get them, guys!”
The game started up again.
The light from the floodlights appeared to dim. I raised my eyes to the sky
—and saw fog rolling in.
Another swirling fog.
Mark jogged past us, looking like a big stork. “Going to be another foggy
night,” he said to Alex and me. “Night games are more fun in the fog.” He
shouted instructions to the boys’ team.
The thick fog swept over us quickly, driven by a gusting wind.
Alex huddled close to me. I turned and caught his worried expression.
“Did you see what Joey did at dinner?” he asked softly.
I nodded. “He said it was a trick.”
Alex thought about that for a moment. “Harry,” he said, keeping his eyes on
the game. “Don’t you think some of these kids are a little weird?”
“Yeah. A little,” I replied. I thought about the tent pole going through Sam’s
foot.
“Something happened at the waterfront,” Alex continued. “I can’t stop
thinking about it.”
I watched the game, squinting into the drifting fog. It was getting hard to
see the players.
Cheers rang out from the girls’side. I guessed they had scored another goal.
Layers of heavy fog blocked my view.
I shivered. “What happened?” I asked my brother.
“I had free swim. After tryouts for the show,” he said. “There was my group
and a couple of girls’ groups. Younger girls, mostly.”
“The lake is nice,” I commented. “It’s so clear and clean. And not too cold.”
“Yeah. It’s good,” Alex agreed. He frowned. “But something strange
happened. I mean—I think it was strange.”
He took a deep breath. I could see he was really upset.
“Let’s go, guys! Go, go, go!” Mark shouted to the team.
The glow from the floodlights twisted and bent in the fog, sending strange
shadows over the playing field. The fog was so thick now, I had trouble telling
the players from the shadows.
“I was floating on top of the water,” Alex continued, wrapping his arms
around his chest. “Sort of taking it easy. Moving slowly. Stroke… stroke… very
slow.
“It was free swim. So we could do what we wanted. Some of the guys were
having a back-floating race near the shore. But I floated out by myself.
“The water was so clear. I put my face in the water, and I stared down to the
bottom. And—and I saw something down there.”
He swallowed hard.
“What was it? What did you see?” I asked.
“A girl,” Alex replied with a shudder. “One of the girls from the younger
group. I don’t know her name. She has short, curly black hair.”
“She was under the water?” I demanded. “You mean, swimming
underwater?”
“No.” Alex shook his head. “She wasn’t swimming. She wasn’t moving.
She was way underwater. I mean, near the bottom of the lake.”
“She dove down?” I asked.
Alex shrugged. “I got so scared!” he cried over the shouts of the two teams.
“She wasn’t moving. I didn’t think she was breathing. Her arms floated up and
down. And her eyes—her eyes stared out blankly into the water.”
“She drowned?” I cried.
“That’s what I thought,” Alex said. “I panicked. I mean, I didn’t know what
to do. I couldn’t think. I didn’t think. I just dove down.”
“You dove down to the bottom to get her?” I asked.
“Yeah. I didn’t really know if I was too late. Or if I should get a counselor.
Or what,” Alex said, shuddering again.
“I swam down. I grabbed her arms. Then I gripped her under the shoulders.
I pulled her up. She floated up easily. Like she was weightless or something.
“I pulled her up to the surface. Then I started to drag her to the shore. I was
gasping for breath. Mostly from panic, I think. My chest felt about to burst. I
was so scared.
“And then I heard laughing. She laughed at me. I was still holding her
under the shoulders. She turned—and spit water in my face!”
“Oh, wow!” I gasped. “Wow, Alex. You mean she was okay?”
“Yeah,” Alex replied, shaking his head. “She was perfectly okay. She was
laughing at me. She thought it was really funny.
“I just stared at her. I couldn’t believe it. I mean, she had been way down at
the bottom. For a long, long time.
“I let go of her. She floated away from me, still laughing.
“I said, ‘How did you do that?’ That’s what I asked her. I asked, ‘How long
can you hold your breath?’
“And that made her laugh even harder. ‘How long?’ I asked.
“And she said, ‘A long, long time.’
“And then she swam back to the other girls.”
“And what did you do?” I asked Alex.
“I had to get out of the water,” he replied. “I was shaking all over. I couldn’t
stop shaking. I—I thought…” His voice trailed off.
“At least she was okay,” he murmured after a while. “But don’t you think
that was weird, Harry? And then at dinner, when Joey stuck that fork in his neck
—”
“It’s weird, Alex,” I said softly. “But it may just be jokes.”
“Jokes?” he asked. His dark eyes stared hard into mine.
“Kids always play jokes on new campers,” I told him. “It’s a camp
tradition. You know. Terrify the new kids. It’s probably just jokes. That’s all.”
He chewed his bottom lip, thinking about it. Even though he was standing
so close to me, the swirling black fog made him appear far away.
I turned back to the game. The boys were moving across the grass toward
the goal. Passing the ball, kicking it from player to player. They looked unreal,
moving in and out of the swirling shadows.
Jokes, I thought.
All jokes.
I squinted into the fog. And saw something that couldn’t be a joke.
A boy kicked the ball to the net. The girls’ goalie moved to block the shot.
She wasn’t fast enough. Or she stumbled.
The ball hit her smack in the forehead.
It made a sickening thud.
The ball bounced onto the ground.
And her head bounced beside it.
15
I gasped. And started to run.
Through the thick wisps of black fog.
The swirling, dark mist seemed to float up from the ground and sweep
down from the trees. It felt cold and wet on my face as I hurtled toward the girl.
Squinting into the heavy darkness, I could see her sprawled on her stomach
on the ground.
And her head…
Her head…
I bent down and grabbed it. I don’t know what I was thinking.
Did I plan to plop it back on her shoulders?
In a total panic, trembling with horror, I bent into the swirling mist—and
picked up the head with both hands.
It felt surprisingly hard. Inhumanly hard.
I raised it. Raised it close to my face.
And saw that I held a soccer ball.
Not a head. Not a girl’s head.
I heard a groan. And gazed down to see the girl climb to her knees. She
muttered something under her breath and shook her head.
Her head. The head on her shoulders.
She stood and frowned at me.
I stared at her face, her head. My whole body was still shaking.
“Your head—” I choked out.
She tossed back her straight blond hair. Brushed dirt off her white shorts.
Then she reached for the ball.
“Harry—you’re not on the first team!” I heard a boy call.
“Get off the field!” another boy demanded.
I turned and saw that the players had all gathered around.
“But I saw her head fall off!” I blurted out.
I instantly regretted it. I knew I shouldn’t have said it.
Everyone laughed. They tossed back their heads and laughed at me.
Someone slapped me on the back.
Their grinning, laughing faces floated all around me. For a moment, it
looked to me as if all their heads had come off. I was surrounded by laughing
heads, bobbing in the eerie, shadowy light from the floodlights.
The girl raised her hands to the sides of her head and tugged up. “See,
Harry?” she cried. “See? It’s still glued on!”
“Someone better check Harry’s head!” a boy cried.
Everyone laughed some more.
A kid came up, grabbed my head, and tugged it.
“Ow!” I screamed.
More wild laughter.
I tossed the goalie the soccer ball. Then I slunk off the field.
What is wrong with me? I wondered. Why am I so messed up?
Why do I keep seeing things?
Am I just nervous because I’m in a new camp? Or am I totally losing it?
I trudged to the sidelines and kept walking. I didn’t know where I was
going. I just knew I wanted to get away from the laughing kids, away from the
soccer game.
The heavy fog had settled over the field. I glanced back. I could hear the
players’shouts and cheers. But I could barely see them.
I turned and started toward the row of cabins. The dew on the tall grass
tickled my legs as I walked.
I was halfway to the cabins when I realized I was being followed.
16
I spun around.
A face floated out of the darkness.
“Alex!” I cried. In all the excitement over the soccer ball and the goalie’s
head, I had forgotten all about him.
He stepped close to me, so close I could see beads of sweat on his upper lip.
“I saw it, too,” Alex whispered.
“Huh?” I gasped. I didn’t understand. “You saw what?”
“The girl’s head,” Alex said sharply. He turned back to the soccer field. To
see if anyone had followed him, I guess.
Then he turned back to me and tugged my T-shirt sleeve. “I saw her head
fall off, too. I saw it bounce on the ground.”
I swallowed hard. “You did? Really?”
He nodded. “I thought I was going to puke. It—it was so gross.”
“But—it didn’t fall off!” I cried. “Didn’t you see? When I ran onto the
field? I picked up the ball. Not her head.”
“But I saw it, Harry,” Alex insisted. “At first I thought it was just the fog.
You know. My eyes playing tricks on me because of the heavy fog. But—”
“It had to be the fog,” I replied quietly. “That girl—she was perfectly okay.”
“But if we both saw it…” Alex started. He stopped and sighed. “This camp
—it’s so weird.”
“That’s for sure,” I agreed.
Alex shoved his hands into the pockets of his shorts. He shook his head
unhappily. “Elvis says the ghost stories are true,” he said.
I put my hands on Alex’s shoulders. I could feel him trembling. We don’t
believe in ghosts—remember?” I told him. “Remember?”
He nodded slowly.
The first howl made us both jump.
I turned to the woods. Another eerie howl rose up from the same spot.
Not an animal howl. Not an animal cry at all.
A long, mournful howl. A human howl.
“Owwoooooooooooooo.”
Another deeper cry made me gasp.
Alex grabbed my arm. His hand felt cold as ice.
“What is that?” he choked out.
I opened my mouth to reply—but another mournful howl interrupted.
“Owwoooooooooooo.”
I heard two creatures howling. Maybe three.
Maybe more.
The eerie wails floated up from behind the trees. Until it sounded as if the
whole woods were howling.
Inhuman howls. Ghostly howls.
“We’re surrounded, Harry,” Alex whispered, still gripping my arm.
“Whatever it is, it’s got us surrounded.”
17
“Owwooooooo.”
The frightening wails rose up from the trees.
“Run!” I whispered to Alex. “To the main lodge. Maybe we can find Uncle
Marv. Maybe—”
Heading into the fog, we started running toward the lodge.
But the howls followed us. And grew louder.
I heard the heavy thud of footsteps behind us, tromping over the grass.
We can’t escape, I realized.
Alex and I both turned at the same time.
And saw Elvis, Sam, and Joey—grinning as they ran after us.
Sam cupped his hands around his mouth and let out a long, ghostly howl.
Laughing, Elvis and Joey tossed back their heads and howled too.
“You jerks!” I screamed, swinging a fist at them.
I could feel the blood rushing to my face.
I felt ready to explode. I wanted to punch those three clowns. And kick
them. And pound their grinning faces.
“Gotcha!” Elvis cried. “Gotcha!” He turned to Sam and Joey. “Look at
them! They’re shaking! Oh, wow! They’re shaking!”
Sam and Joey laughed gleefully. “Did you think there were wolves in the
woods?” Sam asked.
“Or ghosts? Did you think we were ghosts?” Joey demanded.
“Shut up,” I replied.
Alex didn’t say a word. He lowered his eyes to the ground. I could see that
he was as embarrassed as I was.
“Owwoooooo!” Elvis uttered another high-pitched howl. He threw his arms
around my brother’s waist and wrestled him to the ground.
“Get off. Get off!” Alex cried angrily.
The two of them wrestled around in the wet grass.
“Did I scare you?” Elvis demanded breathlessly. “Admit it, Alex. You
thought it was a ghost, right? Right?”
Alex refused to reply. He let out a groan and heaved Elvis off him. They
wrestled some more.
Sam and Joey stepped up beside me, grinning. Very pleased with
themselves.
“You guys aren’t funny,” I grumbled. “That was so babyish. Really.”
Joey slapped Sam a high five. “Babyish?” he cried. “If it was so babyish,
why did you fall for it?”
I opened my mouth to reply—but only a choking sound came out.
Why did I fall for it? I asked myself.
Why did I let myself get scared by three guys standing behind trees and
making howling sounds?
Normally, I would have laughed at such a dumb joke.
As the five of us walked to the cabin, I thought hard about it. The campers
and counselors had all been trying to scare Alex and me since we arrived, I
realized. Even Uncle Marv had tried to scare us with his creepy stories.
They must have a tradition of trying to scare new campers at Camp Spirit
Moon, I decided.
And it works. It really has scared Alex and me. It has made us tense.
Jumpy. Ready to leap out of our skins at the slightest noise.
We stepped into the cabin. I clicked the light on.
Elvis, Sam, and Joey were still laughing, still enjoying their joke.
Alex and I have got to get it together, I decided.
We’ve got to shove all the stupid stuff about ghosts out of our heads.
We don’t believe in ghosts, I told myself.
We don’t believe in ghosts. We don’t believe in ghosts.
I repeated that sentence over and over. Like a chant.
Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts. We’ve never believed in ghosts.
Never. Never.
One night later… after a short hike through the woods—I did believe in
ghosts!
18
Alex and I took a lot of teasing the next day.
Coming out of the mess hall after breakfast, someone tossed a soccer ball at
me and screamed, “My head! Give me back my head!”
We had instructional swim in the morning. Joey and Sam and some of the
other guys started howling like ghosts. Everyone thought it was a riot.
I saw Lucy hanging out on the shore with some girls from her cabin. The
other girls were laughing at the ghostly howls. Lucy was the only one who didn’t
laugh.
In fact, she had a solemn expression on her face. A thoughtful expression.
Several times, I caught her staring at me.
She’s probably thinking about what a total baby I am, I told myself
unhappily. I’ll bet she feels sorry for me. Because I acted like such a jerk in front
of everyone on the soccer field last night.
After instructional swim, I dried myself off.
Then I wrapped the towel around myself and walked over to Lucy at the
little boat dock.
The other girls had wandered away. Lucy stood in her white shorts and Tshirt. She had one foot on a plastic canoe, making it bob up and down in the
shallow water.
“Hi,” I said. I suddenly realized I didn’t know what to say.
“Hi,” she replied.
She didn’t smile. Her dark eyes locked on mine.
To my surprise, she turned quickly—and ran off.
“Hey—!” I called. I started to run after her. But stopped when my legs got
tangled in my towel. “Hey—what’s your problem?”
She vanished behind the Arts and Crafts cabin. She never looked back.
I know what her problem is, I told myself sadly. She doesn’t want to be seen
talking to a total nutcase. To someone who thinks that a girl’s head can roll off.
And who thinks there are howling ghosts lurking in the woods.
I wrapped the towel around me. Sam and Joey and some other guys were
staring at me from the shore. I could see by the grins on their faces that they had
seen Lucy run away from me.
“Maybe it’s your breath!” Joey teased.
They all fell on the ground, howling.
* * *
After lunch, we had letter-writing time. The counselors made sure we all stayed
in our bunks and wrote letters home to our parents.
It was a camp rule that we had to write home once a week. “So your parents
won’t worry about you,” Uncle Marv announced at lunch. “We want them to
know that you’re having the best summer of your lives—right?”
“Yohhhhhhhhhh, Spirits!” everyone cheered.
I wasn’t exactly having the best summer of my life.
In fact, so far, this was one of the worst.
But I decided not to write that in my letter home.
I climbed up to my top bunk and started to think about my letter to Mom
and Dad.
Please come and get me, I thought I might write.
Everyone is weird here. Alex and I are both scared out of our wits.
No. No way. I couldn’t write that.
I leaned over the side of the mattress and peered down at my brother. He
was sitting on his bunk, crouched over his letter. I could see him scribbling
away.
“What are you writing?” I called down.
“I’m telling them about the Camp Spirit Moon talent show,” he replied.
“How I’m going to be the star. And how I’m going to be in the musical next
week.”
“Nice,” I muttered.
I decided I’d tell my parents only good things, too. Why worry them? Why
make them think that I’m losing it?
If Alex isn’t writing about all the weird things, I won’t either, I decided.
I leaned over my sheet of paper and started my letter:
Dear Mom and Dad,
Camp Spirit Moon is a lot more exciting than I ever dreamed….
“Tonight’s after-dinner activity is a night hike,” Uncle Marv announced.
A cheer shook the wooden rafters of the huge mess hall.
“Where are we going to hike?” someone called out.
Uncle Marv grinned. “Deep, deep into the woods.”
Of course, that answer reminded everyone of Uncle Marv’s ghost story.
Some kids cheered. Others laughed.
Alex and I exchanged glances.
But the hike turned out to be fun. A full moon made the woods glow. We
followed a path that curved around the lake.
Everyone seemed in a good mood. We sang the camp song so many times, I
almost learned the words!
About halfway around the lake, two deer stepped out onto the path. A
mother and her doe.
The little one was so cute. It looked just like Bambi.
The two deer stared at us. They turned up their noses, as if to say, “What are
you doing in our woods?”
Then they calmly loped into the trees.
The path headed through a small, round clearing. As we stepped out of the
trees, the ground appeared to light up. The moonlight poured down so brightly, I
felt as if I could see every bush, every weed, every blade of grass.
It was really awesome.
I started to relax. Sam, Joey, and I walked along singing, making up funny
words to songs we knew. We sang “On Top of Spaghetti” about twenty times—
until kids begged us to stop singing it!
Why have I been so crazy? I asked myself.
I’ve made some cool new friends here at Camp Spirit Moon. I’m having an
excellent time.
I felt great until we returned to camp.
The black fog had started to roll in. It greeted us, wrapping its cold, wet
mists around us, darkening the sky, the ground, the whole camp.
“Lights Out in ten minutes,” Uncle Marv announced.
Kids scampered to their cabins.
But two strong arms held me from behind. Held me back.
“Hey—!” I cried out. I felt myself being pulled into the trees.
“Ssshhhhh,” someone whispered in my ear.
I spun around to find Lucy holding onto me. “What are you doing?” I
whispered. “We have to go to our bunks. We have to get ready for—”
“Ssshhhhhh,” she hissed again in my ear.
Her dark eyes searched my face. Were those tears staining her pale cheeks?
Clouds of fog rolled around us.
She loosened her grip on my arms. But her eyes stayed on mine. “Harry,
you’ve got to help me,” she whispered.
I swallowed hard. “Lucy, what’s wrong?”
“I think you know,” she said softly. “It’s all true. What you think. It’s true.”
I didn’t understand. I stared back at her with my mouth open.
“We’re ghosts, Harry,” Lucy told me. “We’re all ghosts at this camp.”
“But, Lucy—” I started.
“Yes.” She nodded sadly. “Yes. Yes. Yes. I’m a ghost too.”
19
The trees disappeared behind the fog. The moonlight made Lucy’s eyes sparkle
like dark jewels. But the light faded from her eyes as the fog covered the moon.
I didn’t blink. I didn’t move. I suddenly felt as wooden as the trees hiding
behind the swirling fog.
“You—you’re joking, right?” I stammered. “This is one of those great
Camp Spirit Moon jokes?”
But I knew the answer.
I could read the answer in her dark eyes. In her trembling mouth. In her
pale, pale skin.
“I’m a ghost,” she repeated sadly. “The stories—they’re true, Harry.”
But I don’t believe in ghosts!
That’s what I almost blurted out.
But how could I not believe in ghosts when one stood right in front of me,
staring into my face?
How could I not believe in Lucy?
“I believe you,” I whispered.
She sighed. She turned her face away.
“How did it happen?” I asked.
“Just as Uncle Marv told in the story,” she replied. “We were sitting around
the campfire. All of us. Just like the other night. The fog rolled in. Such a dark,
heavy fog.”
She sighed again. Even in the darkness, I could see the tears glistening in
her eyes.
“When the fog finally floated away,” Lucy continued, “we were all dead.
All ghosts. We’ve been out here ever since. I can’t explain any more. I don’t
know any more.”
“But—when did it happen?” I demanded. “How long… how long have you
been a ghost, Lucy?”
She shrugged. “I don’t know. I’ve lost track of time. There is no time when
you’re a ghost. There’s just one day and then the next. And then the next.
Forever, I guess.”
I stared at her without speaking.
Chill after chill swept down my back. My whole body was shaking. I didn’t
even try to stop it.
I reached out and grabbed her hand.
I guess I wanted to see if she was real or not. One last test to see if she was
pulling a joke.
“Oh!” I dropped her hand as its icy cold shot through me. So cold. Her hand
—as cold as the black fog.
“You believe me now?” she asked softly. Once again her dark eyes studied
my face.
I nodded. “I—I believe you,” I stammered. “I believe you, Lucy.”
She didn’t reply.
I could still feel the cold of her hand on my fingers.
“The blue puddles,” I murmured. “The sticky blue puddles on the cabin
floor. Do you know what they are?”
“Yes,” she replied. “Those puddles are drops of protoplasm.”
“Huh? Protoplasm?”
She nodded. “The puddles are made when we materialize. When we make
ourselves visible.”
She twisted her face into a sorrowful frown. “It takes so much strength to
make ourselves visible. So much energy. The protoplasm puddles are made when
we use that energy.”
I didn’t really understand.
But I knew when I stepped in them that the slimy blue puddles were
something strange. Something inhuman.
Traces of ghosts.
“And the things Alex and I saw?” I demanded. “Kids floating above their
bunks? Their eyes glowing like spotlights? Kids stabbing themselves and not
bleeding? Not crying out in pain?”
“Some of the kids tried to scare you,” Lucy confessed. “They only wanted a
little fun, Harry. It isn’t fun being a ghost. Believe me. It isn’t fun spending day
after day after day out here, knowing you aren’t real anymore. Knowing you will
never grow. Knowing you will never change.” She uttered a loud sob from deep
in her chest. “Knowing you will never have a life!”
“I—I’m so sorry,” I stammered.
Her expression changed.
Her eyes narrowed. Her mouth twisted into an unpleasant sneer.
I took a step back, suddenly afraid.
“Help me, Harry,” Lucy whispered. “I can’t stand it anymore. You’ve got to
help me get away from here.”
“Get away?” I cried, taking another step back. “How?”
“You’ve got to let me possess your mind,” Lucy insisted. “You’ve got to let
me take over your body!”
20
“No!” I gasped.
Panic shot through my body. I felt every muscle tense. The blood throbbed
at my temples.
“I need to take over your mind, Harry,” Lucy repeated, stepping toward me.
“Please. Please help me.”
“No!” I uttered again.
I wanted to turn and run. But I couldn’t move.
My legs felt like Jell-O. My whole body shook.
I don’t believe in ghosts.
That thought flashed into my mind.
But it wasn’t true anymore.
I stood at the edge of the woods—staring at Lucy. Staring at Lucy’s ghost.
The fog swept around us.
Again, I tried to run. But my legs wouldn’t cooperate.
“Wh-what do you want to do to me?” I finally choked out. “Why do you
have to take over my mind?”
“It’s my only way to escape,” Lucy replied. Her eyes locked on mine. “My
only way.”
“Why don’t you just run away?” I demanded.
She sighed. “If I try to leave the camp by myself, I’ll disappear. If I try to
leave the others, I’ll fade away. I’ll join the mist, be part of the fog.”
“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered.
I took a step back. The fog seemed to tighten around me, cold and wet.
Lucy stood two feet in front of me. But I could barely see her. She seemed
to shimmer in and out with the fog.
“I need help.” Her voice floated softly. I had to struggle to hear her. “The
only way a ghost can escape is to take over the mind of a living person.”
“But—that’s impossible!” I screeched.
What a dumb thing to say, I scolded myself. Seeing a ghost is impossible!
Everything happening to me is impossible.
But it’s happening.
“I need to possess the mind and body of a living boy or girl,” Lucy
explained. “I need to take over your body, Harry. I need you to take me away
from here.”
“No!” I screamed again. “I can’t! I mean…” My heart thudded so hard, I
could barely speak.
“I can’t let you take over my mind,” I finally managed to say. “If you do
that, I won’t be me anymore.”
I started to back away.
I have to get to the cabin, I decided. I have to get Alex. We have to run
away from this camp. As fast as we can.
“Don’t be scared,” Lucy pleaded. She followed me. The fog circled us, as if
holding us inside.
“Don’t be scared,” Lucy said. “As soon as we are far away from here, I’ll
get out. I’ll leave your mind. I’ll leave your body. I promise, Harry. As soon as
we escape this camp, I’ll go away. You will be yourself again. You will be
perfectly okay.”
I stopped backing up. My whole body trembled. The fog washed its cold
mist over me.
“Please, Harry,” Lucy begged. “Please. I promise you’ll be okay. I
promise.”
I squinted at her through the rising mists.
Should I do it?
Should I let Lucy take over my mind?
Will she give it back?
Can I believe her?
21
Lucy floated in front of me. Her dark eyes pleaded with me. “Please,” she
whispered.
“No. I’m sorry. I can’t.” The words escaped my lips almost before I thought
them. “I can’t, Lucy.”
She shut her eyes. I could see the muscles in her jaw tighten as she gritted
her teeth.
“I’m sorry,” I repeated, backing up.
“I’m sorry too,” she said coldly. Her eyes narrowed. Her lips formed a
sneer. “I’m really sorry, Harry. But you don’t have a choice. You have to help
me!”
“No! No way!”
I turned and tried to run.
But something held me back. The fog. It tightened around me.
The thick, wet mist. A choking mist. It drew around me, pushing me,
holding me in place.
I tried to scream for help. But the fog muffled my cry.
Lucy vanished behind the black fog.
And then I felt something cold on the top of my head.
My hair tingled.
I reached up with both hands. And felt ice. As if a frost had settled over my
hair.
“No!” I screamed. “Lucy—no!”
The cold sank down. My scalp itched. My face froze.
I rubbed my cheeks.
Numb.
Cold and numb.
“Lucy—please!” I begged.
I could feel her—so light, so cold—settling into my body. Sinking into my
brain.
I could feel her. And I could feel myself slipping away.
Slipping… slipping…
As if drifting into a deep sleep.
The cold spreading over me. Sweeping down my neck. Down my chest.
“Nooooo!” I uttered a long howl of protest.
I shut my eyes tight. I knew I had to concentrate. I had to think hard. I had
to keep awake. I couldn’t let myself fade away.
I couldn’t let her take over.
I couldn’t let her shove my mind aside. And take control. Take control of
my body.
I set my jaw hard. And kept my eyes shut. And tightened every muscle.
No! I thought. No—you can’t do this to me, Lucy!
You can’t take my mind!
You can’t take over. You can’t—because I won’t let you!
The cold settled over me. My skin tingled. I felt numb all over.
And so sleepy… so sleepy…
22
“Nooooo!” I tossed back my head in another long howl.
If I can keep screaming, I can keep awake, I told myself.
And I can fight Lucy off. I can force her away.
“Noooooooo!” I wailed into the spinning, whirling fog.
“Noooooooo!”
And I felt the cold start to lift.
“Noooooo!”
I squeezed my arms. Rubbed my cheeks. And knew the feeling was
returning.
“Noooooo!”
I suddenly felt lighter. And totally alert.
I did it! I realized. I fought her off!
But how long did I have before she tried to take over again?
I took a deep breath. Then another.
I’m breathing, I told myself. I’m me—and I’m breathing.
I felt stronger now. I lowered my head and darted into the fog.
My sneakers pounded the ground. I made my way to the cabin.
The lights were out. The other guys were in their bunks.
I burst inside and let the screen door slam behind me.
“What’s up?” Sam demanded.
I didn’t answer him. I ran across the room. Grabbed my brother. Shook him
hard. “Come on. Hurry,” I ordered.
“Huh?” Alex squinted up at me sleepily.
I didn’t say another word. I tossed him his shorts and his sneakers.
I heard the other guys stirring. Joey sat up in his bed. “Harry—where were
you?” he asked.
“Lights Out was ten minutes ago,” Sam said. “You’re going to get us all in
trouble.”
I ignored them. “Alex—hurry!” I whispered.
As soon as he had his sneakers tied, I grabbed his arm and tugged him to
the door. “Harry—what’s wrong?” he asked.
“Where are you two going?” I heard Joey call.
I pulled Alex outside. The screen door slammed behind us.
“Run!” I cried. “I’ll explain later. We have to get out of here—now!”
“But, Harry—”
I pulled Alex over the grass. The fog had parted enough to let a trail of
moonlight slip through. We followed the trail to the woods.
Our sneakers slipped and slid over the wet grass. The only other sound was
the chirp of crickets and the rush of wind rattling the pine trees.
After a minute or two, Alex wanted to stop to catch his breath.
“No,” I insisted. “Keep moving. They’ll follow us. They’ll find us.”
“Where are we going?” Alex demanded.
“Deep into the woods,” I told him. “As far away from that camp as we
can.”
“But I can’t keep running, Harry,” Alex cried. “My side hurts and—”
“They’re all ghosts!” I blurted out. “Alex—I know you won’t believe me—
but you’ve got to try. The kids. The counselors. Uncle Marv. They’re all ghosts!”
Alex’s expression grew solemn. “I know,” he replied in a tiny voice.
“Huh? How do you know?” I demanded.
We squeezed between two tangled tree trunks. Over the chirp of crickets, I
could hear the lake washing over the shore just beyond some tall shrubs.
We’re still too close to the camp, I told myself.
I pulled my brother in the other direction. Away from the lake. Pushing
aside tall weeds and shrubs, we made our own path, deeper into the woods.
“Alex—how do you know?” I repeated.
“Elvis told me,” he replied, wiping sweat off his forehead with his arm.
We ducked under a tall thorn bush. Thorns scraped the top of my head. I
ignored the pain and kept moving.
“Elvis said the ghost story about the fog was true,” Alex continued. “I
thought he was just trying to scare me. But then he—he—” Alex’s voice trailed
off.
We ran into a small clearing. Moonlight made the grass glow like silver. My
eyes flashed in one direction, then the other. I couldn’t decide which way to run.
I swatted a mosquito off my arm. “What did Elvis do?” I asked Alex.
Alex raked back his dark hair. “He tried to take over my mind,” he told me
in a trembling voice. “He floated into the fog. And then I started to feel really
cold.”
Twigs snapped. Dry leaves crackled.
Footsteps?
I shoved Alex back into the trees. Out of the clearing.
We pressed against a wide tree trunk and listened.
Silence now.
“Maybe it was a squirrel, or a chipmunk, or something,” Alex whispered.
“Maybe,” I replied, listening hard.
Moonlight trickled through the treetops. It made shadows dance over the
smooth clearing.
“We have to keep going,” I said. “We’re still too close to the camp. If the
ghosts follow us…”
I didn’t finish my thought. I didn’t want to think about what would happen
if the ghosts followed us. If they caught us…
“Which way is the highway?” Alex asked, his eyes searching the trees. “It
isn’t too far from the camp—right? If we can get to the highway, someone will
give us a ride.”
“Good idea,” I said. Why hadn’t I thought of that?
Now here we were, in the middle of the woods. Far from the highway.
I didn’t even know which direction to go to find it.
“It must be back that way,” Alex suggested, pointing.
“No. That’s the way back to the camp,” I argued.
Alex started to reply—but a loud thumping sound made him stop. “Did you
hear that?” he whispered.
I did.
And then I heard it again.
A loud thump. Very close by.
“Is it an animal?” I cried softly.
“I—I don’t think so,” Alex stammered.
KA-THUMP.
Louder.
Is it a ghost? I wondered.
Has one of them found us?
“Quick—this way!” I urged. I grabbed Alex by the wrist and tugged him
hard.
We had to get away from whatever was making that frightening noise.
KA-THUMP.
Louder.
“We’re going the wrong way!” I cried.
We spun around and darted back into the clearing.
KA-THUMP.
“Which way?” Alex screeched. “Which way? It—it’s everywhere!”
KA-THUMP.
And then—from somewhere just ahead of us—a deep, booming voice
growled, “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY HEART?”
23
The ground tumbled and shook.
Alex and I both let out terrified cries.
But our cries were drowned out by a rumbling sound that quickly rose to a
roar.
The ground gave way beneath us.
We both raised our arms high as we toppled over.
I landed on my hands and knees. Alex fell onto his back. The ground
trembled and tossed, tumbling us around.
“It—it’s the monster!” Alex shrieked.
But that’s impossible! I thought, struggling to my feet.
That monster is from a story. A dumb camp ghost story.
It can’t be here in the woods.
I helped pull Alex up. But the ground shook again, and we both fell to our
knees.
KA-THUMP. KA-THUMP.
“It can’t be real!” I cried. “It can’t—”
My mouth dropped open in horror as a huge, hairy head raised itself in front
of us. Its eyes glowed as red as flames—round, terrifying, glowing eyes set deep
in an ugly, growling face. The creature glared furiously at us.
“Th-the monster!” Alex stuttered.
We were both on our knees, bouncing helplessly on the rolling, tossing
ground.
Was it the ground? Or the monster’s chest?
The creature opened an enormous cavern of a mouth. It flashed rows and
rows of jagged yellow teeth.
Slowly it raised its head, moving closer. Closer.
Opening its hairy jaws wide. Preparing to swallow us as we frantically
struggled to scramble away.
“Harry—! Harry—!” Alex shrieked my name. “It’s going to eat us! It’s
going to swallow us whole!”
And then—in a flash—I had an idea.
24
The huge monster uttered a low growl.
Its hairy mouth opened wider. An enormous purple tongue rolled out. I
gasped when I saw that the tongue was covered in prickly burrs.
“Look out, Alex!” I cried.
Too late.
The ground tossed, bouncing us both into the air. We landed with a hard
plop on the tongue.
“Owwww!” we both howled. It felt like a cactus!
Slowly, the prickly purple tongue began to slide, carrying us into the
creature’s open mouth.
“We don’t believe in monsters,” I told Alex.
I had to shout over the bellowing of the hungry monster. The tongue carried
us closer. Closer to the rows of jagged yellow teeth.
“We don’t believe in this monster!” I shouted. “It is just made up. Part of a
story. If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!”
Alex’s whole body shook. He hunched over, making himself into a tight
ball. “It looks pretty real!” he choked out.
The tongue dragged us closer. I could smell the monster’s foul breath. I
could see black stains on its jagged teeth.
“Concentrate,” I instructed my brother. “We don’t believe in you. We don’t
believe in you.”
Alex and I began chanting those words, over and over.
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.”
The purple tongue carried us into the huge mouth. I tried to grab onto the
teeth. But they were too slippery.
My hands slid off. I felt myself being swallowed.
Down, down. Into sour darkness.
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” Alex and I continued to
chant.
But our voices were muffled as we slid down the creature’s throbbing
throat.
“Harry—it swallowed us!” Alex wailed.
“Keep chanting,” I ordered him. “If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!”
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.”
A glob of thick saliva rolled over me. I gagged as it clung to my clothes, my
skin—hot and sticky.
The walls of the throat throbbed harder.
Pulling us down. Down.
Down into the vast, churning gurgling pit of a stomach below.
“Ohhhh.” Alex let out a long, defeated sigh. He sank to his knees. He was
covered in thick saliva too.
“Keep chanting! It’s got to work! It’s got to!” I screamed.
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.”
“We don’t believe in you!”
Alex and I both opened our mouths in screams of horror as we began to fall.
Falling, falling, into the churning stomach below.
25
I shut my eyes.
And waited for the splash. Waited for the crash.
Waited to hit the stomach floor.
Waited.
When I opened my eyes, I was standing on the ground. Standing next to
Alex in a grassy clearing.
The pine trees shivered in the breeze. A full moon poked out from behind
wispy clouds.
“Hey—!” I cried. I was so happy to hear my own voice!
So happy to see the sky. The ground. So happy to breathe the cool air.
Alex started spinning. Spinning like a top. Laughing at the top of his lungs.
“We didn’t believe in you!” he cried gleefully. “We didn’t believe in you—and it
worked!”
We were both so thrilled. So excited that the monster had vanished.
Poof! A puff of imagination.
I started to spin with Alex. Spinning and laughing.
We stopped when we realized we were no longer alone.
I let out a startled cry when I saw the faces all around us. The pale, pale
faces with their glowing eyes.
I recognized Sam, and Joe, and Lucy, and Elvis.
I moved close to Alex as the campers—the ghost campers—moved to form
a circle around us. To trap us.
Uncle Marv moved into the circle. His tiny eyes glowed red as fire. He
narrowed them angrily at Alex and me.
“Capture them!” he bellowed. “Take them back to camp. No one ever
escapes Camp Spirit Moon.”
Several counselors moved quickly to grab us.
We couldn’t move. There was nowhere to run.
“What are you going to do to us?” I cried.
26
“We need living kids,” Uncle Marv boomed. “We cannot allow living kids to
escape. Unless they carry one of us with them.”
“Noooo!” Alex wailed. “You can’t take over my mind! You can’t! I won’t
let you!”
The ghostly circle tightened. The ghost campers moved in on us.
I tried to stop my legs from shaking. Tried to slow my pounding heart.
“Alex—we don’t believe in them, either,” I whispered.
He stared at me, confused for a moment. Then he understood.
We made the monster vanish by not believing in him. We could do the same
thing to the ghost campers.
“Grab them. Take them back to camp,” Uncle Marv ordered the counselors.
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you,” Alex and I started to
chant.
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.”
I stared hard at the circle of ghostly faces. Waited for them to disappear.
I chanted with my brother. Chanted faster. Chanted louder.
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.”
I shut my eyes. Shut them tight.
And when I opened them…
The ghosts were still there.
“You can’t make us disappear, Harry,” Lucy said, stepping into the circle.
She narrowed her eyes at me. They glittered cold and silvery in the moonlight.
“You made the monster disappear because it wasn’t real, just one of our
ghost tricks,” Lucy explained. “We made you see it. But we’re all real! All of us!
And we’re not going to vanish in a puff of smoke.”
“We’re not going away,” Elvis added, moving close to my brother. “In fact,
we’re coming closer. A lot closer.”
“I’m taking over your mind,” Lucy whispered to me. “I’m going to escape
Camp Spirit Moon inside your mind and body.”
“Nooo! No—please!” I protested.
I tried to back up. But the other ghost campers had me trapped.
“You can’t! I won’t let you!” I shrieked to Lucy, frozen in terror.
“Go away!” Alex shouted at Elvis.
The woods darkened as clouds swept over the moon. All around me, the
ghostly eyes appeared to glow brighter.
I saw Elvis reach for my brother.
And then my view was blocked by Lucy. She floated up. Up off the ground.
Up over me.
“No! Stay away! Stay away!” I screamed.
But I felt my hair tingle.
I felt the cold sweep down over me. Down, down.
I felt Lucy’s ghostly cold. Felt her slipping into my mind.
Slipping down, down. Taking over.
And I knew I couldn’t escape.
27
“Get away, Lucy. I’m going first!” I heard a voice shout.
“No way!” a boy cried. “Move out of the way. Uncle Marv said I could be
first!”
I could feel the cold sweep up from my body. I opened my eyes—and saw
Lucy back on the ground.
Other kids tugged her away.
“Let go of me!” Lucy screamed, pulling back. “I saw him first!”
“Finders keepers!” another ghostly girl cried.
They are fighting over me, I realized.
They pulled Lucy away. And now they’re fighting to see who will take over
my mind.
“Hey—let go!” I heard a ghostly girl cry. I saw her wrestling with another
girl.
The ghosts were wrestling and fighting, shoving and clawing at each other.
I saw the counselors join the fight.
“Stop this! Stop this!” Uncle Marv bellowed.
He tried to pull the fighting campers apart.
But they ignored him and continued to battle.
And as I stared in horror, they began to spin around me. Faster and faster. A
ghostly circle of wrestling, fighting, shrieking campers. Boys and girls,
counselors and Uncle Marv, spinning, struggling, clawing.
Faster. Faster.
They spun around and around my brother and me.
Until they became a swirl of white light.
And then the light faded. Faded to gray smoke.
Wisps of smoke that floated to the trees. And disappeared in the trembling
branches.
Alex and I stood watching until the last wisp of smoke had floated away.
“They’re gone,” I choked out. “They fought each other. And they’re gone.
All of them.”
I shook my head. I drew in a deep breath of fresh air.
My heart was still pounding. My whole body trembled.
But I was okay. Alex and I were okay.
“Are they really gone?” Alex asked in a tiny voice.
“Yes. Let’s go,” I said, taking his arm. “Come on. Hurry. Let’s get away
from here.”
He followed me eagerly. “Where are we going?”
“To the highway,” I said. “We’ll walk past the camp to the highway. And
we’ll stop the first car that comes by. We’ll get to a phone. We’ll call Mom and
Dad.”
I slapped my brother on the back. “We’ll be okay, Alex!” I cried happily.
“We’ll be home before you know it!”
We walked quickly through the woods. Pushing bushes and weeds out of
the way. Making our own path.
As we made our way to the highway, Alex started to hum a song to himself.
“Whoa!” I cried. “Alex, what’s wrong?”
“Huh?” He stared at me in surprise.
I stopped and held him in place. “Sing that again,” I ordered.
He sang a little more.
Horrible! His singing was horrible. Totally off-key and sour.
I stared hard into my brother’s eyes. “Elvis—is that you in there?” I cried.
Elvis’ voice came out of Alex’s mouth. “Please, Harry, don’t tell,” he
begged. “I swear I’ll never sing again—if you promise not to tell!”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

HOW TO KILL
A MONSTER
Goosebumps - 46
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
“Why do we have to go there?” I wailed from the backseat of the car. “Why?”
“Gretchen, I’ve told you three times why.” Dad sighed. “Your mother and I
have to go to Atlanta. For work!”
“I know that,” I replied, leaning over the front seat. “But why can’t we go
with you? Why do we have to stay with Grandma and Grandpa?”
“Because we said so,” Mom and Dad declared together.
Because we said so. Once they said those deadly words, there was no use
arguing.
I slumped down in my seat.
Mom and Dad had some kind of work emergency in Atlanta. They got the
call this morning.
It’s not fair, I thought. They get to visit a cool city like Atlanta. And Clark
—my stepbrother—and I have to go to Mud Town.
Mud Town.
Well, it’s not really called Mud Town. But it should be. Because it’s a
swamp. Grandma Rose and Grandpa Eddie live in southern Georgia—in a
swamp.
Can you believe it?
A swamp.
I stared out the car window. We’d been riding on highways all day. Now we
were driving on a narrow road through the swamp.
It was late afternoon. And the cypress trees began to cast long shadows over
the marshy grass.
I stuck my head out the window. A blast of hot, humid air hit my face. I
ducked back in and turned to Clark. His nose was buried in a comic book.
Clark is twelve—like me. He’s much shorter than I am. Much shorter. And
he has curly brown hair, brown eyes, and tons of freckles. He looks exactly like
Mom.
I’m kind of tall for my age. I have long, straight blond hair and green eyes.
I look like Dad.
My parents divorced when I turned two years old. The same thing happened
to Clark. My dad and his mom married each other right after our third birthdays,
and we all moved into a new house together.
I like my stepmother. And Clark and I get along okay, I guess. He acts like
a jerk sometimes. Even my friends say so. But I think their brothers act like
jerks, too.
I stared at Clark.
Watched him read.
His glasses slid down his nose.
He pushed them up.
“Clark…” I started.
“Shhhh.” He waved his hand at me. “I’m at the good part.”
Clark loves comic books. Scary ones. But he’s not brave—so he’s always
terrified by the time he finishes.
I glanced out the window again.
I stared at the trees. At the branches, all draped in long gray webs. They
dangled from every tree—curtains of gray. They made the swamp look really
gloomy.
Mom told me about the gray webs when we were packing this morning. She
knows a lot about swamps. She thinks swamps are pretty—in a spooky sort of
way.
Mom said the gray webs were actually a swamp plant that grew right on the
trees.
A plant that grows on a plant. Weird, I thought. Definitely weird.
Almost as weird as Grandma and Grandpa.
“Dad, how come Grandma and Grandpa never visit us?” I asked. “We
haven’t seen them since we were four.”
“Well, they’re a little strange.” Dad peered at me through the rearview
mirror. “They don’t like to travel. They almost never leave their house. And they
live so far back in the swamp, it’s very hard to visit them.”
“Oh, wow!” I said. “A sleepover with two strange old hermits.”
“Smelly, strange old hermits,” Clark mumbled, glancing up from his comic.
“Clark! Gretchen!” Mom scolded. “Don’t talk about your grandparents that
way.”
“They’re not my grandparents. They’re hers.” Clark jerked his head toward
me. “And they do smell. I can still remember it.”
I punched my stepbrother in the arm. But he was right. Grandma and
Grandpa did smell. Like a combination of mildew and mothballs.
I sank deep into my seat and let out a loud yawn.
It seemed as if we’d been riding in the car for weeks. And it was really
crowded back there—with me, Clark, and Charley kind of squished together.
Charley is our dog—a golden retriever.
I pushed Charley out of the way and stretched out.
“Quit shoving him onto me!” Clark complained. His comic book dropped to
the floor.
“Sit still, Gretchen,” Mom muttered. “I knew we should have boarded
Charley.”
“I tried to find a kennel for him,” Dad said. “But no one could take him at
the last minute.”
Clark pushed Charley off his lap and reached down for his comic. But I
grabbed it first.
“Oh, brother,” I moaned when I read the title. “Creatures from the Muck?
How can you read this garbage?”
“It’s not garbage,” Clark shot back. “It’s really cool. Better than those
stupid nature magazines you read.”
“What’s it about?” I asked, flipping through the pages.
“It’s about some totally gross monsters. Half-human. Half-beast. They set
traps to catch people. Then they hide under the mud. Near the surface,” Clark
explained. He grabbed the comic from my hand.
“Then what happens?” I asked.
“They wait. They wait as long as it takes—for the humans to fall in their
traps.” Clark’s voice started to quiver. “Then they force them deep into the
swamp. And make them their slaves!”
Clark shuddered. He glanced out the window. Out at the eerie cypress trees
with their long beards of gray.
It was growing dark now. The trees’shadows shifted over the tall grass.
Clark lowered himself in his seat. He has a wild imagination. He really
believes the stuff he reads. Then he gets scared—like now.
“Do they do anything else?” I asked. I wanted Clark to tell me more. He
was really scaring himself good.
“Well, at night, the monsters rise up from the mud,” he went on, sliding
down in his seat some more. “And they drag kids from their beds. They drag
them into the swamp. They drag them down into the mud. No one ever sees the
kids again. Ever.”
Clark was totally freaked now.
“There really are creatures like that in the swamp. I read about them in
school,” I lied. “Horrible monsters. Half-alligator, half-human. Covered with
mud. With spiky scales underneath, hidden. If you just brush against one, the
scales rip the flesh right off your bones.”
“Gretchen, stop,” Mom warned.
Clark hugged Charley close to him.
“Hey! Clark!” I pointed out the window to an old narrow bridge up ahead.
Its wooden planks sagged. It looked ready to crumble. “I bet a swamp monster is
waiting for us under that bridge.”
Clark gazed out the window at the bridge. He hugged Charley closer to
him.
Dad began steering the car over the old wooden planks. They rumbled and
groaned under the weight.
I held my breath as we slowly rolled across. This bridge can’t hold us, I
thought. No way.
Dad drove very, very slowly.
It seemed to take forever to ride across.
Clark clung to Charley. He kept his eyes out the window, glued to the
bridge.
When we finally neared the end, I let out a long whoosh of air.
And then I gasped—as a deafening explosion rocked the car.
“Nooo!” Clark and I both screamed as the car swerved wildly.
Skidded out of control.
It crashed into the side of the old bridge.
Plowed right through the old wood.
“We-we’re going down!” Dad cried.
I shut my eyes as we plunged into the swamp.
2
We hit hard, with a loud thud.
Clark and Charley bounced all over the backseat. When the car finally slid
to a stop, they were sitting on top of me.
“Is everyone okay?” Mom asked in a shaky voice. She turned to the back.
“Uh-huh,” I replied. “I guess.”
We all sat quietly for a moment.
Charley broke the silence with a soft whimper.
“Wh-what happened?” Clark stammered.
“Flat tire.” Dad sighed. “I hope the spare is okay. There’s no way we’re
going to get help at night in the middle of a swamp.”
I leaned out the window to check out the tire. Dad was right. It was totally
flat.
Boy, were we lucky, I thought. Lucky this was a low bridge. Otherwise…
“Okay, everybody out of the car,” Mom interrupted my thoughts. “So Dad
can change the tire.”
Clark took a long look out the car window before he opened the door. I
could tell he was afraid.
“Better be careful, Clark,” I said as he swung his short, stubby legs out the
door. “The swamp monster likes low targets.”
“That’s funny, Gretchen. Really funny. Remind me to laugh.”
Dad headed for the trunk to find the jack. Mom followed. Clark and I
stepped into the swamp.
“Oh, gross!” My brand-new white high-tops sank into the thick black mud.
I let out a long sigh.
How could anyone live in a swamp? I wanted to know. It was so gross out
here.
The air felt thick and soupy. So hot, it was hard to breathe.
As I pulled my hair back into a scrunchie, I glanced around.
I couldn’t see much. The sky had darkened to black.
Clark and I drifted away from the car. “Let’s explore while Dad fixes the
tire,” I suggested.
“I don’t think that’s such a great idea,” Clark murmured.
“Sure it is,” I urged. “There’s nothing else to do. And it’s better than
standing around here, waiting. Isn’t it?”
“I—I guess,” Clark stammered.
We took a few steps into the swamp. My face began to tingle and itch.
Mosquitoes! Hundreds of them.
We ducked and dodged, frantically brushing them off our faces, off our bare
arms.
“Yuck! It’s disgusting out here!” Clark cried. “I’m not staying here. I’m
going to Atlanta!”
“It’s not this buggy at Grandma’s house,” Mom called out.
“Oh, sure.” Clark rolled his eyes. “I’m going back to the car.”
“Come on,” I insisted. “Let’s just see what’s over there.” I pointed to a
patch of tall grass up ahead.
I stomped through the mud, glancing over my shoulder—to make sure
Clark was following me. He was.
As we reached the grass, we could hear a loud rustling deep in the blades.
Clark and I peered down, straining to see in the dark.
“Don’t wander too far,” Dad warned, as he and Mom pulled our luggage
from the trunk, searching for a flashlight. “There might be snakes out there.”
“Snakes? Whoa!” Clark jumped away. He started running full speed back to
the car.
“Don’t be a baby!” I called after him. “Let’s do some exploring.”
“No way!” He choked out the words. “And don’t call me a baby.”
“I’m sorry,” I apologized. “Come on. We’ll walk over to that tree. The one
that towers over the others. It’s not that far away. Then we’ll come right back,” I
promised. “Puh-lease.”
Clark and I started toward the tree.
We walked slowly. Through the darkness. Through the jungle of cypress
trees.
The curtains of gray swayed on the tree branches. They were so thick—
thick enough to hide behind.
It would be real easy to get lost in here, I realized. Lost forever.
I shuddered as the heavy gray curtains brushed against my skin. They felt
like spiderwebs. Huge, sticky spiderwebs.
“Come on, Gretchen. Let’s turn back,” Clark pleaded. “It’s gross out here.”
“Just a little further,” I urged him on.
We made our way carefully through the trees, sloshing through puddles of
inky water.
Tiny bugs buzzed in my ears. Bigger ones bit at my neck. I swatted them
away.
I stepped forward—onto a dry, grassy patch of ground. “Whoa!”
The patch started to move. Started to float across the black water.
I leaped off—and stumbled on a tree root. No—not a tree root. “Hey, Clark.
Look at this!” I bent to get a better look.
“What is that?” Clark kneeled beside me and peered at the knobby form.
“It’s called a cypress knee,” I explained. “Mom told me about them. They
grow near the cypress trees. They rise up from the roots.”
“How come Mom never tells me about these things?” he demanded.
“I guess she doesn’t want to scare you,” I replied.
“Yeah, right,” he muttered, pushing up his glasses. “Want to go back now?”
“We’re almost there. See?” I said, pointing to the tall tree. It stood in a
small clearing just a few feet away.
Clark followed me into the clearing.
The air smelled sour here.
The night sounds of the swamp echoed in the darkness. We could hear low
moans. Shrill cries. The moans and cries of swamp creatures, I thought. Hidden
swamp creatures.
A shiver ran down my spine.
I moved deeper into the clearing. The tree with the high branches stood
right before me.
Clark stumbled over a log. Stumbled into a black pool of mucky water.
“That’s it,” he groaned. “I’m outta here.”
Even in the dark, I could see the frightened expression on Clark’s face.
It was scary in the swamp. But Clark seemed so petrified that I started to
giggle.
And then I heard the footsteps.
Clark heard them too.
Heavy, thudding footsteps across the black, misty swamp.
Charging closer.
Headed straight for us.
“Come on!” Clark cried, yanking on my arm. “Time to go!”
But I didn’t move. I couldn’t move.
Now I could hear the creature’s breathing. Heavy, rasping breaths. Nearer.
Nearer.
It came springing out. From behind the gray-bearded tree limbs.
A tall black form. A huge swamp creature. Loping toward us. Darker than
the black swamp mud—with glowing red eyes.
3
“Charley—! What are you doing down there?” Mom cried, marching into the
clearing. “I thought you kids were watching him.”
Charley?
I’d forgotten all about Charley.
Charley was the swamp monster.
“I’ve been looking all over for you,” Mom snapped angrily. “Didn’t we tell
you to stay by the car? Dad and I have been searching everywhere.”
“Sorry, Mom,” I apologized. I couldn’t say any more. Charley leaped on me
and knocked me down—into the mud.
“Off! Charley! Off!” I shouted. But he planted his huge paws on my
shoulders and licked my face.
I was covered in mud. Totally covered.
“Come on, boy.” Clark tugged on Charley’s collar. “You were scared,
Gretchen. You thought Charley was a swamp monster.” Clark laughed. “You
were really scared.”
“I—I was not,” I sputtered, wiping the mud from my jeans. “I was just
trying to scare you.”
“You were really scared. Just admit it,” Clark insisted. “Just admit it.”
“I was NOT scared.” My voice started to rise. “Who was the one begging to
go back?” I reminded him. “You! You! You!”
“What’s all the fighting about?” Dad demanded. “And what are you two
doing way out here? Didn’t I tell you to stay near the car?”
“Um, sorry, Dad,” I apologized. “But we were kind of bored, just waiting
around.”
“We! What do you mean we? It was all Gretchen’s idea,” Clark protested.
“She was the one who wanted to explore the swamp.”
“That’s enough!” Dad scolded. “Everyone—back to the car.”
Clark and I argued all the way back. Charley trotted by my side, flinging
more mud on my jeans.
The flat was fixed—but now Dad had to get the car back on the road. And it
wasn’t easy. Every time he stepped on the gas, the tires just spun around and
around in the thick mud.
Finally, we all got out and pushed.
Now Mom and Clark were splattered with mud, too.
As we drove away, I stared out at the dark, eerie marsh.
And listened to the night sounds.
Sharp chitters.
Low moans.
Shrill cries.
I’d heard lots of stories about swamp monsters. And I’d read some ancient
legends about them. Could they be real? I wondered. Do swamp monsters really
exist?
Little did I know that I would soon find out the answer to that question. The
hard way.
4
“Yes. Yes. They do.”
“No way!” I told Dad. “That can’t be where they live!”
“That’s their house,” Dad insisted as the car bumped up a narrow sandy
road. “That’s Grandma and Grandpa’s house.”
“That can’t be their house.” Clark rubbed his eyes. “It’s a swamp mirage. I
read about them in Creatures from the Muck. The swamp mud plays tricks on
your eyes. It makes you see things.”
See what I mean about Clark? He really does believe the stuff he reads.
And it was beginning to sound right to me, too. How else could you explain
Grandma and Grandpa’s house?
A castle.
A castle in the middle of a swamp.
Almost hidden in a grove of dark, towering trees.
Dad pulled the car up to the front door. I stared at the house in the glow of
the headlights.
Three stories high. Built of dark gray stone. A turret rose up on the right
side. On the left, a sliver of white smoke curled from a blackened chimney.
“I thought swamp houses were smaller,” I murmured, “and built on stilts.”
“That’s the way they look in my comic,” Clark agreed. “And what’s with
the windows?” His voice shook. “Are they vampires or something?”
I stared at the windows. They were tiny. And I could see only three of them.
Three tiny windows in the entire house. One on each floor.
“Come on, kids,” Mom said. “Let’s get your luggage.”
Mom, Dad, and Clark climbed out of the car and headed for the trunk. I
stood by the car door with Charley.
The night air felt cold and damp on my skin.
I stared up.
Up at the big dark house. Almost hidden behind the trees. In the middle of
nowhere.
And then I heard the howl. A mournful howl. From somewhere deep in the
swamp.
A chill swept through me.
Charley pressed against my leg. I bent to pet him. “What could that be?” I
whispered to the dog in the dark. “What kind of creature howls like that?”
“Gretchen. Gretchen.” Mom waved from the front door of the house.
Everyone else had gone inside.
“Oh, my,” Grandma said as I stepped into the dim entrance. “This can’t be
our little Gretchen.” She wrapped her frail arms around me and gave me a big
hug.
She smelled just the way I had remembered—musty. I glanced at Clark. He
rolled his eyes.
I stepped back and forced a smile.
“Move aside, Rose,” Grandpa yelled. “Let me get a look at her.”
“He’s a little hard-of-hearing,” Dad whispered to me.
Grandpa clasped my hand between his wrinkled fingers. He and Grandma
seemed so slight. So fragile.
“We’re really happy you’re here!” Grandma exclaimed. Her blue eyes
twinkled. “We don’t get many visitors!”
“For a while, we thought you weren’t coming!” Grandpa shouted. “We
expected you hours ago.”
“Flat tire,” Dad explained.
“Tired?” Grandpa wrapped his arms around Dad. “Well, then come in and
sit down, son.”
Clark giggled. Mom shoved an elbow into his side. Grandpa and Grandma
led us into the living room.
The room was enormous. Our whole house could probably fit inside it.
The walls were painted green. Drab green. I stared up at the ceiling. Up at
an iron chandelier that held twelve candles, in a circle.
An enormous fireplace took up most of one wall.
The other walls were covered with black-and-white photographs. Yellowed
with age.
Photographs everywhere. Of people I didn’t recognize. Probably dead
relatives, I thought.
I glanced through a doorway into the next room. The dining room. It
appeared to be as big as the living room. Just as dark. Just as dreary.
Clark and I sat down on a tattered green couch. I felt the old springs sag
under my weight. Charley groaned and stretched out on the floor at our feet.
I glanced around the room. At the pictures. At the worn rug. At the shabby
tables and chairs. The flickering light high above us made our shadows dance on
the dark walls.
“This place is creepy,” Clark whispered. “And it really smells bad—worse
than Grandma and Grandpa.”
I choked back a laugh. But Clark was right. The room smelled strange.
Damp and sour.
Why do two old people want to live like this? I wondered. In this musty,
dark house. Deep in the swamp.
“Would anyone like something to drink?” Grandma interrupted my
thoughts. “How about a nice cup of tea?”
Clark and I shook our heads no.
Mom and Dad also said no. They sat opposite us. The stuffing in their
chairs spilled out the backs.
“Well, you’re finally here!” Grandpa yelled to us. “It’s just great. So, tell
me—how come you were late?”
“Grandpa,” Grandma shouted to him, “no more questions!” Then she turned
to us. “After such a long trip, you must be starving. Come into the kitchen. I
made my special chicken pot pie—just for you.”
We followed Grandma and Grandpa into the kitchen. It looked like all the
other rooms. Dark and dingy.
But it didn’t smell as ancient as the other rooms. The tangy aroma of
chicken pot pie floated through the air.
Grandma removed eight small pies from the oven. One for each of us—and
a couple of extras in case we were starving, I guessed.
Grandma placed one on my plate, and I began to dig right in. I was starving.
As I lifted the fork to my mouth, Charley sprang up from his place on the
floor and started to sniff.
He sniffed our chairs.
The counter.
The floor.
He leaped up to the table and sniffed.
“Charley, stop!” Dad ordered. “Down!”
Charley jumped from the table. Then he reared up in front of us—and
curled his upper lip.
He let out a growl.
A low, menacing growl that erupted into loud barking.
Furious barking.
“What on earth is wrong with him?” Grandma demanded, frowning at the
dog.
“I don’t know,” Dad told her. “He’s never done that before.”
“What is it, Charley?” I asked. I shoved my chair from the table and
approached him.
Charley sniffed the air.
He barked.
He sniffed some more.
A chill of fear washed over me.
“What is it, boy? What do you smell?”
5
I grabbed Charley’s collar. Petted him. Tried to calm him down. But he jerked
out of my grasp.
He barked even louder.
I reached for his collar again and tugged him toward me. His nails scraped
the floor as he pulled away.
The more I tugged on his collar, the harder Charley fought. He swung his
head sharply from side to side. And started to growl.
“Easy, boy,” I said softly. “Eeea—sy.”
Nothing worked.
Finally Clark helped me drag Charley into the living room—where he
started to settle down.
“What do you think is wrong with him?” Clark asked as we stroked the
dog’s head.
“I don’t know.” I stared down at Charley. Restless now, he turned in circles.
Then he sat. Then turned in circles. Again and again.
“I just don’t get it. He’s never done that before. Ever.”
Clark and I decided to wait in the living room with Charley while Mom and
Dad finished eating. We weren’t hungry anymore.
“How’s that dog of yours?” Grandpa came in and sat down next to us. He
ran his wrinkled fingers through his thinning gray hair.
“Better,” Clark answered, pushing his glasses up.
“Pet her?” Grandpa hollered. “Sure! If you think that will help.”
After dinner, Mom, Dad, Grandma, and Grandpa talked and talked—about
practically everything that had happened since they last saw each other. Eight
years ago.
Clark and I were bored. Really bored.
“Can we, um, watch television?” Clark finally asked.
“Oh, sorry, dear,” Grandma apologized. “We don’t have a television.”
Clark glowered at me—as if it was my fault.
“Why don’t you call Arnold?” I suggested. Arnold is the biggest nerd in our
neighborhood. And Clark’s best friend. “Remind him to pick up your new
comic.”
“Okay,” Clark grumbled. “Um, where’s the phone?”
“In town.” Grandma smiled weakly. “We don’t know many people—still
alive. Doesn’t pay to have a phone. Mr. Donner—at the general store—he takes
messages for us.”
“Haven’t seen Donner all week, though,” Grandpa added. “Our car broke
down. Should be fixed soon. Any day now.”
No television.
No phone.
No car.
In the middle of a swamp.
This time it was my turn to glower—at Mom and Dad.
I put on my angriest face. I was sure they were going to take us to Atlanta
with them now. Absolutely sure.
Dad glanced at Mom. He opened his mouth to speak. Then he turned
toward me. And shrugged an apology.
“Guess it’s time for bed!” Grandpa checked his watch. “You two have to get
an early start,” he said to Mom and Dad.
“Tomorrow you’re going to have so much fun,” Grandma assured Clark and
me.
“Yes, indeed,” Grandpa agreed. “This big old house is great to explore.
You’ll have a real adventure!”
“And I’m going to bake my famous rhubarb pie!” Grandma exclaimed.
“You kids can help me. You’ll love it. It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after
one bite!”
I heard Clark gulp.
I groaned—loudly.
Mom and Dad ignored us. They said good night. And good-bye. They were
leaving real early in the morning. Probably before we got up.
We followed Grandma up the dark, creaky old steps and down a long,
winding hall to our rooms on the second floor.
Clark’s room was right next to mine. I didn’t have a chance to see what it
looked like. After Clark went in, Grandma quickly ushered me to my room.
My room. My gloomy room.
I set my suitcase down next to the bed and glanced around. The room was
nearly as big as a gym! And it didn’t have a single window.
The only light came from a dim yellow bulb in a small lamp next to the
bed.
A handmade rug covered the floor. Worn thin in spots, its rings of color
were dingy with age.
A warped wooden dresser sat against the wall opposite the bed. It leaned to
one side. The drawers hung out.
A bed. A lamp. A dresser.
Only three pieces of furniture in this huge, windowless room.
Even the walls were bare. Not a single picture covered the dreary gray
paint.
I sat down on the bed. I leaned against the bars of the iron headboard.
I ran my fingers over the blanket. Scratchy wool. Scratchy wool that
smelled of mothballs.
“No way I’m going to use that blanket,” I said out loud. “No way.” But I
knew I would. The room was cold and damp, and I began to shiver.
I quickly changed into my pajamas and pulled the smelly old blanket over
me.
I twisted and turned. Trying to get comfortable on the lumpy mattress.
I stared up at the ceiling and listened. Listened to the night sounds of the
creepy old house. Strange creaking noises that echoed through the old walls.
Then I heard the howls.
Frightening animal howls on the other side of the wall.
The sad howls from the swamp.
I sat up.
Were they coming from Clark’s room?
6
I listened hard, afraid to move.
Another long, sad howl. From outside. Not from Clark’s room.
“Stop it!” I scolded myself. “Clark is the one with the wild imagination.
Not you!”
But I couldn’t shut out the eerie howls from the swamp.
Was it an animal? Was it a swamp monster?
I pressed the pillows over my face. It took me hours to fall asleep.
When I woke up, I didn’t know if it was morning—or the middle of the
night. Without a window, it was impossible to tell.
I read my watch—8:30. Morning.
I searched through the suitcase for my new pink T-shirt. I needed something
to cheer me up—and pink is my favorite color. I pulled on my jeans. Slipped on
my muddy sneakers.
I dressed quickly. The room reminded me of a prison cell. I wanted to
escape fast.
I opened the bedroom door and peeked into the hall.
Empty.
But there, across from my room, I saw a small window. I hadn’t noticed it
the night before.
A bright ray of sunshine filtered through the dusty glass. I peered outside—
into the swamp.
A heavy mist hung over the red cypress trees, casting a soft, rosy glow over
the wet land. The glowing mist made the swamp look mysterious and unreal.
Something purple fluttered on a nearby tree limb. A purple bird. A purple
bird with a bright orange beak. I’d never seen a bird like that before.
Then I heard the sounds again.
The horrible howls. The shrill cries.
From animals hiding deep in the swamp—all kinds of creatures I’d
probably never seen before.
Swamp creatures.
Swamp monsters.
I shuddered. Then turned away from the window and headed for Clark’s
room.
I knocked on the door. “Clark!”
No answer.
“Clark?”
Silence.
I burst through the door and let out a cry.
The sheets on Clark’s bed lay in a tangled mess—as if there had been some
kind of struggle.
And now there was nothing left of Clark—nothing but part of his pajamas,
crumpled on the bed!
7
“Noooo!”
I opened my mouth in a terrified cry.
“Gretchen—what’s your problem?”
Clark stepped out from the closet.
He wore a T-shirt, baseball cap, sneakers, and his pajama bottoms.
“Uh… n-no problem,” I stammered, my heart still pounding.
“Then why did you scream?” Clark demanded. “And why do you look so
weird?”
“I look weird? You’re the one who looks weird,” I snapped. I pointed to his
pajama bottoms. “Where are your pants?”
“I don’t know.” He shook his head. “I think Mom must have packed them
in your suitcase by mistake.”
I have to stop letting this big, old house spook me. Clark is the one with the
wild imagination—not me, I reminded myself again.
“Come on,” I told my stepbrother. “Let’s go back to my room and look for
your jeans.”
On the way down to breakfast, Clark stopped to peer out the hall window.
The mist had cleared. The dew-covered plants glistened in the sunlight.
“It looks sort of pretty, doesn’t it?” I murmured.
“Yeah,” Clark replied. “Pretty. Pretty creepy.”
The kitchen looked pretty creepy too. It was dark—almost as dark in the
morning as the night before. But the back door was open and some sun splashed
on the floor and the walls.
We could hear the sounds of the swamp through the open door. But I tried
to ignore them.
Grandma stood by the stove, a spatula in one hand, a huge plate of
blueberry pancakes in the other. She set down the spatula and plate and wiped
her hands on her faded flower apron. Then she gave us each a big good-morning
hug—smearing Clark with pancake batter.
I pointed at the stains on his shirt and giggled. Then I glanced down at my
shirt. My brand-new pink T-shirt. Splotched with blueberry stains.
I glanced around the kitchen for something to use to clean my shirt. The
room was a disaster.
Globs of pancake batter dripped from the stove. Batter covered the
countertops and stuck to the floor.
Then I took a good look at Grandma. She was a disaster too.
Her face was striped—blue and white. Flour and blueberry stains filled the
creases of her wrinkled cheeks. She had flour streaked across her nose and chin.
“Did you sleep well?” She smiled, and her blue eyes crinkled. With the
back of her hand, she wiped a wisp of gray hair from her eyes. Now a glob of
blueberry batter nested in the thin strands of her hair.
“I did,” Grandpa answered, as a loud shriek rang out from the swamp.
“Always do. It’s so quiet and peaceful here.”
I had to smile. Maybe Grandpa is lucky that he’s hard-of-hearing, I thought.
Grandpa headed out the door, and Clark and I brushed ourselves off. Then
we took our seats at the table.
In the middle of the table sat another plate of blueberry pancakes. This plate
was even bigger than the one Grandma had been holding. And it was stacked
high with blueberry pancakes.
“Grandma must think we eat like pigs,” Clark leaned over and whispered.
“There’s enough here for fifty people.”
“I know,” I groaned. “And we’ll have to eat them all. Otherwise, she’ll be
insulted.”
“We do?” Clark gulped.
That’s one of the things I really like about my stepbrother. He believes
almost everything I tell him.
“Help yourself,” Grandma chirped, carrying two more plates of pancakes to
the table. “Don’t be shy.”
Why did Grandma make all these pancakes? I wondered. There’s no way we
could eat all of them. No way.
I placed a few pancakes on my plate. Grandma heaped about ten onto
Clark’s plate. His face turned green.
Grandma sat down with us. But her plate remained empty. She didn’t take a
single pancake.
All those pancakes and she didn’t even take one. I don’t get it, I thought. I
just don’t get it.
“What’s that you’re reading, dear?” She pointed to Clark’s rolled-up comic,
sticking out of the back pocket of his jeans.
“Creatures from the Muck,” he answered between bites.
“Oh, how interesting,” Grandma replied. “I love to read. So does Grandpa
Eddie. We read all the time. We love mysteries. ‘There’s nothing like a good
mystery,’ Grandpa Eddie always says.”
I jumped up from the table. I just remembered—Grandma and Grandpa’s
presents were still packed in my suitcase.
Books! Mysteries! Dad told us they loved them.
“Be right back!” I excused myself and dashed upstairs.
I started down the long, winding hall to my room. Then stopped when I
heard footsteps.
Who could it be?
I gazed down the dark hall. I gasped when I spotted a shadow moving
against the wall. Someone else was up here. Someone was creeping toward me.
8
I pressed my back against the wall. Held my breath and listened.
The shadow slid out of view.
The footsteps grew softer.
Still holding my breath, I inched down the dark twisting hallway. I peeked
around a corner. And saw it.
The shadow. Nearly shapeless in the dim light.
It moved slowly along the dark green walls, growing smaller as the
footsteps faded in the distance.
I crept swiftly but silently, chasing the shadow through the corridor.
Whose shadow is it? I wondered. Who else is up here?
I crept closer.
The shadow on the wall loomed large again.
My heartbeat quickened as I chased the mysterious shape.
The shadow turned another corner. I hurried to the turn as quietly as I could.
And stopped.
Whoever it was—stood right there. Just beyond the turn.
I took a deep breath—and peeked around the corner.
And saw Grandpa Eddie.
Grandpa Eddie—carrying a huge platter stacked high with blueberry
pancakes.
How did Grandpa get up here? I wondered. I thought I saw him go outside.
Grandpa came in through another door, I decided. That has to be it. This
house is huge. It probably has lots of doors and halls and stairways I haven’t
discovered yet.
But what was he doing up here carrying an enormous tray of pancakes?
Where was he taking them?
What a mystery!
Grandpa Eddie carefully balanced the big silver tray between his hands as
he made his way down the hall.
I have to follow him, I thought. I have to see where he’s going.
I padded down the hallway. I wasn’t too worried about being quiet now.
After all, Grandpa didn’t hear too well.
I walked only a few yards behind him.
When I heard the sounds, I froze.
Sniffing. Behind me. Furious sniffing.
Oh, no! Charley!
Charley bounded down the hall toward me. Sniffing. Sniffing furiously.
Then the dog spotted me—and stopped.
“Good dog,” I whispered, trying to shoo him away. “Go back. Go back.”
But he broke into a run. Barking his head off.
I grabbed for his collar as he tried to dodge me—to race down the hall to
Grandpa.
I grasped the collar tightly. He barked even louder.
“Rose?” Grandpa Eddie called out. “Is that you, Rose?”
“Come on, Charley,” I whispered. “Let’s get out of here.”
I dragged Charley around the corner—before Grandpa could catch me
spying on him. Tugging the dog, I ducked into my room.
I sat down on the scratchy blanket for a second to catch my breath. Then I
quickly rummaged through my suitcase for Grandma and Grandpa’s mystery
books.
Where was Grandpa going with those pancakes? I wondered as I hurried
down the stairs with the presents.
Why was he creeping along so silently?
It was a mystery I had to solve.
If only I had minded my own business….
9
“Why don’t you two go out and play while I clean up these dishes?” Grandma
suggested after breakfast. “Then you can help me make my sweet-as-sugar
rhubarb pie!”
“Play?” Clark grumbled. “Does she think we’re two years old?”
“Let’s go out, Clark.” I pulled him through the back door. Hanging out in a
swamp wasn’t exactly my idea of fun. But anything was better than sitting
around that creepy old house.
We stepped into the bright sunlight—and I gasped. The hot, steamy air felt
like a heavy weight against my skin. I tried to breathe deeply—to shake the
smothered feeling I had.
“So what are we going to do?” Clark grumbled, also drawing in a deep
breath.
I glanced around and spotted a path. It started at the back of the house and
trailed into the swamp.
“Let’s explore a little,” I suggested.
“I am not walking through a swamp,” Clark declared. “No way.”
“What are you afraid of? Comic-book monsters?” I teased him. “Creatures
from the muck?” I laughed.
“You’re a riot,” Clark muttered, scowling.
We walked a few steps. The sun filtered through the treetops, casting leafy
shadows along the trail.
“Snakes,” Clark admitted. “I’m afraid of snakes.”
“Don’t worry,” I told him. “I’ll watch out for snakes. You watch out for
gators.”
“Gators?” Clark’s eyes opened wide.
“Yeah, sure,” I replied. “Swamps are filled with man-eating alligators.”
A voice interrupted us. “Gretchen. Clark. Don’t stray too far.”
I turned and saw Grandpa. He stood a few yards behind us.
What was that in his hand?
A huge saw. Its sharp teeth glinted in the sunlight.
Grandpa headed toward a small, unfinished shed. It stood a few feet off the
side of the path, tucked between two tall cypress trees.
“Okay!” I shouted to Grandpa. “We won’t go far.”
“Want to help finish the shed?” he yelled, waving the saw. “Building things
builds confidence, I always say!”
“Um, maybe later,” I answered.
“Want to help?” Grandpa shouted again.
Clark cupped his hands around his mouth and yelled, “LA-TER!” Then he
turned back toward the path.
And tripped.
Over a dark form that rose up quickly, silently from the muddy grass.
10
“Gator! Gator!” Clark shrieked.
Grandpa waved his saw wildly. “Later? Later? Okay!”
“Help me! Help me! It’s got me!” Clark wailed.
I peered down.
Down at the dark shape in the grass.
And laughed.
“Cypress knee,” I said calmly.
Clark turned, his mouth still open in fright. He stared at the knobby form in
the grass.
“It’s a cypress limb, poking up from the grass,” I explained. “It’s called a
cypress knee. I showed you one yesterday. Remember?”
“I remembered!” he lied. “I just wanted to scare you.”
I started to crack a joke, but I saw Clark’s whole body trembling as he
picked himself up. I felt kind of sorry for him. “Let’s go back to the house,” I
suggested. “Grandma is probably waiting for us. To make her sweet-as-sugar
rhubarb pie.”
On the way back, I told Clark about seeing Grandpa upstairs, and the huge
tray of pancakes he carried. But Clark didn’t think it was all that strange.
“He probably likes to eat in bed,” he said. “Mom and Dad always like
breakfast in bed.”
“Yeah, maybe,” I agreed. But I wasn’t convinced. I wasn’t convinced at all.
“Well, you two look as if you’ve had fun!” Grandma chirped when we
walked through the door.
Clark and I glanced at each other and shrugged.
“Are you ready to bake?” Grandma smiled. “Everything is ready.” She
waved at the counter, at the pie ingredients all lined up.
“Who wants to roll out the dough,” she asked, staring straight at me, “while
I slice the rhubarb?”
“I guess I will,” I replied.
Clark sighed. “Uh, maybe I’ll go into the living room and read my comic,”
he told Grandma, trying to escape. “Mom says I just get in the way when she
cooks.”
“Nonsense!” Grandma replied. “You measure out the sugar. Lots and lots of
sugar.”
I rolled out the pie dough. It seemed like an awful lot of dough. But then—
what did I know? I’m never around when Mom bakes. She says I get in the way
too.
When the dough was rolled flat, Grandma took over. “Okay, children. You
sit down at the table and have a nice glass of milk. I’ll finish up.”
Clark and I weren’t thirsty. But we didn’t feel like arguing. We drank our
milk and watched Grandma finish making the pie.
No—not one pie. Three pies.
“Grandma, how come you’re making three pies?” I asked.
“I always like to have a little extra,” she explained. “Just in case company
drops in.”
Company? I thought. Company?
I stared at Grandma.
Is she totally losing it?
Who did she think was coming to visit? She lives in the middle of nowhere!
What is going on around here? I wondered.
Is Grandma really expecting visitors?
Why does she make so much extra food?
11
“Work builds thirst!” Grandpa announced, banging open the kitchen door. He
headed for the refrigerator. “See! I’m right!” Grandpa pointed to our empty milk
glasses. “Are you two ready to help with the shed now?”
“Eddie, the children didn’t come here to work!” Grandma scolded. “Why
don’t you two have some fun exploring the house? There are endless rooms. I’m
sure you’ll find some wonderful treasures.”
“Great idea!” Grandpa’s face lit up with a smile. But it faded quickly. “Just
one warning. You’ll find a locked room. At the end of the hall on the third floor.
Now pay attention, children. Stay away from that room.”
“Why? What’s in it?” Clark demanded.
Grandma and Grandpa exchanged worried glances. Grandma’s face turned
bright pink.
“It’s a supply room,” Grandpa replied. “We’ve stored away things in there.
Old things. Fragile things. Things that could easily break. So just stay away.”
Clark and I took off. We were glad to get away. Grandma Rose and
Grandpa Eddie were nice—but weird.
The kitchen, living room, and dining room took up most of the first floor.
And we’d seen them already.
There was a library on the first floor too. But the books in there were old
and dusty. They made me sneeze. Nothing very exciting in there. So Clark and I
headed upstairs. To the second floor.
We made our way past our bedrooms.
Past the little hall window.
We followed the twists and turns of the dim hallway—until we came to the
next room.
Grandma and Grandpa’s bedroom.
“I don’t think we should go in there,” I told Clark. “I don’t think Grandma
and Grandpa want us snooping through their things.”
“Come on!” he urged. “Don’t you want to check it out? For pancake
crumbs.” He laughed.
I shoved Clark hard.
“Hey!” he grumbled. His glasses slid down his nose. “It was just a joke.”
I left my stepbrother in the hall and opened the door to the next room. The
door was made of heavy, dark wood. It groaned when I pushed it.
I fumbled in the dark for the light switch. The room glowed a sickly yellow
—from a single, dirty bulb, dangling from the ceiling.
In the dreary light, I could make out cartons. A room full of cartons. Stacks
and stacks of them.
“Hey! Maybe there’s some cool stuff in these boxes,” Clark said, pushing
past me.
Clark began to pry one open. “Whatever is in here must be pretty big,” he
said, pointing to the carton’s bulging sides.
I peered over Clark’s shoulder. The room smelled so musty and sour. I held
my nose and squinted in the dim light. Waiting for Clark to reveal what was
inside the box.
Clark struggled with the cardboard flaps—and finally they sprang open.
“I don’t believe this!” he exclaimed.
“What?” I demanded, craning my neck. “What?”
“Newspapers. Old newspapers,” Clark reported.
We lifted the top layers of newspapers to reveal—more newspapers. Old,
yellowed newspapers.
We opened five more boxes.
Newspapers.
All the cartons were stuffed with newspapers. A room filled with cartons
and cartons of newspapers. Dating way back to before Dad was born. More than
fifty years of newspapers.
Why would anyone want to save all this stuff? I wondered.
“Whoa!” Clark leaned over a box across the room. “You’re not going to
believe what’s in this one!”
“What? What’s in it?”
“Magazines.” Clark grinned.
My brother was starting to get on my nerves. But I made my way across the
room. I liked magazines. Old ones and new ones.
I shoved my hand deep inside the magazine box and lifted out a stack.
I felt something tickle the palm of my hand. Under the magazines.
I peeked underneath.
And screamed.
12
Hundreds of cockroaches skittered through my fingers.
I flung the magazines to the floor.
I shook my hand hard, trying to shake the ugly brown bugs off. “Help me!”
I wailed. “Get them off me!”
I felt prickly legs scurrying up my arm.
I struggled to brush them off—but there were dozens of them!
Clark grabbed a magazine from the floor and tried to swat them off. But as
he whacked my arm, more roaches flew out from the pages.
Onto my T-shirt. My neck. My face!
“Ow! Nooo!” I shrieked. “Help me! Help me!”
I felt a cockroach skitter across my chin.
I brushed it off—and slapped one off my cheek.
Frantic, I grabbed Clark’s comic from his back pocket—and began batting
at the scurrying cockroaches. Brushing and batting. Brushing and batting.
“Gretchen! Stop!” I heard Clark scream. “Stop! They’re all off. Stop!”
Gasping for breath, I peered down.
He was right. They were gone.
But my body still itched. I wondered if I would itch forever.
I went out into the hall and sat on the floor. I had to wait for my heart to
stop pounding before I could speak. “That was so gross,” I finally moaned.
“Totally gross.”
“Tell me about it.” Clark sighed. “Did you have to use my comic?” He held
it up by a corner. Not sure if it was safe to stuff back in his pocket.
My skin still felt as if prickly roach legs were crawling all over it. I
shuddered—and brushed myself off one last time.
“Okay.” I stood up and peered down the dreary hallway. “Let’s see what’s
in the next room.”
“Really?” Clark asked. “You really want to?”
“Why not?” I told him. “I’m not afraid of little bugs. Are you?”
Clark hated bugs. I knew he did. Big ones and little ones. But he wouldn’t
admit it. So he led the way into the next room.
We pushed open the heavy door—and peered inside.
13
“Wow! Look at all this junk!” My stepbrother stood in the middle of the room.
Spinning round and round. Taking it all in.
A room filled with toys and games. Really old toys and games. Mountains
of them.
In one corner stood a rusty tricycle. The big front tire was missing.
“I bet this belonged to Dad,” I said. It was hard to imagine Dad as a little
kid, riding this trike.
I honked the horn. It still worked.
Clark pulled out a dusty chess set from a banged-up wooden box. He began
setting up the board while I hunted through the rest of the junk.
I found a teddy bear with its head badly twisted out of shape.
A box that held a single roller skate.
A stuffed toy monkey with one of its arms yanked off.
I rummaged through bags and bags of little toy soldiers, their uniforms
faded, their faces rubbed off.
Then I spotted an antique toy chest. It had a golden carousel painted on it,
dulled with age.
I lifted the dusty lid. A porcelain doll rested face down inside the chest.
I lifted her gently. And turned her face toward me.
Fine cracks ran across her delicate cheeks. A small chip marred the tip of
her nose.
Then I stared into her eyes—and gasped.
She had no eyes.
No eyes at all.
Just two black holes cut out of the space below her small forehead. Two
gaping black holes.
“These are Grandma’s treasures?” I croaked. “It’s all junk!”
I dropped the doll into the chest.
And heard a squeak.
From the other side of the room. Next to the door.
I turned and saw a rocking horse, rocking back and forth.
“Clark, did you push that horse?” I demanded.
“No,” Clark replied, softly, watching the horse rock back and forth. Back
and forth. Squeaking.
“Let’s get out of here,” I said. “This room is starting to give me the creeps.”
“Me, too,” Clark said. “Someone beheaded the queen in the chess set.
Chewed her head right off.”
Clark leaped over some boxes and jumped into the hall.
I turned for one last look before I clicked off the light. Totally creepy.
“Clark?”
Where did he go?
I glanced up and down the long hall.
No sign of him. But he was just there. Standing in the doorway.
“Clark? Where are you?”
I walked down the corridor, following its twists and turns.
A queasy feeling settled in my stomach. My heart began to race.
“Clark? This isn’t funny.”
No answer.
“Clark? Where are you?”
14
“BOOOOOO!”
I let out a long shrill scream.
Clark stepped out from behind me, bent over with laughter. “Gotcha!” he
cried. “Gotcha big-time!”
“That wasn’t funny, Clark,” I growled at him. “It was just dumb. I wasn’t
even scared.”
He rolled his eyes. “Why can’t you just admit it, Gretchen? Admit it—just
once. You were totally scared.”
“Not!” I insisted. “You just surprised me. That’s all.” I stuffed my hands in
my jeans pockets so Clark wouldn’t see them shaking. “You’re a real jerk,” I told
him.
“Well, Grandma told us to have fun. And that was fun!” he teased. “So
where should we go now?”
“We aren’t going anywhere,” I told him angrily. “I’m going to hide in my
room and read.”
“Hey! Great idea!” Clark exclaimed. “Let’s play hide-and-seek!”
“Play? Did I hear you say play?” I asked sarcastically. “I thought you said
that only two-year-olds play.”
“This is different,” Clark explained. “Hide-and-seek in this house is
definitely not for babies.”
“Clark, I am not—”
He didn’t let me finish. “NOT IT!” he cried. Then he took off, running
down the hall to hide.
“I don’t want to be It,” I grumbled. “I don’t want to play hide-and-seek.”
Okay, I told myself. Get this over with. Find Clark fast. Then you can go to
your room and read.
I started to count by fives.
“Five, ten, fifteen, twenty…” I called out, counting to one hundred. Then I
started down the dark hall. When I reached the end, the hall turned—revealing
an old winding staircase that led up to the third floor.
I started to climb the dusty, wooden stairs. They wound round and round. I
looked up ahead, but I couldn’t see where the steps led.
I couldn’t even see my own feet. It was totally black in there.
The stairs creaked and groaned with every step I took. A thick layer of
grime coated the banister—but I held onto it anyway. And I groped my way up
—up the dark, winding staircase.
Breathing hard, I climbed higher and higher. The dust in the air stuck in my
throat. It smelled sour and old.
I finally reached the top of the staircase and peered down the third-floor
hallway. It looked like the one below—with the same twists and turns.
The same dark green walls. The same dim shaft of light that entered from a
single window.
I slowly moved down the hall and opened the first door I reached.
It was a huge room. Almost as big as the living room. But totally empty.
The next room was just as large. Just as empty.
I moved carefully down the dark hall.
It was really hot up here. Beads of sweat dripped down the sides of my
face. I blotted them with the sleeve of my T-shirt.
The next room I entered was small. Well, not exactly small, but the smallest
I’d seen so far. Against one wall stood an old player piano.
If it wasn’t so gross up here, I’d come back to this room, I thought. I’d
come back and see if the old piano worked.
But right now all I wanted to do was find Clark in his hiding place. And
leave.
I walked a little farther.
Rounded a corner.
And choked on a scream—as I started to fall.
No floor!
No floor at all beneath my feet!
My hand shot out in the dark, fumbling for something to grab onto.
I grabbed something hard—an old banister.
And held on. Held on. Held on.
I gripped it tightly with both hands and swung myself back. Back up to the
solid hallway floor.
My heart pounding, I stared down into the gaping black hole where I had
fallen. A hole where an old staircase once stood. Now rotted away with age.
I let out a long sigh. “I’ll get you for this, Clark,” I cried out loud. “I told
you I didn’t want to play.”
I hurried down the hall, searching for my stepbrother. Searching quickly. To
get this dumb game over with.
And then I stopped.
And stared—at the door at the end of the hall.
A door with a shiny metal lock.
I moved slowly toward the door. A tarnished silver key rested in the
keyhole.
What is inside there? I wondered. Why is it locked?
I stepped closer.
Why don’t Grandma and Grandpa want us in that room?
They said it was a supply room.
Practically every room in this weird old house is a storage room, I thought.
Why don’t they want us to open that door?
I stood in front of the door.
I reached out my hand.
And wrapped my fingers around the silver key.
15
No.
I pulled my hand away from the doorknob.
I have to find Clark, I decided. I’m tired of playing this stupid game. I’m
tired of being It.
Then I had a great idea.
I’ll hide! I’ll trick Clark into being It!
I’ll hide and Clark will get bored waiting for me to find him. He’ll have to
look for me!
Perfect! I thought. Now… where shall I hide?
I searched the rest of the rooms on the third floor—scouting out a good
hiding place. But the rooms up here were all empty. Nothing to slip behind.
Nothing to crawl under.
I returned to the little room with the player piano. Maybe I can figure out a
way to hide behind that, I thought.
I tried to push the piano away from the wall.
Just enough so I could squeeze behind it. But it was way too heavy. I
couldn’t budge it.
I made my way back to the door with the silver key—the locked room.
I peered up and down the dim hall. Had I searched everywhere? Did I miss
a room?
That’s when I spotted it.
A small door. A door in the wall.
A door I hadn’t noticed before.
A door to a dumbwaiter.
I’d seen dumbwaiters in the movies. In big, old houses like this one. They
were little elevators that carried food and dishes from one floor to another. Pretty
cool.
A dumbwaiter! I thought. A perfect place to hide! I turned and started
toward it—when I heard a crash. A crash—like the sound of a plate dropping.
A crash coming from the other side of the door with the silver key.
I pressed my ear against the door. I heard footsteps.
So that’s where Clark is hiding! I realized. He is such a cheater! He hid in
the one place he knew I wouldn’t look!
He hid in the room Grandma and Grandpa told us to stay out of.
Well, Clark, I thought. Too bad for you. I found you!
I slipped my fingers around the key and turned it. The lock sprang open
with a sharp click. I yanked open the door.
And stared at a hideous monster.
16
I nearly fell into the room.
I couldn’t move. Couldn’t back away. Couldn’t take my eyes off him.
A living, breathing monster. At least ten feet tall.
Standing inside the locked room.
I gaped at his big, furry body. A body like a gorilla—with leaves and tree
roots and sand tangled in his fur. His head was scaly, with snapping rows of
jagged alligator teeth.
A foul stench filled the room. The putrid smell of decay. The smell of the
swamp.
My stomach heaved.
The creature raised his eyes to me—bulging eyes set into the sides of his
enormous head.
He held me in his stare for a moment. Then he glanced down at his hairy
paws—where he balanced a tall stack of pancakes.
He began stuffing the pancakes into his mouth. Devouring them. Gnashing
them with his jagged teeth.
Still gripping the door handle, I stared at the monster as he ate. He jammed
another stack of pancakes down his throat. He swallowed them whole and
grunted with pleasure.
His horrible alligator eyes went wide. The thick veins in his neck throbbed
as he ate.
I tried to call for help. To scream. But when I opened my mouth, no sound
came out.
With one hand the monster shoved pancakes into his mouth—stacks at a
time. With the other, he scratched at one of his furry legs.
Scratched and scratched. Until he found a big black beetle, nesting in his
fur.
He held the beetle up to the side of his head—to one of his bulging eyes.
The beetle’s legs waved in the air.
He glared at the beetle. At the waving legs.
Then he popped the bug into his mouth—and chomped down on its shiny
black shell with a sickening crunch.
Blueberries and beetle juice oozed from his mouth.
Run! I told myself. Run! But I was too terrified to move.
The creature reached down for another stack of pancakes.
I forced myself to take a small step back—into the hall.
The monster jerked his head up.
He glared at me. Then he let out a deep growl.
He let the pancakes slide to the floor and lumbered toward me.
I ran, screaming for help as I charged into the hall.
“Gretchen! Gretchen! What’s wrong?” Clark turned the corner at the end of
the corridor.
“A monster! In the locked room! Hurry!” I shrieked. “Hurry! Get help!”
I leaped down the stairs. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. “A monster!”
I turned to see if the beast was following me—and realized that Clark
hadn’t moved.
“There’s a monster in there!” I wailed. “Get away, Clark! Get away!”
He snickered. “You must think I’m pretty stupid to fall for that one.”
Clark headed toward the door of the monster’s room. Grinning.
“No! Please!” I pleaded. “I’m telling the truth!”
“You just want to scare me. To get even.”
“I’m not kidding, Clark! Don’t go in there!” I shrieked. “DON’T!”
Clark reached the door. “Here I am, swamp monster!” he called out as he
stepped into the room. “Come and get me!”
17
A second later Clark’s terrified screams echoed from the room.
The creature roared over Clark’s cries.
Charley bounded up the stairs, barking wildly.
“Run! Run!” Clark came bursting from the room, waving his arms. “A
monster! A swamp monster!”
We tore down the stairs, dragging Charley with us. Charley fought hard. He
wanted to turn around and charge back up the steps.
“Charley, come!” I pleaded. “Come!”
But Charley sat down on a step and howled. He wouldn’t budge.
A bellow thundered through the hall.
Oh, no! He’s coming! He’s coming after us!
“PLEASE, CHARLEY!” I begged, yanking on his collar. “PLEASE!”
Clark stood on the steps, frozen in fear.
“Help me, Clark!” I pleaded. “Don’t just stand there. Help me!”
The swamp monster pounded down the hall. The old stairway quaked under
our feet.
“He’s coming to get us,” Clark whispered. He still hadn’t moved.
I grabbed my stepbrother’s T-shirt and yanked him hard. “Help me, Clark!”
I screamed. “Push Charley!”
We struggled down the stairs. I tugged Charley and Clark shoved him from
behind.
“Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out.
No answer.
The monster’s roar grew louder. Closer.
“Lock Charley in the bathroom!” I ordered Clark when we reached the
second floor. “He’ll be safe there. I’ll find Grandma and Grandpa.”
I charged down to the kitchen. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I yelled. “A monster!”
No one in the kitchen.
I flew into the living room. “Where are you? Help!”
Not in the living room.
I searched the library. Empty.
I ran back up the stairs. I checked their bedroom and all the other rooms on
the second floor.
I couldn’t find them anywhere.
Where are they? Where could they be? I asked myself.
Clark stepped out of the bathroom—just in time to hear the monster’s
footsteps rumbling above us.
“W-where’s Grandma and Grandpa?” he stammered.
“I—I don’t know. I can’t find them!”
“Did you check outside?” His voice came out in a squeak.
That’s it! I thought. Don’t panic, Gretchen. They must be outside. Probably
in the back. Grandpa is probably working on the shed.
We bolted down the stairs and into the kitchen.
We stopped at the back door. Stared out across the swamp. To the shed.
No one back there.
“Where are—?” Clark began.
“Listen!” I cut Clark off. “Do you hear that?”
The sound of a car—starting up.
“Grandpa and Grandma’s car! It’s back! It’s fixed!” I shouted.
We followed the sound of the engine. It was coming from the front of the
house.
We ran to the front door and peered out the window.
There they were!
“Huh?” I cried out in shock.
My grandparents were backing down the driveway.
They were driving away!
“No—wait! Wait!” I screamed, turning the lock.
“They can’t hear you!” Clark shouted. “Open the door! Open it!”
I yanked on the door. I pulled it as hard as I could. I turned the lock again.
“Hurry!” Clark shrieked. “They’re leaving us here!”
I tugged and tugged. And turned the knob frantically.
Then I realized the horrible truth.
“It’s bolted from the outside!” I told Clark. “They’ve locked us in!”
18
“How could they do this to us?” I wailed. “How could they leave us here? Why
did they lock us in?”
The ceiling shook above our heads. Shook hard. Hard enough to send the
pictures on the living room wall crashing to the floor.
“What was that?” Clark’s eyebrows shot up.
“The monster! He’s coming after us!” I croaked. “We have to get out of
here! We have to find help!”
Clark and I ran back to the kitchen. To the kitchen door.
I twisted the doorknob. Pulled as hard as I could. But this door was also
jammed shut—barred from the outside.
We ran through the house.
We checked all the side doors.
All stuck. All of them—bolted shut from the other side.
The monster’s footsteps rumbled above us.
How could Grandma and Grandpa do this to us? How could they? How
could they? The question screamed in my head as I charged into the library. To
the window.
The only window on the entire first floor.
Our only escape now.
I struggled to shove the window up.
It wouldn’t budge.
I pounded on the wooden sash with my fists.
“Look!” Clark choked. He pointed to the grimy pane. “Look!”
Two rusty nails. Driven into the wooden sash. Nailing the window shut—
from the outside.
Nailing us in.
How could they do this to us? How could they? I chanted silently. How
could they?
“We have to break the glass!” I turned to Clark. “It’s the only way out!”
“Okay!” Clark cried. He leaned forward and began beating his fists against
the pane.
“Are you nuts?” I screamed at him. “Find something stronger to—”
But the rest of my sentence was lost—lost in a deafening crash from above.
Followed by the thundering clatter of piano keys.
“Wh-what’s he doing?” Clark stammered.
“There’s an old piano up there. It sounds as if he’s throwing it across the
room!”
The floors, the walls, the library ceiling—everything quaked—as the
monster hurled the piano across the third-floor room. Over and over again.
A porcelain vase, a crystal dish, little glass animals flew from a nearby table
and shattered at our feet.
I threw my hands over my head as the library books spilled from their
shelves.
Clark and I huddled together. On the floor. Waiting for the avalanche of
books to end.
Waiting for the monster to stop.
We huddled there until the house grew silent.
A final book tumbled from a shelf. It landed on a small table next to me.
“Hand me that!” I ordered Clark, pointing to a heavy brass candlestick next
to the book. “Stand back.”
I turned to the window. I pulled back my arm to swing the heavy
candlestick—when I heard the whimpering.
Charley’s whimpering. From upstairs.
“Oh, no!” I gasped. “The monster—he’s got Charley!”
19
I ran for the stairway, clutching the candlestick in one hand, dragging Clark with
the other.
I had to save Charley! I had to!
I raced up the stairs. I stopped when I reached the top.
My heart pounded in my chest as I peered down the hall.
The corridor was empty.
I crept toward the bathroom. Except for Clark’s raspy breathing and the
thudding of my heart, the house was still.
As I neared the bathroom, the bathroom door came into view.
Shut.
I gripped the doorknob. It slipped in my sweat-drenched hand.
I opened the door a crack and peeked inside. But I couldn’t see anything.
I could feel Clark breathing down my neck as I pushed the door open a bit
more.
A bit more.
“Charley!” I cried out with relief.
Charley sat in the bathtub. Curled up in a corner. Scared—but safe.
He gazed up at us with his big brown eyes. He wagged his tail weakly.
Then he began to bark.
“Shhhh!” I whispered, petting him. “Please, Charley. Don’t let the monster
hear you. Quiet, boy.”
Charley barked even louder.
So loud that we almost didn’t hear the car pull up outside.
“Shhhh!” I urged Charley. I turned to Clark. “Did you hear that?”
His mouth dropped open. “A car door!”
“Yes!” I cried.
“Grandma and Grandpa are back!” Clark shouted. “I’ll bet they brought
help!”
“Stay,” I commanded Charley as we eased out of the bathroom. “Good boy.
Stay.”
Clark slammed the door behind us, and we bolted down the stairs.
“I knew they’d be back! I knew they wouldn’t just leave us!” I flew down
the steps, two at a time.
And heard the engine start.
Heard the car rumble away.
Heard the tires crunch down the driveway.
“Noooo!” I shouted as I reached the front door. “Don’t go! Don’t go!”
I pounded the door with my fists. I kicked it hard. And then I saw the pink
slip of paper on the floor, slipped under the door.
A message. I picked it up with a trembling hand. And started to read:
We’re not coming back. Until next week. Sorry, kids. But work is taking
much longer than we thought.
A phone message—from Mom and Dad.
Grandma and Grandpa didn’t come back, I realized. Mr. Donner, from the
general store, had driven over to deliver this phone message.
The roar of the monster tore through my thoughts.
I spun around.
Clark was gone.
“Clark!” I shouted. “Where are you?”
The monster’s growls grew louder. Meaner.
“Clark!” I called out again. “Clark!”
“Gretchen—come quick!” I heard his desperate cry from the kitchen.
20
“Gretchen! Gretchen!”
As I charged through the living room, he shouted my name over and over
again. Each time his voice grew higher, more excited.
“I’m coming!” I yelled. “Hold on, Clark. I’m coming!”
I rounded the couch—and tripped over a footstool. My head hit the floor
hard.
Clark continued to cry out my name, but his voice seemed distant now. So
far away.
My head throbbed with pain.
I struggled to stand, and the room spun around me.
“Gre-tchen! Gre-tchen!”
He sounded more frantic than ever.
“I’m coming!” I said through a dizzy haze.
Then I heard the monster’s bellow. It thundered through the house.
I have to get to Clark. He’s in trouble! The monster has him! I realized.
I stumbled through the living room. Toward the kitchen.
The creature’s roars shook the walls.
“Hold on, Clark!” I tried to shout, but my voice came out in a moan. “I’m
coming!”
I stumbled into the kitchen.
“Gretchen!” Clark stood next to the refrigerator.
Alone.
“Where is he?” I cried. My eyes darted around the room, searching for the
monster.
“Wh-where’s who?” Clark stammered.
“The monster!” I yelled.
“Upstairs,” Clark replied, puzzled. “What took you so long to get here?”
Clark didn’t wait for an answer. “Look at this.” He pointed to the
refrigerator. I turned and saw two letters stuck there with magnets.
“You were screaming like a maniac to show me that?” I shrieked. “I nearly
killed myself! I thought the monster had grabbed you!”
Clark’s hand trembled as he lifted the envelopes from the refrigerator. “It’s
two letters addressed to us. From Grandma and Grandpa.”
I stared at the envelopes in Clark’s hand. They were addressed to us, just as
he said. And they were numbered, one and two.
“They left us letters?” I couldn’t believe it.
Clark ripped open the first envelope. The paper shook in his hands as he
began to read it to himself.
His eyes scanned the paper. He mumbled as he read. I couldn’t understand
what he was saying.
“Let me have that!” I reached out for the letter, but Clark jerked back. He
held the paper tightly and continued to read.
“Clark, what does it say?” I demanded.
He ignored me. He pushed his glasses up on his nose and kept on reading.
Mumbling.
I watched Clark as he read.
I watched his eyes move down the page.
I watched his eyes grow wide with horror.
21
“Clark!” I shouted impatiently. “What does it say?”
Clark began to read the letter out loud. “‘Dear Gretchen and Clark,’” he
started. The paper fluttered between his trembling fingers.
“‘We’re sorry to do this to you, but we had to leave. A few weeks ago, a
swamp monster invaded our house. We captured it in the room upstairs. Then we
didn’t know what to do with it. We didn’t have a car, so we couldn’t get to a
phone to call for help.
“‘We’ve lived in terror for the past few weeks. We were afraid to let the
monster out. It’s so loud and angry all the time. We know it would have killed
us.’”
My knees started to wobble as Clark continued.
“‘We didn’t want to tell your parents about the creature. If we did, they
wouldn’t have let you come. We don’t get many visitors here. We wanted so
much to see you. But I guess we were wrong. You should have gone to Atlanta
with your mother and father. I guess we were wrong to let you stay.’”
“They guess they were wrong! They guess!” I shrieked. “Can you believe
them?”
Clark peered up from the letter. His face was white. Even his freckles
seemed to disappear. He shook his head, stunned.
Then he continued to read our grandparents’ letter. “‘We’ve been feeding
the creature, slipping food through an opening Grandpa sawed in the bottom of
the door. The monster eats a lot. But we had to feed him. We were afraid not to.
“‘We know it’s unfair to run off now. But we’re just going for help. We’ll
be back—as soon as we can find someone. Someone who knows what to do with
this horrible beast.
“‘Sorry, kids. We really are—but we had to bolt you inside the house. To
make sure you didn’t wander into the swamp by yourselves. It’s not safe out
there.’”
Were they for real?”
“Not safe out there!” I cried. “They left us in this house with a killer
monster—and they say it’s not safe out there! They’re both crazy, Clark. Totally
crazy!”
Clark nodded and continued reading. “‘Sorry, kids. We really, really are
sorry. But just remember one thing: You are perfectly safe as long as…’”
The monster upstairs let out a loud bellow. And Clark dropped the letter.
I watched in horror as it sailed through the air.
Floated down to the floor.
And slid under the refrigerator.
“Get it, Clark!” I yelled. “Quick!”
Clark stretched out on the floor and shoved his fingers under the
refrigerator. But his fingers only managed to brush the tip of the paper, shoving it
back.
“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re pushing it away!”
But Clark didn’t listen.
He shoved his hand in deeper. Groping for the paper.
Pushing it back. Farther and farther.
Until we couldn’t see it anymore.
“What did it say?” I hollered. “You read the letter! We’re perfectly safe as
long as… what?”
“I—I didn’t get to that part,” Clark stammered.
I wanted to strangle him.
I spun around. And frantically searched for something to slip under the
refrigerator—to ease out the letter.
But I couldn’t find anything slim enough or long enough. Everything was
way too big to fit underneath.
Clark tore open the kitchen cabinets and drawers looking for something we
could use.
The monster stomped on the floor above us.
The ceiling quaked.
A dish fell off the counter and shattered on the cold gray tiles. Shattered
into a thousand tiny pieces.
“Oh, no,” I moaned, staring up at the ceiling, watching the paint crack and
crumble. “He’s down to the second floor. He’s coming closer.”
“We’re doomed,” Clark groaned. “He’s going to catch us and—”
“Clark. We have to move the refrigerator. We have to find out what it says
in the rest of that letter!”
Clark and I tugged on the refrigerator. We pushed and tugged with all our
strength.
Upstairs, the monster roared an angry roar.
We tugged harder.
The refrigerator began to move.
Clark knelt down and peered underneath it. “Push!” he told me. “Push! I
can see a corner of the letter! Push—just a little more!”
I gave the refrigerator one more hard shove—and Clark had it! He grasped
the corner of the letter between his thumb and index finger. And pulled it out.
He shook the paper, to free a clump of dust that clung to it.
“Just read it!” I shouted at him. “Read it!”
Clark started to read again. “‘You are perfectly safe as long as…’”
22
I held my breath, waiting for Clark to finish the sentence. Waiting to find out
how we could keep ourselves safe.
“‘You are perfectly safe,’” Clark read, “‘as long as you do not open the door
and let the monster out.’”
“That’s it?” My jaw dropped. “It’s too late for that! It’s too late! Did they
say anything else? They must have said something else!”
“There’s a little more.” Clark read on:
“‘Please. Please stay away from that room. Do not open that door.’”
“Too late!” I wailed. “It’s too late!”
“‘If the monster escapes, you will have no choice. You will have to find a
way to kill it.’” Clark looked up from the letter. “That’s it, Gretchen. That’s all it
says. You will have to find a way to kill it.”
“Quick!” I ordered Clark. “Open the other letter. It’ll probably tell us more.
It has to!”
Clark started to tear open the second envelope when we heard the heavy
footsteps.
Footsteps downstairs.
In the next room—the living room.
“Hurry, Clark! Open it!”
Clark’s fingers fumbled as he tried to rip through the sealed envelope. But
he stopped when we heard the creature’s breathing.
Deep, wheezing breaths.
Coming nearer.
My heart thumped wildly as the monster’s wheezing grew louder.
“He-he’s coming for us!” Clark cried, stuffing the unopened envelope in his
pocket.
“The dining room!” I shouted. “Head for the dining room!”
“What are we going to do? How can we kill it?” Clark cried as we bolted
from the kitchen.
“We—owwww!” A sharp pain shot up my leg as I ran smack into the
dining-room table.
I clutched my knee. I tried to bend it. But the pain tore through it.
I spun around.
And there he stood.
The swamp monster.
In the kitchen—lumbering toward us hungrily.
23
The monster glared at me with his horrible bulging eyes. I watched the veins in
his head throb as he let out a long, low growl.
I stared at those huge, pulsing veins. Stared as they beat against his coarse
alligator skin.
“Run, Gretchen!” Clark pulled me from behind. He yanked me out of the
dining room. We dove toward the stairs.
“We need a place to hide.” Clark panted as we fled to the second floor. “We
have to hide until Grandma and Grandpa come back with help.”
“They’re not coming back!” I screamed at him. “They’re not coming back
with help!”
“They said they would,” Clark insisted. “They said so in the letter.”
“Clark, you are such a jerk.” We reached the top of the stairs. I stopped to
catch my breath. “Who is going to believe them?” I said, gulping air. “Who’s
going to believe they have a swamp monster trapped in their house?”
Clark didn’t reply.
I answered for him. “No one! That’s who. Everyone they tell the story to
will think they’re nuts.”
“Someone might believe them.” Clark’s voice cracked. “Someone might
want to help.”
“Yeah, right. ‘Will you help us kill a swamp monster?’ they’ll ask. I’ll bet
they get loads of volunteers!” I rolled my eyes.
I stopped yelling at Clark when I heard the monster’s heavy breathing. I
spun around—and saw the creature.
He stood at the bottom of the stairs. Eyeing us. Drooling hungrily.
Clark and I backed slowly away from the top of the stairs.
The monster followed us with his eyes.
“We have to kill it,” Clark whispered. “That’s what the letter said. We have
to kill it. But how?”
“I have an idea!” I told Clark. “Follow me!”
We turned and ran. As we charged past the bathroom, we heard Charley
whimpering.
“Let’s get Charley!” Clark stopped running. “It’s too dangerous to leave
him closed up in there. We have to take him with us.”
“We can’t, Clark,” I replied. “He’ll be okay. Don’t worry.”
I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But there was no time to stop for
Charley now—because the monster had reached the second floor.
There he stood. Looming at the end of the hall.
He raised his hands up over his head. I saw that he held the wooden
footstool I had tripped over in the living room.
His eyes burned with anger.
He glared at me, then growled a loud, savage growl. A stream of thick
white drool dribbled down his chin.
He licked the drool away with a reptile tongue—and smashed the stool
down across his leg. It splintered into two jagged pieces.
He raised the pieces and hurled them at us.
“Let’s go!” Clark shrieked as the footstool bounced off the wall.
We ran up the stairs. Up to the third floor.
The monster lumbered after us. The whole house shook with each heavy
step he took.
“He’s coming!” Clark cried. “What are we going to do? You said you had
an idea. What?”
“There’s a collapsed stairway up here,” I told Clark, running as fast as I
could through the dark, twisting hall. “It’s totally fallen down. Just a big hole.
When we turn the corner, grab onto the railing. The monster will chase us around
the corner—and he’ll fall down the open stairway.”
The roar of the monster thundered in my ears. I saw him plodding down the
hall after us.
“Come on, Clark! Hurry!”
“What if it doesn’t work?” Clark demanded, very frightened. “What if the
fall only hurts him? Won’t it make him even more angry?”
“Don’t ask questions, Clark,” I replied impatiently. “It’s got to work! It’s
got to!”
We started to run again.
The monster howled. Howled with rage.
“There’s the turn, Clark. Up ahead.”
The creature roared. Only steps behind us.
My heart pounded hard. My chest felt as if it were about to explode. “Grab
the railing, Clark. Or else you’ll drop to the bottom. Here goes!”
We turned the corner.
We both threw our hands up. And grabbed the railing.
Our bodies slammed hard against the wall—then dangled over the black,
empty hole.
The creature turned the corner.
Would my plan work? Would he fall to his death?
Was this the way to kill a monster?
24
The beast whirled around the corner.
Staggered on the edge of the hole.
His head jerked to face us. His eyes glowed red.
He opened his mouth in an ugly growl. He swayed, trying to keep his
balance. Then he plunged down the open staircase.
I heard him land with a heavy thud.
Clark and I hung on to the rotted banister. It creaked under the strain of our
weight.
My hands ached. My fingers were numb. I knew I couldn’t hold on much
longer.
We listened.
Silence.
The creature didn’t move.
I looked down, but it was too dark to see.
“My fingers are slipping,” Clark groaned. Then he swung out his foot,
searching with his sneaker for the hallway floor.
Hand over hand, he inched his way along the banister to the safety of the
hall. I followed.
We peered down into the black hole once more. But it was so black down
there—we couldn’t make out a thing. Dark and silent. Totally silent.
“We did it! We’re safe!” I cheered. “We killed the monster!”
Clark and I jumped up and down in celebration. “We did it! We did it!”
We ran downstairs. We let Charley out of the bathroom.
“Everything is okay, Charley.” I hugged my dog. “We did it, boy,” I told
him. “We killed the swamp monster.”
“Let’s get out of here,” Clark urged. “We can walk to town. Call Mom and
Dad from the general store. Tell them to pick us up—now!”
We were so happy, we practically danced down the steps. The three of us
headed into the library. “Stand back,” I told Clark. “And hold Charley. I’ll break
the window, and we’ll get out of here.”
I glanced around the room, searching for the heavy brass candlestick to
break the glass. It wasn’t there.
“Wait here,” I told Clark. “I left the candlestick up in the bathroom. I’ll be
right back.”
I sprinted out of the library.
I couldn’t wait to break out of this creepy place. To leave this horrible
swamp. And tell Mom and Dad how stupid they were to dump us here in a house
with a real, live monster inside.
I ran through the living room—to the stairs.
I jogged up three steps—and stopped.
Stopped when I heard the low groan.
It can’t be, I thought. Maybe it’s Charley. Maybe Charley is growling.
I listened.
And heard it again.
Not a dog growl. Definitely not a dog growl.
Then I heard the rumbling footsteps, the footsteps of the swamp monster,
coming from somewhere nearby.
Closer.
Closer.
25
“Clark!” I staggered back into the library. My legs were shaking. My whole body
trembled. “He’s not dead!” I cried. “The monster isn’t dead!”
The library was empty.
“Clark? Where are you?” I shouted.
“In the kitchen,” he called. “Feeding Charley.”
I raced into the kitchen. Clark and Charley sat on the floor. Charley was
lapping up a bowl of water.
“The fall didn’t kill him! The monster isn’t dead!” I shrieked.
Clark gasped in horror. “He must be really angry now. He must be furious.
What are we going to do?”
My eyes darted around the kitchen. “Put Charley in there,” I ordered. “In
that closet. I have another idea.”
“I hope it’s better than your last idea,” Clark moaned.
“Do you have an idea?” I yelled at him. “Do you?”
He didn’t.
Clark dragged Charley across the kitchen. “Gretchen, this isn’t a closet. It’s
some kind of room.”
“I don’t care what it is,” I hollered. “Just put Charley in there.”
On the counter sat one of Grandma’s rhubarb pies. “The monster hasn’t
eaten since this morning,” I told Clark. “We’ll put this pie out on the counter
where he’ll see it.”
“But that will only slow him down for a second,” Clark whined. He shut
Charley in the room. “He’ll gobble the pie in one bite. Then he’ll come after us
again.”
“No, he won’t,” I insisted. “We’re going to poison the pie. We’ll put stuff in
it. Enough stuff to kill him!”
“I don’t know, Gretchen,” Clark argued. “I don’t think that’s going to
work.”
Charley whimpered behind the closed door—as if he agreed.
“We have no choice!” I snapped. “We have to try something!”
I found a fork and carefully lifted up the pie crust with it.
Then I searched the cabinet under the kitchen sink. It was filthy under there.
Damp, with green mold growing on the pipes.
I found a jar of turpentine sitting on a shelf right in front. The lid was
screwed on tight. I had to twist it hard to open it.
I slowly poured the entire jar of turpentine into the pie.
“Yuck! That stuff stinks,” Clark said, holding his nose.
I studied the pie. It was wet and runny now. “I think we need something to
soak up the turpentine,” I told Clark. “This should do it!” I held up a can of drain
cleaner.
I sprinkled the blue drain-cleaner crystals over the pie. They made the
rhubarb bubble and fizz.
Clark leaped back. “I think that’s enough,” he said.
I ignored him.
I stuck my head under the sink and came up with two jars. “Rat poison!” I
exclaimed, reading the dirty label on one of them. “Excellent.” The other jar was
filled with ammonia.
“Hurry!” Clark urged. “I hear the monster. He’s coming.”
I sprinkled the pie with the rat poison and poured in the ammonia too.
The monster’s groans came closer. Each time he groaned or growled, I
jumped.
I found an old can of orange paint and dumped it into the pie.
“That’s enough! We have enough!” Clark insisted in a panic.
“Okay. Okay. I just want to make sure this works.”
I shoved in a handful of mothballs.
“Hurry!” Clark urged. “Close it up. He’s coming!”
The monster’s footsteps pounded the living-room floor.
“Hurry!” Clark begged.
I sprayed the top of the pie with bug spray.
“Gretchen!” Clark pleaded with me.
I placed the poisoned pie on the counter.
It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after one bite. Grandma’s words came
back to me.
It better do more than that! I told myself. It better kill a monster!
“Here he comes!” Clark cried.
We ducked under the kitchen table.
The monster stomped into the kitchen. Peering out from under the table, I
could see him swing his arms wildly. He knocked over dishes, pots, glasses.
Everything in sight.
Then my heart stopped when I saw the big creature turn.
He hesitated. Then he took a step toward the kitchen table. Another step.
Another.
Clark and I huddled together under the table. We were both trembling so
hard, the table shook.
The swamp monster sees us under here! I realized.
We’re trapped.
What is he going to do?
26
Clark and I held on to each other. The monster stepped up to the table—so close
I could smell the sour odor of his thick fur.
Clark started to let out soft, whimpering sounds.
I clapped my hands over his mouth. I shut my eyes.
Please go away, I prayed. Please, monster, don’t see us.
I heard the creature sniffing. Like a dog trying to sniff out a bone.
When I opened my eyes, he had moved away from the table.
“Whew!” I breathed a long, silent sigh of relief.
The monster rumbled around the room.
Sniffing loudly, urgently.
He sniffed the refrigerator.
He lumbered over to the stove and sniffed some more. He plodded around
the room. Sniffing.
He smells us. He smells Clark and me, I thought. Please, see the pie. See
the pie.
The creature stomped back to the stove.
Sniffing.
He bent down and peered into the oven. Then he ripped the oven door off
its hinges and hurled it across the room.
The door hit the wall with a loud crash. Clark jumped in fright and banged
his head on the table. He let out a low moan.
I moaned too. “Look,” I whispered.
The creature was eating—but he wasn’t eating our pie. There were two pies
still in the oven. And the creature was stuffing himself with them.
Oh, no, I thought. He’ll eat those pies. Then he’ll be full. He won’t eat our
pie! We’re as good as dead.
The monster hungrily jammed the two pies into his mouth. He practically
swallowed them whole. Then he lumbered to the center of the room.
Sniffing.
Yes! He’s still hungry! I thought. Eat our pie. Eat our pie, I chanted to
myself.
I peered out from under the table—and saw the creature, heading toward
the counter. Yes!
He stopped.
And sniffed.
He saw the pie.
He eyed it for a moment. Then he lifted it to his mouth and shoved it in.
Yes! I cheered silently. He’s eating it! He’s eating our pie!
He chomped away at the pie. Chomped and shoved more into his huge
mouth. Chomped and shoved. Chomped and shoved.
He licked his big lips as he ate.
He licked his paws.
He rubbed his stomach.
“Oh, no!” I groaned. “He likes it!”
27
I watched the monster shove the last bit of pie into his mouth.
Then he flicked his reptile tongue in and out, licking up every last crumb
from the pie tin.
“It isn’t working,” I moaned to Clark. “He loves it.”
“Now what are we going to do?” he whispered back. He hugged his knees
tightly to his chest to keep them from shaking.
The monster let out a long groan.
I peered out from under the table. I saw the creature’s eyes bug out. They
practically popped out of his head!
A gurgling, choking sound escaped his throat.
He grasped his neck with his two hairy paws.
He groaned again.
His stomach rumbled—a deep rumble. He clutched his stomach and
doubled over.
He uttered a weak cry of pain—and surprise.
Then he dropped dead on the kitchen floor.
“We did it! We did it!” I cheered. “We killed the swamp monster!”
I pulled Clark out from under the table.
I studied the creature from across the room. I was sure he was dead—but I
still didn’t want to get too close.
The monster’s scaly eyelids were closed.
I stared at his chest—to see if it moved. To see if he was breathing.
His chest remained still.
I stared at him a few moments longer.
He didn’t stir.
Clark peered over my shoulder. “Is—is he really dead?” he stammered.
“Yes!” I was sure of it now. Totally sure. “We did it!” I cried. I jumped up
and down joyfully. “We killed the monster! We killed him!”
Clark reached into his back pocket—for his comic book, Creatures from the
Muck. He hurled it across the room. It hit the monster in the head and fell to the
floor.
“I never want to read about swamp monsters again. Never!” Clark cried.
“Let’s get out of here!”
Charley scratched at the door. When we opened it, he leaped out and
jumped all over us. “It’s okay, boy,” I told him, trying to calm him down. “It’s
okay.”
I peered into the room where we had locked Charley. “Hey, Clark, I think
there’s a door in here,” I said. “A door that leads out!”
I stepped into the small, dark space—and stumbled over a broom lying on
the floor.
I squinted in the darkness.
Two rusty shovels leaned against the wall to my right. On the left sat a coil
of old hose.
In front of me I saw the door. A door with a large glass window.
I looked out the window—out to the backyard. To the path that ran through
the swamp.
Does that path lead through the swamp to town? I wondered. I decided it
was worth a try.
“We’re almost out of here!” I declared. “We’re almost free!”
I turned the doorknob, but the door was locked. Bolted from the other side,
like all the doors in the house.
“It’s jammed shut,” I told Clark. “But I’ll break the window and we’ll climb
out. No problem.”
The shovels against the wall were big and heavy. I gripped the handle of
one with both hands and took aim.
I swung it back—and felt the floor quake.
I spun around—and heard the roar.
The roar of the swamp monster.
He wasn’t dead.
28
The creature rumbled into the doorway.
Clark and I both shrieked as he took a giant step into the room. His hideous
head made a scraping sound as it brushed against the frame of the door. But he
didn’t even seem to notice.
Clark and I pressed against the wall.
Charley backed into a corner, whimpering. Frightened.
We were trapped.
No way out.
Nowhere to run.
The monster’s eyes shifted from Charley, to me, to Clark. They rested on
Clark for a moment. Then the creature lifted his head and wailed.
“He-he’s going to get me first,” Clark cried. “I—I shouldn’t have thrown
the comic at him. I shouldn’t have hit him in the head.”
“He’s going to get us, you jerk!” I shouted at him. “Because we tried to kill
him!”
That shut Clark up.
I have to do something, I thought. I have to do something. But what? What?
The swamp monster staggered forward.
He opened his snout with a snap—and bared jagged yellow teeth.
Sharp yellow teeth, dripping with saliva.
His eyes glowed red as he moved forward. Clomping closer and closer.
I glanced down and realized that I still held the shovel. I lifted it with two
hands—and thrust it forward. Jabbing—jabbing at the air between the creature
and me.
“Back!” I screamed. “Get back! Leave us alone!”
The monster grunted.
“Get back! Get back!” I swung the shovel wildly. “Go away!”
I swung at the creature.
I swung—and hit his stomach with a sickening thwack.
The room went silent.
Then the monster tossed back his head and let out a piercing howl.
He stumbled forward. Swiped the shovel from my hand. And tossed it out
the door. Tossed it as if it were a toothpick.
I gasped as it crashed to the kitchen floor.
I eyed the other shovel leaning against the wall. The monster followed my
gaze.
He snatched it up and broke it in half with his bare hands. Then he pitched
the pieces into the kitchen.
What can I do? I have to do something!
And then it came to me!
The letter.
The second letter from Grandma and Grandpa—the one we hadn’t opened
yet!
“Clark! Quick! The second letter,” I cried. “Maybe it will tell us what to do!
Read it!”
Clark stared at me. Frozen. His eyes on the raging monster.
“Clark!” I said, through clenched teeth. “Open… the… letter. NOW!”
He reached into his jeans pocket with a trembling hand. He fumbled with
the flap.
“Hurry, Clark!” I pleaded.
He finally managed to tear a hole in the corner of the envelope.
And then I screamed.
The monster dove forward.
He grabbed my arm. He yanked it hard.
And pulled me toward him.
29
The monster pulled me close.
I stared up into his hideous face—and gasped.
His eyes were deep, dark pools—with tiny worms swimming in them!
I twisted my head away—so I wouldn’t have to stare into those horrible,
wormy eyes.
The creature gripped me tighter.
His hot, sour breath swept over my cheeks.
He opened his jaws wide.
His mouth was filled with bugs! I saw them crawling up and down his
tongue.
I screamed. And struggled against the monster’s hold. But he clutched me
too tightly.
“Let me go!” I shrieked. “Please—!”
The monster bellowed in reply, hitting me with a blast of his hot breath.
He smells like a swamp, I realized as I fought against his grasp. He is a
swamp. He’s like a living swamp.
With my free hand, I pounded on the creature’s arm. I nearly gagged when I
felt the moss. His whole body was covered with a layer of wet moss!
“Let me go!” I pleaded. “Please—let me go!”
Clark leaped forward. He grabbed my arm and tried to tug me away. “Leave
her alone!” he shrieked.
Charley charged out of his corner. His lip curled back and he let out a low
snarl. Then he sank his teeth into the monster’s hairy leg.
Startled, the monster jerked away, dragging me along with him.
But Charley wouldn’t give up. I glanced down to see him dig his teeth deep
into the monster’s foot.
With a growl, the beast raised his foot. And with one fierce shake, he hurled
Charley across the room.
“Charley!” I cried out. “Charley!”
I heard Charley whimper on the other side of the room.
“He’s okay,” Clark said, breathlessly. He tugged harder on my arm, trying
to wrestle me free.
With another angry growl, the beast swung at Clark. Shoved him hard
against the wall. Then the monster leaned down—and pulled me up to his face.
He opened his mouth.
His disgusting, bug-infested tongue rolled out.
And he LICKED me.
He ran his hot, bumpy tongue up and down my arm.
Then he lowered his enormous teeth—as he prepared to chew off my hand.
30
“Nooooo!” A horrified shriek tore from my throat.
The monster’s jaw swung down. His mouth gaped open. The bugs swarmed
over his yellow teeth. He lowered his mouth to my hand.
Then he stopped.
And let me go.
He backed away, staring at me. Staring at my arm, eyes bulging.
I stared at my arm too. It was covered with disgusting, monster saliva.
The monster raised his hands and clutched at his throat now. Choking.
Choking on something.
He raised his wet eyes to me.
“You—you human?” he choked out.
“He can talk!” Clark gasped.
“You human? You human?” he demanded.
“Y-yes, I’m a human,” I stammered.
The monster threw back his head and groaned. “Oh, no. I’m allergic to
humans.”
His eyes rolled up.
He staggered forward and collapsed against the door to the outside. It
crashed open under his heavy weight. Moonlight streamed in.
He lay there on his stomach. He didn’t move.
I rubbed my wet arm and stared down at the swamp monster.
Was he really dead this time?
31
“Gretchen! Let’s go!” Clark yanked me toward the open door.
We stepped over the monster. I glanced down at the creature one last time.
His eyes were shut. He didn’t breathe. He didn’t move.
“Come on, Gretchen!” Clark pleaded.
Is he really dead? I stared at the swamp monster. I wasn’t totally sure. But I
did know one thing—I wasn’t going to hang around to find out.
Clark and I ran out through the broken door. We found Charley already
there, waiting for us. We bolted down the path—away from the house. Into the
swamp.
I was so surprised to find it was dark out. Had we really fought the swamp
monster all day?
A pale moon hung over the cypress trees, casting an eerie glow over them.
The mud rose up over my ankles as we made our way through the marshy
ground. Through the tall weeds. Through a blanket of heavy mist.
My shoes plunged into deep pools of water.
Tripped over upraised roots.
I swiped at the long beards of gray that hung from the trees. Swiped them
from my face as we headed deeper and deeper into the swamp.
When the house was no longer in view, we stopped running. Stopped to
catch our breath.
I listened in the darkness for footsteps.
The swamp monster’s footsteps.
There weren’t any.
“We did it! We killed the monster!” My voice rang out in the night.
“And we escaped!” Clark cheered. “We’re free! We’re okay!”
“Yes!” I shouted. “We really did it!”
Now that we had stopped running for our lives, we stepped through the
swamp carefully. Leaping over the inky puddles and gnarled tree roots.
The night air echoed with strange sounds.
Low gurgling. Scampering footsteps. Piercing cries.
But I didn’t care.
I had already battled my worst nightmare—the swamp monster. Battled him
and won.
“Hey! Clark!” I suddenly remembered the other letter! “We never read
Grandma and Grandpa’s letter. The second letter!”
“So what?” Clark replied. “We don’t have to read it. The monster is dead.
We killed it. Just as they told us to do in the first letter.”
“Where is it? Where’s the letter?” I demanded. “Take it out, Clark.” I
stopped walking. “I want to know what it says.”
Clark pulled the crumpled envelope from his jeans pocket. As he smoothed
out the wrinkles, a fierce animal cry cut through the swamp.
“I—I don’t think we should stop now,” Clark said. “We can read it later.
After we reach town. After we call Mom and Dad.”
“Read it now,” I insisted. “Come on. Don’t you want to know what it says?”
“No,” Clark declared.
“Well, I do,” I told him.
“Okay. Okay.” Clark ripped open the envelope and slipped out the letter.
A light wind began to blow, carrying the sharp animal cries to us.
The dark trees rustled over our heads.
Clark began to read slowly, struggling to see in the dim moonlight. “‘Dear
Gretchen and Clark. We hope you children are safe and well. We forgot one
word of warning in the first letter.
“‘If the monster gets out… and you do kill it… and escape from the house
—stay on the road. Do NOT go into the swamp.’”
Clark rolled his eyes. He let out a loud groan.
“Keep reading!” I shouted. “Read!”
He squinted in the dark and went on. “‘The monster’s brothers and sisters
live in the swamp—dozens of them. We think they are out there. Waiting for
him.’”
My heart started to race as Clark continued.
“‘We’ve seen the monsters in the swamp. We’ve heard them whistling to
each other every night. They’re unhappy their brother was captured. They’re
waiting for him to return. So whatever you do, stay out of the swamp. It’s not
safe out there. Stay out of the swamp! Good luck! We love you.’”
Clark’s hands dropped to his sides. The letter fell to the marshy ground.
I turned slowly, staring out at the shifting shadows.
“Gretchen.” Clark choked out my name. “Do you hear that? What is that
sound? What is it?”
“Uh… it sounds like a whistle.”
“Th-that’s what I thought,” he whispered. “What do we do now? Any
ideas?”
“No, Clark,” I replied softly. “I don’t have any more ideas. How about
you?”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

LEGEND OF THE
LOST LEGEND
Goosebumps - 47
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
Justin Clarke tugged his gloves under the sleeves of his heavy blue parka.
Then he shielded his eyes with one hand and searched all around. “I don’t
see Dad,” he told his sister, Marissa. “Do you?”
“I can’t see anything!” Marissa cried, shouting over the wind. “All I
can see is ice!”
The sled dogs barked and shook themselves, eager to start moving
again.
Justin narrowed his eyes, squinting to the right, then the left. The ice
stretched smooth and shiny, silvery under the bright sunlight.
In the distance, it darkened to blue. Darker. Darker. Until the blue ice
appeared to melt into the sky. Justin couldn’t see where the ice ended and
the sky began.
“It’s cold,” Marissa murmured. A sharp gust of wind blew the parka
hood off her red hair. She instantly reached up with both gloved hands and
pulled it back in place.
Justin rubbed his stub of a nose. He pressed his furry gloves against his
frozen cheeks, trying to warm them.
The dogs tugged. Justin grabbed the handle of the dogsled to keep it
from sliding away.
“What do we do now?” Marissa asked. Justin could hear a slight
tremble in her voice. He knew his sister was as frightened as he was.
He stepped onto the sled runner. “Keep going, I guess. Keep going
until we find Dad.”
Marissa shook her head. She held her hood in place with both hands.
“Maybe we should stay right here,” she suggested. “If we stay here, it will
be easier for Dad to find us.”
Justin stared hard at her. Why does Marissa look so different? he
wondered. Then he realized—the cold had made her freckles disappear!
“It’s too cold to stay in one place,” he said. “It will be warmer if we
keep moving.”
He helped her onto the back of the sled. At twelve, he was only a year
older than Marissa. But he was big and athletic, and she was tiny and
skinny.
The dogs grunted and impatiently pawed the silvery ice.
“I hate Antarctica!” Marissa wailed, grabbing the sled handle with
both hands. “I hate everything about it. I can’t even spell it!”
Uh-oh, thought Justin. Here she goes. Once Marissa started
complaining, she never stopped.
“We’ll be okay,” he said quickly. “As soon as we find Dad, everything
will be okay. And we’ll have some amazing adventures.”
“I hate amazing adventures!” Marissa declared. “Almost as much as I
hate Antarctica! I can’t believe he brought us to this awful place—and then
lost us!”
Justin gazed up at the sky. The sun had started to set. Wide streaks of
golden light sparkled over the ice.
“We’ll find Dad really soon,” he told Marissa. “I know we will.” He
lowered the hood over his forehead. “Let’s get going, okay? Before we
freeze.” He snapped the line and, in a deep voice, called out to the six dogs,
“Mush! Mush!”
The dogs lowered their heads and moved forward with a burst of
speed. The sled jerked hard as it started to slide.
“Whoooooaaa!”
Justin let out a startled shriek as he felt himself start to fall.
His gloved hands flew off the sled handle. He frantically groped for it.
Missed.
And fell off the sled. He fell hard onto his back on the ice.
“Ooooof!” He felt the breath whoosh from his lungs.
His arms and legs kicked the air, like a bug on its back.
He struggled to a sitting position. Blinking. The ice shimmering all
around him. Shimmering so brightly, he could barely see the sled as it sped
away.
“Justin—I can’t stop it!” Marissa’s shrill shriek sounded tiny against
the steady rush of cold wind.
“Marissa—!” He tried to call to her.
“I can’t stop it! Help me! Help!” Her cry already so far away.
2
Justin leaped to his feet and started to run after the sled.
He fell again. Face first this time.
How can I run in snowshoes? he wondered. They’re like wearing
tennis rackets on my feet!
He had no choice. He jumped back up and started to run.
He had to catch the sled. He couldn’t let Marissa face the cold and the
endless ice on her own.
“I’m coming!” he shouted. “Marissa—I’m coming!”
He lowered his head against the onrushing wind. He dug the
snowshoes into the snowy surface of the ice. One step. Then another. Then
another.
Running hard, he raised his head and squinted into the distance. The
sled was a dark blur against the glowing ice. A tiny blur.
“Marissa—!” he gasped. “Stop the sled! Pull the line! Pull it!”
But he knew she couldn’t hear him.
His heart thudded in his chest. He felt a sharp stab of pain in his side.
His legs ached from lifting the heavy snowshoes.
But he kept moving. He didn’t slow down.
When he gazed up again, the sled appeared larger. Closer.
“Huh?” His cry sent a puff of white steam floating above his head.
Am I catching up? he asked himself.
Yes!
The sled appeared clearer now. Closer.
He could see Marissa, holding on with one hand, waving frantically to
him with the other.
“How—how did you stop the sled?” he choked out as he staggered up
to her.
Her blue eyes were wide with fear. Her chin trembled. “I didn’t stop
it,” she told him.
“But—”
“It stopped itself,” Marissa explained. “The dogs—they all stopped.
I’m frightened, Justin. They stopped all by themselves.” She pointed. “Look
at them.”
Justin turned to the dogs at the front of the sled. All six of them had
their heads lowered, their backs arched. They all whimpered and shook,
huddled together.
“Something is frightening them,” Justin murmured. He felt a sudden
chill of fear.
“They won’t move,” Marissa said. “They just hunch together,
whimpering. What are we going to do?”
Justin didn’t reply. He stared past the sled. Past the frightened dogs.
He stared at an amazing sight.
A blue lake. Almost perfectly round, as if someone had carved it out of
the ice. A pool of water reflecting the clear blue of the sky.
“Oh, wow!” Marissa gasped. She saw it too.
In the center of the small lake, they both saw a creature sitting on a
large chunk of ice. It had its head lowered, staring back at them.
A sea lion.
A blue sea lion!
“It’s the one Dad is looking for!” Justin cried. He stepped up beside his
sister. They both stared in amazement at the magical creature.
“The only blue sea lion in the world,” Marissa murmured. “A creature
from a myth. No one even believes it is real.”
Where is Dad? Justin wondered, not taking his eyes from the
enormous blue animal. How can Dad be missing this?
He brought us all the way to Antarctica to search for this creature. And
now he’s lost—lost!—and Marissa and I are the only ones to see it.
“Do you think we can get closer to it?” Marissa asked. “Can we walk
up to the edge of the water and see it better?”
Justin hesitated. “Dad said it has strange powers,” he told his sister.
“Maybe we should stay back here.”
“But I want to see it better,” she protested.
She started to step off the sled—then stopped.
They both heard the rumbling sound at the same time.
A deep rumble, low at first and then louder.
“Where is it coming from?” Marissa asked in a whisper, her eyes
suddenly wide with fear.
“The sea lion?” Justin guessed. “Did it roar?”
No.
They heard it again. Louder this time. Like thunder.
Thunder… beneath them.
And this time the ground shook.
Justin heard a cracking sound. He looked down in time to see the ice
start to break.
“Ohh!” A frightened cry escaped his throat. He grabbed for the back of
the sled and pulled himself onto it.
“What is happening?” Marissa cried. She grasped the sled handle with
both hands.
Another rumble of thunder beneath them.
The sled tilted and started to rock.
The sound of cracking ice drowned out the low rumble.
Ice cracked all around. The ground appeared to split open.
The blue sea lion, perched in the center of the small, round lake, stared
back calmly at them.
A loud crack made the dogs howl.
The sled bobbed and tilted. Justin grasped the handle as tightly as he
could.
He peered down. And saw that the ground holding them had broken
away, broken free.
As the ice cracked, the lake opened up. Water rushed all around.
It’s not a lake, Justin realized. It’s a hidden ocean—under the ice!
“We-we’re floating away!” Marissa shrieked.
The dogs howled, drowning out the sound of the cracking ice. Water
rushed up over the sides of the sled. A strong current carried the sled away.
Justin and Marissa held on tightly, struggling to stay on the rocking,
tilting sled.
The blue sea lion faded into the distance.
And they floated away, bobbing and swaying. Floating out to sea.
3
“What happens next, Dad?” I asked.
“Yeah. Don’t stop there,” Marissa begged. “You can’t leave Justin and
me on a chunk of ice, floating out into the ocean. Go on with the story.”
I pulled the top of the sleeping bag up to my chin. Outside our tent, the
fire flickered low. I could hear the cluttering of insects all around us in the
forest.
I peered out through the open tent flap. Too dark to see the trees. I
could see a narrow patch of purple sky. No moon. No stars at all.
Is anything darker than a forest? I wondered.
We had a kerosene lantern inside the tent. It sent warm yellow light
around us. But no heat.
Dad buttoned the top button of his sweater. It had been hot in the tent
when we came in after dinner. But now a damp chill had fallen over us.
“That’s all for tonight,” Dad said, scratching his brown beard.
“But what happens next?” Marissa demanded. “Go on with the story,
Dad. Please!”
“Yeah,” I agreed. “Do we float out to sea? How do we get back? Do
you show up and rescue Marissa and me?”
Dad shrugged his big shoulders. Under the woolly sweater, he looked
like a big, brown bear. “I don’t know,” he replied. “I don’t know what
happens next.”
He sighed and bent over his sleeping bag. He has a big stomach, and
it’s hard for him to bend over. He started to unfold the sleeping bag.
“I haven’t thought of an ending to the story yet,” Dad said softly.
“Maybe I’ll dream a good ending tonight.”
Marissa and I both groaned. We hate it when Dad stops a story in the
middle. He always leaves us in terrible danger. And sometimes we have to
wait for days to find out if we survive.
Dad sat down on the tent floor. He groaned as he pulled off his boots.
Then he struggled to squeeze into the sleeping bag.
“Good night,” Marissa said, yawning. “I’m so tired.”
I felt tired too. We’d trudged through the forest since early morning,
cutting our own path through the trees, and rocks, and tangled weeds.
“Justin, do me a favor,” Dad said. He pointed to the kerosene lantern.
“Turn that off, okay?”
“No problem,” I said. I leaned forward. Reached for the lantern. My
hand bumped it. Knocked it on its side. And in seconds, the tent was ablaze
with orange and yellow flames.
4
I let out a sick cry and struggled to pull myself out of the sleeping bag.
Dad climbed to his feet first. I never saw him move so fast.
He picked up a section of the canvas tent floor and smothered the
flames on the tent wall.
“Dad—sorry!” I managed to choke out. I finally struggled out of the
sleeping bag.
Luckily, the flames had only caught on one wall. I have too good an
imagination. I instantly pictured us surrounded by fire.
I guess I get my imagination from Dad. Sometimes it comes in handy.
Sometimes it doesn’t.
Now I was breathing hard, my whole body trembling. “Sorry,” I
repeated.
“That was close!” Marissa cried, shivering. “Justin is such a klutz!”
She had scrambled to the tent flap, ready to run outside.
Dad shook his head. “It just burned a small hole,” he reported. “Here. I
can cover it with this.” He spread the section of canvas floor over the hole.
“This thing burns pretty fast,” I murmured.
Dad grunted but didn’t reply.
“I’d hate to be in the middle of the forest without a tent,” Marissa
declared. “Especially in this weird country.”
“Everything is fine,” Dad said softly, still fiddling with the tent wall.
“But no thanks to either of you,” he added sourly.
“Huh? What do you mean?” I demanded, straightening a leg of my
pajama pants.
“You haven’t been much help,” Dad complained.
“What did I do?” Marissa asked shrilly. “I didn’t try to burn the tent
down.”
“You wandered off and got lost this morning,” Dad reminded her.
“I thought I saw a weird animal,” Marissa replied.
“It was probably a squirrel,” I chimed in. “Or her shadow.”
“Give me a break, Justin,” Marissa muttered.
“Then tonight you both refused to get firewood,” Dad accused.
“We were tired,” I explained.
“And we didn’t know where to look,” Marissa added.
“In a forest?” Dad cried. “You don’t know where to look for firewood
in a forest? How about on the ground?”
Dad was getting steamed.
Maybe he’s right, I thought. Maybe Marissa and I should try to be a
little more helpful.
After all, this was a very important trip for Dad. And it was really
great of him to bring us along.
My dad is Richard Clarke. Maybe you’ve heard of him. He’s a very
famous writer, storyteller, and story collector.
Dad travels all over the world, searching for stories. All kinds of
stories. Then he puts them in books. He has published ten books of stories.
And he goes all over the country, telling some of the stories he has hunted
down.
He has been on a lot of exciting trips. But this one was special. He
brought Marissa and me to Europe—to this forest in the tiny country of
Brovania—because of a very special search.
Dad had kept the whole thing as a surprise. But he told us about it as
we made our way through the forest that morning.
“We’ve come to Brovania to search for the Lost Legend,” he
explained. He pulled a large black beetle from his beard and tossed it away.
“The Lost Legend is a very old manuscript. It is said to be hidden
away in a silver chest,” Dad continued as we walked. “It hasn’t been seen
for five hundred years.”
“Wow,” Marissa murmured from far behind us.
She kept stopping to look at bugs and wildflowers. Dad and I had to
keep waiting for her to catch up.
“What is the legend about?” I asked.
Dad shifted the heavy equipment pack on his back. “No one knows
what the legend is about,” he replied. “Because it has been lost for so long.”
He used his machete to hack away a tall clump of weeds. Then we
followed him through a narrow opening in the trees.
The trees were so thick and leafy overhead, little sunlight could get
through. Even though it was still morning, the forest stretched as dark as
night.
“If we find the Lost Legend, we’ll be very lucky,” Dad said. “It will
change our lives.”
“What do you mean?” I asked.
His expression turned solemn. “The ancient manuscript of the Lost
Legend is worth a fortune,” he replied. “The whole world is curious about
it. The whole world wants to read it. Because no one knows who wrote it—
or what it’s about.”
I thought about it all day as we twisted our way through the forest. What if
I’m the one to find it? I asked myself.
What if I look down and see the silver chest? Hidden between two
rocks, maybe. Or half-buried in the dirt with only part of its silver lid
poking up.
Wouldn’t that be cool? Wouldn’t that be awesome?
I pictured how happy Dad would be. And I thought about how rich and
famous I would be too. I’d be a hero. A real hero.
That’s what I thought about all day.
But so far, I knew I hadn’t been much of a hero. In fact, I nearly
burned down the tent.
And Dad was already grumbling that Marissa and I hadn’t been much
help.
I’ll be more helpful, I promised silently that night. I snuggled lower
into the sleeping bag, trying to get warm.
On the other side of the tent, I could hear Dad snoring lightly. Dad can
fall asleep in seconds. And he’s such a sound sleeper, you practically have
to hit him in the head to wake him up!
Marissa and I are not like Dad. It takes us hours to fall asleep. And the
tiniest, tiniest sound wakes us up instantly.
So now I lay on my back in the sleeping bag, staring up at the dark
ceiling of the tent. Trying to clear my mind. Trying not to think about
anything.
Trying to fall asleep… asleep… asleep.
I had almost drifted off—when an animal howl cut through the silence.
An angry howl. A menacing howl. So close!
Right outside the tent.
I jerked straight up. Wide awake. Breathing hard. I knew this wasn’t a
storybook creature. This creature was real.
5
The air in the tent felt cold against my hot skin. I realized that I was
sweating.
I listened hard.
And heard a shuffling sound. A low growl. The crackle of heavy paws
over the leafy forest ground.
My heart pounding, I slid the sleeping bag down. Started to crawl out
of it.
“Oh!” I let out a whispered cry as someone pushed past me.
“Dad—?”
No. I could still hear Dad’s steady snores from across the tent.
I knew it would take more than a terrifying animal howl to wake Dad
up!
“Marissa—” I whispered.
“Sssshh.” She held a finger up to her mouth as she crawled toward the
tent flap. “I heard it too.”
I moved quickly beside her. We stopped in front of the closed flap.
“It’s some kind of animal,” Marissa whispered.
“Maybe it’s a werewolf!” I whispered back.
There goes my wild imagination again.
But aren’t werewolves supposed to live deep in the forests of Europe?
I think that’s where all the old werewolf movies took place. In a forest just
like this one.
I heard another low growl.
I grabbed the tent flap and pulled it up. Cold air rushed in. A gust of
wind ruffled my pajama shirt.
I peered out into the night. A mist had fallen over the small clearing
where we had set up the tent. Pale moonlight shining through the mist
turned everything a shade of blue.
“What is it?” Marissa whispered from close behind me. “Do you see
it?”
I couldn’t see any animal. Only swirls of blue mist.
“Get back inside,” Marissa ordered.
I heard more shuffling sounds. A loud sniff.
“Hurry. Get back in,” Marissa urged.
“Just wait,” I whispered. I had to see what was out there. I had to see
what was making those noises.
I shivered. The air felt heavy and damp.
Wisps of the blue fog seemed to cling to me. I took a step out of the
tent. The ground sent a shock of cold up from my bare feet.
I held my breath and took another step.
And saw the creature.
A dog. A big dog, tall. Like a shepherd, only with long, white fur. The
white fur shimmered like silver under the misty moonlight. The dog had his
head lowered. He sniffed the ground.
As I stared at the animal, he raised his head and turned to me. And
started to wag his tail.
I love dogs.
I’ve always loved dogs.
Without thinking, I reached out my arms. And I ran to pet him.
“No! Don’t!” Marissa screamed.
6
Too late.
I knelt down and petted the fur on the big dog’s back. It felt soft and
thick. My hand touched leaves and small twigs tangled in the fur.
The dog’s tail wagged furiously. I petted his head. He raised his eyes
to me.
“Hey—!” I cried out. The dog had one brown eye, one blue.
“He might be a wolf!” Marissa called. I turned to see that she had
taken only one step from the tent. She clung to the flap, ready to duck
inside at any instant.
“He’s not a wolf. He’s a dog,” I told her. I studied him again. “At least,
I think he’s not a wolf,” I added. “I mean, he’s too friendly to be a wolf.”
I rubbed the top of his head. Then I scratched the thick, white fur on
his chest. I pulled blades of dried grass and weeds from his fur.
The dog wagged his tail happily.
“What is he doing out here?” Marissa demanded in a loud whisper. “Is
he a wild dog? Justin—he might be dangerous.”
The dog licked my hand.
“I don’t think he’s too dangerous,” I told her.
“But maybe he’s part of a pack,” Marissa warned. She let go of the tent
flap and took another step across the ground toward me. “Maybe the other
wild dogs sent him out as a scout. Maybe there are a hundred of them!”
I climbed to my feet and glanced around. Squinting through the blue
mist, I could see the tall, dark trees that circled the clearing. A half-moon
floated low over the trees, shimmery through the fog.
I listened hard.
Silence.
“I think this guy is alone,” I told my sister.
Marissa gazed down at the dog. “Remember that story Dad used to tell
about the ghost dog?” she asked. “Remember? The dog used to appear
outside someone’s house. It was such a cute little dog. Very sweet and
cuddly. It would tilt its head up toward the moon and let out an ‘eeeh eeeh’
sound, as if it were laughing.
“The dog was so cute, people had to come out and pet it. And when
they did, the dog would start to bark. It would call its ghost dog friends.
“The friends were mean and ugly. And they would circle the person,
circle faster and faster. And then gobble the poor victim up. And the last
thing the victim would see was the cute, cuddly dog tilting back its head,
laughing ‘eeeh eeeh’, laughing at the moon.
“Remember that story?” Marissa demanded.
“No, I don’t,” I told her. “I don’t think that’s one of Dad’s stories. It
isn’t good enough. I think it’s one of yours.”
Marissa thinks she’s a great storyteller like Dad. But her stories are
pretty dumb.
Whoever heard of a laughing dog?
She took another step toward the dog and me. I shivered. The forest air
was cold and damp, too cold to be out in pajamas and bare feet.
“If he’s a wild dog, he could be dangerous,” Marissa repeated.
“He seems gentle enough,” I said. I petted his head again. And as my
hand slid down the fur on the back of the dog’s neck, I felt something hard.
At first I thought it was another dead leaf matted in his thick, white fur.
I wrapped my hand around it.
Not a leaf. A collar. A leather dog collar.
“It’s not a wild dog,” I told my sister. “He has a collar. He must belong
to someone.”
“Maybe he ran away and got lost,” Marissa said, kneeling beside the
dog. “Maybe his owner is searching the forest for him.”
“Maybe,” I agreed. I tugged the collar up over the thick fur. The dog
turned his head and licked my hand.
“Does it have an ID tag or a license?” Marissa asked.
“That’s what I’m looking for,” I replied. “Whoa. Hold on. There is
something tucked under the collar.”
I pulled out a folded-up wad of paper. Squinting in the dim light, I
started to unfold it. “It’s a note,” I told Marissa.
“Maybe it has the owner’s address or a phone number on it,” she said.
I finished unfolding it and held the sheet of paper up close to my face
to read it.
“Well? What does it say?” Marissa demanded.
I read the handwritten words silently to myself—and gasped in
surprise.
“Justin—what does it say?” Marissa repeated.
7
Marissa tried to grab the note from my hand. But I swung it away from her.
“It’s a very short note,” I told her. I held it up again and read it out
loud:
“‘I KNOW WHY YOU’RE HERE. FOLLOW SILVERDOG.’”
“Silverdog?” Marissa lowered her gaze to the dog. “Silverdog?”
His ears perked up.
“He knows his name,” I said. I ran my eyes over the paper, trying to
see if I had missed anything. But that’s all there was. No name at the
bottom. Nothing else.
Marissa took the note from me and read it for herself. “ ‘I KNOW
WHY YOU’RE HERE’,” she repeated.
I shivered. The blue fog lowered around us. “We’d better show this to
Dad,” I said.
Marissa agreed. We turned and hurried to the tent. I glanced back to
make sure the dog wasn’t leaving. Silverdog had walked over to a clump of
tall weeds and was sniffing around them.
“Hurry,” I whispered to Marissa.
We both made our way to Dad’s sleeping bag. He was sound asleep on
his back, making soft blowing sounds through his lips.
I dropped to my knees and leaned over him. “Dad? Dad?”
He didn’t stir.
“Dad? Wake up! It’s important! Dad?”
Marissa and I both shouted at him. But he’s such a sound sleeper, he
didn’t hear us.
“Tickle his beard,” Marissa suggested. “Sometimes that works.”
I tickled his beard.
Nothing. He snored away.
I brought my face down to his ear. “Dad? Dad?”
I tried shaking him by the shoulders. But it was hard to get a good grip
under the sleeping bag.
“Dad? Please! Wake up!” Marissa pleaded.
He let out a groan.
“Yes!” I cried. “Dad?”
He rolled onto his side. Sound asleep.
I turned and saw that Marissa had crawled back to the tent opening.
She stared out. “The dog is heading toward the trees,” she reported. “What
should we do?”
“Get dressed,” I urged. “Hurry.”
We both pulled on the jeans and sweatshirts we’d been wearing. I got
one hiking boot on, then discovered I had a knot in the other shoelace.
By the time I pulled the second boot on, Marissa was already back
outside. “Where is Silverdog?” I asked, hurrying up beside her.
She pointed through the thickening fog. Clouds had rolled over the
moon. The heavy darkness made it almost impossible to see.
But I spotted the big dog loping slowly toward the trees.
“He’s leaving!” I gasped. “We have to follow him.” I started jogging
across the dirt.
Marissa hung back. “Not without Dad,” she insisted. “We can’t.”
“But someone is trying to help us!” I cried. “Someone knows where
the Lost Legend is. They sent the dog to bring us.”
“It may be a trap,” Marissa insisted. “Some kind of evil trick.”
“But, Marissa—”
I searched through the fog. Where was the dog? I could barely see
him. He had reached the trees on the far side of the clearing.
“Remember the story Dad tells about the forest imp?” Marissa asked.
“The imp puts out a trail of flowers and candy in the forest. And when
children follow the trail, it leads them into The Pit With No Bottom. And
the kids fall and fall for the rest of their lives. Remember?”
“Marissa—please!” I begged. “No more stories. Silverdog is getting
away.”
“But—but—” she sputtered. “Dad wouldn’t want us to go wandering
off on our own in the forest. You know he wouldn’t. We’ll be in real
trouble.”
“What if we found the Lost Legend?” I replied. “Then what? Then we
wouldn’t be in trouble—would we!”
“No! No way!” Marissa protested, folding her arms over her chest.
“We can’t go. No way, Justin.”
I sighed and shook my head. “I guess you’re right,” I said softly. “Let
the dog go on its way. Let’s get some sleep.”
I put my hand on her shoulder and led her back to the tent.
8
“Are you crazy?” Marissa cried. She spun away from me. “We can’t let the
dog get away! It may lead us right to the Lost Legend!”
She grabbed my hand, gave me a hard tug, and started to run, pulling
me across the clearing.
As I ran after her, I tried hard not to let her see the big smile on my
face. I knew my little trick would work with Marissa. It always does.
If I ever really want to do something, all I have to say is, “Let’s not do
it.”
Marissa always disagrees with me. Always.
That makes it very easy to get her to do what I want.
“Dad said we weren’t being helpful,” she murmured. “He was giving
us a hard time because we wouldn’t find firewood. What if we find the Lost
Legend? Then we’ll be helping him—big-time!”
“Big-time,” I repeated.
I pictured Marissa and me handing Dad the silver chest containing the
Lost Legend. I pictured the shock on Dad’s face. Then I pictured his smile.
Then I pictured the three of us on the TV news shows. I imagined
myself telling everyone how Marissa and I found the valuable old
manuscript—without any help from Dad.
My boots clumped over the soft ground. I stopped when we reached
the trees.
“There’s just one problem,” I told Marissa.
She spun around. “What’s that?”
“Where’s the dog?”
“Huh?” She turned back to the trees.
We both searched the darkness.
The dog had disappeared.
9
The fog clung to the dark trees. Clouds still covered the moon.
Marissa and I peered into the darkness, listening hard.
I sighed. I felt so disappointed. “I think our adventure is over before it
even started,” I murmured.
Wrong.
A loud bark made us both jump. “Hey—!” I cried out.
Silverdog barked again. He was calling us!
We stepped between the trees, following the sound.
My boots sank into the soft dirt. Under the tall trees, the sky grew even
darker.
“Stick close together,” Marissa pleaded. “It’s so hard to see.”
“We should have brought a flashlight,” I replied. “We left in such a
hurry, I didn’t think—”
A loud crackling sound made me stop. The crisp thud of paws over
dead leaves.
“This way,” I urged Marissa. I turned toward the sound. “Silverdog is
right up ahead.”
I still couldn’t see the dog. But I could hear his footsteps over the dry
twigs and leaves of the forest floor.
The dog had turned to the left, following a narrow path through the
trees. The ground beneath my boots became hard. We both raised our arms
in front of our faces as we stepped through a thicket of brambles.
“Ouch!” I cried out as prickly thorns pierced through the sleeve of my
sweatshirt.
“Where is that dog taking us?” Marissa asked shrilly. I knew she was
trying to sound calm. But I could hear the fear creep into her voice.
“He’s taking us to someone who wants to help us,” I reminded her.
“He’s taking us to someone who is going to make us rich and famous.
“Ow!” I pulled a burr from my wrist.
I hoped I was right. I hoped that the note didn’t lie. I hoped that the
dog was taking us someplace nice.
The footsteps turned sharply up ahead. I couldn’t see a path now.
Actually, I couldn’t see three feet in front of me!
We kept our arms in front of us, using them as shields. And we pushed
our way through a thicket of tall weeds.
“He’s speeding up,” Marissa whispered.
She was right. I could hear the dog’s footsteps moving more rapidly
over the ground.
Marissa and I began jogging, eager to keep up. Over our own
crunching footsteps, I could hear the dog breathing hard.
The flutter of wings—many wings, low overhead—made me duck.
“Were those birds?” Marissa cried. She swallowed hard. And then she
added, “Or bats?”
I could still hear the fluttering, in the distance now. The sound sent a
chill down my back.
So many flapping wings!
“They were birds,” I told Marissa. “They had to be birds.”
“Since when do birds fly like that at night?” she demanded.
I didn’t answer. Instead, I listened for the dog’s footsteps up ahead.
They seemed to be slowing down.
We followed the sound through an opening between tall bushes. And
stepped into a broad, grassy clearing.
As we made our way into the grass, the clouds floated away from the
moon. Under the moonlight, dew-covered grass shimmered like diamonds.
I gazed up from the grass—and gasped in horror.
Marissa grabbed my arm. Her mouth dropped open in shock.
“I don’t believe it!” I cried.
I stared at the creature standing a few yards up ahead of us.
Not the dog.
Not Silverdog.
A brown-and-black-spotted deer. A stag with antlers that curled up
from his head and gleamed in the moonlight.
We had followed the wrong animal.
And now we were hopelessly lost.
10
The big deer stared at us. Then he turned and trotted across the grass, into
the trees on the other side.
Frozen in shock, I watched him disappear. Then I turned to my sister.
“We—we made a bad mistake,” I managed to choke out. “I thought it was
the dog. I really did.”
“Let’s not panic,” Marissa said. She huddled close to me.
A gust of wind made the tall grass whisper and bend. I heard a low
moaning sound from the trees behind us. I tried to ignore it.
“You’re right. We won’t panic,” I agreed. But my legs were shaking,
and my mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton.
“We’ll go back the way we came,” Marissa said. “We didn’t walk that
far. It shouldn’t be too hard to retrace our steps.” She glanced around.
“Which way did we come?”
I spun around. “That way?” I pointed. “No. That way? No…”
I wasn’t sure.
“Maybe we should panic,” I said.
“Why did we do this?” Marissa wailed. “Why were we so stupid?”
“We thought we were helping Dad,” I reminded her.
“Now we may never see him again!” she cried.
I wanted to say something to calm her down. But the words caught in
my throat.
“This forest goes on for miles and miles!” Marissa continued. “The
whole country is probably forest. We’ll never find anyone who can help us.
We-we’ll probably be eaten by bears or something before we ever get out.”
“Don’t say bears,” I begged. “There aren’t any bears in this forest—are
there?”
I shuddered. Dad had told us too many stories that ended with children
being eaten by bears. That seemed to be one of Dad’s favorite endings.
It was never one of mine.
The wind bent the grass back the other way. In the far distance, I heard
the flutter of wings once again.
And over the whisper of the wings, I heard another sound.
A dog bark?
Was I imagining it?
I listened hard. And heard it again. Yes!
I turned and saw the happy expression on Marissa’s face. She heard it
too. “It’s Silverdog!” she cried. “He’s calling us!”
“Let’s go!” I exclaimed.
I heard another long series of barks. The dog was definitely calling us.
We spun around and ran toward the sound.
Ran back into the trees. Ran through the tall bushes. Leaped over
fallen logs. Ran to the barking.
Ran.
Ran full speed.
Until the ground suddenly gave way.
A hole opened up beneath us.
And we started to fall.
“Nooooooo!” I let out a long, terrified wail. “It’s The Pit With No
Bottom!”
11
I landed hard on my elbows and knees.
“Ooof!” I let out a groan as my face hit wet dirt.
A bottom.
A very hard bottom.
I glanced over at Marissa. She was already climbing to her feet. She
brushed dirt and dead leaves off the knees of her jeans.
“What did you yell?” she asked. “I couldn’t hear you.”
“Uh… nothing,” I mumbled. “Just yelled.”
I glanced up. Marissa and I had tumbled down a short, steep hill. We’d
fallen maybe three or four feet.
Not exactly a bottomless pit.
I brushed myself off, hoping Marissa couldn’t see how embarrassed I
felt.
When we climbed back to the top, Silverdog was waiting for us. The
dog raised his head and stared at us with his brown and blue eyes—as if to
say, “What is your problem? Why can’t you two jerks keep up with me?”
As soon as we joined him at the top of the hill, the big dog turned and
loped off, wagging his furry white tail. Every few steps, he glanced back to
make sure we were following.
I still felt kind of shaky from the fall. Even though it was such a short
drop, I had banged my knees pretty hard. They still ached. My heart still
raced.
Dad and his crazy stories, I thought, shaking my head. The Pit With
No Bottom… why would I even think such a crazy thought?
Well… what could be crazier than following a big white dog through a
Brovanian forest in the middle of the night?
Maybe Marissa and I will have a legend to tell our friends when we’re
finished, I thought. “The Legend of the Two Incredibly Stupid Kids.”
Or, maybe we’ll find the silver chest containing the Lost Legend—and
be rich and famous and make Dad proud.
These were my thoughts as my sister and I followed Silverdog along a
curving path through the forest. The dog loped easily between the trees and
weeds. And we trotted behind him, eager not to lose him again.
After a few minutes, we stepped into a large patch of tall grass.
Marissa and I stopped and watched Silverdog run across the grass,
prancing, raising his legs high. He ran to a small cabin on the other side of
the grass.
The cabin stood silvery gray under the moonlight. It had one narrow
door and one square window under a slanted red roof.
A stone fireplace stood beside the cabin. Some kind of barbecue grill, I
guessed. Beside the fireplace, I saw a low pile of firewood, neatly stacked.
I could see no lights on inside the cabin. No sign that anyone lived
there.
Silverdog pranced up to the tiny building, pushed in the door with his
snout, and disappeared inside.
Marissa and I hesitated at the edge of the clearing. We watched the
cabin, waiting for someone to come out. The door remained half-open.
We took a few steps closer. “This is where he wanted to bring us,”
Marissa murmured, her eyes on the cabin door. “Silverdog sure seemed
happy to get home. Did you see the way he strutted? Do you think the
person who wants to help us is inside?”
“Only one way to find out,” I replied.
“The cabin looks almost like a fairy-tale cabin,” Marissa said. “Like a
cabin in one of Dad’s old stories.” She laughed, a quiet dry laugh. “Maybe
it’s made out of cookies and candy.”
“Yeah. Right.” I rolled my eyes.
“Do you remember the story—?” she started.
“Please—no stories!” I begged. “Come on. Let’s check out the place.”
We stepped up to the cabin. The whole building was only a few feet
taller than we were!
“Hello?” I called.
No answer.
“Anyone home?” I called, a little louder.
No answer.
I tried one more time. “Hello? Anyone in there?” I shouted, cupping
my hands around my mouth.
I pushed open the door. Marissa followed me inside.
We found ourselves in a warm kitchen. Light from a candle on a small
table flickered over the wall. I saw a crusty loaf of bread on the sink
counter. A carving knife beside it.
I saw a big black pot simmering on a wood-burning stove. It sent a
sweet, tangy aroma floating through the room.
I didn’t have time to see anything else.
As I took one step into the small kitchen, a figure burst in from a back
room.
A very large woman wearing a long, flowing, gray dress.
She had flashing, bright green eyes. Blond bangs fell across her
forehead, and long braids hung down the sides of her round-cheeked face.
She wore a helmet over her head. A cone-shaped helmet with two
horns poking up from the sides. Like a Viking from long ago. Or someone
in an opera.
Her arms were big, with powerful muscles. She had sparkling rings on
every finger. A round, jeweled medallion swung heavily over her chest.
She dove quickly past Marissa and me, her green eyes wild, her mouth
twisted in an evil grin.
She slammed the cabin door shut.
Pressed her back against the door.
“I’ve caught you!” she shrieked. And tossed back her head in an ugly
cackle of triumph.
12
Her cruel laugh ended in a cough. Her green eyes sparkled at us, reflecting
the candlelight. She stared at us hungrily.
“Let us go!”
Those were the words I wanted to shout.
But when I opened my mouth, only a tiny squeak slipped out.
Marissa moved first. She dove for the door. I forced my rubbery legs
into action, and followed close behind.
“Let us out!” I finally managed to scream. “You can’t keep us here!”
The big woman’s smile faded. “Take it easy, kids,” she boomed. She
had a loud, deep voice. “I was just kidding.”
Marissa and I both gaped at her. “Excuse me?” I cried.
“Sorry. I have a bad sense of humor,” the woman said. “I guess it
comes from living out here in the middle of the forest. I can’t resist a really
mean joke.”
I still didn’t understand. “You mean you didn’t lock us in?” I
demanded in a trembling voice. “You haven’t captured us?”
She shook her head. The horns on the helmet moved with her head.
She suddenly reminded me of a large, gray bull.
“I haven’t captured you. I sent Silverdog so that I could help you.” She
pointed toward the stove.
I saw that the big white dog had dropped down beside it. He lowered
his head, licking a big front paw. But he kept his eyes on Marissa and me.
My sister and I stayed near the door. This woman was strange. And
kind of terrifying.
She was so big and loud. And powerful-looking. And those green eyes
flashed and danced wildly beneath the horned helmet.
Is she totally crazy? I wondered.
Did she really bring us here to help us?
“I know everything that happens in this forest,” she said mysteriously.
She raised the jeweled medallion close to her face and stared into it. “I have
ways of seeing things. Nothing escapes me.”
I glanced at Marissa. Her eyes were wide with fright. Her hand
reached for the cabin door.
Back by the stove, Silverdog yawned. He lowered his head between
his paws.
“What are your names?” the woman boomed. She let the heavy
medallion drop back onto her chest. “My name is Ivanna.” She narrowed
her eyes at me. “Do you know what Ivanna means?”
I cleared my throat. “Uh… no,” I replied.
“I don’t, either!” the woman exclaimed. She tossed back her head in
another cackling laugh. The medallion bounced on her chest. Her helmet
nearly toppled off her blond hair.
Despite the warmth of the small kitchen, I shivered. We had walked so
far through the cold forest. I couldn’t shake off the chill.
“You two look half-frozen,” Ivanna said, studying our faces. “I think I
know what you need. Hot soup. Sit down.” She motioned to a small
wooden table with two chairs in the corner of the room.
Marissa and I hesitated. I didn’t want to leave the door. I knew we both
were still thinking of making a run for it.
“Our dad…” Marissa murmured. “He’ll be looking for us. He might be
here—any minute.”
Ivanna stepped over to the stove. “Why didn’t you bring him along?”
she asked. She pulled down two bowls from a cabinet.
“We couldn’t wake him up,” I blurted out.
Marissa glared at me.
“A heavy sleeper, huh?” Ivanna had her back to us. She was ladling
soup from the black pot into the two bowls.
I leaned close to Marissa. “If we want to escape, now is our chance,” I
whispered.
She turned to the door, then swung back. “I’m so cold,” she whispered.
“And the soup smells so good.”
“Sit down,” Ivanna ordered in her deep, booming voice.
I led the way to the small wooden table. Marissa and I sat down on the
hard chairs.
Ivanna set the steaming bowls in front of us. Her green eyes lit up as
she smiled. “Hot chicken noodle soup. It will warm you and get you ready
for your test.”
“Huh? Test?” I cried. “What test?”
“Eat. Eat,” Ivanna ordered. “Warm yourselves.” She stepped back to
the stove.
I watched her bend to pet Silverdog’s head. Then I raised the soup
spoon to my mouth. Blew on it. And swallowed a mouthful.
Delicious.
And it felt so warm and soothing on my dry throat.
I took a few more spoonfuls. Then I glanced across the table. Marissa
seemed to be enjoying it too.
I had raised a spoonful of noodles nearly to my mouth—when Ivanna
spun toward us from the sink. Her eyes went wide. Her mouth dropped
open.
She pointed at us with a trembling finger. “You—you haven’t eaten
any of it—have you?” she demanded.
“Huh?” Marissa and I both gasped.
“Whatever you do, don’t eat it!” Ivanna cried. “I—I just remembered.
It’s poison!”
13
The spoon dropped from my hand and splashed into the bowl. I grabbed my
stomach, waiting for the pain to begin.
I glanced over at Marissa—and saw her roll her eyes. “Another joke?”
Marissa asked Ivanna.
“Another joke!” Ivanna confessed gleefully. Once again, she roared
with laughter.
I swallowed hard. Why didn’t I guess it was another one of the
woman’s mean jokes? I hate it when Marissa catches on to things before I
do!
“I knew it all along,” I muttered.
Ivanna stepped up to the table, the medallion bouncing as she walked.
“The soup isn’t poison. But don’t eat it yet,” she instructed. “I want to read
the noodles.”
“Excuse me?” I replied.
She leaned over my bowl, bringing her face so close that the steam
misted her cheeks. “Chicken soup noodles foretell your fate,” she
whispered mysteriously.
She studied the noodles in my bowl. Then she studied Marissa’s.
“Hmmmm. Hmmmm,” she kept repeating. “Yes. Hmmmm hmmmm.”
Finally, she stood up and crossed her powerful arms over her chest.
Her cheeks were red from the hot steam off the soup.
“Eat. Eat your soup now,” she instructed. “Before it gets cold.”
“What did you see?” I asked. “In the noodles. What did they tell you?”
Her expression turned solemn. “You must take the test in the
morning,” she replied. “I was right. I know why you have come to the
forest. I know what you seek.”
She straightened the helmet on her head. “I can help you. I can help
you find it. But first you must take the test.”
“Uh… what kind of test?” I asked.
Her eyes flashed. “A survival test,” she replied.
I swallowed hard. “I was afraid of that,” I muttered.
“What if we don’t want to take your survival test?” Marissa demanded.
“Then you will never find the silver chest!” Ivanna declared heatedly.
I gasped. “Wow! You do know what we’re looking for!” I exclaimed.
She nodded. “I know everything in this forest.”
“But—but we need our dad!” Marissa stammered.
Ivanna shook her head. “There is no time. You will take the test in his
place. Do not worry. It is not a difficult test. If you stay alive.”
“Huh? If we stay alive? Is that one of your jokes?” I asked weakly.
“No,” Ivanna replied, shaking her head. “No joke. I never joke about
the test in the Fantasy Forest.”
I was holding the soup spoon. But I let it fall to the table. “Fantasy
Forest? Where’s that? What is it?”
Ivanna opened her mouth to answer. But before she could say a word,
the cabin door burst open.
I felt a blast of cold air.
And then a wild creature, covered in black fur, scrabbled into the room
on all fours. Snarling, it cast its bulging black eyes around the room.
Then it snapped its jagged teeth—and, with a hoarse growl, leaped to
attack me.
14
I uttered a scream—and tried to dodge out of the way.
My chair fell, and I fell with it.
The chair clattered noisily onto the floorboards. I landed on my side.
I tried to roll away. But the snarling creature sank its teeth into my leg.
“Owwww!” I shrieked.
Over my cry, I heard Ivanna’s booming shouts: “Down, Luka! Get
down! Off, Luka! Get off!”
The wild creature gurgled. It let go of my leg. And backed away,
breathing hard.
As I scrambled to my feet, I stared at the panting creature. It had a
man’s face. Hunched on its hind legs, it looked almost human. Except that it
was covered with thick, black fur.
“Get back, Luka!” Ivanna screamed. “Back!”
The creature obediently inched back.
“Don’t be scared of Luka,” Ivanna said, turning to me. “He’s a good
boy.”
“What—what is he?” I cried, rubbing my leg.
“I’m not sure,” Ivanna replied, grinning at the furry thing.
Luka hopped up and down, grinning, making grunting sounds.
“He was brought up by wolves,” Ivanna said. “But he’s a good boy.
Aren’t you, Luka?”
Luka nodded. His tongue hung out of his open mouth. He panted like a
dog.
Ivanna petted his long, shaggy hair.
He broke away from her and charged at me again. He sniffed my
sweatshirt and jeans. Then he crawled under the table and sniffed Marissa’s
hiking boots.
“Get away, Luka!” Ivanna ordered. “Off! Off!” She turned to me.
“He’s a good boy. He’s just nosy. He’ll calm down—once he gets to know
you.”
“Gets to know us?” Marissa demanded, watching Luka scurry over to
Silverdog by the stove.
“Luka will be a big help to you when you enter the Fantasy Forest,”
Ivanna said with a smile.
“He’s coming with us?” I cried.
Ivanna nodded. “He will be your guide. And he will protect you.” Her
expression turned solemn. Then she added softly, “You need all the help
you can get.”
We finished our soup quickly. Silverdog and Luka watched us from
beside the stove.
When we finished, Ivanna led us to a small back room. The room was
bare except for two cots.
“You will sleep here,” she said sternly.
“But our dad—” Marissa started.
Ivanna raised a hand to silence her. “You want to find the silver chest
—don’t you? You want to surprise your father and make him proud—don’t
you?”
Marissa and I nodded.
“Then you will take the test. If you pass it, I will tell you how to find
the chest.”
She dropped a coarse wool blanket onto each cot. “Sleep quickly,” she
instructed. “The test begins first thing in the morning.”
I awoke slowly. Stretched. Turned and reached to push the blanket off me.
No blanket.
Had I kicked it onto the floor?
I blinked several times, trying to clear the sleep from my eyes.
How long had I slept?
Sunlight streamed all around.
Yawning, I sat up. Started to climb off the cot.
But the cot had disappeared, too.
“Hey—!” I cried out when I realized the cabin had also disappeared.
“Where am I?”
I was sitting on the grass, fully dressed. I blinked, waiting for my eyes
to adjust to the bright morning sunlight. The grass still shimmered wetly
from the morning dew.
I stood up. My mouth dry. Feeling stunned.
Nothing but forest all around.
My mind whirled. Ivanna had said the test would begin first thing in
the morning.
Had it already begun? Was I in the Fantasy Forest?
Had the test begun before I awoke?
Rubbing my eyes, I turned to Marissa. “Where are we?” I asked, my
voice still hoarse from sleep. I cleared my throat. “Do you think—”
I stopped with a gasp when I realized Marissa wasn’t there.
I was alone.
Alone in the middle of the forest.
“Marissa—?” I called, feeling the panic tighten my chest. Where was
she?
Where was I?
“Marissa—? Marissa—?”
15
“Marissa—?”
My voice cracked. My throat tightened.
I heard a low growl from the trees. The thud and crackle of heavy
animal footsteps.
I turned to the sound. And watched Luka come hopping out of the
forest. He stood on his two feet like a man. But he hopped like a rabbit.
Scratching the thick fur on one leg, he grinned at me as he came near.
I didn’t grin back. “Where is Marissa?” I demanded. “Where is my
sister?”
He tilted his head and stared at me, confused.
“Marissa!” I screamed at him. “Where is Marissa?”
“Over here!”
I jumped when her voice leaped out at me. “Where are you?” I called.
I saw a flash of her red hair. Then she poked her head out from behind
a wide, leafy bush.
“Over here,” she repeated. “You were still asleep. So I thought I’d
explore.”
“You scared me to death!” I admitted. I began trotting through the tall
grass and weeds, eager to join her. “Where are we?” I demanded. “What
happened to Ivanna’s cabin?”
Marissa shrugged. “Beats me. I woke up—and here we were.”
Behind us, Luka growled.
I turned and saw him pawing the dirt, like a dog. “Do you think he’s
part human?” I whispered to Marissa.
She didn’t seem to hear me. She pointed to a spot between two trees.
“I found a path over there. Do you think we’re supposed to follow it?”
“I don’t know what we’re supposed to do,” I replied shrilly. “Did
Ivanna ever explain the test? No. Did she ever tell us the rules? No. Did she
ever tell us what we’re supposed to do to pass the test? No.”
Marissa’s eyes narrowed in fear. “I think we’re supposed to stay
alive,” she said softly. “I think that’s how we pass the test.”
“But where do we go? What do we do?” I cried. I could feel myself
start to lose control. I felt angry and frightened and confused—all at the
same time.
Luka uttered another growl. He stopped digging up the dirt and came
staggering over to us, standing up like a human.
If he shaved off all the fur, put on some clothes, and got a haircut, he’d
look like a young man, I thought. As I stared at him, he started to wave and
point.
“What is he doing?” I asked Marissa.
She stepped up beside me and stared at him too.
Luka grunted excitedly. He waved a furry hand at us and jabbed his
other hand toward the trees.
“I think he wants us to follow him,” I said.
“Yes,” Marissa agreed. “Remember—Ivanna said he would be our
guide.”
Grunting and waving, Luka headed for the trees.
I held back. “Can we trust him?” I asked.
Marissa shrugged. “Do we have a choice?”
Luka stepped onto a path that led through the forest. The path curved
behind a clump of tall, yellow-leafed bushes. I saw his head bobbing above
the bushes. Then he disappeared.
“Hurry!” I tugged my sister’s arm. “We’d better not let him get out of
sight.”
I glanced down and saw two black backpacks on the grass. I bent
down, grabbed one, and unzipped it. Empty.
I handed the other backpack to Marissa. “Ivanna must have left these
for us,” I told her. “They’re empty. But I guess we should take them.”
We pulled the backpacks onto our backs. Then we jogged to the path
and hurried to catch up with the bouncing, hopping Luka.
He stopped to sniff a weed. Then he continued shuffling along the
path.
We followed close behind. Two or three times, he turned back to make
sure we were following.
The path curved between prickly weeds and tall reeds. We passed a
small, round pond that reflected the blue sky. The air became warmer and
wet. The back of my neck felt hot and prickly.
We entered a cluster of trees with smooth, white trunks. The trees grew
close together. The smooth bark of the trunks felt cool against my hot
hands.
“Where is he taking us?” Marissa whispered.
I didn’t answer her. I didn’t know. I only knew that Luka was leading
us deeper and deeper into this forest.
We squeezed our way through the white-trunked trees. And came out
in a large, grassy clearing. Small gray rocks poked up from the grass. The
slender white trees formed a circle around the clearing.
My boots crunched over the ground as I followed Luka across the
grass. I looked down to see what made the crunching sound.
And discovered that the ground was covered with large brown nuts.
I picked one up. “Check this out,” I called to Marissa. I turned and saw
that she had picked up two of them. “They must have fallen off the white
trees,” I said.
“They look like walnuts. But they’re bigger than eggs!” she declared.
“I never saw walnuts this big!”
“They feel so hot!” I exclaimed. I glanced up at the sky. “I guess it’s
from the sun beating down on them.”
“Hey—! Whoa!”
Marissa’s cry made me look up.
I saw a gray creature scamper across the clearing.
At first I thought it was a dog or a very large cat. Then I realized it was
a squirrel. It carried one of the large nuts in its front paws. And it hopped
quickly toward the trees, its bushy gray tail floating behind it like a
pennant.
I turned as Luka let out a hoarse cry.
I saw him stand straight up. I saw his eyes go wide with excitement.
He let out another cry. Leaned forward. Reached out both hands.
And started to chase after the squirrel.
The squirrel saw Luka coming. It dropped the nut and took off at full
speed into the white trees.
Luka dropped to all fours and galloped after it.
“No, Luka—come back!” Marissa shouted.
“Come back! Come back!” we both called. “Luka—come back!”
16
Marissa and I both let out worried cries. Then we took off after Luka, into
the clump of trees.
“Luka—! Hey, Luka!” I called. My voice bounced off the trees. It
echoed all around me.
“Luka—! Hey, Luka!”
The cry repeated and repeated, echoing loudly.
I could hear his growl up ahead. And I could hear him thrashing his
way through the trees as he chased the fat squirrel.
“Luka—come back!” Marissa’s cry echoed all around the forest, too.
As we called after him, it sounded as if there were dozens of us in the
forest, all chasing after him, all frantically calling for him to stop chasing
that squirrel and come back to us.
“Whoa!” I cried out as I tried to slip through the narrow space between
two white tree trunks—and my backpack caught between the trees.
“Ow!”
It snapped me back. I staggered and nearly fell.
Mister Klutz. For a change.
“Luka! Hey—Luka!” I could hear Marissa’s cry up ahead of me now.
I tried to slip through the trees again, and the backpack caught again. I
pulled it free and found another, wider opening.
A few seconds later, I caught up with my sister. She had stopped
running. She leaned against a tree trunk, breathing hard.
“Where is he?” I cried. “Do you see him? Where did he go?”
“I—I lost him,” Marissa replied breathlessly. “I don’t even hear him
anymore.”
I listened hard. The forest was silent now. No footsteps. No growls.
The leaves above us brushed together, making a soft, whispering sound.
“But how could he run away?” I cried. “He’s supposed to be our
guide!”
“I think he really wanted to catch that squirrel,” Marissa said quietly.
“But—but—” I sputtered. “He can’t just run away and leave us all by
ourselves here.”
Marissa sighed. “I think he just did.”
“We have to find him!” I cried. “Come on. We have to keep going. We
can’t let him—”
Marissa shook her head. “How can we find him, Justin? Which way
should we go?”
“We’ll follow his footprints,” I replied. I lowered my gaze to the
ground. A thick carpet of brown leaves spread over the dirt.
No footprints.
“I think he was heading that way,” I said, pointing to the trees.
Marissa shook her head. “I don’t think so.” She pushed herself away
from the tree trunk. “He’s gone, Justin.”
I spun around, frantically searching for him. For any sign of him.
“Hey—what’s that?” Marissa called.
“Huh?” I turned back to her.
“In your back pocket,” she said, pointing. “What is it?”
Confused, I reached into the back pocket of my jeans—and pulled out
a folded-up sheet of paper. My hands were sweaty and stuck to the paper.
But I unfolded it quickly.
“It’s some kind of a note,” I told Marissa. “In a tiny handwriting.”
“Well, read it!” she cried.
My eyes slid to the bottom of the page. “It-it’s from Ivanna,” I
stammered excitedly.
“What does it say?” Marissa demanded impatiently.
I steadied the page between both my hands and read the note out loud
to both of us:
“DEAR KIDS,
KEEP LUKA WITH YOU, AND YOU WILL PASS THE TEST. DO
NOT LET HIM OUT OF YOUR SIGHT. BE CAREFUL NOT TO LOSE
HIM—OR YOU ARE DOOMED.”
17
Marissa and I made our way slowly back to the clearing. The grass swayed
under a soft breeze. Our boots crunched over the large nuts in the grass.
I still held Ivanna’s note in my hand. I glanced over it one more time,
hoping it didn’t say what it said. Then I angrily balled it up and tossed it
away.
Marissa trudged along beside me. The sun beat down on us. We were
both sweating.
“Maybe if we wait here, Luka will come back,” Marissa said.
“He isn’t coming back,” I groaned. “He is probably miles away, still
chasing after that squirrel.”
“Then what do we do next?” Marissa demanded. “How do we pass the
test?”
I let out an unhappy sigh. “We can’t pass the test. You heard what the
note said. We’re doomed.”
“Well, we can try,” she insisted. She started across the clearing. I
followed her.
We had taken six or seven steps when I heard a startling sound. A loud
snap, like a pencil being broken in two.
Then a crack—soft at first, and then louder.
I stopped and whirled around. I expected to see Luka come bounding
out of the forest.
But I saw only the tall, white trees. No one there.
I heard another sharp snap. Then another. And another.
And then I heard cracking all around.
The earth is cracking open!
That was my first thought. I pictured the ground splitting apart. A dark
hole opening up. And Marissa and me falling, falling down into it.
The Pit With No Bottom!
I wished Dad had never told us that story!
Now Marissa grabbed my shoulder and pointed down. “Justin—look!”
I gazed down. The ground hadn’t split open. But the snapping and
cracking echoed all around.
Louder. Louder.
“Ohh!” I let out a frightened moan as I realized to my horror that the
grass was moving.
I could feel it move under my feet.
“What’s happening?” Marissa cried, still holding on to me. “That
sound—!”
The cracking grew louder, rising up from the ground. Now it sounded
as if all the trees were cracking apart.
The grass swayed and bent.
“It’s—the nuts!” I cried to Marissa. “Look! They’re all cracking
open!”
I covered my ears against the sound.
And stared at the nuts, bouncing and trembling all around our feet.
Cracking open. Splitting apart.
Hundreds and hundreds of them. The whole clearing. The ground
shaking as they all cracked apart.
Cracked into pieces. Crumbled around us.
We stared in amazement at the cracking nuts. And then, Marissa and I
both screamed in shock when we saw what came climbing out.
18
Staring down as a nut split open, I saw gnashing teeth. Tiny black eyes. A
twitching black nose.
The creature pushed itself up. I saw spindly front legs.
A slender body of gray fur.
And those teeth. Snapping. Gnashing.
“A mouse!” I choked out.
“Hundreds of them!” Marissa cried.
The nuts were splitting apart. All across the clearing. So many of
them, it made the grass quiver and the ground appear to shake.
I stood frozen in place, watching mice hatch around my feet. They
pushed out slowly, poking their heads out first. Sniffing the air. Trying out
their pointy teeth.
The nuts rocked onto their sides. Cracked apart. Gray bodies slithered
out. Sticklike back legs kicked their way out from the empty shells.
“They’re not nuts—they’re eggs!” Marissa wailed.
“But mice don’t come from eggs!” I protested.
Marissa raised her eyes to me, her face twisted in shock. “I guess no
one told these mice!”
A mouse scampered over my boots. Mice were scurrying through the
tall grass, making the grass whisper.
Another gray body slithered over my boots.
“Let’s get out of here!” I cried to Marissa. I grabbed her arm and
started to pull.
But so many mice scampered over the grass, so many gray bodies
slithered at our feet—we couldn’t move.
Shrill squeaks rose up from the grass as the creatures found their
voices. “Eee eee eee eee!” The sound surrounded us. Grew louder, louder.
Until it drowned out the whisper of the grass. Until it forced Marissa and
me to cover our ears.
“Eee eee eee eee!”
“We have to run!” I shouted.
“But the ground is covered!” Marissa shrieked. “If we run—”
“YOWWWWW!” I let out a cry as I felt a mouse drop inside my
hiking boot. Its tiny feet scratched through my wool socks.
I bent down to pull it out—and saw two more mice clinging by their
teeth to my pants cuff.
“Hey—” I tried to bat them away.
Lost my balance.
Fell to my knees.
Justin the Super Klutz strikes again.
Mice scurried over my hands. I felt one climb up my sweatshirt sleeve,
onto my back.
“Hellllp!” Marissa and I both cried out at the same time.
I turned and saw her bent over, hands raised, struggling to pull two
mice from her hair.
Another mouse chewed the bottom of her sweatshirt. Two more mice
climbed a leg of her jeans. Mice clung to her backpack.
“Helllp me! Ohhhh—helllp!”
Still on my knees, I struggled to push myself up. But a mouse slithered
under my sweatshirt. I felt its prickly feet move across my chest. Then I felt
a sharp stab of pain in the middle of my back.
Did it bite me?
Mice jumped onto my shoulders. Crawled over the back of my neck.
Swarmed over my backpack.
Swinging both hands wildly, I tried to brush them off me.
But there were too many of them.
Squeaking. Snapping. Clinging to my clothes. My wrists. My hair.
“Helllllp! Hellllp!”
I pulled a mouse from my ear. And tossed it across the grass.
I could feel a bunch of them crawling over my bare skin under my
sweatshirt. Another sharp bite made me cry out—and I dropped facedown
onto the grass—onto more mice!
I tried to swat the mice away. Tried to swat them and push them and
grab them and tug them off me.
But there were too many. Way too many.
I turned and saw them swarming over Marissa. She cried out as she
spun around, swinging her arms. Trying to shake the mice off.
I wanted to help her. But I couldn’t get up.
My whole body tingled and itched.
The squeaking, chattering mice swarmed over me, holding me down.
Prickling me, scratching me, biting me—until I couldn’t move, couldn’t
breathe.
19
“Off! Get off!” I managed to cry.
I swiped at my face, slapping two mice off my cheeks. I pulled one,
squeaking and squirming, from my hair. Pulled another one off my
forehead.
I kicked my legs and swung my arms, frantically trying to free myself.
“Oww!” I let out a wild shriek as a fat, gray mouse scratched at my
ear.
I reached up. Grabbed it. And squeezed.
The mouse gave a soft groan—and collapsed.
“Huh?” I felt something hard above its furry gray belly. Like a bump.
I slapped away two other mice and examined the one in my hand. I
pushed the tiny, hard bump. The mouse started to squirm and struggle.
I pushed the bump again. The mouse slumped in my hand, silent and
still.
“It’s an on-off switch!” I screamed.
I turned to Marissa. She had fallen to her knees. Dozens of mice
swarmed over her. They covered her sweatshirt. They crawled through her
hair.
“It’s an on-off switch!” I shouted to her. “Marissa—squeeze the button
on their front. You can turn them off!”
I grabbed a mouse off my neck. Squeezed the button. Shut it off.
I swiped up two more and turned them off.
“They’re not real!” I cried happily. “The mice—they’re fakes! They’re
little machines!”
Marissa climbed to her feet. She was brushing mice off her clothes.
Clicking them off. “Weird!” she exclaimed. “Justin—this is so weird!”
“We’ve got to get out of here,” I told her. “We’ve got to find Luka.”
Marissa tugged a mouse off the back of her neck and clicked it off.
“Do you think this was the test?” she asked. “Do you think we passed it?”
“I don’t know,” I replied. My eyes searched the trees. “I don’t care
about the test right now. I just want to get away from these dumb
mechanical mice.”
I brushed two more off the front of my jeans. Then I reached for
Marissa. I pulled a mouse off her shoulder, clicked it off, and tossed it
away.
Then we both started to run for the trees.
Mice scurried under our feet. Their shrill squeaks echoed all around
us.
We stepped on them as we ran. But we didn’t care. We knew they
weren’t real. We knew they were mechanical.
We were nearly out of the clearing when I stopped suddenly. I had an
idea.
I bent down and started scooping up mice. “Wait up!” I called to
Marissa.
She didn’t hear me. She kept running toward the trees.
“Wait up! I’ll be right there!” I called. I picked up a few handfuls of
mice and clicked them off. Then I shoved them into my backpack.
These will be awesome for playing jokes on people back home! I told
myself. They’re so lifelike. Can you imagine the fun I’ll have with these in
Miss Olsen’s class?
I shoved eight or nine more of them into the pack and closed it up.
Then I climbed to my feet and ran after my sister.
I glanced back once—and saw the mice, thousands of them, crawling
over each other, crawling in wild circles through the grass.
Then I turned and ran, following Marissa into the safety of the whitetrunked trees. Ran full-speed. Ran blindly.
So eager to get away from that clearing and the squeaking, scurrying
mice.
“Marissa—wait up!” I called.
She was far ahead, running fast.
“Wait up!” I called.
And then I uttered a sharp cry as I ran—full-force—into a tree.
“Oooof!”
I felt the air burst from my lungs. I saw stars. Red and yellow stars,
dancing in a pure white sky.
Gasping for breath, I reached for the tree trunk.
I heard a cracking sound.
So loud. And close.
The tree!
The tree I had run into—it started to fall!
“Look out—!” I called to my sister.
Too late.
As I stared helplessly, the tall, white tree collapsed.
Marissa’s hands shot up as the tree fell on her.
And crushed her beneath its heavy trunk.
20
“Nooooo!” I let out a howl of horror. And stared down at my sister.
Marissa lay sprawled facedown in the dirt. The tree trunk had crushed
her back and shoulders.
Was she breathing?
I couldn’t tell.
“Marissa—!” I choked out her name and dropped down beside her. “I
—I—”
I saw her body give a hard shake.
She raised her head and squinted up at me. “What happened?” Her
words came out in a whisper.
“Does it hurt?” I cried. “Are you in pain?”
She squinted harder, as if thinking about it. “No. No pain.” Marissa
rolled onto her back. Then she reached up with both hands—and shoved the
tree trunk off her.
“Huh?” I let out a startled cry.
I saw the bewildered expression on my sister’s face. “It’s fake too,”
she murmured.
She reached out and tugged off a chunk of the tree trunk. “It’s plaster
or something,” she announced. “Check it out, Justin.”
My hand was trembling as I tore off a piece of the trunk. I was still
shaking all over from the sight of Marissa falling under the tree.
I squeezed the chunk of tree, and it turned to powder in my hand. I
pulled off another hunk. Soft plaster.
Marissa climbed to her feet. She brushed the plaster dust off her
clothes. “It’s a total fake,” she murmured again.
“Do you think the trees are all fake?” I cried. “The whole forest?”
I got up. Then I took a running start. Stuck both hands straight out in
front of me…
…And ran as hard as I could, shoving my hands against a tree.
The trunk cracked easily. I stood shaking my head in amazement as the
tree toppled over. It hit another tree and knocked that one down too. The
plaster trunks cracked and shattered as they hit the ground.
“Fake. It’s all a fake!” Marissa declared. A smile spread over her face.
“That looks like fun.”
She took a running start, aiming at a tree across from the others.
“No! Not that one!” I screamed.
I guess Marissa couldn’t stop in time. She slammed her shoulder into
the tree. “Yaaaay!”
She raised both fists over her head in triumph as the tree toppled over.
But she didn’t have much time to cheer.
As the white trunk fell, I heard the hard flutter of wings.
And I watched in horror as dark forms fluttered up from the fallen
limbs.
I had seen the bats. Dozens of black bats. Clinging upside down on the
tree limbs.
I had seen them. But I hadn’t warned Marissa in time.
And now the bats all came flapping up, cluttering angrily, their sleep
interrupted.
Hissing and shrieking at us, they surrounded us—and began to circle. I
could feel the warm breeze from their flapping wings.
Faster. Faster, they circled.
“Are they fake too?” Marissa asked in a tiny voice.
“I—I don’t think so,” I stammered as they swooped in for the kill.
21
Marissa and I both ducked as the circle of bats swooped low.
I shut my eyes and covered my head with my hands.
And waited.
The sound of a deep boom rose over the shrill chittering of the bats.
The ground shook.
Thunder?
Another boom, low at first, then loud as an explosion.
I raised my head in time to see the white trees tremble.
The bats stopped their shrieking. Their wings shot up, stretched out.
Another boom of thunder sent them racing back up to the sky. I
watched them flutter up, rising, rising above the trees, rising against the
bright sky until they seemed to disappear into the sun.
Marissa let out a long sigh of relief. “We’re safe.” She climbed to her
feet slowly.
“But what is that sound?” I demanded, listening hard.
Another thunderous boom. Closer this time.
I felt the ground shake. A tree tottered, then came toppling to the
ground.
“It can’t be thunder,” Marissa said softly. She pointed to the sky. “No
clouds or anything.”
Another boom.
Closer.
“I—I know what it is,” I stammered.
Marissa turned to me. Another boom shook the trees.
“Footsteps,” I murmured. “Coming toward us. I know it’s footsteps.”
Marissa’s mouth dropped open. “Justin—you’re letting your crazy
imagination run away with you. Again!”
“No. I’m right,” I insisted. “Footsteps.”
My sister squinted at me. “Are you losing it? What could make
footsteps that loud? It would have to be…” Her voice trailed off.
Another boom.
I let my crazy imagination run away with me. I couldn’t help it. I
pictured a dinosaur. A Tyrannosaurus rex. Lumbering through the trees. Or
maybe one of those fat ones with the long, skinny necks.
Boooooom. Booooom.
Or maybe two of them!
“Whatever it is, it’s coming closer,” Marissa whispered. She shook her
head. “Ivanna said this was a test of survival. But—”
So far, it had been a test of our running skills!
But I didn’t care. No way I wanted to stick around to see what this
giant creature was.
As Marissa and I turned and started to run in the opposite direction, a
shadow fell over us.
I gazed up to see if clouds had blocked the sun.
But I saw no clouds overhead.
The shadow was cast by the creature, thundering closer and closer
behind us.
I heard trees crunching underfoot. The ground shook. The heavy
footsteps boomed close behind us.
How tall was it?
I glanced back—but could see only quivering trees.
Booooom. Booooom.
My knees buckled as the ground shook under my feet.
Marissa and I ran side by side. We hurtled through the trees as fast as
we could, gasping for breath as we ran.
But we couldn’t run out of the shadow. No matter how hard we ran, it
floated over us, cold and dark.
Booooom. Booooom.
So close now. So close that every footstep made me leap into the air.
My heart thudded. My temples throbbed.
Marissa and I forced ourselves to keep running, desperate to escape,
desperate to run out from under the wide shadow that seemed to hold us
prisoner.
We ran until we reached a wide stream.
We both stopped inches from the muddy shore. And stared down into
the fast-flowing, blue water.
“Now what?” I cried breathlessly. “Now what?”
The shadow darkened as the creature moved over us.
Marissa tugged my sleeve. “Look. You can see the bottom. It looks
really shallow. Maybe we can walk across it. Or swim if we have to.”
Boooom. Boooom.
The shadow darkened.
“Let’s go,” I said.
We stepped into the cold, clear stream.
22
The water flowed faster than I thought. I stepped onto the stream’s soft
bottom—and nearly lost my balance as the current swept around me.
I grabbed Marissa’s shoulder to steady myself. We clung together for a
moment, getting used to the water.
“Brrrr.” I shivered. The water felt ice cold, even through my jeans legs.
But it was shallow, as Marissa had said. It came up only a few inches
above my boots.
I took another step, leaning forward, trying to balance against the
stream’s fast current.
One more step. We were both halfway across the stream.
“Oh—!” I cried out when I realized I couldn’t take the next step.
“Hey—!” Marissa exclaimed. I saw her struggling, too. “I’m stuck!”
“The bottom is so soft!” I cried. I worked to pull my foot up from the
mud.
Stuck. My hiking boots had sunk below the surface of the muddy
bottom.
I leaned down. And pulled. Pulled my leg up.
It wouldn’t budge.
I grabbed my leg with both hands and tried to tug my foot out from the
muddy stream bottom.
No.
“We-we’re sinking!” Marissa wailed. “Justin—look! We’re sinking
fast!”
I swallowed hard. She was right. I could feel myself being pulled
down. Down into the cold water, into the soft, sticky mud.
The water came up to my knees now. It seemed to be rising quickly.
But I knew the water wasn’t going up. I was heading down.
“Pull off your boots and swim for it!” I instructed Marissa.
We both bent over and struggled to reach our hiking boots.
But they were buried too deeply in the mud.
The water rose up over my waist. If I kept sinking, it would be over
my head in a few minutes.
Booom. Booom.
The thundering footsteps made the water ripple.
The dark shadow spread over the stream.
“Justin—look!” Marissa cried. She pointed to the other shore.
I turned to the shore—so close. But so far away.
I squinted into the shadows to see what she was gawking at. “What is
it?” I cried.
“A big plug,” Marissa reported. “In the stream bottom. Like a bathtub
drain plug. This stream isn’t real, either. It’s a fake.”
“The water feels plenty real!” I exclaimed, feeling myself sink even
deeper into the mud. “Can you reach the plug, Marissa? Maybe if you pull
it up, the water will drain.”
She leaned toward it, bending at the waist. She stretched out both
hands for the ring on top of the plug. “I-I’m trying,” she groaned. “If
only…”
Boooom. Booooom.
Marissa uttered a sigh. “I can’t! I can’t reach it! It’s too far away.”
The cold stream water flowed against my chest. I felt myself drop
farther into the muddy bottom.
“I think we failed Ivanna’s test,” I murmured.
“Noooo!” Marissa wailed. She began thrashing at the water with both
hands, twisting her body one way, then the other.
The deepening shadow moved over us.
I turned back and raised my eyes to the shore.
I saw the creatures lurching toward us.
And opened my mouth in an ear-shattering scream of horror.
23
At first I thought I was seeing black clouds, floating low over the trees.
But then I realized the bobbing shapes were too dark to be clouds. Too
dark and too solid.
And then I saw the twin pairs of yellow eyes.
And I recognized the shapes of the heads. And I knew I was staring at
cats.
Cats!
Black cats. Huge heads rising over the trees. Tails curling up like
smoke from chimneys.
Two giant black cats, their paws thundering over the forest, shaking
the ground and the trees. Their yellow eyes locked on Marissa and me.
“They’re… not real!” Marissa murmured. “Not real… not real.” She
had stopped thrashing the water and stood now perfectly still, staring back
at the enormous cats, repeating the words like a chant.
Trees crunched and fell. The two cats thundered their way to the shore.
“Noooo…” A low wail escaped Marissa’s throat.
I struggled to breathe. My chest ached. My head started to spin.
The cats pulled back their lips in a terrifying hiss.
I saw rows of sharp teeth. I saw their yellow eyes narrow menacingly.
Tossing back their heads in another hiss, the creatures arched their
backs. The black fur on their backs stood straight up.
“Wh-what are they going to do?” Marissa stammered.
I opened my mouth to answer her, but only a tiny squeak escaped.
The water flowed past my shoulders. I raised my hands out of the
water, trying to keep from sinking under.
“Justin—what are they going to do?” she repeated in a shriek.
We didn’t have to wait long to find out.
Before we could even cry out, the cat heads came swooping down at
us. The jaws opened wide. The curled and jagged teeth slid apart.
I turned and tried to squirm and wriggle away. But I couldn’t move.
Water splashed over my face. Then I felt teeth clamp shut on the back of
my sweatshirt.
Sputtering, gasping for breath, I felt myself lifted up. My boots made a
popping sound as they were pulled from the mud.
I felt the cat’s hot breath on my neck and the back of my head. The
teeth held me firmly, plucking me up, up out of the stream.
“Whoooooa!” I finally found my voice.
The cat dangled me high in the air.
My arms and legs thrashed wildly. The cat tossed its head, swinging
me from side to side.
“Helllp! Ohhh, help!” I heard my sister’s cry from nearby. I turned and
saw her hoisted up by the other cat, hoisted high in the air, the cat’s jaws
clamped tightly on the back of Marissa’s sweatshirt.
I tried to call out to Marissa. But a burst of hot cat breath nearly
suffocated me.
I felt myself being lifted even higher as the cat rose up on its hind legs.
A paw swung up and batted my side. The other paw batted me the other
way.
Does it think I’m a cat toy? I wondered.
I didn’t have time to think about it.
I twisted dizzily as the cat played with me, batting me from side to
side. Then, suddenly, I found myself being lowered.
The jaws opened.
I was falling now.
Into the water?
No. I landed hard on my back on the shore. So hard, I bounced. Pain
shot through my body.
I ignored it and scrambled to my feet. My heart pounding, my whole
body shaking, I tried to run.
But the cat grabbed me up again, its jaws closing around my right
shoulder.
As I sailed back up into the air, I saw Marissa falling through the air. I
heard her cry out as she hit the ground. And then I saw the other black cat
bend its head, open its jaws, and drag Marissa up in the air again.
Up—and then down. My body slammed hard on the shore. I gasped
and struggled to my hands and knees. In time to be picked up again and
dangled over the water.
Marissa and I both hung over the stream.
Then once more, we were dropped to the shore.
“Oww!” I bounced hard. Stared up as the cat lowered its massive head
to pick me up again.
“What are they doing?” Marissa screeched. “Why are they doing
this?”
“I know what they’re doing. They’re doing what cats always do!” I
cried, feeling cold horror run down my body. “They’re playing with their
food.”
24
“Whooooaaa!”
My stomach lurched as I felt myself being swooped up into the air
again. A black cat’s paw swiped at me and sent me swinging.
“They-they’re going to eat us?” Marissa called.
“We must look like mice to them!” I shouted back.
And then I had an idea.
The cat tossed its head and sent me flying. It caught me between its
enormous paws. The paws squeezed my middle so hard, I thought my head
might pop off!
But as I struggled to breathe, my idea gave me hope.
Do I have time? I wondered. Can I do it—before this cat swallows me
whole?
The cat tossed me up again, then caught me between its teeth. Pain
shot down my back. My whole body tingled and ached.
With a groan, I twisted my body. I reached behind me and struggled to
grab the backpack.
If I can unzip it, I thought, maybe I can reach the mechanical mice I
stuffed inside. And maybe I can switch one or two of them on. And maybe
the mice will distract the two cats. And maybe Marissa and I can escape.
Maybe, maybe, maybe.
But I had to try something. Or else, in a few seconds, Marissa and I
would be cat chow.
The cat’s tongue swept over the back of my neck. I cried out in pain.
The tongue felt as rough as sandpaper! Hot cat breath stung my neck.
I grabbed the backpack with one hand and started to tug it around to
my chest.
But the cat opened its jaws. The rough tongue bumped me from
behind. And I went flying back to the ground.
I landed hard on my hands and knees. Pain shot through me once
again. I felt like collapsing in the dirt.
But I knew I couldn’t give up.
The cat leaned over me, hissing each breath. Yellow eyes gleamed
down at me hungrily.
Ignoring the pain, I grabbed the backpack. I pulled the straps off my
shoulder. Then I swung the pack around to my chest and gripped it tightly
with both hands.
“Got to get the mice,” I murmured out loud. “Got to get the kitty cat
some mice to play with.”
My hands were trembling so hard, I couldn’t work the zipper.
“Aaaaagh!” I let out a frustrated cry—just as the cat swooped me up in
its jaws again.
I tried to call out to Marissa. I wanted to tell her to hold on. That I had
a plan.
High in the air, I gripped the backpack with my right hand. Reached
for the zipper with my left.
Please. Please! I prayed silently. Let me get the mice out. Let me click
them on.
“My only chance,” I muttered, struggling with the backpack zipper.
“My only chance…”
A burst of hot cat breath made me shudder. Once again I felt the dry,
scratchy tongue scrape the back of my neck.
“Yessss!” I shouted as I finally pulled the zipper and opened the
backpack.
“Yessss!”
I shot my hand excitedly into the backpack. I felt the furry mechanical
creatures inside.
I started to wrap my fingers around one…
But the cat swung me hard. Tossed back its head and flung me into the
air.
“Noooooo!” I let out a long wail—and felt the backpack fly out of my
hands.
“Noooooo!” I frantically grabbed at it. Grabbed with both hands.
Missed. Then I tried to snare it on my foot.
“Noooooo!” I watched the backpack sail to the ground.
It bounced once. Twice. Then lay in the dirt near the shore.
The cat caught me in its teeth. I felt the sharp points dig into my skin.
Then the jaws opened. And I started to slide. Down the scratchy
tongue. Down, down into the cat’s cavern of a mouth.
“
S
o
r
r
y,
M
a
r
i
s
s
a
,
”
I
m
u
r
m
u
r
e
d
i
n
m
y
p
a
n
i
c. “
We
a
r
e
d
o
o
m
e
d.”
25
The ground disappeared from view as I slid further down the cat’s rough
tongue. On my stomach, I reached out with both hands.
And grabbed the two curved eyeteeth. They felt warm and sticky in
my hands.
With a hard tug, I pulled myself part of the way up. I crawled a little
way on the tongue. Then I gave another tug, and my head poked out from
the cat’s open mouth.
I searched for Marissa, but I couldn’t see her.
Had she already been swallowed?
Beneath me, the tongue bucked and curled. The cat was trying to force
me down.
But I held tightly onto the eyeteeth. And glimpsed the ground far
below.
And saw three or four gray mice scampering out of the backpack, onto
the dirt.
They must have clicked on when the backpack hit the ground!
Would the cats see them? Would they care?
The cat chomped its teeth together. I cried out in pain, and my hands
slid off the eyeteeth.
The tongue rolled beneath me. I started to slide again.
The mouth closed over me, shutting me in darkness. “Ohhhh.” So hot
and wet inside. So hard to breathe.
I heard low gurgling and growling below me in the cat’s stomach.
“No!” I cried. “No no no no!” My voice sounded tiny and muffled
inside the cat’s mouth.
And then, to my shock, the sunlight poured back in as the jaws popped
open.
The tongue pushed me forward. Past the teeth. Past the lips.
I sucked in a deep breath of cool, fresh air.
And then I went flying from the cat’s mouth.
I landed on my back on the ground next to Marissa. She gaped at me in
surprise, her eyes wild, her red hair tangled and matted wetly to her head.
We both scrambled to our feet—in time to see both giant black cats
pounce.
They both leaped at the same mechanical mouse.
Hissing and clawing at each other, they began to fight over it.
“Marissa—let’s go!” I choked out.
She stared in amazement as the giant cats wrestled, hissing and
scratching, rolling into the stream, then out again.
“Hurry! Let’s go!” I shouted. I grabbed Marissa with both hands and
tugged. “If they figure out the mice aren’t real, they’ll come back after us!”
“But are the cats real?” Marissa demanded, still gazing at them in
amazement. “Are the cats real? Or fake?”
“Who cares?” I shrieked. “Let’s get out of here!”
Once again, we started running through the forest. Which way were
we headed? We didn’t pay any attention. We just wanted to get as far away
from those cats as we could.
My clothes felt wet and sticky from the inside of the cat’s mouth. But
the cool, fresh air felt good against my skin and helped to dry me off.
Our shadows leaned ahead of us, as if leading the way. I heard strange
animal calls that sounded like shrill laughter. And I heard the flapping of
wings above the trees.
But Marissa and I ignored all the sounds. We kept running, pushing
tall weeds and shrubs out of our way, making our own path.
We didn’t speak. We didn’t even look at each other. We ran side by
side, keeping each other in sight, helping each other through the tangled
forest.
We were both breathless when we reached a round, grassy clearing.
White and yellow moths floated silently over the swaying grass.
“Marissa—look!” I gasped, pointing to the other side of the clearing.
A small cabin stood under the trees where the grass ended. A very
familiar cabin.
“It’s Ivanna’s!” Marissa exclaimed happily. “Justin—we made it!
We’re back!”
I sucked in a deep breath and scrambled across the grass. Marissa ran
right behind me.
“Ivanna! Ivanna!” We both called her name as we hurried to the cabin.
She didn’t come out. So I grabbed the door and pushed it open.
“Ivanna—we’re back!” I cried happily. I glanced quickly around the room,
waiting for my eyes to adjust to the dim light.
Marissa pushed me aside as she burst into the small kitchen. “We
survived!” she exclaimed. “Ivanna—is the test over? Did we pass it? Justin
and I—”
We both saw Ivanna seated at the small wooden table. She sat stooped
over, her head on the table.
Her horned helmet had fallen off. It lay on its side on the table. Her
long blond braids had come undone and fallen over her face.
“Ivanna? Ivanna?” I called. I turned to my sister. “She must be asleep.”
“Ivanna?” Marissa called. “We’re back!”
The woman didn’t stir.
I heard a whimper from the back of the room. Squinting into the
shadows, I saw Silverdog. He was huddled sadly against the wall, his head
on the floor between his paws. He let out another whimper.
“Justin—something is wrong here,” Marissa whispered.
“Ivanna! Ivanna!” I shouted her name. But she still didn’t move.
The big white dog whimpered sadly.
“Is she asleep?” Marissa demanded. “What’s wrong with her?”
“Let’s see,” I murmured.
I took a deep breath and made my way across the kitchen to the table.
Marissa raised her hands to her cheeks and stared at me. She didn’t budge.
I was nearly to the table when I stopped with a gasp.
“Wh-what’s wrong?” Marissa stammered.
“Look what’s sticking out of her back!” I choked out.
26
“Huh?” Marissa’s mouth dropped open in horror. “Justin—what?”
I swallowed hard. My legs started to tremble. I grabbed the back of a
chair to steady myself.
“Marissa—look,” I instructed, still pointing.
She came a couple of steps closer, her eyes bulging wide with fear.
We both stared at the metal object poking out from the back of
Ivanna’s dress.
A large metal key.
I worked up my courage and crept up behind Ivanna. My heart
pounding, I leaned down and examined the big key.
“It-it’s a windup key!” I stammered.
Marissa opened her mouth, but no sound came out.
I took the key in both hands and turned it one click.
Ivanna’s head bobbed up, then fell back to the table.
“Yes. It’s a windup key,” I told my sister.
Ivanna’s hands had drooped to the floor at her sides. I reached down
and grabbed one of them.
It felt soft and spongy. Stuffed with cotton or something.
I let the hand drop to the floor and turned back to Marissa. “Ivanna
isn’t real,” I told her, swallowing again. “She’s some kind of dummy or
puppet or something. Ivanna isn’t real, either!”
“Then what is real?” Marissa demanded in a tiny voice. “This is so
scary, Justin. Is it all part of a test, or what? How do we get out of here
now? How do we find Dad? If Ivanna isn’t real, then who is?”
I just shook my head. I didn’t know how to answer her questions. I felt
as frightened as she did.
My eyes fell on Silverdog back in the corner. The dog had his head
buried in his paws. He whimpered softly.
Then, suddenly, the dog’s ears perked up. He raised his head, his eyes
flashing excitedly.
I heard a sharp growl behind me. From the door.
“Hey—!” I spun around as the door swung open.
And a growling, snarling creature burst in.
Luka!
His eyes moved hungrily from me to Marissa. A pleased grin spread
over his wild face.
“No!” Marissa shrieked, backing away from him.
Luka tossed back his long hair with a shake of his head. He opened his
mouth in a long howl.
He leaped into the center of the room. Tossed back his head in a roar.
And hurtled toward us.
“Luka—stop!” I begged. “Don’t hurt us!”
27
Luka’s grin faded. He lowered his arms. He narrowed his dark eyes at me.
“I’m not going to hurt you,” he said softly.
Marissa and I stared back at him in shock. “You—you can talk?” I
stammered.
He nodded. “Yes. I can talk. And the first thing I want to say is,
congratulations!” His smile returned.
He stepped across the room, walking upright like a human. He shook
hands with Marissa, then with me. “Congratulations to both of you,” Luka
said warmly. “You passed the test.”
“But—but—” I could only sputter.
Luka peeled a long strip of fur off his arm. Then he pulled the fur from
around his neck. “I’m happy to get this stuff off,” he said, peeling more fur
from his arm. “It’s so hot and itchy—especially when you’re running
around like a wild man in the forest.”
“I’m very confused,” I confessed.
Marissa nodded agreement. “Ivanna isn’t real,” she murmured. She
motioned to Ivanna, slumped over the table behind us.
Luka shook his head. “No, she isn’t. I built her myself. Just as I built
all the creatures you found in my Fantasy Forest.”
“But—why?” I choked out. “Why did you build all that?”
“As a test,” Luka replied simply. He stepped up behind Ivanna and
pulled her up into a sitting position. He brushed the dummy’s hair behind
her head with his hand. Then he propped the helmet back on her head.
“So many people come to the forest,” Luka continued, turning back to
Marissa and me. “They come searching for all kinds of treasures. Just as
you two have.
“My family has lived in this forest for hundreds of years,” Luka
explained. “It became our job to protect many of the treasures. And so we
built a test forest, to keep out those who were unworthy. To stop the people
who don’t deserve the wonderful treasures.”
“You built the entire forest?” Marissa asked him.
He shook his head. “Just the part that isn’t real.”
“And how did we pass the test?” I demanded.
“By discovering what was real and what wasn’t,” Luka replied. “By
surviving and triumphing over the unreal.”
Marissa stared hard at Ivanna. The dummy’s green eyes gazed dully
back. “Why did you build Ivanna?” Marissa asked.
Luka grinned proudly. “She is my best creation. She keeps everyone
from guessing that I am in charge here. No one believes that a wild wolf
man runs the Fantasy Forest. It makes it so easy for me to watch everyone
and see how they do on my test.”
It all seemed very mysterious to me. But I was too happy it was all
over to argue with him.
“And now I shall give you the treasure you came for,” Luka
announced. He turned quickly and disappeared into the back.
Marissa and I exchanged glances. “I can’t believe it!” I whispered.
“He’s giving us the silver chest containing the Lost Legend! Dad is going to
be so amazed!”
“We’re going to be rich and famous!” Marissa exclaimed. “And Dad
won’t be able to tell us we’re not helpful—ever again!”
A few seconds later, Luka returned carrying a small silver chest.
“Congratulations again,” he said solemnly. “I am happy to award you the
ancient treasure that you came here to seek. And I wish you good fortune
with it.”
He placed the silver chest in my hands. It felt lighter than I expected.
The silver gleamed in the light from the candle on the table.
My heart pounded. My hands trembled.
I suddenly felt so excited, I nearly dropped the silver chest! To think
that I held the Lost Legend in my hands!
“Thank you,” I managed to choke out.
“Yes, thank you,” Marissa said. “Now how do we get back to our
dad?”
Luka snapped his fingers. Back at the wall, Silverdog leaped to his
feet.
“Silverdog will lead you back to your camp,” Luka announced. “Stay
close behind him, and he will protect you.”
“Uh… protect us?” I asked, gripping the chest tightly.
Luka nodded. “There are many thieves in the forest. Some of them are
real, and some of them are not real. But they all would steal your treasure
and make it their own.”
“We’ll stay close to Silverdog,” I promised.
We thanked Luka again. Then we followed the big white dog out of
the cabin and back into the forest.
The afternoon sun had started to lower itself behind the trees. It cast an
orange glow over the forest floor. The air had already begun to carry an
evening chill.
Trotting steadily, the big dog kept his furry tail up high as he led the
way, like a flag for us to follow. I carried the chest carefully between my
hands and kept my eyes on the dog. Marissa followed close behind.
We walked along a curving path through a patch of tall yellow weeds.
Then we made our way around a high clump of evergreen bushes.
On the other side of the bushes, Silverdog led us onto a leaf-covered
path. Our boots crunched over the path as we hurried to keep up with the
trotting dog.
I gripped the silver chest tightly. I couldn’t wait to pull open the lid
and gaze at the Lost Legend. To take it out and start to read it.
What was the legend about?
Who wrote it? And when was it written?
So many questions. And I knew they would all be answered as soon as
we opened the chest and removed the legend from its hiding place of five
hundred years.
The sun lowered itself behind the trees. Our shadows grew longer. The
leaves crunched underfoot.
“Oh—wait!” I cried out when I heard leaves crunching behind us.
“Wait—!”
Silverdog trotted on ahead of us.
But Marissa and I stopped.
And listened.
Listened to the crunching footsteps creeping up fast from the trees
behind us.
I felt a chill of fear sweep down my back. “Marissa—we’re being
followed,” I whispered.
28
“Luka warned us about thieves,” Marissa whispered.
The crunching footsteps came closer. I tucked the silver chest under
one arm as if protecting a football. My throat tightened. I could barely
breathe.
I turned and saw Silverdog trotting on up ahead, his tail still raised
behind him. The dog disappeared behind a clump of tall weeds.
“We can’t just stand here,” Marissa whispered.
The footsteps were approaching faster now. Any moment, I knew,
some thief—or several thieves—would burst out of the trees and grab the
chest away from us.
I turned to the tall weeds. I couldn’t see the dog at all now.
“We have to run,” Marissa whispered.
I listened to the crunching footsteps.
“We can’t outrun him,” I told her. “I can’t run very fast. I have to be
careful with this chest.”
Marissa’s blue eyes grew wide with panic. Then her expression
changed. “I have an idea, Justin. Let’s duck into those trees.” She pointed.
“The thief will run right past us. Then we’ll hide there till he’s out of sight.”
Was it a good idea?
A terrible idea?
We had no time to think about it. We had to move.
We both spun around and started to run to the trees. Toward the
approaching footsteps.
Would we make it to safety? Could we hide in the trees before he came
rushing out at us?
I never found out.
About halfway across the grass, I tripped over a fallen tree limb.
“Ohhh!” I cried out.
And stumbled forward.
The silver chest flew from my hands.
“Noooooo!”
I desperately grabbed for it.
Missed.
Fell hard to my knees.
I watched the chest sail into the air.
And I stared in shock as a big man lumbered out of the dark shadows
of the trees, raised his arms, and caught the chest easily.
29
I stared at the silver chest. Watched the man’s hands pull it in, then hold it
tightly.
Our chest.
Our Lost Legend.
We had gone through so many horrors to get it. And now someone else
had taken it away.
I stared at the chest gripped so tightly in the man’s hands. Then I
raised my eyes to the man’s bearded face.
“Dad!” I cried.
“Dad!” Marissa echoed. “I don’t believe it!”
Beneath the beard, a grin spread quickly over Dad’s face. “I don’t
believe it, either!” he cried. “Where have you been? Why did you run
away? I’ve been searching the forest for you! Where were you?”
“It’s kind of a long story,” Marissa told him, rushing forward.
“Yes. Marissa and I have a legend of our own,” I said.
Dad set the chest on the ground, and we both hugged him. Dad was so
glad to see us, he had tears in his eyes. When we finished hugging, he
hugged us both again.
“I can’t believe I finally found you!” he exclaimed happily.
“And look what we found!” I declared, pointing to the chest.
Dad’s mouth dropped open. When he jumped out and caught the chest,
I don’t think he realized what he had caught.
“It’s—a silver chest!” he exclaimed.
“It’s the silver chest!” I told him. “The silver chest we came to
Brovania to find!”
“But—but—how?”
I never saw Dad so confused. Or so excited.
“The Legend of the Lost Legend,” he murmured. He carefully lifted
the chest off the ground. “This is the most thrilling moment of my life,” he
said. “How did you do this? How did you find this ancient chest? How did
you—?”
His voice cracked. I think he was too excited to speak.
“I told you, Dad. It’s a very long story,” I said.
“At least you can’t say we weren’t helpful!” Marissa chimed in.
All three of us laughed.
“Do you realize what this will mean to us?” Dad asked, lowering his
voice to a whisper. “Do you realize what a thrilling discovery this is?”
He dropped down to his knees to admire the chest. He tenderly ran his
hands over the smooth silver of the lid.
“Beautiful. Beautiful,” he repeated, grinning.
“Can we open it?” Marissa asked, dropping down on the ground beside
him. “Please, Dad? Can we open it and see the Lost Legend?”
“We have to see it!” I exclaimed eagerly. “We have to!”
Dad nodded. “Yes. We have to!” He laughed. “Believe me, I’m even
more impatient to see it than you two are!”
He bent over the chest. I saw his hands tremble as he lowered them to
the silver clasp.
“Beautiful. Beautiful,” he murmured again.
His hands closed around the clasp. He turned it, then gave a sharp tug.
Slowly, slowly, he pulled open the lid.
And all three of us leaned close and gazed into the chest.
30
We leaned so close over the chest, our heads touched.
“I—I don’t believe it!” I gasped.
“What is it?” Marissa shrieked.
Dad’s mouth dropped open. He narrowed his eyes and gazed into the
chest. He didn’t say a word.
“It-it’s an egg!” I finally stammered.
The three of us were staring down at a large yellow egg with brown
speckles.
“But—where is the Lost Legend?” Marissa demanded. “This can’t be
it!”
Dad sighed and shook his head. “This isn’t the right silver chest,” he
said softly.
He reached inside and carefully lifted the egg. Then he felt around on
the bottom of the chest with his free hand. “Nothing else in here. Just an
egg.” He examined the egg, rolling it slowly between his hands. Then he
carefully lowered it back into the chest. “Just an egg,” he repeated sadly.
I let out a hoarse cry. “But Marissa and I passed the test!” I wailed.
“Luka said he would give us what we came here for!”
“Who is Luka?” Dad asked. He carefully closed the clasp on the chest.
Then, with a groan, he climbed to his feet. “Where can we find him?”
Before I could answer, I heard a rustling sound across the clearing. I
turned to see Silverdog come trotting out of the weeds.
“Silverdog!” I cried. I rushed forward and petted the dog’s big head
and the fur around his neck. “Take us back to Luka!” I ordered him. “Luka!
Take us to Luka!”
Silverdog wagged his tail. Did that mean he understood?
“Luka!” I repeated. “Take us to Luka!”
Still wagging his bushy tail, the big dog headed past us to the trees.
Dad picked up the silver chest. And the three of us followed the dog back
through the forest.
Marissa and I hadn’t traveled far from the little cabin. A few minutes later,
it came into view. Luka hurried out, his face twisted in surprise.
“I didn’t expect to see you back here,” he said, shaking out his long,
dark hair. “Did you get lost?”
“No. Not exactly,” Marissa replied.
“This is our dad,” I told Luka. “We finally found him.”
Dad and Luka shook hands.
“Well, why did you come back here?” Luka demanded. He lowered his
gaze to the silver chest in Dad’s hands. “I gave you what you came here
for.”
“Not exactly,” Dad replied. “It’s an egg.”
“Yes, I know,” Luka said, scratching his jaw.
“But we didn’t come here for an egg!” I protested.
Luka narrowed his eyes at us. “You didn’t come to the forest in search
of the Eternal Egg of Truth?”
“No way,” I replied. “Dad brought us here to find the Legend of the
Lost Legend.”
“Oops!” Luka blushed. “I made a little goof.” He looked very upset.
“That’s okay,” Dad said softly. “Everyone makes mistakes.”
Luka shook his head. “I’m so sorry. I usually get it right. I really
thought you were searching for the Eternal Egg of Truth.”
Still shaking his head, he took the silver chest from Dad’s hands. He
carried it into the cabin. A few seconds later, he returned. “A thousand
apologies,” he said.
“But can you help us find the Lost Legend?” I demanded. “Do you
have it?”
“Do I have it?” The question seemed to surprise Luka. “No. I don’t
have it. I think it will be very hard to get it.”
“Why?” Dad asked eagerly. “Do you know where it is?”
Luka nodded. “Yes. I can direct you to the people who have the Lost
Legend. But I do not think they will part with it. They have been wandering
the forest with it for five hundred years. I do not think they will want to
give it to you—for any price.”
“I—I just want to talk with them!” Dad cried excitedly. “I just want to
see it with my own eyes!”
“Go in this direction,” Luka instructed us, pointing. “Cross two
streams, and you will probably find them on a wide, stone clearing. They
wander the forest. They never stay in the same place for long. But I think
you will find them in the stone clearing if you hurry.”
“Thank you!” Dad cried, shaking Luka’s hand.
We all thanked Luka. Then we hurried off in the direction he had
pointed. We were so excited, all three of us talked at the same time.
“Do you think they’ll be friendly?”
“Do you think they’ll let us see the Lost Legend?”
“Do you think they’ll let me borrow it?” Dad asked. “If I could only
borrow it for a few weeks….”
“Luka said they might not be friendly.”
“He said they might not part with it—for any price.”
The journey across the two streams was not difficult. We walked for
only an hour.
We were still talking excitedly as we drew near their camp. We
stopped on a low hill overlooking a wide patch of stony ground.
The stone clearing.
We could see rows of small tents made of animal hides. Several
people, dressed in brown robes, worked to build a fire in the center of the
clearing. A bunch of scrawny gray dogs wrestled and snapped at each other
at the edge of the clearing.
“I can’t believe it,” Dad exclaimed, his eyes searching the small tent
village. “I can’t believe these wanderers actually have the Lost Legend.”
“But will they let us see it?” I asked.
“Only one way to find out,” Dad replied. He led the way down the hill.
“Hello, there!” he called out to the wanderers. “Hello!”
31
“Hello, there! Hello!”
As we stepped onto the stone ground, the scrawny gray dogs stopped
wrestling. Barking furiously, they came scurrying up to greet us. They
lowered their heads, bared their jagged teeth, and growled.
Marissa, Dad, and I stopped. I saw three men in brown robes come
running out of tents. They quickly shooed the dogs away. The men, I saw,
were as scrawny as the dogs.
“Hello,” Dad greeted them warmly. “I am Professor Richard Clarke,
and this is Justin and Marissa.”
The three men nodded solemnly. But they did not speak.
Two of them were bald. One had long, wavy white hair and a bushy
white mustache.
Marissa and I exchanged glances.
I could see that she was as frightened as I was.
These brown-robed wanderers did not look friendly.
The white-haired man spoke first. “How did you find us?” he
demanded coldly.
“Someone directed us to you,” Dad replied.
“Why have you come here, Professor Clarke?” the wanderer asked.
“We’re searching for the Legend of the Lost Legend,” Dad told him.
The three men all gasped in shock. They leaned close and whispered
furiously to each other.
When they finished their excited conversation, they turned back to us.
But they didn’t speak.
“Do you have it?” Dad asked eagerly. “Do you have the Lost Legend?”
“Yes,” the white-haired man replied. “Yes, we have it.”
He whispered something to the two bald men. They spun around, their
long robes twirling with them, and hurried away.
A few seconds later, they returned. One of them carried a small silver
chest.
“Oh, my goodness!” Dad declared, his eyes bulging. “Is that it? Is that
really it? Is that the Lost Legend?”
“Yes,” the white-haired man replied. “Do you want it?”
“Huh?” all three of us cried.
The wanderer shoved the chest into my hands. I was so shocked, I
nearly dropped it!
“It is yours,” the white-haired man said. He stepped back.
Dad swallowed hard. “Are you sure?” he cried. “Are you sure you
want to give it to us?”
“Yes. Take it,” the man replied quickly. “Goodbye.”
He and the other two turned and walked quickly back to their tents. To
our surprise, they instantly began to pack up.
Dozens of wanderers began pulling up tents, packing up supplies,
putting out the campfire. In minutes, they had scurried away.
The stone clearing stood bare. No sign they had ever been there.
“How strange,” Dad said. “How totally strange.”
We began to walk away from the clearing. I think all three of us were
in shock or something. I know I was completely stunned.
“They handed the treasure over to us without a word,” Dad said,
rubbing his beard. “Why did they do that? Why did they give this treasure
to us without asking for anything in return? I just can’t believe it.”
I still had the chest in my arms. After we had walked for a short while,
I stopped. “Where are we going?” I demanded. “Let’s open the chest. Let’s
take a look at it!”
“Yes!” Dad agreed. “I am so surprised—so stunned—I guess I don’t
know what I’m doing!”
He took the chest from me and carefully set it down on the ground.
“Let’s see it. Let’s finally see it!”
Carefully, he unlatched the lid and opened the chest. Then he reached
inside—and pulled out a manuscript. A thick stack of yellowed paper with
tiny black writing all over it.
“Yes!” Dad whispered happily. “Yes!”
He gripped the ancient legend tightly in both hands and held it down
so that Marissa and I could see it.
“Wow!” Marissa cried. “It really looks five hundred years old—
doesn’t it?”
“Dad, what does it say on the top page?” I asked, struggling to make
out the words.
“Uh… let’s see,” Dad replied. He raised the manuscript close to his
face, squinted hard at the tiny words, and then read them out loud:
“WHOEVER OWNS THE LOST LEGEND WILL BE LOST
FOREVER.”
“Huh? What does that mean?” I cried.
Dad shrugged. “It doesn’t really mean anything. It’s just part of the
legend.”
“Are you sure?” Marissa demanded in a trembling voice.
Dad stared down at the manuscript. “‘Lost forever…’” he murmured.
“‘Whoever owns the Lost Legend will be lost forever.’”
Then he raised his eyes to the trees that surrounded us. “Hey—where
are we?”
All three of us gazed around at the strange, dark trees.
We had wandered away from the stone clearing. Now nothing looked
familiar.
“Where are we?” Dad repeated.
“We-we’re lost,” I whispered.
Scanning, formatting and basic
proofing by Undead.

ATTACK OF THE
JACK-O’-LANTERNS
Goosebumps - 48
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
“Where are you going, Elf?” Dad called from the den.
“Don’t call me Elf!” I shouted back. “My name is Drew.”
Dad thinks it’s real cute to call me Elf, but I hate it. He calls me Elf because
I’m tiny for a twelve-year-old. And I have short, straight black hair and sort of a
pointy chin and a pointy little nose.
If you looked like an elf, would you want people calling you Elf?
Of course not.
One day my best friend, Walker Parkes, heard my dad call me Elf. So
Walker tried it. “What’s up, Elf?” Walker said.
I stomped on Walker’s foot as hard as I could, and he never called me that
again.
“Where are you going, Drew?” Dad called from the den.
“Out,” I told him, and slammed the front door behind me. I like to keep my
parents guessing. I try never to give them a straight answer.
You might say I’m as mischievous as an elf. But if you said it, I’d stomp on
your foot, too!
I’m tough. Ask anyone. They’ll tell you that Drew Brockman is tough.
When you’re the shrimpiest girl in your class, you’ve got to be tough.
Actually, I wasn’t going anywhere. I was waiting for my friends to come to
my house. I walked down to the street to watch for them.
I took a deep breath. The people in the corner house had a fire going in their
fireplace. The white smoke floated out from their chimney. It smelled so sweet
and piney.
I love autumn. It means Halloween is on the way.
Halloween is my favorite holiday. I guess I like it so much because it gives
me a chance to look like someone else. Or something else.
It’s the one night of the year that I don’t have to look like pointy-chinned
me.
But I have a problem with Halloween. Two kids in my class are the
problem. Tabitha Weiss and Lee Winston.
For the past two years, Tabby and Lee have totally ruined Halloween for
Walker and me.
I’m so angry about it. Walker is angry, too. Our favorite holiday ruined
because of two stuck-up kids who think they can do whatever they want.
Grrrrrrrr.
Just thinking about it makes me want to punch someone!
My other friends, Shane and Shana Martin, are upset about it, too. Shane
and Shana are brother and sister, twins my age. They live in the house next door,
and we hang out a lot.
Shane and Shana don’t look like anyone else I know. They both have very
round faces with curly ringlets of blond hair. They have red cheeks and cheery
smiles, and they’re both short and kind of chunky.
My dad says they’re roly-poly. Dad always thinks of something icky to say
about everyone!
Anyway, the twins are as angry as Walker and me about Tabby and Lee.
And this Halloween, we’re going to do something about it.
Only we don’t know what we’re going to do.
That’s why they’re coming over to my house to discuss it.
How did the Tabby and Lee problem start? Well, I have to go back two
years to explain it to you.
I remember it so clearly.
Walker and I were ten. We were just hanging out in front of my house.
Walker had his bike on its side and was doing something to the spokes on one
wheel.
It was a beautiful autumn day. Down the block, someone was burning a big
pile of leaves. It’s against the law here in Riverdale. My dad always threatens to
call the police when someone burns leaves. But I love the smell.
Walker was fiddling with his bike, and I was watching him. I forget what
we were talking about. I glanced up—and there stood Tabby and Lee.
Tabby looked as perfect as always. “Little Miss Perfect.” That’s what Dad
calls her—and for once, he’s right.
The wind was blowing pretty hard. But her long, straight blond hair stayed
in place. It didn’t fly out all over her head like mine did.
Tabby has perfect creamy-white skin and perfect green eyes that sparkle a
lot. She’s very pretty, and she knows it.
Sometimes it takes all my strength not to shake both hands in her hair and
mess it all up!
Lee is tall and good-looking, with dark brown eyes and a great, warm smile.
Lee is African-American, and he sort of struts when he walks and acts real cool,
like the rappers on MTV videos.
The girls at school all think he’s terrific. But I can never understand a word
he says. That’s because he always has a huge wad of green-apple bubble gum in
his mouth.
“Mmmmmbbb mmmmbbbbb.” Lee stared down at Walker’s bike and
mumbled something.
“Hey,” I said. “What’s up, guys?”
Tabby made a disgusted face and pointed a finger at me. “Drew, you have
something hanging from your nose,” she said.
“Oh—!” I shot my hand up and rubbed the bottom of my nose. Nothing
there.
“Sorry,” Tabby snickered. “It only looked like you did.”
Tabby and Lee both laughed.
Tabby is always playing mean jokes like that on me. She knows I’m selfconscious about my looks. So I always fall for her dumb tricks.
“Nice bike,” Lee mumbled to Walker. “How many speeds?”
“It’s a twelve-speed,” Walker told him.
Lee sneered. “Mine is a forty-two-speed.”
“Huh?” Walker jumped to his feet. “There’s no such thing as a forty-twospeed!” he cried.
“Mine is,” Lee insisted, still sneering. “It’s specially made.”
He blew a big green bubble-gum bubble. That’s hard to do while you’re
sneering.
I wanted to pop it all over his smug face. But he stepped back and popped it
himself.
“Did you get a haircut?” Tabby asked me, studying my windblown hair.
“No,” I replied.
“I didn’t think so,” she said. She smoothed her perfect hair back with one
hand.
“Grrrrrrr.” I couldn’t help it. I balled my hands into fists and let out an
angry growl.
I growl a lot. Sometimes I don’t even know I’m doing it.
“Mummmmmbb mmmmbbbbb.” Lee said something. Bubble-gum juice
ran down his chin.
“Excuse me?” I asked.
“I’m having a Halloween party,” he repeated.
My heart started to pound. “A real Halloween party?” I demanded. “With
everyone in costumes, and hot apple cider, and games and bobbing for apples,
and scary stories?”
Lee nodded. “Yes. A real Halloween party. At my house on Halloween
night. You guys want to come?”
“Sure!” Walker and I replied.
Big mistake. Real big mistake.
2
The Halloween party was already crowded with kids from school when Walker
and I showed up. Lee’s parents had orange and black streamers strung up all
over the living room. Three huge jack-o’-lanterns grinned at us from the window
seat by the front window.
Of course Tabby was the first person I ran into. Even in costume, she
wasn’t hard to recognize. She was dressed as a princess.
Perfect?
She wore a frilly pink princess-type gown with long, puffy sleeves and a
high, lacy collar. And she had her blond hair pinned up with a sparkly rhinestone
tiara in it.
She smiled her lipsticked lips at me. “Is that you, Drew?” she asked,
pretending she didn’t recognize me. “What are you supposed to be? A mouse?”
“No!” I protested. “I’m not a mouse. I’m a Klingon. Don’t you ever watch
Star Trek?”
Tabby snickered. “Are you sure you’re not a mouse?”
She turned and walked away. She had a pleased smile on her face. She gets
such a thrill from insulting me.
I growled under my breath and searched for someone else to talk to. I found
Shane and Shana in front of the fireplace. The twins were easy to recognize.
They were both big, puffy white snowmen.
“Excellent costumes!” I greeted them.
They wore two white snowballs. One big snowball over their bodies. A
smaller snowball over their heads.
The snowman faces had eyeholes cut in them. But I couldn’t tell Shane
from Shana. “What is the snow made of?” I asked.
“Styrofoam,” Shana answered. She has a high, squeaky voice. So now I
knew who was who. “We carved them out of big blocks of it.”
“Cool,” I said.
“Great party, huh?” Shane chimed in. “Everyone from our class is here. Did
you see Bryna Morse’s costume? She sprayed her whole body with silver spray
paint. Her face and hair, too!”
“What’s she supposed to be?” I demanded, searching the crowded room for
her. “Silver Surfer?”
“No. I think the Statue of Liberty,” Shane replied. “She was carrying a
plastic torch.”
A loud crackle in the fireplace made me jump. Most of the lights were off,
giving the room a dark, Halloween mood. The fire made long shadows dance
over the floor.
I turned and saw Walker making his way to us. His entire body was
wrapped in bandages and gauze. He was a mummy.
“I’m in trouble,” he announced.
“What’s your problem?” Shane asked.
“My mom did a terrible wrapping job,” Walker complained. “I’m coming
unraveled.” He struggled to retie the loose bandages around his neck.
“Aaaagh!” He let out an angry cry. “The whole thing is coming undone!”
“Are you wearing clothes underneath?” Shana asked.
Shane and I laughed. I pictured Walker huddled in the middle of the party in
his underwear, piles of bandages at his feet.
“Yes. I’ve got my clothes on underneath the costume,” Walker replied. “But
if these bandages all come undone, I’ll fall on my face!”
“Hey—what’s up?” Lee interrupted. He wore a Batman costume, but I
recognized his dark eyes under the mask. And I recognized his voice.
“Awesome party,” Shana said.
“Yeah. Awesome,” I repeated.
Lee started to reply. But a thunderous crash made everyone gasp.
We all froze. “What was that?” Lee cried.
The crowded room grew silent.
I heard another crash. Bumping sounds. Low voices.
“It—it’s coming from the basement!” Lee stammered. He pulled off the
Batman mask. His bushy hair fell over his face, but I could see his frightened
expression.
We all turned to the open doorway at the far end of the living room. Beyond
the doorway, stairs led down to Lee’s basement.
“Oh—!” Lee gasped as we heard another crash.
Then heavy footsteps—up the basement stairs.
“Someone is in the house!” Lee shrieked in terror. “Someone has broken
in!”
3
“Mom! Dad!” Lee cried. His voice rang out shrilly in the silent living room. The
rest of us had all frozen in place.
A shiver ran down my back as I listened to the heavy footsteps treading up
the stairs.
“Mom! Dad! Help!” Lee called again, his eyes bulging with fear.
No reply.
He took off toward their bedroom at the back of the house. “Mom? Dad?”
I started to run after him. But he returned to the living room a few seconds
later, his whole body trembling. “My parents—they’re gone!”
“Call the police!” someone shouted.
“Yes! Call nine-one-one!” Walker screamed.
Lee hurtled to the phone beside the couch. His foot kicked over a can of
Pepsi on the rug. But he didn’t notice.
He grabbed the phone receiver and jammed it to his ear. I saw him push the
emergency number.
But then he turned to us and let the phone fall from his hand. “It’s dead. The
line is dead!”
Some kids gasped. A few cried out.
I turned to Walker and opened my mouth to speak. But before I could get a
sound out, two bulky figures burst out from the basement doorway.
“Noooooo—!” Lee let out a horrified howl. Tabby stepped up and huddled
close beside him. Her heavily made-up eyes were wide with fright. She grabbed
Lee’s arm.
The two intruders moved quickly into the living room entrance and blocked
the doorway. One of them had a blue wool ski mask pulled down over his face.
The other wore a rubber gorilla mask.
They both wore black leather jackets over black jeans.
“Party time!” the gorilla shouted in a gruff voice. He laughed. A cruel
laugh. “Party time, everyone!”
Several kids cried out. My heart started to pound in my chest. I suddenly
felt hot and cold at the same time.
“Who are you?” Lee demanded over the frightened cries of some kids.
“How did you get in? Where are my parents?”
“Parents?” the guy in the ski mask replied. He had bright blue eyes, almost
as blue as the wool mask that covered his face. “Do you have parents?”
They both laughed.
“Where are they?” Lee cried.
“I think they ran away when they saw us coming!” the guy said through the
ski mask.
Lee swallowed hard. A tiny gulping sound escaped his throat.
Tabby stepped in front of him. “You can’t come in here!” she shouted
angrily to the two intruders. “We’re having a party!”
The gorilla turned to his partner and laughed. They both laughed loudly,
tossing back their heads.
“It’s our party now!” the gorilla announced. “We’re taking over!”
Hushed gasps rang out around the room. My legs suddenly felt rubbery and
weak. I grabbed Walker’s shoulder to keep from collapsing.
“Wh-what are you going to do?” Tabby demanded.
4
“Everybody down on the floor!” the guy in the ski mask ordered.
“You can’t do this!” Tabby screamed.
“We’re just kids!” someone else cried. “Are you going to rob us? We don’t
have any money!”
I saw Shane and Shana huddled together by the fireplace. Their faces were
hidden by their snowman costumes. But I knew they must be terrified, too.
“Down on the floor!” both intruders screamed.
The room echoed with heavy thuds and the rustle of costumes as we all
obediently dropped to the floor.
“You, too!” the gorilla screamed at Shane and Shana.
“It’s impossible! How can we get down in these big snowballs?” Shana
cried.
“Get down on the floor anyway,” the gorilla ordered nastily.
“Get down—or we’ll push you down,” the ski-masked guy threatened.
I watched Shane and Shana struggle to lower themselves to the floor. They
had to pull off their bottom snowballs to get onto their knees. Shana’s snowball
broke in half as she worked to pull it off.
“Okay—push-ups, everybody!” the gorilla ordered.
“Huh?” Confused cries rose up through the room.
“Push-ups!” the gorilla repeated. “You all know how to do push-ups—
right?”
“How—how many do we have to do?” Walker asked. He knelt close beside
me on the rug in front of the coffee table.
“Do them for a couple of hours,” the ski-masked guy replied.
“Hours?” several kids cried out.
“A few hours of push-ups will get you all warmed up,” the gorilla said.
“Then we’ll think of something harder for you to do!”
“Yeah. Much harder!” his partner added. Then they both burst out laughing
again.
“You can’t do this!” I screamed. My voice came out high and tiny, like a
mouse voice.
Other kids protested, too. I turned to the door. The guy in the ski mask had
moved into the living room. But the gorilla was still blocking any escape.
“Get started!” the gorilla ordered.
“Or we’ll make it three hours!” his partner added.
I heard a lot of groans and complaints. But we all dropped onto our
stomachs and started doing push-ups.
What choice did we have?
“We can’t do this for two hours!” Walker protested breathlessly. “We’ll
faint!”
He raised and dropped, raised and dropped, close beside me on the floor.
His mummy costume was unraveling with each move he made.
“Faster!” the gorilla ordered. “Come on. Speed it up!”
I had done only four or five push-ups, and my arms already started to ache.
I don’t get much exercise, except for bike riding and swimming in the summer.
There was no way I’d last for more than ten or fifteen minutes.
I raised my eyes to the front of the room—and saw a sight that made me cry
out in shock.
5
“Walker—look!” I whispered.
“Hunnh?” he groaned.
I poked Walker in the side.
He lost his balance and hit the floor. “Hey, Drew—! What’s your problem?”
he groaned.
We both turned our eyes to the doorway.
And saw to our surprise that Tabby and Lee weren’t down on the floor with
the rest of us. They had joined the two intruders in front of the doorway.
And they both had wide, gleeful grins on their faces.
I stopped the push-ups and raised myself to my knees. I saw Lee start to
laugh.
Tabby joined him. She laughed so hard, her tiara shook. They slapped each
other a high five.
All around me on the floor, some kids were still working away, pushing
themselves up, then down, up, then down. Groaning and grunting as they
obediently did their push-ups.
But Walker and I had stopped. We were both on our knees, watching Tabby
and Lee. The two creeps were laughing and celebrating.
I was about to cry out in anger—when the two intruders tugged off their
masks.
I instantly recognized the boy with the gorilla mask. He was Todd Jeffrey, a
high-school kid who lives next door to Lee.
I knew the ski-mask kid, too. His name was Joe Something-or-other. He is a
friend of Todd’s.
Todd brushed his coppery hair back off his forehead. His hair was wet, his
face was red, and he was sweating. I guess it was hot inside that rubber mask.
Joe tossed his ski mask to the floor. He shook his head, laughing at us. “All
a joke, guys!” he called out. “Happy Halloween!”
All the other kids had stopped the push-ups. But no one had moved from
the floor. I guess we were too shocked to stand up.
“Just a party joke!” Lee chimed in, grinning.
“Did we scare you?” Tabby asked coyly.
“Grrrrrr!” I let out the loudest growl I ever growled. I wanted to leap up,
grab the tiara off Princess Tabby’s head, and wrap it around her neck!
Todd and Joe slapped each other a high five. They picked up cans of Pepsi
and tilted them up over their mouths.
“You can get up now!” Lee announced, snickering.
“Wow! You guys looked so scared!” Tabby cried gleefully. “I guess we
really fooled you!”
“I don’t believe this,” Walker muttered, shaking his head. The wrapping had
fallen from his face. Bandages drooped loosely over his shoulders. “I really
don’t believe this. What a mean, rotten joke.”
I climbed up shakily and helped Walker to his feet. I heard Shane and Shana
grumbling behind us. Their costumes were totally wrecked.
Kids were grumbling and complaining. Tabby and Lee were the only ones
laughing. No one else thought the joke was the least bit funny.
I started across the room to tell the two creeps what I thought of their dumb
joke. But Lee’s parents burst into the room, pulling off their coats.
“We went next door to the Jeffreys’,” Lee’s mom announced. Then she saw
Todd. “Oh, hi, Todd. We were just at your house, visiting your parents. What are
you doing over here? Helping Lee out with the party?”
“Kind of,” Todd replied, grinning.
“How’s the party going?” Lee’s dad asked.
“Great,” Lee told him. “Just great, Dad.”
And that’s how Tabby and Lee ruined Halloween two years ago.
Walker and I—and Shane and Shana, too—were all really upset.
No. We were more than upset. We were furious.
Halloween is our favorite holiday. And we don’t like to see it ruined
because of a mean practical joke.
So, last year we decided to get even.
6
“We need special decorations,” Shana said. “Not the same old pumpkins and
skeletons.”
“Yeah. Something scarier,” Shane chimed in.
“I think jack-o’-lanterns are plenty scary,” I insisted. “Especially when you
put candles in them. And their dark faces light up with those jagged, evil grins.”
“Jack-o’-lanterns are babyish,” Walker argued. “No one is afraid of a jacko’-lantern. Shana is right. If we’re going to scare Tabby and Lee, we need
something better.”
It was a week before Halloween. The four of us were hard at work at my
house. We were working on my Halloween party.
Yes. Last year, the party was at my house.
Why did I decide to have the party? For only one reason.
For revenge.
For revenge on Tabby and Lee.
Walker, Shane, Shana, and I had spent the entire year talking about it,
dreaming up plans. Dreaming up the most frightening scares we could imagine.
We didn’t want to pull a mean joke like having people break into the house.
That was too mean. And too frightening.
Some of my friends still have bad dreams about guys in ski masks and
gorilla masks.
The four of us didn’t want to terrify all of our guests. We just wanted to
embarrass Tabby and Lee—and scare them out of their skins!
Now, a week before the big night, we were sitting around my living room
after dinner. We should have been doing homework. But Halloween was too
near.
We had no time for homework. We had to spend all of our time making evil
plans.
Shane and Shana had a lot of really frightening ideas. They both look so
sweet and innocent. But once you get to know them, they’re pretty weird.
Walker and I wanted to keep our scares simple. The simpler, the scarier.
That’s what we thought.
I wanted to drop fake cobwebs over Tabby and Lee from the stairway. I
know a store that sells really sticky, scratchy cobwebs.
Walker has a tarantula that he keeps in a glass cage in his room. A live
tarantula. He thought maybe we could tangle the tarantula in the cobwebs and
then drop it in Tabby’s hair.
Not a bad idea.
Walker also wanted to cut a trapdoor in the living room floor. When Tabby
and Lee stepped on the spot, we’d open the trapdoor, and they would disappear
into the basement.
I had to reject that idea. I liked it. But I wasn’t sure how Mom and Dad
would react when they discovered us sawing up the floor.
Also, I just wanted to terrify the two creeps. I didn’t want to break their
necks.
“Where are we going to put the fake blood puddles?” Shane asked.
He held a red plastic puddle of blood in each hand. He and his sister had
bought a dozen fake blood puddles at a costume store. They came in different
sizes, and looked very real.
“And don’t forget the green slime,” Shana reminded us. She had three
plastic bags of slime beside her.
Walker and I opened one of the bags and felt the slimy, sticky, oozy gunk.
“Where did you buy this?” I asked. “At the same store?”
“No. It came out of Shana’s nose!” Shane joked.
With an angry cry, Shana hoisted up one of the bags. She swung it in front
of her, threatening to smack her brother with it.
He laughed and bounced off the couch.
“Whoa! Careful!” I cried. “If that bag breaks—”
“Maybe we can hang the slime from the ceiling,” Walker suggested.
“Yeah! Cool!” Shane cried excitedly. “And it could drip down onto Tabby
and Lee.”
“Maybe we could cover them in it!” Walker added excitedly. “And they’d
look like two sticky green blobs.”
“Glub glub glub!” Shana thrashed out her arms and pretended she was
drowning under a puddle of slime.
“Will it stick to the ceiling?” I asked. “How will we keep it up there long
enough? How will we get the two of them to stand under it?”
I’m the practical one in the group. They have a lot of wild ideas. But they
never know how to make them work.
That’s my job.
“I’m not sure,” Walker replied. He jumped up from his chair. “I’m going to
get something to drink.”
“What if the slime started to spew out of the jack-o’-lanterns?” Shane
suggested. “That would be kind of scary—wouldn’t it?”
“What if we had fake blood gush out of the jack-o’-lanterns?” Shana said.
“That would be even scarier.”
“We have to trap Tabby and Lee somehow,” Shane suggested, thinking
hard. “All this slime and cobwebs and blood is good. But we have to make them
think they’re really in danger. We have to make them think that something
terrible is really going to happen to them.”
I started to agree—but the lights went out.
“Oh—!” I uttered a cry of surprise, blinking in the sudden darkness. “What
happened?”
Shane and Shana didn’t reply.
The curtains were drawn. So no light entered the living room from outside.
The room was so dark, I couldn’t see my two friends sitting right across from
me!
And then, I heard a dry, whispered voice. A frightening whisper, so close,
so close to my ear:
“Come with me.
Come home with me now.
Come home to where you belong.
Come home—to the grave.”
7
Staring into the darkness, the whispered words sent a shiver down my back.
“Come with me.
Come home with me now.
Come home to where you belong.
Come to your grave, Tabby and Lee.
I have come for you and you alone.
Come, Tabby and Lee. Come with me now.”
“That’s excellent!” I cried.
The lights flashed back on. Across from me, Shane and Shana clapped and
cheered.
“Good job, Walker!” I turned to congratulate him.
He set his portable tape player on the coffee table in front of us and
rewound the tape. “I think it will scare them,” he said.
“It scared me!” I told him. “And I knew what it was.”
“When the lights go out and that voice starts to whisper, it will creep
everyone out!” Shana exclaimed. “Especially with the tape player right under the
couch.”
“Who recorded the voice?” Shane asked Walker. “Did you do it?”
Walker nodded.
“Cool,” Shane said. He turned to me. “But, Drew, I still think you should let
Shana and me do some of our scares on Tabby and Lee.”
“Let’s save those for when we really need them,” I replied.
I bent down and opened one of the plastic bags. I dug a hand in and pulled
out a big chunk of green slime. It felt cold and gooey in my hand.
I worked it around in my palm, squeezing it and shaping it. Then I rolled it
into a ball.
“Think it’s sticky enough to hang from the ceiling?” I asked. “It would be a
nice effect to have it running down the walls. I think—”
“No. I’ve got a better idea,” Walker interrupted. “The lights all go out—
right? And the creepy voice starts to whisper. And when it whispers their names
—when it whispers, ‘Come to your grave, Tabby and Lee’—then someone
sneaks up behind each of them and drops a huge glob of slime on their heads.”
“That’s cool!” Shane declared. We all laughed and cheered.
We had some good ideas. But we needed more.
I didn’t want to slip up. I didn’t want Tabby and Lee to think it was funny,
all a big joke.
I wanted them to be SCARED—with a capital S-C-A-R-E-D.
So we thought of more scary ideas. And more ideas.
We worked all week. From after school until late at night. Setting traps.
Hiding little creepy surprises all over the living room.
We carved the ugliest jack-o’-lanterns you ever saw. And we filled them
with real-looking plastic cockroaches.
We made an eight-foot-tall, papier-mâché monster. And we rigged it to fall
out of the coat closet when we pulled a string.
We bought real-looking rubber snakes and worms and spiders and hid them
all around the house.
We didn’t eat or sleep. We dragged ourselves through school, thinking only
about more ways to terrify our two special guests.
Finally, Halloween arrived.
The four of us gathered at my house. We were too tense to sit still or even
stand still. We moved around the house, barely speaking to each other. And we
carefully checked and rechecked all of the frightening traps and tricks we had
prepared.
I had never worked so hard in all my life. Never!
I spent so much time getting ready for the party—and our revenge—that I
didn’t even think of my Halloween costume until the very last minute.
And so I ended up wearing the same Klingon costume I had worn the year
before.
Walker was a pirate that year. He had a patch over one eye and wore a
striped shirt and a parrot on one shoulder.
Shane and Shana had dressed as some kind of blobby creatures. I couldn’t
really tell what they were supposed to be.
We didn’t care about our costumes. We only cared about scaring Tabby and
Lee.
And then, as we paced the living room nervously, one hour before the party
was to start, the phone rang.
And we received a call that filled us all with horror.
8
I was standing right next to the phone when it rang. The harsh buzz nearly made
me jump out of my skin. Was I a little tense? YES!
I grabbed the phone in the middle of the first ring. “Hello?”
I heard a familiar voice on the other end. “Hi, Drew. It’s Tabby.”
“Tabby!” I cried. I decided she was calling to find out what time the party
started. “The party starts at eight,” I said. “But if you and Lee—”
“That’s why I’m calling,” Tabby interrupted. “Lee and I can’t come
tonight.”
“Huh?”
The phone dropped out of my hand. It clattered to the floor.
I dove to pick up the receiver, stumbled, and nearly knocked the whole
table over.
“What? What did you say?” I demanded.
“Lee and I can’t come.” Tabby repeated the chilling words. “We’re going to
Lee’s cousin’s instead. His cousin gets to trick-or-treat until midnight. He does
four different neighborhoods. He promised we’ll get bags and bags of candy.
Sorry.”
“But, Tabby—” I started to protest weakly.
“Sorry,” she said. “See you. ’Bye.”
She hung up.
I let out a hoarse wail and sank to my knees on the floor.
“What’s wrong?” Walker demanded.
“They—they—they—” I couldn’t get the words out.
My three friends huddled around me. Walker tried to pull me to my feet.
But my head was spinning. I didn’t want to stand up.
“They’re not coming!” I finally managed to choke out. “Not coming.”
“Oh,” Walker replied softly. Shane and Shana shook their heads glumly, but
didn’t say a word.
We all stayed frozen in place, stunned, too miserable to talk. Thinking about
all the work… all the planning and all the hard work.
A whole year of planning and work.
I’m not going to cry, I told myself. I feel like crying, but I’m not going to.
I climbed shakily to my feet. And glanced at the couch.
“What is that?” I shrieked.
Everyone turned and saw what I saw. A huge, ugly hole in one of the brown
leather couch cushions.
“Oh no!” Shana wailed. “I was playing with a ball of green slime. I must
have dropped it onto the couch when I stood up. It—it burned a hole in the
cushion!”
“Quick—cover it up before Mom and Dad see—” I started.
Of course Mom and Dad came strolling into the living room. “How’s it
going?” Dad asked. “All ready for your guests?”
I crossed my fingers and prayed they wouldn’t see the huge hole in the
couch.
“Good heavens! What happened to the couch?” Mom shrieked.
It took Mom and Dad a long time to get over the ruined couch.
And it took me even longer to get over the ruined party.
That’s how it went last Halloween. Two years. Two years of ruined
Halloweens.
Now it’s a year later.
Halloween time again. This year, we have twice as much reason to get
revenge on Tabby and Lee.
If only we had a plan…
9
“This year I’m a space princess,” Tabby announced.
She had her blond hair piled high once again, with the same rhinestone tiara
in it. And she wore the same long, lacy dress.
The same costume as two years ago. But to add the outer-space look, Tabby
had painted her face bright green.
She always has to be a princess, I thought bitterly. Green or not green, she’s
still a princess.
Lee showed up in a cape and tights and said he was Superman. He said it
was his little brother’s costume. He told us why he didn’t have time to get a
costume of his own. But I couldn’t understand him because of the big wad of
bubble gum in his mouth.
Walker and I had decided to be ghosts. We cut eyeholes in bedsheets, and
armholes, and that was that.
My sheet dragged behind me on the grass. I should have cut it shorter. But
it was too late. We were already on our way to trick-or-treat.
“Where are Shane and Shana?” Lee asked.
“I guess we’ll catch up with them,” I replied. I raised my trick-or-treat bag
in front of me. “Let’s get going.”
The four of us stepped out into a clear, cold night. A pale half-moon floated
low over the houses. The grass shone gray under a light blanket of frost.
We stopped at the bottom of my driveway. A minivan rumbled by. I saw
two big dogs peering out the back window. The driver slowed to stare at us as
she passed by.
“Where shall we start?” Tabby asked.
Lee mumbled something I didn’t understand.
“I want to trick-or-treat all night!” Walker exclaimed. “This may be our last
trick-or-treat night ever.”
“Excuse me? What do you mean?” Tabby demanded, turning her green face
to him.
“Next year, we’ll be teenagers,” Walker explained. “We’ll be too old to
trick-or-treat.”
Kind of a sad thought.
I tried to take a deep breath of cool air. But I had forgotten to cut a nose or
mouth hole in the sheet. We hadn’t even left my front yard, and I was already
starting to feel hot!
“Let’s start at The Willows,” I suggested.
The Willows is a neighborhood of small houses. It starts on the other side of
a small woods, just two blocks away.
“Why The Willows?” Tabby demanded, fiddling with her tiara.
“Because the houses are real close together,” I told her. “We won’t have to
walk much, and we’ll get a lot of candy. No long driveways to walk up and
down.”
“Sounds good,” Lee agreed.
We started walking along the curb. Across the street, I saw two monsters
and a skeleton making their way across a front yard. Little kids, followed by a
father.
The wind fluttered my costume as we walked. My shoes crunched over
frost-covered dead leaves. The sky seemed to grow darker as we made our way
past the bare black trees of the woods.
A few minutes later, we reached the first block of The Willows. Streetlights
cast a warm yellow glow over the neighborhood. A lot of the houses were
decorated with orange and green lights, cutouts of witches and goblins, and
flickering jack-o’-lanterns.
The four of us began walking from house to house, gleefully yelling “Trick
or treat!” and collecting all kinds of candy.
People oohed and aahed over Tabby’s princess costume. She was the only
one in our group who had bothered to put on a decent costume. So I guess she
stood out.
We passed by a lot of other kids as we made our way down the block. Most
of them appeared younger than us. One kid was dressed as a milk carton. He
even had all the nutritional information printed on one side.
It took us about half an hour to do both sides of the street. The Willows
ended in a cul-de-sac. Kind of a dead end.
“Where to next?” Tabby asked.
“Whoa. Wait. One more house,” Walker said. He pointed to a small brick
house set back in the trees.
“I didn’t see that one,” I said. “I guess because it’s the only house that isn’t
right on the street.”
“The lights are on, and they’ve got a pumpkin in the window,” Walker
announced. “Let’s check it out.”
We trooped up to the front stoop and pushed the doorbell. The front door
swung open instantly. A small, white-haired woman poked out her head. She
squinted through thick eyeglasses at us.
“Trick or treat!” the four of us chanted.
“Oh my goodness!” she exclaimed. She pressed wrinkled hands against her
cheeks. “What wonderful costumes!”
Huh? Wonderful costumes? I thought. Two bedsheets and a borrowed
Superman suit from last year?
The old woman turned back into the house. “Forrest, come see this!” she
called. “You’ve got to see these costumes.”
I heard a man cough from somewhere deep inside the house.
“Come in. Please come in,” the old woman pleaded. “I want my husband to
see you.” She stepped back to make room for us to enter.
The four of us hesitated.
“Come in!” she insisted. “Forrest has to see your costumes. But it’s hard for
him to get up. Please!”
Tabby led the way into the house. We stepped into a tiny, dimly lit living
room. A fire blazed in a small brick fireplace against one wall. The room felt like
a blast furnace. It had to be five hundred degrees in there!
The woman shut the front door behind us. “Forrest! Forrest!” she called.
She turned to us and smiled. “He’s in the back room. Follow me.”
She opened the door and let us enter. To my surprise, the back room was
enormous.
And jammed with kids in costumes.
“Whoa!” I cried out, startled. My eyes quickly swept the room.
Most of the kids had taken off their masks. Some of them were crying.
Some were red-faced and angry. Several kids sat cross-legged on the floor, their
expressions glum.
“What’s going on?” Tabby demanded shrilly. Her eyes bulged wide with
fear.
“What are they all doing here?” Lee asked, swallowing hard.
A red-faced little man with shaggy white hair came hobbling out from the
corner, leaning on a white cane. “I like your costumes,” he said, grinning at us.
“We—we have to go now,” Tabby stammered.
We all turned to the door. The old woman had shut it behind her.
I glanced back at the kids in costumes. There were at least two dozen of
them. They all looked so frightened and unhappy.
“We have to go,” Tabby repeated shrilly.
“Yeah. Let us out of here,” Lee insisted.
The old man smiled. The woman stepped up beside him. “You have to
stay,” she said. “We like to look at your costumes.”
“You can’t go,” the man added, leaning heavily on his cane. “We have to
look at your costumes.”
“Huh? What are you saying? How long are you going to keep us here?”
Tabby cried.
“Forever,” the old couple replied in unison.
10
That was my daydream.
I was down by the street in front of my house, waiting for my friends to
show up. And daydreaming about Tabby and Lee being trapped by a weird old
couple who liked to collect trick-or-treaters and keep them forever.
Of course, in my daydream, Walker and I sneaked out a side door.
But Tabby and Lee were caught before they could escape. And they were
never seen again.
Nice daydream, huh?
I was still picturing the whole thing when Walker, Shane, and Shana finally
arrived. And we eagerly trooped inside and up to my room.
“Drew, why are you grinning like that?” Shana demanded, dropping down
onto the edge of my bed.
“I was just having a very funny daydream,” I told her. “About Tabby and
Lee.”
“What could be funny about those two creeps?” Walker demanded. He
picked up a tennis ball from the floor and tossed it to Shane. The two of them
started tossing the ball back and forth across my room.
“It was very funny,” I replied, sitting up and stretching. “Especially the
ending.”
I told them the whole daydream. I could see from the smiles on their faces
that they enjoyed it.
But Shana scolded me. “We don’t have time for daydreams, Drew. We need
a real plan. It’s almost Halloween.”
Walker tossed the tennis ball too high. It smashed into my dresser lamp and
knocked it over.
Shane hurtled toward the lamp and made a diving catch before it hit the
floor.
“Way to go!” Walker cried. “Catch of the Month!” He slapped Shane a high
five. He hit Shane so hard, the poor guy almost dropped the lamp.
“Grrrrrrr!” I growled at Walker and pointed to the desk chair. “Sit down.
We have serious thinking to do.”
“She’s right,” Shana agreed. “We have to scare Tabby and Lee out of their
skins this year. We have to pay them back for the last two years. We have to!”
“So what are we going to do?” Walker demanded, dropping his long, lanky
body into the desk chair. “Hide behind some bushes and yell ‘Boo!’?”
Bad attitude.
“I’ve been thinking of some really scary things we could do at a party,” I
started. “I think—”
“No party!” Shana interrupted.
“Right. No party,” her twin agreed. “We worked so hard on last year’s
party. And then Tabby and Lee didn’t show up.”
“Grrrrr.” Just thinking about last year made me growl.
“Well, if we don’t scare them at a Halloween party, where do we scare
them?” Walker asked, tapping out a rhythm with his fingers on the desk.
“Shane and I have some really good ideas,” Shana said.
“Yeah. I think you have to listen to Shana and me this year,” Shane chimed
in. “We have a really good plan. It will have them shaking for a year. Really!”
Walker pulled the desk chair closer. Shane sat on the floor beside him. I
leaned closer to Shana on the bed.
Speaking in a low voice just above a whisper, Shana told Walker and me
their plan. A very scary plan.
It gave me a chill just hearing Shana describe it.
“It’s very simple,” Shana finished. “Very easy to do. And there’s no way it
won’t work.”
“We’ll give Tabby and Lee a Halloween they’ll never forget!” Shane
boasted.
“It’s really mean,” Walker murmured.
I gazed at the chubby, pink-cheeked twins. They were so cute-looking. So
sweet and innocent. But their plan to frighten Tabby and Lee really was truly
horrifying!
“It’s mean,” I agreed. “And it’s cruel. And it’s terribly gross and shocking.”
I grinned. “I like it!”
We all laughed.
“So we agree?” Shane asked. “We’re doing it?”
We all agreed. We all solemnly shook hands.
“Great,” Shana declared. “So Drew, all you have to do is invite them to
come trick-or-treating with you. Shane and I will do the rest.”
“No problem,” I replied, still grinning. “No problem.”
We all cheered and congratulated each other. We knew this was the year
—our year.
Shana started to say something else—but my mom poked her head into the
room.
“What are you four plotting so seriously?” Mom asked.
“Uh… nothing,” Walker answered quickly.
“Just making plans for Halloween, Mom,” I told her.
Mom bit her lower lip. Her expression turned serious. “You know, Drew,”
she said, shaking her head, “I don’t think I can let you go trick-or-treating this
year.”
11
“Mom—you have to let me go trick-or-treating! You have to! Or else you’ll spoil
all of our plans for revenge!”
Those words almost burst from my mouth.
But somehow I held them in.
I choked back the words and stared hard at her, trying to decide if she was
serious.
She was.
“Mom—what’s wrong?” I finally cried. “What did I do? Why am I
grounded?”
“Drew, you’re not grounded.” Mom laughed. “I just don’t think trick-ortreating is a good idea this year. Haven’t you seen the news stories? About the
people in town who disappeared?”
“Huh? Disappeared?”
My mind flashed back to my daydream. I pictured the old couple again,
locking kids up in their back room.
“You mean kids have disappeared?” I asked.
Mom shook her head. “No. Not kids. Adults. A fourth person was reported
missing yesterday. Here. Look.”
Mom had the newspaper rolled up under her arm. She pulled it out and
unrolled it. She held the front page up so we all could see it.
I could read the bold, black headline from across the room:
LOCAL MYSTERY: 4 HAVE VANISHED
I climbed up from the bed and made my way over to Mom. I saw Shane and
Shana exchange worried glances. Walker’s expression had turned solemn. He
drummed his fingers tensely on the desktop.
I took the newspaper from Mom and stared at the photos of the four people
who had disappeared. Three men and one woman.
“The police are warning people to be very careful,” Mom said softly.
Walker walked over and took the newspaper from my hands. He studied the
photos for a moment. “Hey—these people are all fat!” he exclaimed.
Now we all clustered around the paper and stared at the gray photos.
Walker was right. All four people were very overweight. The first one, a bald
man in a bulging turtleneck sweater, had at least six chins!
“Weird,” I murmured.
Shane and Shana had grown strangely silent. I guessed they were
frightened.
“Why would four fat people disappear into thin air?” Walker asked.
Mom sighed. “That’s what the police would like to know,” she said.
“But, Mom, if only adults are disappearing, why can’t I go trick-ortreating?” I asked.
“Please let Drew go,” Shana pleaded. “It’s our last year to go out on
Halloween night.”
“No. I don’t think so,” Mom replied, biting her bottom lip again.
“But we’ll be really really really careful!” I promised her.
“I don’t think so,” Mom repeated. “I don’t think so.”
Once again, Halloween was completely ruined.
12
But then Dad thought maybe trick-or-treating would be okay.
It was two days later. He and Mom had been discussing it nonstop.
“You can go out if you go in a group,” Dad said. “Stay in the neighborhood.
And don’t wander away from the others. Okay, Elf?”
“Thanks, Dad!” I cried. I was so happy, I didn’t remind him to stop calling
me Elf! Instead, I surprised him with a big hug.
“Are you sure about this?” Mom asked.
“Of course he is!” I cried.
No way was I going to let them change their minds. I was already halfway
to the phone to tell Walker that our plan was back on!
“There will be a thousand kids trick-or-treating in the neighborhood,” Dad
argued. “Besides, Drew and her friends are old enough and smart enough to keep
out of trouble.”
“Thanks, Dad!” I cried again.
Mom wanted to keep the discussion going. But I ran out of the kitchen and
up to my room before she could get a word out.
I called Walker and told him the good news. He said he would call Shane
and Shana and tell them to get ready for trick-or-treat night.
Everything was set. I had just one little problem left.
I had to convince Tabby and Lee that they should go trick-or-treating with
us.
I took a deep breath and called Tabby’s house. Her mother said she was
over at Lee’s, helping him get his Halloween costume ready.
So I hurried over to Lee’s house. It was a gray Saturday afternoon. It had
rained all morning, and the storm clouds still floated overhead.
The front lawns shimmered from the clinging rainwater. I jumped over wide
puddles on the sidewalk. I wore a heavy gray sweatsuit. But the air felt damp
and cold, and I wished I had put on a jacket over it.
I jogged the last block to Lee’s house, partly to warm up. I stopped to catch
my breath on the front stoop. Then I pushed the doorbell.
A few seconds later, Lee answered the door.
“Whoa!” I cried out when I saw his costume. He had bobbing antennas on
his head. He wore a fuzzy yellow vest, pulled over a black-and-yellow-striped
girl’s swimsuit.
“You—you’re a bee?” I stammered.
He nodded. “Tabby and I are still working on it. We bought black tights for
my legs this morning.”
“Cool,” I said. He looked really stupid.
But why should I tell him?
Tabby greeted me as I stepped into the den. She had opened the package
containing the tights and was stretching them out, tugging them hard between
her hands.
“Drew—have you lost weight?” she asked.
“Excuse me? No.”
“Oh. I guess you like your sweatsuit baggy like that—huh?”
She’s so mean.
She turned her head away. But I saw her snicker to herself. She thinks she’s
really funny.
“Is that your costume?” she asked.
I decided to ignore her nasty jokes. “No. I’m going to be some kind of
superhero, I think,” I told her. “You know. Wear a cape and tights. What are you
going to be?”
“A ballerina,” she replied. She handed the tights to Lee. “Here are your bee
legs. Do you have some heavy construction paper?”
“What for?” Lee asked.
“We need to make the stinger. You know. To glue to the back of your
tights.”
“No way!” Lee protested. “No stinger. I don’t need a stinger. I’ll only sit on
it anyway.”
I let them argue for a few minutes. I kept out of it.
Lee finally won. No stinger.
Tabby pouted for a while and made faces at him. She hates it when she
doesn’t get her way. But he’s even more stubborn than she is.
“Listen, guys,” I started. “Walker and Shane and Shana and I are all going
to trick-or-treat together this year.” I took a deep breath, then asked my question.
“Want to come with us?”
“Yeah. Sure,” Lee replied.
“Okay,” Tabby agreed.
And that was that.
The trap was set.
Tabby and Lee were in for the most frightening Halloween of their lives.
Unfortunately, we were, too.
13
The week dragged by. I counted the hours till Halloween.
Finally, the big night arrived. I was so nervous, I could barely get my
superhero costume together.
It wasn’t much of a costume. I wore bright blue tights and a blue top. I
pulled a pair of red boxer shorts over the tights.
For my cape, I cut up a red tablecloth we didn’t use anymore and tied it
around my shoulders. Then I pulled on a pair of white vinyl boots. I had a red
cardboard mask that just covered my eyes.
“Super Drew!” I proclaimed to the mirror.
I knew the costume was lame. But I didn’t care. Tonight wasn’t about
costumes. It was about terror. It was about scaring two kids to death!
I grabbed a large brown shopping bag from the closet to use as a trick-ortreat bag. Then I scrambled down the stairs, hoping to get out of the house
before running into my parents. I hoped to avoid a last-minute lecture about how
I had to be careful outside.
No such luck.
Dad stopped me at the bottom of the stairs. “Wow! Great costume, Elf!” he
exclaimed. “What are you supposed to be?”
“Please don’t call me Elf,” I muttered. I tried to get past him to the front
door, but he blocked my way.
“Just let me take one photo,” he said.
“I’m kind of late,” I told him. I was supposed to meet Walker on the corner
at seven-thirty. It was already a quarter to eight.
“Be careful out there!” my mother called from the den.
Dad disappeared to get his camera. I waited at the bottom of the stairs,
tapping my hand on the banister.
“Don’t talk to any strangers!” Mom called.
Very helpful.
“Okay. One quick shot,” Dad said, returning with his camera raised to his
eye. “Stand against the door. You look great, Drew. Are you Wonder Woman or
something?”
“Just a superhero,” I mumbled. “I’ve really got to go, Dad.”
He steadied the camera over his eye. “How about a smile?”
I gave him a toothy grin.
He clicked the shutter.
“Oh. Wait. Did it flash?” he asked. “I don’t think I had the flash on.” He
examined the camera.
“Dad—” I started. I thought about Walker, standing by himself on the
corner. Walker hated to wait. I knew how tense he’d be.
As tense as me.
“Dad, I’ve got to meet my friends.”
“If you see anyone suspicious, run away!” Mom called from the den.
“Let’s try again, Elf.” Dad raised the camera again. “Smile.”
He clicked the shutter. No flash.
“Whoa—” He checked the camera again.
“Dad, please—” I begged.
“Oh, wow,” he murmured. “Would you believe it? No film.” He shook his
head. “I thought I had film in here. I’ll go upstairs and get a roll. It will only take
a second.”
“Dad—!” I screamed.
The doorbell rang. It startled us both.
“Probably some trick-or-treaters,” Dad said.
I leaped to the door and pulled it open. I squinted into the yellow porch
light. A boy stood there all in black. He wore a black sweater and black pants. A
black wool ski cap was pulled down over his forehead. He had black makeup
covering his face. And he wore black gloves.
“Cute costume,” Dad declared. “Get him a candy bar, Drew.”
I groaned. “Dad, it’s not a trick-or-treater. It’s Walker.” I pushed open the
storm door so that Walker could come in.
“I thought you were going to meet me,” he said.
Dad stared at Walker’s all-black costume. “What are you supposed to be?”
he asked.
“A dark and stormy night,” Walker replied.
“Huh? Where’s the stormy part?” I asked.
“Here,” Walker replied. He raised a black plastic water pistol and squirted
me in the face.
Dad burst out laughing. He thought that was a riot. He called Mom in from
the den to take a look.
“We’re never getting out of here,” I whispered to Walker. “We’re going to
miss Tabby and Lee.”
We had the night all planned out, down to the minute. But now the whole
plan could be ruined.
I had a knot in my stomach. I could feel it tightening. The cape suddenly
felt as if it were choking me.
Mom and Dad were admiring Walker’s costume. “A dark and stormy night!
Very clever,” Mom said. “But how will anyone see you in the dark? You’d better
be very careful crossing the street.”
Mom had advice for everyone tonight.
I couldn’t take it anymore. “We’ve got to go. ’Bye,” I said. I shoved Walker
out the door and followed right behind him.
Mom called out more warnings from the house. But I couldn’t hear her. I
pulled Walker down the driveway, and we hurried toward the corner. That’s
where we were supposed to meet Tabby and Lee.
Our two victims.
“You should have stayed on the corner,” I scolded Walker. “Maybe Tabby
and Lee were here already and left.”
“But you were so late,” Walker protested. “I thought maybe something was
wrong.”
My heart was thumping. The knot in my stomach grew even tighter. “Okay,
okay,” I urged. “Let’s just calm down.”
It was a clear, cold night. A light frost made the lawns silvery. Overhead, a
sliver of moon rested near a cluster of bright stars.
Most of the houses on the block had their lights on. I saw two groups of
little trick-or-treaters across the street. They were all hurrying up to the same
house. A dog barked excitedly in the house next door.
I turned my eyes to the corner where we were supposed to meet Tabby and
Lee. No one there.
Walker and I stopped under the street light. I adjusted my cape. It was really
choking me. I saw that I hadn’t cut it short enough. The bottom was soaked from
dragging along the ground.
“Where are they?” I demanded.
“You know they’re always late,” Walker replied.
He was right. Tabby and Lee loved to keep people waiting for them.
“They will be here any second,” Walker said.
A tall hedge ran along the corner yard. Walker started pacing back and forth
from the hedge to the curb. His outfit was so black, when he stepped into the
shadow of the hedge, he completely disappeared!
“Could you stop pacing—?” I started.
But my voice caught in my throat when I heard a cough. From the other
side of the hedge.
A low, gruff cough.
Not a human cough. More like an animal growl.
I turned and saw that Walker had heard it, too. He stopped pacing and
stared at the hedge.
I heard a scraping sound. The hedge appeared to shiver.
“Wh-who’s back there?” I choked out.
The hedge shook again. Shook and cracked.
“Hey—who is it?” Walker cried.
Silence.
The hedge shook. Harder this time.
“Is this a joke or something?” Walker demanded in a trembling voice.
Another low animal growl.
“Noooo—!” I cried out as two ugly creatures came snarling through the
hedge.
I saw only a blur of ragged fur. Open jaws. Saliva-covered teeth.
Before I could move, one of the creatures leaped onto me, snarling and
growling. It shoved me roughly down to the grass. And dug its fangs into my
shoulder.
14
I let out a shrill wail of pain.
I tried to scramble to my feet. But the snarling creature had me pinned to
the ground.
“Stop! Stop!” I struggled to squirm free as the creature tugged my cape
over me, covering me like a blanket.
“Hey—!” I heard Walker’s angry shout. But I couldn’t see what was
happening to him.
“Noooooo! Let me go!” I shrieked.
With a frantic burst of energy, I reached up one hand—and swiped at the
creature’s drooling face.
To my shock, the whole face pulled off easily.
A mask. I held a rubber mask in my hand.
I stared up at a grinning face.
It took me a few moments to recognize the boy. Todd Jeffrey. Yes. Todd
Jeffrey, the high-school kid who had frightened us all at Lee’s party two years
ago.
“Todd,” I murmured. I frantically pulled the cape away from my face.
“Gotcha! Gotcha good!” he whispered. He let go of me and stood up.
“You creep!” I cried angrily. I tossed the rubber mask in his face.
He caught it in one hand and laughed. “Drew, can’t you take a joke?”
“Huh? A joke? A joke?” I screamed.
I climbed to my feet and furiously began brushing myself off. My cape was
totally tangled and covered with wet brown leaves.
Walker had been wrestling with the other creature. The guy pulled off his
mask. Of course it was Joe, Todd’s disgusting friend.
“Hope we didn’t scare you!” he teased. He and Todd laughed like hyenas.
They fell all over each other, slapping high fives and low fives.
Before I could tell them what jerks they were, I heard more laughter. To my
surprise, Tabby and Lee came stepping out from behind the hedge. And all four
of them enjoyed a good laugh together.
“Grrrrrrr!” I uttered a furious growl. At that moment, I wished I really were
a superhero. I wanted to plow my superfists into their laughing faces.
Or maybe spread my cape and fly away—far away, so I wouldn’t have to
see any of them anymore.
“Happy Halloween, Drew!” Tabby called smugly.
“Happy Halloween!” Tabby and Lee repeated in unison, grinning their
disgusting grins.
“How long were you and Lee standing back there?” I demanded angrily.
“Long enough!” Lee snickered. He and Tabby both burst out laughing
again.
“We were standing back there the whole time,” Tabby declared. “I love
Halloween—don’t you?”
I growled under my breath. But I didn’t say anything.
Keep cool, Drew, I instructed myself. Tabby and Lee and their two highschool buddies played a little joke on you.
But they won’t have the last laugh.
When the night is over, I told myself, Walker and I will be the ones who are
laughing.
When Shane and Shana arrive, we are going to terrify them. Truly terrify
them.
Todd and Joe had pulled their monster masks back on. They tilted back
their heads and howled like wolves. Todd’s mask was really gross. It had rubber
saliva dripping over the long, pointy fangs.
“They’re not coming trick-or-treating with us—are they?” I asked Tabby.
Tabby shook her head. She adjusted the tiara on top of her blond hair.
“No way!” Todd replied from behind the ugly mask. “Joe and I are too old
to trick-or-treat. Especially with you crybabies.”
“Then why are you wearing those monster costumes?” Walker demanded.
“Just to scare kids,” Joe replied. He and Todd laughed again, loud, cruel
laughs.
Joe grabbed my mask and pulled it down to my chin. Todd rubbed the back
of his hand over Walker’s cheek, smearing the black makeup. Then they ran off
to find some other victims.
What creeps.
I was glad to see them go. I stood watching them, making sure they didn’t
change their minds and come back.
“Nice guys,” Lee said. He set his orange and black trick-or-treat bag down
on the grass. Then he adjusted his bee antennas.
I heard kids laughing across the street. I turned and saw a group of four kids
—all monsters and goblins—running up the driveway to a house.
“Let’s get going,” Tabby said. “It’s kind of cold.”
“Aren’t Shane and Shana supposed to meet us?” Lee asked.
“Yeah. They’ll catch up to us,” I said.
We crossed the street and started toward the first house, a tall, brightly lit
brick house with a smiling pumpkin cutout in the front window.
As we made our way up the gravel driveway, I glanced at my watch.
And gasped. Nearly eight-fifteen.
Shane and Shana were supposed to meet us on the corner at eight. Where
were they? They were never late. Never. I swallowed hard.
Was this Halloween about to be ruined, too? Had something gone wrong?
15
We stepped up onto the front stoop and peered through the glass storm door. A
big orange cat with bright blue eyes stared back at us from the other side of the
door.
I rang the doorbell.
A few seconds later, a smiling young woman in jeans and a yellow
turtleneck came hurrying to the door. She carried a basket of Snickers bars and
Milky Ways.
“You all look great,” she declared, dropping a candy bar in each bag.
“Drew—hold up your bag!” Tabby ordered shrilly.
“Oh. Sorry.” I was still worrying about Shane and Shana. I held up my bag
for the woman. The cat narrowed its amazing blue eyes at me.
“Are you supposed to be a princess?” the woman asked Tabby.
“No. A ballerina,” Tabby replied.
“And you’re a lump of coal?” the woman asked Walker.
“Something like that,” Walker muttered. He didn’t do his dark-and-stormynight routine. I guessed he was worried about Shane and Shana, too.
“Have fun,” the woman said. She pulled the storm door shut.
The four of us jumped off her stoop and started across the frost-covered
grass to the next yard. When I glanced back to the door, I saw the cat still staring
out at us.
The next house was dark. So we crossed the lawn to the house next door to
it. A group of kids was already on the front stoop, shouting, “Trick or treat! Trick
or treat!”
“Where are they?” I whispered to Walker.
He shrugged.
“If they don’t show up…” I started. But I saw Tabby watching me. So I
didn’t finish my sentence.
We waited for the kids to leave, then climbed up to the stoop. Two little
kids—probably three or four years old—were handing out little bags of candy
corn to everyone.
They laughed at Lee’s bee costume. They wanted to feel the antennas. The
little boy asked Lee where his stinger was.
“I stuck it in someone,” Lee told him.
They stared hard at Walker’s all-black outfit. I think it kind of frightened
them. “Are you supposed to be a monster?” the little girl asked Walker timidly.
“No. I’m a lump of coal,” Walker told her.
She nodded seriously.
We hurried away and did three more houses to the end of the block. I saw
two kids that I babysit for. They were in matching robot costumes. I stopped to
talk with them for a minute.
Then I had to run to catch up to the others. They had crossed the street and
had started doing the houses on the other side.
A strong gust of wind fluttered my cape. I shivered—and glanced nervously
at my watch again.
Where were they? Where were Shane and Shana?
The whole plan depended on them….
“Wow! Pretty good haul so far!” Lee declared. He held his bag open,
studying the contents as we crossed the street.
“Did you get any Kit Kats?” Tabby demanded. “I’ll trade anyone for Kit
Kats.”
“Only one person gave out apples,” Lee said, making a disgusted face. He
reached into his bag and pulled out the apple. Then he heaved it as hard as he
could across the yard.
The apple hit a tree trunk with a loud thunk. Then it bounced into the next
driveway.
“Why do people give out apples?” Lee grumbled. “Don’t they know we
only want candy?”
“Some people are just cheap,” Tabby said. She pulled out her apple and
dropped it in the grass. Then she kicked it with the toe of her ballet slipper.
They both really deserve what they’re going to get, I thought. They’re both
really jerks.
But where are Shane and Shana?
We trick-or-treated our way down the block. It was getting pretty late, and
there were fewer little kids out.
The streetlight near the corner was broken. We stepped into a patch of deep
shadow.
One of Lee’s antennas kept slipping off. He slid it back into place for the
tenth time.
As we neared the corner, a tall tree blocked the moonlight, and it grew even
darker.
“Oh—!” I let out a cry as two figures leaped out at us from behind the tree.
I thought that Todd and Joe had returned.
But I quickly saw that it wasn’t those guys.
In a gray blur, the two figures turned their backs on us, blocking our way.
They wore dark robes that flowed straight down to the ground. And over their
heads…
Over their heads…
They wore pumpkins!
Large, round pumpkins, perfectly balanced on their shoulders.
“Whoa—!” Walker let out a startled cry. He backed up and stumbled into
me.
Tabby and Lee gaped in surprise.
But the most horrifying surprise was yet to come.
As they slowly turned to face us, their jack-o’-lantern faces came into view.
Eerie, jagged grins cut into their pumpkin heads.
Flashing triangle eyes.
Lit by flames!
Bright orange and yellow flames danced inside their heads!
And as the pumpkin heads turned their fiery, ragged grins on us, Walker and
I opened our mouths and screamed in terror.
16
Our screams echoed down the block.
The fire flashed in the pumpkin heads’ eyes.
I turned to Tabby and Lee. The light from the fiery jack-o’-lantern faces
flickered over their faces. They stood calmly, staring at the grinning pumpkin
heads.
Tabby turned to me. “Is this your idea of a joke? Were you trying to scare
us?”
“We know it’s Shane and Shana,” Lee said. He tugged at one of the dark,
loose, flowing costumes. “Hey, Shane—how’s it going?”
The two pumpkin heads remained silent.
“How did you get the fire to work? Do you have candles in there?” Tabby
demanded. “How can you see?”
The pumpkin heads grinned back in silence. A lick of fire darted out from
one of the jagged mouths.
I shivered. These costumes were too good. I could hear the flames hiss
inside the big orange heads. The costumes were dark green, like pumpkin vines.
Why aren’t Tabby and Lee frightened? I wondered.
I expected Shane and Shana to appear in something frightening. But I didn’t
expect anything as good as these fiery jack-o’-lantern heads.
The costumes were great. But I felt so disappointed. Tabby and Lee were
definitely not frightened.
This Halloween is going to be a disaster—like the others, I thought.
I stepped up beside Walker. I couldn’t see his expression under all that
black makeup.
“How do they do the fire?” he whispered. “It’s really awesome!”
I nodded. “But it didn’t scare Tabby and Lee,” I whispered back.
“It’s early,” Walker whispered. “Shane and Shana have just started.”
My cape had become tangled around my legs. I tugged it free and tossed it
behind me.
The two pumpkin heads still hadn’t said a word.
Tabby picked up her trick-or-treat bag and turned to me. “You’ll have to do
better than this if you want to scare Lee and me,” she said with a sneer.
“We’re not scaredy-cats like you two,” Lee boasted.
Flames darted out of the pumpkin heads’ eyes. They both tilted their big
heads as they stared at Tabby and Lee.
How do they do that? I wondered. How do they control the flames? Do they
have some kind of remote control?
“Well, are we going to stand here and freeze? Or are we going to trick-ortreat?” Tabby demanded.
“Let’s do your block,” I suggested to her.
Tabby started to reply—but a hiss of fire from the nearest pumpkin head
made her stop.
“Let’s go somewhere else,” the jack-o’-lantern said from somewhere inside
the pumpkin head. His voice came out in a hoarse crackle. Too harsh to be a
whisper. A dry, choked sound.
“Somewhere else,” his partner echoed. Her voice also came out in a hoarse
crackle. Like dry, dead leaves being crinkled together.
“Excuse me?” Lee cried.
“We know a better neighborhood,” the first pumpkin head crackled. The
jagged mouth, cut through the thick pumpkin flesh, didn’t move. The voice
hissed from inside. The orange and yellow flames tossed in rhythm to the words.
“We know a better neighborhood.”
“A neighborhood you won’t forget.”
Tabby laughed. She rolled her eyes. “Oh, wow. Scary voices!” she said
sarcastically.
“Oooh, I’m shaking! I’m shaking!” Lee teased.
He and Tabby laughed together.
“Give us a break, guys,” Tabby said to the pumpkin heads. “Your costumes
are pretty good. But they didn’t scare us. So lose the creepy voices, okay?”
“Yeah,” Lee agreed. “Let’s go do some houses. It’s getting late.”
“Follow ussss,” one of the pumpkin heads hissed.
“Follow us to a new neighborhood. A better neighborhood.”
They led the way down the street. Their big heads bounced on their
shoulders as they walked. The fire flickered from their heads, casting a glow like
lighted torches.
“What are they doing?” Walker whispered in my ear. “This isn’t in the plan.
Where are they taking us?”
I didn’t know.
17
We walked three blocks, heading away from our houses. We passed a row of big
stone houses set back on wide lawns behind tall hedges. The next block had an
empty lot where someone had started to build a house, and then stopped.
The two pumpkin heads walked quickly, taking long strides. Their heads
bounced on their shoulders. They kept their fiery faces straight ahead and didn’t
glance back at us.
“Where are we going?” Lee demanded, jogging to catch up to them. He
tugged at one of their shoulders. “You’re passing a lot of good houses across the
street.”
The jack-o’-lantern creature didn’t slow down. “Let’s try a new
neighborhood,” he crackled.
“Yessssss,” his partner hissed. “A new neighborhood. A better
neighborhood. You’ll see.”
They led us past the empty lot. Past a row of small, dark houses.
“Where are we going?” Walker whispered. He motioned to Shane and
Shana. “What is their problem? Why are they doing this? They’re starting to
scare me!”
“I’m sure they know what they’re doing,” I whispered back.
I gazed around the block. I didn’t see many other trick-or-treaters. It was
getting late, and most of the little kids had already gone home.
In the next driveway, two tall kids—a gorilla and a chubby clown—were
pawing through their trick-or-treat bags. They had their heads lowered to the
bags. We passed by them, and they didn’t even look up.
“Hey—we’re missing a lot of good houses!” Lee protested. He pointed to a
brick house on the corner. “Can we stop there? Those people always give out
handfuls of candy bars. Really. Handfuls!”
The pumpkin heads ignored him and kept walking.
“Hey—whoa! Stop!” Tabby demanded.
She and Lee both trotted up in front of the pumpkin heads.
“Stop! Come on—whoa!”
“A new neighborhood,” one of them croaked.
“Let’s try a new neighborhood,” the other one echoed.
“A better neighborhood.”
A chill ran down my back. Shane and Shana were acting so weird.
I tugged my cape off a clump of weeds. The air suddenly felt colder, and
damp. I wrapped the cape around me.
Up ahead, Lee fiddled with his bee antenna. I saw that Tabby’s ballet
slippers were soaked with mud.
We followed the pumpkin heads across the street. And then they stepped off
the sidewalk and started into a dark woods.
Walker hurried up beside me. Even through his heavy makeup, I could see
the worried expression on his face. “Why are they taking us into the woods?” he
whispered.
I shrugged. “I guess they’re getting ready to scare Tabby and Lee.”
Twigs and dead leaves crackled under our shoes as we made our way
between the trees.
A frightening thought flashed into my mind. I suddenly pictured the four fat
people who had disappeared.
Four people. Vanished into thin air. Never seen again.
I remembered all of my mother’s warnings. I remembered how she told us
to stay where there were a lot of kids and a lot of bright lights.
I remembered how she didn’t even want me to go trick-or-treating tonight.
This is wrong, I realized.
Mom’s advice was smart. We shouldn’t be walking through the woods
tonight, I knew.
We shouldn’t be away from the street, away from the brightly lit houses.
We shouldn’t go off by ourselves like this in the dark, creepy woods.
“A new neighborhood,” a pumpkin head crackled from up ahead.
“Just past these woods,” the other one whispered. “A really good
neighborhood. You’ll see.”
The light from inside their heads flickered over the dark tangles of bare
trees and tall weeds.
My heart began to thud. I hurried to keep up with the others.
Shane and Shana are good friends, I told myself.
I’m sure they know where they’re going.
But this isn’t what we planned. This isn’t what we planned at all.
Why do I have such a bad feeling about this?
18
“Shane! Shana! Give us a break!” Tabby complained shrilly. “Look at me! Look
at my ballerina skirt!”
She held up the front of the skirt. Even in the dim light, I could see the mud
stain on the front.
“We have to get out of these woods!” Tabby wailed angrily.
“Yeah. It’s too dark. And we’re wasting too much time,” Lee agreed.
His trick-or-treat bag got caught on a low tree limb. He tugged it hard to
pull it loose.
Shane and Shana ignored the complaints. The big, fiery pumpkins bouncing
on their shoulders, they made their way steadily and quickly through the
darkness of the woods.
A few minutes later, we stepped out onto a narrow street. Seeing the bright
street lights and rows of little houses, we all let out a happy cheer.
“Now we can trick-or-treat,” one of the pumpkin heads croaked.
I turned my eyes up and down the street. I saw house after house, all small,
all on tiny lawns. Most of them had lights on in front. Many of them were
decorated for Halloween.
The houses stretched for blocks. Two rows of brightly lit little houses—as
far as I could see.
“This is an awesome neighborhood for trick-or-treating!” I declared,
starting to feel a lot better. A lot less frightened.
“Excellent!” Lee agreed. “We’ll clean up here!”
“Where are we?” Walker demanded. “How come I’ve never seen this
neighborhood before?”
No one answered him. We were all too eager to get started.
I pulled some wet leaves off my cape and straightened my mask. Tromping
through the woods had messed all of us up. We took a few seconds to get our
costumes in better shape.
Then the six of us hurried up to the first house.
A young woman carrying a baby in one arm came to the door. She dropped
miniature candy bars into our bags. The baby stared at the flaming pumpkin
heads and smiled.
At the next house, an elderly couple took forever getting to the door. “Trick
or treat!” we shouted at the top of our lungs. They raised their hands to their
ears. I guess they couldn’t stand the noise.
“I’m sorry. But we don’t have any candy,” the old woman said. She
dropped nickels into our bags. A nickel per bag.
We hurried across the small yard to the next house. Two girls, about seven
or eight, greeted us at the door. “Awesome costumes!” one of them said to Shane
and Shana. They gave us little bags of M&M’s.
“This is cool!” Lee declared as we hurried to the next house.
“The houses are so close together,” Tabby added. “We can do a hundred
houses in no time!”
“Why didn’t we ever come here before?” Walker asked.
“Trick or treat!” we screamed as we rang the doorbell on the next house.
A teenaged boy with long blond hair and an earring in one ear answered the
door. He snickered at our costumes. “Cool,” he muttered. Then he dropped
packages of candy corn into our bags.
On to the next house. And the next and the next.
We did the next block, stopping at every house. Then we covered two more
blocks. The little houses seemed to stretch on forever.
My trick-or-treat bag was nearly full. We stopped at the corner because
Walker’s shoe had come untied. While he bent down to tie it, we all stopped to
catch our breath.
“Hurry up!” a pumpkin urged Walker. Flames leaped angrily from his
eyeholes.
“Yesssss, hurry,” the other one hissed. “No time to wasssssste.”
“Give me a break,” Walker murmured. “I have a knot.”
As he struggled with his shoe, the two pumpkin heads bobbed and squirmed
impatiently.
Finally, Walker climbed to his feet and picked up his bulging trick-or-treat
bag. The pumpkin heads were already leading the way to the next block of
houses.
“I’m getting a little tired,” I heard Lee whisper to Tabby. “What time is it?”
“My bag is nearly full,” Tabby replied. With a groan, she shifted the heavy
bag to her other hand.
“Hurry,” a pumpkin head insisted. “Lots more houses to do.”
“Lotssssss,” the other one hissed.
We did two more blocks. Both sides of the street. About twenty houses.
My bag was filled to the top. I had to carry it in both hands.
Walker’s shoelace had come undone again. When he bent to tie it, it ripped
in his hand. “Now what am I going to do?” he muttered.
“Hurry,” a pumpkin head insisted.
“More houses.”
“I’m getting tired,” Tabby complained, loud enough for everyone to hear
this time.
“Me, too,” Lee agreed. “And this trick-or-treat bag is getting heavy.”
“Stupid shoelace,” Walker muttered, still bent over his shoe.
“I guess it is getting pretty late,” I said, gazing around. “I don’t see any
other trick-or-treaters. I think they’ve all gone home.”
I pulled off my cape. It was all tangled, and it was starting to choke me. I
balled it up and tucked it under my arm.
“More houses,” one of the pumpkin heads whispered.
“Hurry. Lots more to do,” the other one insisted in her dry, crackling voice.
The yellow flames danced inside her head.
“But we want to quit!” Lee whined.
“Yes. We’re done,” Tabby agreed shrilly.
“You can’t quit!” a pumpkin head snapped.
“Huh?” Lee’s mouth dropped open.
“Keep going! You can’t quit!” the pumpkin head insisted.
They both appeared to float up, to rise up over us. The fires raged in their
triangle eyes. The heads floated up over the dark, caped bodies.
“You can’t quit! You can’t EVER quit!”
19
“Ha-ha. Very funny.” Tabby rolled her eyes.
But I saw Lee step back in fear. His knees seemed to buckle, and he nearly
dropped his trick-or-treat bag.
“Another block,” a pumpkin head insisted.
“Another block. And then another.”
“Whoa. Wait a minute!” Tabby protested. “You can’t boss us around like
that. I’m going home.”
She turned and started to walk away. But the two pumpkin heads moved
quickly to block her path.
“Let me go!” Tabby protested.
She darted sharply to the right. But the big pumpkin creatures floated with
her. Their fiery grins appeared to grow wider. Brighter.
The two of them began circling us, floating silently. They swirled around
us, faster and faster—until it looked as if we were surrounded by flames.
A wall of leaping flames all around us!
“You will obey!” came the crackling command.
The flames pushed us from behind. Forced us forward.
We had no choice but to obey them. We were prisoners. Prisoners of their
fire.
An old man was standing at the door to the first house. He grinned at us as
we stepped onto his front stoop. “You kids are out kind of late—aren’t you?” he
asked.
“Kind of,” I replied.
He dropped packages of Chuckles into our bags.
“Hurry,” a pumpkin head urged as we crossed the wet grass to the next
house. “Hurry!”
Lee’s trick-or-treat bag was so heavy, he dragged it along the ground. I
carried mine in both hands. Tabby complained to herself, muttering and shaking
her head.
We did both sides of the block. I didn’t see any other kids out. No cars came
by. Some of the houses were turning out their lights.
“Hurry!” a pumpkin head insisted.
“Lots more houses. Lots more blocks.”
“No way!” Lee cried.
“No way!” Tabby repeated. She tried to sound strong. But I heard a tremble
in her voice.
The jack-o’-lantern faces loomed over us once again. The fiery eyes stared
out at us.
“Hurry. You can’t stop now! You CAN’T!”
“But it’s too late!” I protested.
“And my shoe keeps coming off,” Walker chimed in.
“We don’t want to trick-or-treat anymore,” Tabby told them shrilly.
“You can’t stop now! Hurry!”
“Lots more houses. This is the BEST neighborhood!”
“No way!” Tabby and Lee repeated together. They started to chant. “No
way! No way! No way!”
“Our bags are full,” I said.
“Mine is starting to tear,” Walker complained.
“No way! No way!” Tabby and Lee chanted.
The two jack-o’-lanterns began to swirl around us again, circling faster and
faster, rebuilding the wall of flames. “You mussssst not ssssstop!” one of them
hissed.
“You musssst keep going!”
They swirled closer. So close I could feel the scorching heat of their flames.
And as they swirled, they began to hiss, like snakes about to strike.
The hissing grew louder, louder—until it sounded as if we were surrounded
by snakes!
My heavy trick-or-treat bag fell from my hands. “Stop—!” I screamed up at
them. “Stop it! You’re not Shane and Shana!”
Fire leaped from their eyes. Their hisses became a high wail.
“You’re not Shane and Shana!” I shrieked. “Who are you?”
20
They swirled to a stop. Bright flames licked out of their grinning mouths. Their
shrill wails bounced off the bare trees, cutting through the heavy night silence.
“Who are you?” I demanded again, my voice trembling. My whole body
shook. I suddenly felt as if the cold of the night had seeped inside me.
“Who are you? Have you done something to our friends?”
No reply.
I turned to Walker. The light of the flames flickered over his face. Through
his black makeup, I could see his frightened expression.
I swallowed hard and turned to Tabby and Lee. They were both sneering
and shaking their heads.
“Is this your idea of a dumb Halloween joke?” Tabby demanded. She rolled
her eyes. “Wow. Did you really think Lee and I would fall for this?”
“Ooh—I’m scared! I’m scared!” Lee cried sarcastically. He made his knees
knock together. “Look—I’m shaking like a leaf!”
He and Tabby let out loud laughs.
“These are real clever costumes. Great fire effects. But we know it’s Shane
and Shana,” Lee declared. “No way you’re going to scare us, Drew.”
“No way,” Tabby repeated. “Look—!”
She and Lee reached out their hands. They each grabbed a pumpkin head—
and tugged.
“Whoa!”
They pulled the fiery pumpkin heads off the creatures’shoulders.
And then all four of us screamed—because the two costumed figures had
no heads underneath!
21
Our screams rose up shrilly, cutting through the night air like wailing sirens.
The pumpkin head fell from Tabby’s hand and bounced heavily on the
ground. Bright orange flames shot out of its eyes and mouth.
Lee still gripped the other pumpkin head between his hands. But he
dropped it when the jagged mouth began to move.
The fiery heads grinned up at us from the grass.
“Ohhh.” I uttered a low moan of terror and staggered back. I wanted to run
away to run as fast as I could and not look back.
But I couldn’t take my eyes off the two heads, grinning up at us from the
wet grass.
As I stared, my heart pounded and my legs began to shake. Someone
grabbed my arm.
“Walker!”
He held on to me. His hand was as cold as ice.
With his other hand, he pointed to the two headless bodies.
They stood in their dark, flowing costumes. They hadn’t moved. The spot
between their shoulders where their heads had rested was flat and smooth.
As if the pumpkin heads had been balanced there. But never attached.
Never attached.
Tabby and Lee huddled together beside me. Tabby’s tiara was missing. Her
hair had come unpinned. It fell in wet tangles over her face.
Lee’s trick-or-treat bag had toppled onto its side. A pile of candy had spilled
over the grass, inches away from one of the pumpkin heads.
The flames inside the heads danced and flickered. And then the jagged
mouths began to move.
The smiles grew wider. The triangle eyes narrowed.
“Hee hee hee heeeeee.”
An ugly laugh escaped their mouths. An evil, dry sound. More like a throat
clearing, more like a cough than a laugh.
“Hee hee heeeeeeeee.”
“Noooo!” I moaned. Beside me, I heard Walker gasp.
Lee swallowed hard. Tabby was holding on to the sleeve of his bee costume
with both hands.
She pulled him back until they were standing behind Walker and me.
“Hee hee heeeeeeeee.”
The heads laughed together, flames flickering inside them.
Their two bodies moved quickly. They reached out long arms and grabbed
the heads up from the grass.
I expected them to place the heads back on their shoulders. But they didn’t.
They held the heads in front of their chests.
“Hee heeeeeee.”
Another dry laugh. The pumpkin mouths twisted on the dark, round faces.
The eyes stared blankly at us, bright orange, then shadowy, flickering with the
flames.
I realized I was squeezing Walker’s arm. He didn’t even seem to notice.
I let go. And took a deep breath.
“Who are you?” I called to the two creatures. My voice came out high and
tiny. “Who are you? And what do you want?”
“Hee heee heeeee.” They laughed their ugly laughs again.
22
“Who are you?” I choked out again, shouting over their dry, crackling laughter.
“Where are Shane and Shana? Where are our friends?”
Flames hissed from the two heads. Their ragged orange grins grew wider.
“Drew—let’s try one more time to run away,” Walker whispered. “Maybe if
we catch them by surprise…”
We both spun around and started to run. Tabby and Lee came stumbling
after us.
My legs felt so wobbly and weak, I didn’t think I could run. My heart
pounded so hard, I struggled to breathe.
“Run!” Walker cried breathlessly, pulling my arm. “Drew—faster!”
We didn’t get far.
Uttering their shrill, frightening hisses, the creatures whirled around us once
again. Trapping us. Holding us prisoner inside their circle of flames.
No way we could run away. No way we could escape from them.
Peering over the flying flames, I searched desperately up and down the
street.
No one in sight. Nothing moved. No cars. No people. Not even a dog or a
cat.
Holding their heads at their waists, the two creatures stepped up to us. They
stood over us menacingly, raising the red, glowing heads high above their bare
shoulders.
“More houses. More houses.” The jack-o’-lantern lips pushed out the
words. The red eyes stared down at us.
“More houses. More houses.”
“You cannot stop. You must keep on trick-or-treating!”
“Pick up your bags. Pick them up—now!” one of them growled. Her head
held up between two hands, she gazed down at us, her jagged lips forming an
evil sneer.
“We—we don’t want to trick-or-treat!” Lee wailed, holding onto Tabby.
“We want to go home!” Tabby cried.
“More houses. More houses. More houses.” The pumpkin heads continued
their hissing chant.
They bumped us together. They bumped and pushed us.
We had no choice. Wearily, we picked up our trick-or-treat bags from where
they had fallen on the grass.
They moved behind us, chanting, chanting in their low, dry whispers.
“More houses. More houses.”
They pushed us to the first house on the block. They pushed us onto the
front stoop. Then they hovered close behind.
“How—how long do we have to trick-or-treat?” Tabby demanded.
The pumpkin heads grinned together. “Forever!” they declared.
23
A woman came to the door and dropped packages of Hershey’s kisses into our
bags. “You kids are out awfully late,” she said. “Do you live around here?”
“No,” I replied. “We don’t really know where we are. We’re in a strange
neighborhood, and we’re being forced to trick-or-treat by two headless pumpkin
creatures. And they say they’re going to make us trick-or-treat forever. Help us
—please! You’ve got to help us!”
“Ha-ha! That’s good!” the woman laughed. “That’s very funny. You have a
very good imagination.” She closed the door before I could get out another
word.
At the next house, we didn’t even bother to ask for help. We knew no one
would believe us.
“Your bags are so full!” the woman exclaimed. “You must have been trickor-treating for hours!”
“We… we like candy a lot,” Walker replied wearily.
I glanced back at the pumpkin heads. They were motioning impatiently.
They wanted us to move on to the next house.
We said good-bye to the woman and made our way across the front yard.
Our trick-or-treat bags were heavy, so we dragged them along the grass.
As we headed to the next driveway, Tabby hurried up beside me. “What are
we going to do?” she whispered in my ear. “How are we going to get away from
these… these monsters?”
I shrugged. I didn’t know how to answer her.
“I’m so scared,” Tabby confessed. “You don’t think these pumpkin
creatures really plan to make us trick-or-treat forever—do you? What do they
really want? Why are they doing this to us?”
“I don’t know,” I said, swallowing hard. I could see that Tabby was about to
cry.
Lee was walking with his head down. He dragged his bulging trick-or-treat
bag behind him. He was shaking his head, muttering to himself.
We stepped up to the next porch and rang the bell. A middle-aged man in
bright yellow pajamas opened the door. “Trick or treat!” we cried wearily.
He dropped little Tootsie Rolls into our bags. “Very late,” he muttered. “Do
your parents know you’re still out?”
We dragged on to the next house. And the next.
I kept waiting for a chance to escape. But the two creatures never let us out
of their sight. They stayed right with us, keeping in the shadows. Their eyes
glowed red from the deepening fire inside their heads.
“More houses,” they chanted, forcing us to cross the street and do the long
row of houses on the other side.
“More houses.”
“I’m so scared,” Tabby repeated to me in a trembling whisper. “So is Lee.
We’re so scared, we feel sick.”
I started to tell her I felt the same way.
But we both gasped when we saw someone walking along the street.
A man in a blue uniform!
At first I thought he was a policeman. But as he stepped under a streetlight,
I saw that he wore a blue work uniform. He had a blue baseball cap on his head.
He carried a large black lunch box in one hand.
He must be coming home from work, I told myself. He was whistling softly
to himself, walking with his head down. I don’t think he saw us.
Tabby changed that. “Helllllp!” she screamed. “Sir—please! Help us!”
The man raised his head, startled. He squinted at us.
Tabby began running across the grass to him. The rest of us followed,
dragging our heavy trick-or-treat bags.
“Help us—please!” Tabby pleaded shrilly. “You’ve got to save us!”
The four of us hurtled breathlessly into the street. We surrounded the
startled man. He narrowed his eyes at us and scratched his brown, curly hair.
“What’s wrong, kids? Are you lost?” he asked.
“Monsters!” Lee exploded. “Headless jack-o’-lantern monsters! They’ve
captured us! They’re forcing us to trick-or-treat!”
The man started to laugh.
“No—it’s true!” Tabby insisted. “You’ve got to believe us! You’ve got to
help us!”
“Hurry!” Lee cried.
The man scratched his hair again. He squinted at us hard, studying our
faces.
“Hurry! Please hurry!” Lee wailed.
I stared back at the startled man.
Would he help us?
24
“You’ve got to help us!” Lee pleaded.
“Okay. I’ll go along with the joke,” the man said, rolling his eyes. “Where
are your monsters?”
“There!” I cried.
We all turned back to the front yard.
No one there. The pumpkin heads were gone.
Disappeared.
Tabby gasped. Lee’s mouth dropped open.
“Where did they go?” Walker murmured.
“They were standing right there!” Tabby insisted. “Both of them. Holding
their heads in their hands! Really!”
The man let out a long sigh. “You kids have a good Halloween,” he said
wearily. “But give me a break, okay? I just got off work, and I’m beat.”
He shifted his black lunch box to the other hand. Then we watched him
make his way up the driveway. He disappeared around the back of the house.
“Let’s get out of here!” Lee cried.
But before we could run, the two pumpkin heads leaped out from behind a
low hedge. The red flames hissed inside their heads. Their jagged mouths were
turned down in angry snarls.
“More houses,” they insisted, rasping the words together. “More houses.
You can’t stop trick-or-treating.”
“But we’re so tired!” Tabby protested. Her voice cracked. Again, I saw
tears wetting her eyes.
“Let us go—please!” Lee begged.
“More houses. More!”
“You can never stop! NEVER!”
“I can’t!” Lee cried. “My bag is full. Look!” He held out the bulging trickor-treat bag to the pumpkin heads. Candy bars spilled over the top.
“Mine is full, too!” Walker declared. “It’s filled to the top. I can’t squeeze
another piece of candy corn in it!”
“We have to go home!” Tabby cried. “Our bags are totally full.”
“That’s no problem,” one of the pumpkin heads replied.
“No problem?” Tabby wailed. “No problem?”
“Start eating,” the pumpkin head ordered.
“Huh?” We all gasped.
“Start eating,” he insisted. “Start eating.”
“Hey—no way!” Lee protested. “We’re not going to stand here and—”
The creatures appeared to rise up. Bright yellow flames shot out from their
eyes. A roar of hot wind escaped their jagged, snarling mouths. The wind burned
my face.
We all knew what would happen if we refused to do as they said. We’d end
up inside the flames.
Lee grabbed a chocolate bar from the top of his trick-or-treat bag. He tore
off the wrapper with a trembling hand. And he shoved the candy into his mouth.
We all started to eat candy. We had no choice.
I shoved a Hershey bar into my mouth and started to chew. I couldn’t even
taste it. A big gob stuck to my teeth. But I shoved in more and kept chewing.
“Faster! Faster!” the pumpkin heads ordered.
“Please—!” Tabby begged, with a mouthful of red licorice. “We can’t—”
“Faster! Eat! Eat!”
I shoved an entire bag of candy corn into my mouth and struggled to chew.
I saw Walker pawing through his bag, looking for something he could eat
quickly.
“Faster! Eat!” the fiery heads demanded, floating over us. “Eat! Eat!”
Lee choked down his fourth Musketeer bar. He grabbed a Milky Way and
started to unwrap it.
“I—I’m going to be sick!” Tabby declared.
“Faster! Faster!” came the raspy command.
“No. Really. I feel sick!” she cried.
“Eat more! Eat—faster!”
Lee started to choke. A gob of pink taffy shot out of his mouth. Tabby
slapped him on the back until he stopped coughing.
“More! Faster!” the pumpkin heads ordered.
“I—I can’t!” Lee cried in a hoarse whisper.
The creatures leaned over him, angry flames shooting from their eyes.
Lee grabbed a Crunch bar, tore off the wrapper, and bit into it.
All four of us huddled there on the curb, gobbling down candy. Chewing as
fast as we could. Forcing it down, then shoving in some more.
Trembling. Frightened. Feeling sick.
We had no idea that the biggest horror was still to come.
25
“I… can’t… eat… any more,” Tabby choked out.
We had been stuffing ourselves with candy for several minutes. Tabby had
chocolate running down her chin. And I saw chocolate stuck in the tangles of her
blond hair.
Lee was bent over on the grass. He held his stomach and groaned. “I don’t
feel so hot,” he murmured. He let out a long, loud burp. And groaned again.
“I never want to see another candy bar in my life,” Walker whispered to me.
I tried to reply. But my mouth was full.
“More houses!” one of the pumpkin heads ordered.
“More houses! More trick-or-treating!”
“No—please!” Tabby begged.
Bent over on the grass, Lee let out another long burp.
“It’s almost midnight!” Tabby protested. “We have to go home!”
“There are many houses to go,” a pumpkin head told her, narrowing its
fiery eyes. “Houses forever. Trick-or-treat forever!”
“But we feel sick!” Lee moaned, holding his stomach. “We can’t do any
more houses tonight!”
“Everyone has gone to sleep,” Walker told the pumpkin heads. “No one will
answer the door this late.”
“They WILL in this neighborhood!” the pumpkin head replied.
“No problem in THIS neighborhood,” the other creature agreed. “In this
neighborhood, you can trick-or-treat FOREVER!”
“But—but—but—” I sputtered.
I knew it was no use. The fiery creatures were going to force us to keep
going. They weren’t going to listen to our complaints.
And they weren’t going to let us go home.
“More houses! More! Trick-or-treat forever!”
Tabby helped Lee to his feet. She picked up his trick-or-treat bag and placed
it in his hand. Then she brushed her hair out of her face and picked up her own
bag.
The four of us trooped across the street, dragging the bags beside us. The
night air had grown cold and heavy. A strong breeze rattled the trees and sent
brown leaves scuttling past our feet.
“Our parents must be so worried,” Lee murmured. “It’s really late.”
“They should be worried!” Tabby declared in a trembling voice. “We may
never see them again.”
The porch light at the first house was still on. The pumpkin heads forced us
onto the porch.
“It’s too late to trick-or-treat,” Lee protested.
But we had no choice. I rang the bell.
We waited. Shivering. Feeling heavy and sick from all the candy we had
forced down.
Slowly, the front door opened.
And we all gasped in shock.
26
“Ohhh!” A low cry escaped Walker’s throat.
Lee jumped off the porch.
I stared at the creature in the yellow porch light. A woman. A woman with a
grinning jack-o’-lantern head.
“Trick or treat?” she asked, turning her jagged smile on us. Orange flames
danced and flickered inside her head.
“Uh—uh—uh—” Walker hopped off the porch and stumbled into Lee.
I stared at the grinning pumpkin head. This is a nightmare! I told myself. A
living nightmare!
The woman dropped some kind of candy into my bag. I didn’t even see
what it was. I couldn’t take my eyes off her pumpkin head.
“Are you—?” I started to ask.
But she closed the front door before I could get the words out.
“More houses!” the pumpkin heads commanded. “More trick-or-treating!”
We dragged ourselves to the next little house. The door swung open as we
climbed onto the front stoop.
And we stared at another pumpkin-head creature.
This one wore jeans and a maroon sweatshirt. The flames hissed and
crackled behind his eyes and mouth. Two wide, crooked teeth were carved into
his mouth—one on top, one below—giving him a silly expression.
But my friends and I were too terrified to laugh.
At the next house, we were greeted by two jack-o’-lantern creatures. We
crossed the street and found another fiery-headed creature waiting for us at the
next house.
Where are we? I wondered.
What is this strange neighborhood?
The two pumpkin heads forced us on to the next block. The houses here all
had jack-o’-lantern creatures living in them.
At the end of the block, Tabby set down her trick-or-treat bag and turned to
face the pumpkin heads. “Please—let us stop!” she begged. “Please!”
“We can’t do any more houses!” Lee exclaimed weakly. “I—I’m so tired.
And I really feel sick.”
“Please—?” Walker pleaded. “Please—?”
“I can’t do another house. I really can’t,” Tabby said, shaking her head.
“I’m so frightened. Those creatures… in every house…” She uttered a sob and
her voice trailed off.
Lee crossed his arms over the front of his striped costume. “I’m not taking
another step,” he insisted. “I don’t care what you do. I’m not moving.”
“Me neither,” Tabby agreed, stepping close beside him.
The two pumpkin heads didn’t reply. Instead, they rose up high in the air.
I took a step back as their triangle eyes bulged wide and their mouths
stretched open. Bright orange flames flew from their eyes.
And then their mouths stretched even wider. And they both let out high
wails. The shrill sound rose and fell through the heavy night air. Rose and fell,
like police sirens.
The pumpkin heads tilted back until their flames shot straight up to the sky.
And their siren wails grew louder. Louder. Until I had to hold my hands over my
ears.
I saw a flash of light. And turned to see another pumpkin head floating
toward us from across the street.
“Oh!” I uttered a hoarse cry as two more pumpkin-head creatures hurried
out of their houses.
And then two more. And another creature. And another.
All down the block, doors flew open.
Creatures floated out. Floated toward us. Hissing and wailing.
Flickering, dancing flames shot out from their jack-o’-lantern eyes and
mouths, sending orange light into the black sky. They floated and bobbed down
the street, across the dark lawns, wailing like sirens, hissing like snakes.
Closer. Closer.
Dozens of them. Dozens and dozens.
Walker, Tabby, Lee, and I pressed close together in the middle of the street
as the pumpkin-head creatures drew near.
They formed a circle around us. A circle of grinning, fiery jack-o’-lantern
faces over dark-robed bodies.
The circle of creatures spun around us slowly. And as they spun, their heads
bobbed and tilted on their shoulders.
Slowly, slowly, they spun around us. And then they began to chant in their
hoarse, crackly voices:
“Trick or treat! Trick or treat! Trick or treat!”
“What do they want?” Tabby cried. “What are they going to do?”
I didn’t have a chance to answer her.
Four creatures stepped quickly into the middle of the circle.
And when I saw what they carried in their hands, I started to scream.
27
“Trick or treat! Trick or treat! Trick or treat!”
My scream drowned out the chanting pumpkin heads.
And as the four creatures stepped forward, the chanting stopped. Their jacko’-lantern heads bobbed on their shoulders. Their ragged smiles grew wider as
they came near.
They held their hands waist high. In their hands, they each held a pumpkin
head.
Four extra pumpkin heads!
“Oh, no!” Lee cried out when he saw them.
Tabby grabbed Lee’s arm in terror. “What are they going to do with those
heads?”
Bright yellow flames flickered from the eyes and grinning mouths of the
four extra heads.
“These are for you!” a pumpkin head announced in a voice that sounded
like sharp pieces of gravel being rubbed together.
“Ohhh!” A low moan escaped my throat.
I stared at the empty heads, stared at their fiery eyes, their ugly grins.
“These are for you,” the pumpkin head repeated, stepping closer. “These
will be your new heads!”
“No! You can’t! You can’t!” Tabby screamed. “You—”
Her cry was cut off as one of the creatures raised a pumpkin head over her.
It had a hole cut in the bottom. The creature slammed the pumpkin head over
Tabby’s head.
Lee tried to run.
But a creature moved quickly to block his way—and then slammed a
pumpkin head onto Lee’s head.
I stumbled back, my mouth open in amazement.
Hands pressed helplessly against the sides of their pumpkin heads, Tabby
and Lee ran down the street. Ran blindly. Ran screaming. Screaming into the
darkness.
And then the creatures turned to Walker and me. And raised the empty
pumpkin heads high.
“Please—!” I begged. “Please—no!”
28
“Please—!” I cried. “Please don’t give me a pumpkin head!”
“Please—” Walker joined in.
And then we both burst out laughing.
The two creatures set the empty pumpkin heads down on the ground. And
then their own pumpkin heads started to change. The flames died out. The heads
began to shrink. And change shape.
A few seconds later, Shane and Shana had their own heads back.
And then all four of us started to laugh. We hugged each other and spun
around. We danced wildly, crazily, up and down the street. We tossed back our
heads and laughed at the moon and stars. Laughed till it hurt.
“It worked, guys!” I exclaimed when we finally stopped celebrating. “It
worked! It worked! We really scared Tabby and Lee this time!”
“They’ll be scared for the rest of their lives!”
Walker declared. He slapped Shane on the back. Then he danced another
happy dance, waving his hands gleefully above his head.
“We did it! We did it!” I chanted joyfully. “We really scared them! We
finally scared them!”
“That was so much fun!” Walker exclaimed. “And so easy!”
I stepped up to Shane and Shana and hugged them both. “Of course,” I
exclaimed, “it helps to have two aliens from another planet as friends!”
29
“Whoa! Take it easy!” Shane warned, lowering his voice. He glanced around
nervously.
“We don’t want any strangers to know that we’re not from Earth,” Shana
said.
“I know, I know!” I replied. “That’s why we didn’t use your weird powers
to scare Tabby and Lee before.”
“This year, we were desperate!” Walker declared.
“But we’ve got to be very careful,” Shana said.
Shane rose up and turned to all the other pumpkin-head creatures who still
circled us. “Thanks for your help, brothers and sisters!” Shane called to them.
“You’d better hurry home before anyone sees that we have invaded this whole
neighborhood!”
Waving and laughing, murmuring happily to each other, the other pumpkin
heads hurried back to their houses. In a few seconds, the street stood empty
again—except for us four friends.
We started walking down the middle of the street, making our way home.
Walker and I dragged our heavy trick-or-treat bags beside us.
Walker turned to Shane and Shana. A smile spread over his face. “When do
you think Tabby and Lee will discover they can just pull off their pumpkin
heads?” Walker asked.
“Maybe never!” Shana replied.
And we all started laughing all over again.
We didn’t stop until we reached the bottom of my driveway.
“Thanks again,” I told Shane and Shana. “You guys were great.”
“You were greater than great! You were awesome!” Walker declared. “A
couple of times, you even scared me! And I knew it was you!”
“And do you know what else is great about having aliens from another
planet as friends?” I said. “You two don’t eat candy.”
“That’s right,” Shane and Shana agreed.
“That means Walker and I get to keep it all!” I exclaimed, laughing.
I suddenly had a serious thought. I stopped laughing. “You know, I’ve never
seen you two eat,” I told the two aliens. “What do you eat?”
Shana reached out and pinched my arm. “You’re still really bony, Drew,”
she replied. “You’ll find out what Shane and I eat when you fill out a bit.”
“Yeah,” Shane chimed in. “People from our planet only like to eat very
plump adults. So you don’t have to worry for now.”
My mouth dropped open. “Hey—you’re kidding, right?” I demanded.
“Shane? Shana? You’re not serious—right? That’s a joke. Right? Right?”
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

VAMPIRE BREATH
Goosebumps - 49
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
“When a werewolf creeps up behind you at night, he steps so silently you can’t
hear a thing. You don’t know the werewolf is there until you feel his hot, sour
breath on the back of your neck.”
I leaned over and blew a big blast of hot air onto the back of Tyler Brown’s
neck. The kid’s eyes bulged out and he made a sick, choking sound.
I love baby-sitting for Tyler. He scares so easily.
“The werewolf’s breath freezes you so you can’t move,” I said in a whisper.
“You can’t run away. You can’t kick your legs or move your arms. That makes it
easy for the werewolf to rip your skin off.”
I sent another hot blast of werewolf breath onto Tyler’s neck. I could see
him shiver. He made a soft whimpering noise.
“Stop it, Freddy. You’re really scaring him!” my friend Cara Simonetti
scolded me. She flashed me a stern scowl from the chair across the room.
Tyler and I were on the couch. I sat real close to him so I could whisper and
scare him good.
“Freddy—he’s only six,” Cara reminded me. “Look at him. He’s shaking all
over.”
“He loves it,” I told her. I turned back to Tyler. “When you are out late at
night, and you feel the hot werewolf breath on the back of your neck—don’t turn
around,” I whispered. “Don’t turn around. Don’t let him know that you see him
—because that’s when he’ll attack!”
I shouted the word attack. And then I leaped on Tyler and began tickling
him with both hands as hard as I could.
He let out a shout. He was crying and laughing at the same time.
I tickled him until he couldn’t breathe. Then I stopped. I’m a very good
baby-sitter. I always know when to stop tickling.
Cara climbed to her feet. She grabbed me by the shoulders and tugged me
away from Tyler. “He’s only six, Freddy!” she repeated.
I grabbed Cara, wrestled her to the floor, and started tickling her. “The
werewolf attacks again!” I shouted. I tossed back my head in an evil laugh.
Wrestling with Cara is always a big mistake. She punched me in the
stomach, so hard I saw stars. Really. Red and yellow stars. I rolled away, gasping
for air.
Did you ever have the breath knocked out of you? It’s not a good feeling.
You really think you’ll never breathe again.
Making me see stars is Cara’s hobby. She does it all the time. She can do it
with one punch.
Cara is tough.
That’s why she’s my best friend. We’re both tough. When the going gets
tough, we never crumble!
Ask anyone. Freddy Martinez and Cara Simonetti. Two tough kids.
A lot of people think we’re brother and sister. I guess it’s because we look a
little alike. We’re both pretty big for twelve. She’s an inch taller, but I’m
catching up. We both have wavy black hair, dark eyes, and round faces.
We’ve been friends ever since I beat her up in fourth grade. She tells
everyone that she beat me up in fourth grade.
No way.
Want to know how tough we are? We like it when our teacher squeaks the
chalk against the chalkboard!
That’s tough.
Anyway, Tyler lives across the street from me. Whenever I baby-sit for him,
I call Cara, and she usually comes along. Tyler likes Cara better than me. She
always calms him down after I tell him stories to scare him to death.
“It’s a full moon tonight, Tyler,” I said, leaning close to him on the green
leather couch in his den.
“Did you look out the window? Did you see the full moon?”
Tyler shook his head. He scratched one side of his short, blond hair.
His blue eyes were wide. He was waiting for the rest of the werewolf story.
I leaned closer and lowered my voice. “When a werewolf steps out under
the full moon, hair starts to grow on his face,” I told him. “His teeth grow longer
and longer, and pointier. They don’t stop until they reach under his chin. Fur
covers his body like a wolf. And claws grow out from his fingers.”
I raked my fingernails down the front of Tyler’s T-shirt. He gasped.
“You’re really scaring him,” Cara warned. “He isn’t going to sleep at all
tonight.”
I ignored her. “And then the werewolf starts to walk,” I whispered, leaning
over Tyler. “The werewolf walks through the forest, searching for a victim.
Searching… hungry… walking… walking…”
I heard the footsteps in the living room. Heavy footsteps thudding over the
rug.
At first I thought I was imagining them.
But Tyler heard them, too.
“Walking… walking…” I whispered.
Tyler’s mouth dropped open.
The heavy footsteps thudded closer.
Cara turned in her chair to the doorway.
Tyler swallowed hard.
We all heard them now.
The heavy, thudding footsteps.
“A real one!” I shrieked. “It’s a real werewolf!”
All three of us screamed.
2
“Give me a break,” the werewolf said.
Of course it wasn’t a real werewolf. It was Tyler’s dad.
“What are the three of you doing?” Mr. Brown asked, pulling off his
overcoat. He had blond hair and blue eyes like Tyler.
“Scaring Tyler to death,” Cara told him.
He rolled his eyes. “Didn’t you do that last time?”
“We do it every time,” I replied. “Tyler loves it.” I patted the kid on the
back. “You love it—right?”
“I guess,” he said in a tiny voice.
Tyler’s mom stepped into the room, straightening her sweater. “Were you
telling werewolf stories to Tyler again, Freddy?” she demanded. “Last time, he
had nightmares all night.”
“No, I didn’t!” Tyler protested.
Mrs. Brown tsk-tsked. Mr. Brown handed Cara and me each a five-dollar
bill. “Thanks for baby-sitting. Do you want me to walk you home?”
“No way,” I replied. Did he think I was some kind of wimp? “It’s just
across the street.”
Cara and I said good night to the Browns. I didn’t really feel like going
home yet. So I walked Cara home. She lives on the next block.
The full moon shone down on us. It appeared to follow us as we walked,
floating low over the dark houses.
We laughed about my werewolf story. And we laughed about how scared it
made Tyler.
We didn’t know that it would be our turn to be scared next.
Really scared.
Saturday afternoon, Cara came over. We hurried down to my basement to play
air hockey.
A few years ago, my parents cleaned the basement up and turned it into a
great playroom. We have a full-sized pool table and a beautiful, old jukebox
down there. Mom and Dad filled the jukebox with old rock-and-roll records.
Last Christmas, they bought me an air hockey game. A big, table-sized one.
Cara and I have some major hockey battles. We spend hours slapping the
plastic puck back and forth at each other. We really get into it.
Our air hockey games usually end in wrestling matches. Just like real
hockey games on TV!
We leaned over the air hockey game and started to warm up, shoving the
puck slowly back and forth across the table. Not trying to score.
“Where are your parents?” Cara asked.
I shrugged. “Beats me.”
She narrowed her eyes at me. “You don’t know where they went? Didn’t
they leave you a note or something?”
I made a face at her. “They go out a lot.”
“Probably to get away from you!” Cara exclaimed. She laughed.
I had just come from karate class. I stepped around the hockey table and
made a few karate moves on her. One of my kicks accidentally landed on the
back of her ankle.
“Hey—!” she cried angrily. “Freddy—you jerk!”
When she bent over to rub her ankle, I shoved her into the wall. I meant it
as a joke.
I was just goofing. But I guess I don’t know my own strength.
She lost her balance and slammed hard into an antique china cabinet filled
with old dishes. The dishes rattled and shook. But nothing broke.
I laughed. I knew that Cara wasn’t really hurt.
I reached out to help pull her off the front of the cabinet. But she let out a
roar of attack—and came hurtling into me.
Her shoulder caught me in the chest. I uttered a hoarse choking sound.
Once again, I saw stars.
While I gasped for air, she grabbed the hockey puck off the game table. She
pulled her hand back to heave it at me.
But I wrapped my hand around hers and struggled to wrestle the puck away.
We were laughing. But this was a pretty serious fight.
Don’t get me wrong. Cara and I do this all the time. Especially when my
parents are out.
I pulled the puck from her hand—and it went flying across the room. With a
loud karate cry, I swung free of her.
We were both laughing so hard, we could barely move. But Cara took a
running start and plowed into me once again.
This time she sent me sailing back… back. I lost my balance. My hands
shot up as I crashed into the side of the tall china cabinet.
“Whooooa!”
I landed hard. My back smashed into the wooden cabinet’s side.
And the whole cabinet toppled over!
I heard the crash of broken plates.
A second later, I fell on top of the cabinet, sprawling helplessly on my back.
“Ohhhh.” My cry turned to a painful moan.
Then silence.
I just lay there on top of the fallen cabinet, like a turtle on its back. My
hands and legs thrashed the air. My whole body hurt.
“Uh-oh.”
That’s all I heard Cara say.
A simple “Uh-oh.”
And then she hurried over. She reached down, grabbed my hands, and
tugged me to my feet.
We both stepped away from the fallen cabinet.
“Sorry,” Cara murmured. “I didn’t mean to do that.”
“I know,” I said. I swallowed hard, rubbing my aching shoulder. “I think
we’re in major trouble.”
We both turned to check out the damage.
And we both cried out in surprise when we saw what the old wooden
cabinet had been hiding.
3
“A secret doorway!” I cried excitedly.
We stared at the door. It was made of smooth, dark wood. The doorknob
was covered with a thick layer of dust.
I had no idea there was a door back there. And I was pretty sure that Mom
and Dad didn’t know about it, either.
Cara and I stepped up to the doorway. I rubbed my hand over the doorknob,
wiping away some of the dust.
“Where does this lead?” Cara asked, smoothing her black hair back off her
face.
I shrugged. “Beats me. Maybe it’s a closet or something. Mom and Dad
never mentioned another room down here.”
I knocked on the door with my fist. “Anyone in there?” I called.
Cara laughed. “Wouldn’t you be surprised if someone answered you!” she
exclaimed.
I laughed, too. It was a pretty funny idea.
“Why would someone hide the door behind a cabinet?” Cara asked. “It
doesn’t make any sense.”
“Maybe there’s pirate treasure hidden back there,” I said. “Maybe there’s a
room filled with gold coins.”
Cara rolled her eyes. “That’s really lame,” she muttered. “Pirates in the
middle of Ohio?”
Cara turned the knob and tried to tug open the door.
I guess some kids would hesitate. Some kids probably wouldn’t be so eager
to pull open a mysterious, hidden door in their basement. Some kids might be a
little afraid.
But not Cara and me.
We’re not wimps. We don’t think about danger.
We’re tough.
The door didn’t open.
“Is it locked?” I asked her.
She shook her head. “No. The cabinet is blocking the way.”
The cabinet lay on its side in front of the door. We both grabbed hold of it.
Cara took the top. I took the bottom.
It was heavier than I thought. Mainly because of all the broken dishes
inside. But we pushed it and pulled it, and slid it away from the doorway.
“Okay,” Cara said, wiping her hands off on the legs of her jeans.
“Okay,” I repeated. “Let’s check it out.”
The doorknob felt cool in my hand. I turned it and pulled open the wooden
door.
The door moved slowly. It was heavy, and the rusted hinges made an eerie
squeeeeeeak squeeeeeeak as I strained to open it.
Then, standing close together, Cara and I leaned into the doorway and
peered inside.
4
I expected to find a room in there. A storage room or an old furnace room. Some
old houses—like my aunt Harriet’s—have coal rooms where coal was stored to
feed the furnace.
But that’s not what we saw.
Squinting into total darkness, I realized I was staring into a tunnel.
A dark tunnel.
I reached out and touched the wall. Stone. Cold stone. Cold and damp.
“We need flashlights,” Cara said softly.
I rubbed the cold, damp stone again. Then I turned to Cara. “You mean
we’re going into the tunnel?” I asked.
Silly question. Of course we were going into the tunnel. If you find a
hidden tunnel in your basement, what do you do?
You don’t stand around at the entrance and wonder about it. You explore it.
She followed me over to my dad’s workbench. I started pulling open
drawers, searching for flashlights.
“Where could that tunnel lead?” Cara asked, frowning thoughtfully.
“Maybe it goes to the house next door. Maybe it connects the two houses
together.”
“There is no house next door on that side,” I reminded her. “It’s an empty
lot. It’s been empty for as long as I’ve been living here.”
“Well, it has to lead somewhere,” she replied. “You can’t just have a tunnel
that goes nowhere.”
“Good thinking,” I replied sarcastically.
She shoved me.
I shoved her back.
Then I spotted a plastic flashlight at the bottom of a tool drawer. Cara and I
both grabbed for it at the same time. We had another battle, a short one this time.
I wrestled the flashlight away from her.
“What’s the big idea?” she demanded.
“I saw this one first,” I said. “Get your own.”
A few seconds later, she found another flashlight on a shelf above the
workbench. She tested it by shining it in my eyes till I screamed at her.
“Okay. Ready,” she said.
We hurried back to the door, our flashlight beams criss-crossing each other
over the basement floor. I stopped at the open door and shot the light into the
tunnel.
Cara’s light bounced off the stone walls. They were covered with a layer of
green moss. On the smooth stone floor, small puddles of water glimmered in the
darting rays of our flashlights.
“Damp in there,” I murmured. I took a step into the tunnel, moving my light
along the walls. The air instantly felt colder. I shivered, startled by the change in
temperature.
“Brrrr,” Cara agreed. “It’s like a freezer in here.”
I raised my light and aimed it straight ahead. “I can’t see where the tunnel
ends,” I said. “It could stretch on for miles and miles!”
“Only one way to find out,” Cara replied. She raised her light and blinded
me with it once again. “Ha-ha! Gotcha!”
“Not funny!” I protested. I beamed my light into her eyes. We had a short
flashlight battle. Neither of us won. Now we both had bright yellow spots in our
eyes.
I turned back into the tunnel. “Helllloooooooooo!” I shouted. My voice
echoed again and again. “Annnnnnybody hommmmmmmme?” I called.
Cara shoved me against the damp stone wall. “Shut up, Freddy. Why can’t
you get serious?”
“I am serious,” I told her. “Come on. Let’s go.” I bumped her with my
shoulder. I wanted to knock her into the wall. But her feet were planted hard. She
didn’t budge.
I lowered my light to the floor so we could see where we were walking.
Cara kept her light aimed straight ahead.
We made our way slowly, stepping around puddles. The air grew even
colder as we walked deeper into the passageway.
Our shoes made soft, scraping sounds. The sounds echoed eerily off the
stone walls. After about a minute, I turned back and glanced to the basement
doorway. It was a narrow rectangle of yellow light, very far away.
The tunnel curved, and the stone walls appeared to close in on us. I felt a
shiver of fear, but I shook it away.
Nothing to be afraid of, I told myself. It’s just an old, empty tunnel.
“This is so weird,” Cara murmured. “Where can it lead?”
“We must be under the empty lot next door,” I guessed. “But why would
someone build a tunnel under an empty lot?”
Cara raised the flashlight to my face. She grabbed my shoulder to stop me.
“Want to turn back?”
“Of course not,” I shot back.
“I don’t, either,” she said quickly. “I just wanted to see if you wanted to.”
Our lights played over the damp stone walls as we followed the curve of the
tunnel. We leaped over a wide puddle of water that covered the entire tunnel
floor.
Then the tunnel curved one more time. And a door came into view.
Another dark wood door.
Our flashlight beams slid up and down the door as we hurried up to it.
“Hello, in there!” I called. “Helllooooo!” I pounded on the door.
No reply.
I grabbed the doorknob.
Cara held me back again. “What if your parents get home?” she asked.
“They’ll be really worried. They won’t know where you are.”
“Well, if they come down to the basement, they’ll see the cabinet on the
floor,” I replied. “And they’ll see the open door that leads into the tunnel.
They’ll figure out what happened. And they’ll probably follow us in here.”
“Probably,” Cara agreed.
“We’ve got to see what’s on the other side of this door,” I said eagerly. I
turned the knob and pulled the door open. This door was heavy, too. And it
creaked eerily as it opened, just like the first door.
We raised our flashlights and sent our pale beams of light ahead of us.
“It’s a room!” I whispered. “A room at the end of the tunnel!”
Our lights danced over the smooth, dark walls. Bare walls.
We stepped side by side into the small, square room.
“What’s the big deal? It’s empty,” Cara said. “It’s just an empty room.”
“No, it isn’t,” I replied softly.
I aimed my flashlight at a large object on the floor in the middle of the
room.
We both stared straight ahead at it. Stared at it in silence.
“What is it?” Cara demanded finally.
“A coffin,” I replied.
5
I felt my heart skip a beat.
I wasn’t scared. But my body started to tingle all over. A cold tingling.
Excitement, I guess.
Cara and I both aimed our flashlight beams at the coffin in the middle of the
floor. The light circles bounced up and down over the dark wood. Our hands
were shaking.
“I’ve never seen a coffin before,” Cara murmured.
“Neither have I,” I confessed. “Except on TV.”
The light reflected off the polished wood. I saw brass handles at both ends
of the long box.
“What if there is a dead person inside it?” Cara asked in a tiny voice.
My heart leaped again. My skin tingled even colder.
“I don’t know,” I whispered. “Who would be buried in a secret room under
my house?”
I raised my light and swept it around the room. Four bare walls. Smooth
and gray. No windows.
No closet. The one and only door led back into the tunnel.
A hidden room at the end of a twisting tunnel. A coffin in a hidden,
underground room…
“I’m sure Mom and Dad don’t know anything about this,” I told Cara. I
took a deep breath and made my way closer to the coffin.
“Where are you going?” Cara demanded sharply. She hung back near the
open doorway.
“Let’s check it out,” I replied, ignoring my pounding heart. “Let’s take a
look inside.”
“Whoa!” Cara cried. “I… uh… I don’t think we should.”
I turned back to her. The light from my flashlight caught her face. I saw her
chin quiver. Her dark eyes narrowed at the coffin.
“You’re afraid?” I demanded. I couldn’t keep a grin from spreading over
my face. Cara afraid of something? This was a moment to remember!
“No way!” she insisted. “I’m not afraid. But I think maybe we should get
your parents.”
“Why?” I asked. “Why do we need my parents around to open up an old
coffin?”
I kept the light on her face. I saw her chin quiver again.
“Because you don’t just go around opening coffins,” she replied. She
crossed her arms tightly in front of her.
“Well… if you won’t help me, I’ll do it myself,” I declared. I turned to the
coffin and brushed my hand over the lid. The polished wood felt smooth and
cool.
“No—wait!” Cara cried. She hurried up beside me. “I’m not scared. But…
this could be a big mistake.”
“You’re scared,” I told her. “You’re scared big time.”
“I am not!” she insisted.
“I saw your chin tremble. Twice,” I told her.
“So?”
“So you’re scared.”
“No way.” She let out a disgusted sigh. “Here. I’ll prove it to you.”
She handed me her flashlight. Then she grabbed the coffin lid with both
hands and started to lift it open.
“Whoa. It’s really heavy,” she groaned. “Help me.”
A shiver ran down my back.
I shook it off and set the flashlights down on the floor. Then I placed both
hands on the coffin lid.
I leaned forward. Started to push up.
Cara and I both pushed with all our strength.
The heavy wooden lid didn’t budge at first.
But then I heard a creaking sound as it started to lift.
Slowly, slowly, it raised up in our hands.
Leaning over the open coffin, we pushed it, pushed it, until it stood straight
up and came to a rest.
We let go of the lid.
I shut my eyes. I didn’t really want to look inside.
But I had to.
I squinted down into the open coffin.
Too dark. I couldn’t see a thing.
Good, I told myself. I let out a sigh of relief.
But then Cara bent down and picked up the flashlights from the floor. She
slipped mine into my hand.
We aimed our lights into the coffin and stared inside.
6
The coffin was lined in purple velvet. The velvet glowed under the light from
our flashlights. We swept our flashlights up and down the inside of the coffin.
“It—it’s empty!” Cara stammered.
“No, it isn’t,” I replied.
My light locked on an object at the foot of the coffin. A spot of blue against
the purple velvet.
As I moved closer, it came into focus.
A bottle. A blue glass bottle.
“Weird!” Cara exclaimed. Now she saw it, too.
“Yes. Totally weird,” I agreed.
We both moved to the foot of the coffin to see it better. I pressed against the
side of the coffin as I leaned close to the bottle. My hands felt frozen now.
Cara reached past me and picked up the bottle. She held it in the white
beam of light from my flashlight, and we both studied it carefully.
The bottle was round and dark blue. It fit easily in Cara’s hand. The glass
was smooth. The bottle was closed by a blue glass stopper.
Cara shook it. “It’s empty,” she said softly.
“An empty bottle inside a coffin? Definitely weird!” I cried. “Who could
have left it here?”
“Hey—there’s a label.” Cara pointed to a tiny square of paper glued to the
glass. “Can you read it?” she asked. She raised the blue bottle to my face.
The tiny label had faded, old-fashioned-looking letters on it. I squinted
hard.
The words had been rubbed until they were little more than smudges.
I held my light steady and finally managed to make out the words:
“VAMPIRE BREATH.”
“Huh?” Cara’s mouth opened in shock. “Did you say Vampire Breath?”
I nodded. “That’s what it says.”
“But what could that be?” she asked. “What is Vampire Breath?”
“Beats me,” I replied, staring into the bottle. “I’ve never seen it advertised
on TV!”
Cara didn’t laugh at my joke.
She turned the bottle in her hands. She was looking for more information.
But the label had only two words printed on it: “VAMPIRE BREATH”.
I turned my light back into the coffin to see if we had missed anything
inside it. I swept the light back and forth. Then I leaned over the side and rubbed
my hand over the purple velvet. It felt smooth and soft.
When I looked back at Cara, she had tucked her flashlight under her arm.
And she was twisting the glass stopper on top of the bottle.
“Hey—what are you doing?” I cried.
“Opening it,” she replied. “But the top is stuck and I can’t seem to—”
“No—!” I shouted. “Stop!”
Her dark eyes flashed. She locked them on mine. “Scared, Freddy?”
“Yes. I mean—no!” I stammered. “I—uh—I agree with you, Cara. We
should wait for my parents to get home. We should show this to them. We can’t
just go around opening coffins and taking out bottles and—”
I gasped as she tugged at the stopper.
I wasn’t afraid or anything. I just didn’t want to do anything stupid.
“Give me that!” I shouted. I grabbed for the bottle.
“No way!” She swung around to keep me from getting it.
And the bottle fell out of her hand.
We both watched it hit the floor.
It landed on its side. Bounced once. Didn’t break.
But the glass top popped off. Cara and I both stared down at the bottle. Not
breathing. Waiting. Wondering what would happen.
7
Ssssssssssssssss.
It took me a few seconds to figure out what was making that hissing sound.
Then I saw a smoky green mist shooting up from the bottle.
The thick mist rose up like a geyser, chilly and wet. I felt it float against my
face.
“Ohhhh.” I groaned when its sour smell reached my nose.
I staggered back, choking. I started to gag.
I thrashed both hands wildly, trying to brush the mist away.
“Yuck!” Cara cried, making a sick face. She pressed her fingers over her
nose. “It stinks!”
The sickening fog swept around us. In seconds, the mist billowed all over
the room.
“I—I can’t breathe!” I gasped.
I couldn’t see, either. The fog blocked the light from our flashlights!
“Ohhh,” Cara groaned. “It smells so bad!” My eyes burned. I could taste
the sour fog on my tongue. I felt sick. My stomach gurgled. My throat tightened.
I’ve got to plug up the bottle, I decided. If I close the bottle, this disgusting
mist will stop spurting up.
I dropped to my knees and my flashlight clattered to the floor. I felt blindly
along the floor till I found the bottle. Then I swept my other hand in a circle till
my fingers curled around the stopper.
Struggling not to gag, I shoved the stopper into the top of the bottle.
I jumped to my feet and held the bottle up so that Cara could see that I
closed it.
She didn’t see me. She had both hands over her face. Her shoulders were
heaving up and down.
As I set the bottle down, I started to gag. I swallowed hard. Again. Again. I
couldn’t get the disgusting taste from my mouth.
The sour fog swirled around us for a few seconds more. Then it lowered
itself to the floor, fading away.
“Cara—?” I finally choked out. “Cara—are you okay?”
She slowly lowered her hands from her face. She blinked several times,
then turned to me. “Yuck,” she murmured. “It was so gross! Why did you grab
the bottle like that? That was all your fault.”
“Huh?” I gasped. “My fault? My fault?”
She nodded. “Yes. If you hadn’t grabbed at the bottle, I never would have
dropped it. And—”
“But you’re the one who wanted to open it!” I shrieked. “Remember? You
were pulling off the top!”
“Oh.” She remembered.
She brushed at her sweater and jeans with both hands. She tried to wipe the
awful smell away. “Freddy, let’s get out of here,” she demanded.
“Yeah. Let’s go.” For once we agreed on something.
I followed her to the door. Halfway across the room, I turned back.
Gazed at the coffin.
And gasped.
“Cara—look!” I whispered.
Someone was lying in the coffin.
8
Cara screamed. She grabbed my arm and squeezed it so hard, I cried out.
We huddled together in the doorway, staring back into the dark room.
Staring at the pale form in the coffin.
“Are you scared?” Cara whispered.
“Who—me?” I choked out.
I had to show her I wasn’t scared. I took a step toward the coffin. Then
another. She stayed close by my side. The beams of light from our flashlights
darted shakily ahead of us.
My heart started to pound. My mouth suddenly felt dry. It was impossible
to hold the flashlight steady.
“It’s an old man,” I whispered.
“But how did he get there?” Cara whispered back. “He wasn’t there a
second ago.” She squeezed my arm again.
But I didn’t really feel the pain. I was too excited, too amazed, too confused
to feel anything.
How did he get there?
Who was he?
“Is he dead?” Cara asked.
I didn’t answer. I crept up to the coffin and shone my light in.
The man was old and completely bald. His skin stretched tight against his
skull, smooth as a lightbulb.
His eyes were shut. His lips were as pale as his skin, drawn tightly together.
He had tiny, white hands. Thin as bones. They were crossed over his chest.
He was dressed in a black tuxedo. Very old-fashioned-looking. The stiff
collar of his white shirt pressed up against his pale cheeks. His shiny black shoes
were buttoned instead of laced.
“Is he dead?” Cara repeated.
“I guess so,” I choked out. I had never seen a dead person before.
Again, I felt Cara’s hand on my arm. “Let’s go,” she whispered. “Let’s get
out of here!”
“Okay.”
I wanted to leave. I wanted to get away from there as fast as I could.
But something held me there. Something froze me in place, staring at the
pale, old face. At the old man lying so still, so silent in the purple coffin.
And as I stared, the old man opened his eyes.
Blinked.
And started to sit up.
9
I gasped and stumbled backward. If I hadn’t hit the wall, I think I would have
fallen over.
The flashlight fell from my hand. It clattered loudly to the floor.
The sound made the old man turn in our direction.
In the trembling beam from Cara’s flashlight, he blinked several times.
Then his tiny pale hands rubbed his eyes, as if rubbing the sleep from them.
He groaned softly. And tried to focus on us, squinting and rubbing his eyes.
My heart pounded so hard I thought it was about to explode through my
shirt. My temples throbbed, and I let out sharp, wheezing breaths.
“I—I—” Cara stammered. I could see her whole body shaking as she stood
in front of me, training the light on the old man in the coffin.
“Where am I?” the old man croaked. He shook his head. He appeared
dazed. “Where am I? What am I doing here?” He squinted in the flashlight
beam.
His pale, bald head glowed in the light. Even his eyes were pale, sort of
silvery.
He licked his white lips. His mouth made a dry, smacking sound.
“I’m so thirsty,” he moaned in a hoarse whisper. “I’m so terribly—thirsty.”
He sat up slowly, with a loud groan. As he pulled himself up, I saw that he
wore a cape, a silky, purple cape that matched the purple of the coffin.
He licked his pale lips again. “So thirsty…”
And then he saw Cara and me.
He blinked again. And squinted at us. “Where am I?” he asked, staring hard
at me with those eerie, silver eyes. “What room is this?”
“It’s my house,” I replied. But the words tumbled out in a weak whisper.
“So thirsty…” he murmured again. Groaning and muttering to himself, he
lifted one leg over the coffin, then the other.
He slid out onto the floor. He didn’t make a sound when he landed. He
seemed so light, as if he didn’t weigh anything at all.
A chill of fear froze the back of my neck. I tried to back up. But I was
already pressed against the wall.
I glanced to the open doorway. It seemed a hundred miles away.
The old man licked his dry lips. Still squinting hard, he took a step toward
Cara and me. He smoothed his cape with both hands as he walked.
“Who—are—you?” Cara managed to choke out.
“How did you get here?” I cried, finding my voice. “What are you doing in
my basement? How did you get in that coffin?” The questions burst out of me.
“Who are you?”
He stopped and scratched his bald head. For a moment, he appeared to be
struggling to remember who he was.
Then he replied, “I am Count Nightwing.” He nodded, as if reminding
himself. “Yes. I am Count Nightwing.”
Cara and I both uttered gasps. Then we started talking at the same time.
“How did you get here?”
“What do you want?”
“Are you—are you—a vampire?”
He covered his ears with his hands. He shut his eyes. “The noise…” he
complained. “Please, speak softly. I’ve been asleep for so long.”
“Are you a vampire?” I asked softly.
“Yes. A vampire. Count Nightwing.” He nodded. And opened his eyes. He
gazed at Cara, then at me, as if seeing us for the first time.
“Yessss,” he hissed. He raised his arms and began to move toward us.
“And I’m so thirsty. So very thirsty. I’ve been asleep for so long. And now
I’m thirsty. And I must drink now.”
10
The count raised his arms and gripped the purple cape. The cape spread out
behind him like wings, and he rose up into the air.
“So thirsty…” he murmured, licking his dry lips. “So thirsty.” His silvery
eyes locked onto Cara, as if trying to hypnotize her and hold her in place.
I was never so frightened in all my life. I admit it.
I don’t scare easily. And neither does Cara.
We’ve watched a hundred vampire movies on TV. We laugh at them. We
think the idea of a guy with fangs who flies around drinking human blood is
funny.
We have never been the least bit scared.
But that was movies. This was real life!
We had just watched this guy—who called himself Count Nightwing—rise
up from a coffin. A coffin practically in my basement!
And now, he had his arms spread out and he was floating across the room
toward us. Muttering about how thirsty he was. Narrowing his weird, frightening
eyes at Cara’s throat!
So, yes—I admit I was scared. But not too scared to move.
“Hey—!” I gasped and grabbed Cara’s arm. “Come on!” I cried. “Let’s go!”
She didn’t budge.
“Cara—come on!” I screamed, tugging her.
She stared up at the pale face of the vampire.
She didn’t move. She didn’t blink.
I grabbed her arm with both hands. I tried to drag her away. But she stood
rooted to the floor. As frozen as a statue.
“So thirsty…” the old man croaked. “I must drink now!”
“Cara—snap out of it!” I cried. “Snap out of it! Please!”
I pulled with all my strength—and dragged her to the door.
As we reached the tunnel, Cara blinked and shook her head. Letting out a
startled cry, she tugged her arm free and started to run.
We both burst out of the little room and ran through the curving tunnel. Our
shoes clapped loudly on the hard stone floor. The noise echoed off the walls. It
sounded as if a thousand kids were running from the vampire!
My legs felt rubbery and weak. But I forced myself to run.
We ran through the dark tunnel, following the curve of the stone walls. Cara
leaned forward, her arms stretched in front of her as she ran.
She gripped the flashlight tightly in one hand. The light bounced all over.
But we didn’t need it. We knew where we were running.
Cara is a very fast runner—faster than me. As we turned again, her long
legs were pumping hard, and she was pretty far ahead of me.
I glanced back.
Was the vampire following us?
Yes.
He was close behind, floating near the ceiling, his cape flapping behind
him.
“Cara—wait up!” I called breathlessly.
A yellow rectangle of light came into view up ahead.
The door! The door to my basement!
If we can just get to the door, I thought.
If we can get to my basement, we can slam the door behind us. And trap
Count Nightwing in the tunnel.
If we can get to the basement, we’ll be safe.
Mom and Dad must be home by now, I decided. Please be home! Please!
Up ahead, the rectangle of light from the open doorway grew larger.
Cara was running hard, uttering a low gasp with each step. I was several
feet behind her now. Running as fast as I could. Struggling to catch up.
I didn’t turn around. But I could hear the flap of the vampire’s cape close
behind me.
Cara had nearly reached the door.
Go, Cara, go! I thought. My chest felt about to burst. But I ran harder,
desperate to catch up. To reach the door. To leap into the basement to safety.
“Ohhhh!” I cried out as I saw the rectangle of light start to grow smaller.
“The door—it’s closing!” I shrieked.
“Nooooooo!” Cara and I both wailed.
The door slammed shut with a crash.
Cara couldn’t stop in time. She hit the door. And bounced off, stunned.
I grabbed her by the shoulders to steady her. “Are you okay?”
She didn’t answer. Her eyes went to the closed door. She grabbed for the
doorknob.
“Freddy—” she murmured. “Look!”
No doorknob! There was no knob on this side of the door.
With a frantic cry, I lowered my shoulder to the wooden door—and heaved
my body against it. Again. Again.
Nothing happened.
My shoulder throbbed with pain. But the door didn’t budge.
“Help!” I shouted. “Somebody—help! Let us out!”
Too late.
Count Nightwing had us trapped.
He landed silently, his cape lowering around him. A thin smile spread over
his pale face. His silvery eyes opened wide with excitement. His tongue darted
back and forth over his caked, dry lips.
“Run past him,” Cara whispered in my ear. “Run back into the tunnel.
Maybe we can keep him chasing after us and wear him out.”
But the vampire raised his cape to block our way.
Could he read our minds?
Holding his cape high, he stepped up to Cara. “So thirsty…” he murmured.
“So thirsty.”
Then he lowered his face to Cara’s throat.
11
“Let her go! Let her go!” I screamed.
I grasped at his waist, desperate to pull him away.
But I grabbed only cape.
“Let her go! Stop!” I pleaded, tugging on the cape.
I couldn’t see Cara at all. I could see only the vampire’s cape and shoulders
as he lowered his head to drink her blood.
“Please—!” I begged. “I’ll get you something else to drink! Please—let
Cara go!”
To my surprise, Count Nightwing raised his head. He stood up straight and
took a step back from Cara.
Cara raised her hand to her throat. She rubbed her neck. Her eyes were wide
with fear, and her chin was quivering.
“Something is wrong,” Count Nightwing said, shaking his head. He
frowned. “Something is terribly wrong.”
I turned to Cara. “Did he bite you?” I choked out.
Cara rubbed her neck. “No,” she whispered.
“Something is wrong,” the vampire repeated softly. He raised a hand to his
mouth.
I watched him open his mouth and stick a finger inside. He shut his eyes
and poked around in there.
“My fangs!” he cried finally. His strange eyes bulged and his mouth
dropped open. “My fangs! They’re gone!”
He turned away and started examining his mouth again.
I saw my chance. I pounded on the door to the basement with both fists.
“Mom! Dad! Can you hear me?” I shouted.
Count Nightwing paid no attention to me. I heard him moan behind me.
“My beautiful fangs!” he cried. “Gone. Gone. I’ll starve to death without my
fangs!”
He opened his mouth wide, showing Cara and me. He had no fangs. No
teeth at all. Only gums.
“We’re safe!” I whispered to Cara.
He’s too old and weak to hurt us, I told myself. Without his fangs, the old
vampire can’t harm us.
“We’re safe! We’re safe!” I cried.
How wrong could a person be?
12
The old vampire poked a finger around in his mouth, shaking his head sadly the
whole while. Finally, he sighed and dropped his hands to his sides.
“Doomed,” he whispered. “Doomed. Unless…”
“Sorry we can’t help you,” I said. “Now, will you open the door and let me
back in my house?”
Count Nightwing rubbed his chin. He shut his eyes, thinking hard.
“Yes. Let us out!” Cara insisted. “We can’t help you. So—”
The old vampire’s eyes shot open. “But you can help me!” he declared.
“You will help me!”
I took a deep breath. “No. We won’t,” I told him. “Let us go—now.”
He floated up over us. He moved his gaze from Cara to me. His silvery eyes
suddenly appeared cold, icy. “You will help me,” he said softly. “Both of you. If
you ever hope to return to your homes again.”
I shivered. The tunnel suddenly felt so cold, as if a freezing wind was
blowing through it.
I glanced at the door. So close, I thought. We’re so close to being safe and
sound in my house.
On the other side of the door we would be out of danger. But we can’t get
there. We can’t. We could be a thousand miles away.
I turned back to the icy stare of the old vampire.
He’s evil, I realized. Even without his fangs, he is evil.
“Wh-what do we have to do?” Cara stammered.
“Yes. What can we do?” I repeated.
He lowered himself to the floor. His expression softened.
“The bottle of Vampire Breath,” he said. “Did you see it?”
“Yes,” I replied. “We found it. In your coffin.”
“Do you have it?” he demanded eagerly. He reached out a hand. “Do you
have it? Give it to me.”
“No,” Cara and I answered together.
“We didn’t take it,” I told him. “I think I left it on the floor.”
“We—we dropped it,” Cara stammered.
The old vampire gasped. “You what? Did you break it? Did you spill the
Vampire Breath?”
“It—it poured out,” I replied. “The room filled with smoke. We put the cap
back on. But—”
“We must find it!” Count Nightwing declared. “I must have that bottle. If
there is a little bit of Vampire Breath left in the bottle, it will take me back to my
time.”
“Your time?” I asked.
He squinted at me. “Your clothing. Your hair. You two are not of my time,”
he said. “What year is this?”
I told him.
His mouth dropped open. A startled squeak escaped his throat. “I have been
asleep for over a hundred years!” he exclaimed. “I must find the Vampire Breath.
It will take me back in time. Back to when I had my fangs.”
I stared hard at him, trying to understand what he was telling us. “Does that
mean you will go away?” I asked. “If there is Vampire Breath left in the bottle,
you will go back a hundred years?”
The old vampire nodded. “Yessss,” he hissed. “I will go back to my time.”
But then his eyes turned cold again, “If there is any of the precious Vampire
Breath left,” he said bitterly. “If you didn’t spill it all.”
“There’s got to be some left!” I cried.
Cara and I followed Count Nightwing back through the tunnel. He floated
silently ahead of us, his cape fluttering behind him. “So thirsty…” he kept
muttering. “So terribly thirsty.”
“I can’t believe we’re going back into that room,” I whispered to Cara as
we jogged over the smooth stone floor. “I can’t believe we’re going to help a
vampire!”
“We have no choice,” she replied. “We want to get rid of him—don’t we?”
My shoes splashed through a puddle on the floor. I felt cold water on my
ankles. The tunnel curved, and we followed it. Into the small, square room.
Count Nightwing stepped up to his coffin, then turned back to us. “Where is
the bottle?” he demanded.
I picked up my flashlight from the floor. I clicked it. Once. Twice. No light.
It must have broken when I dropped it. I set it back down on the floor.
“The bottle,” the old vampire repeated. “I must have it.”
“I think Freddy dropped it into the coffin,” Cara told him. She stepped to
the center of the room and flashed her light up and down the purple velvet of the
coffin.
“No. It is not there,” Count Nightwing said impatiently. “Where is it? You
must find it. You have no idea how thirsty I am. It’s been at least one hundred
years!”
He’s a good sleeper! I thought.
“It must be somewhere on the floor,” Cara told him.
“Well, find it! Find it!” the vampire shrieked.
Cara and I began to search the floor. I walked beside her since she had the
only light.
She swept the flashlight up and down the bare floors. No sign of the blue
bottle.
“Where is it?” I whispered. “Where?”
“It shouldn’t be so hard to find in an empty room!” Cara declared.
“Do you think maybe it rolled out into the tunnel?” I suggested.
Cara bit her bottom lip. “I don’t think so.” She raised her eyes from the
floor and gazed at me. “We didn’t break it—did we?”
“No. When I put the cap back on it, I set it down somewhere,” I replied.
I glanced up to see the vampire glaring at us angrily. “I’m losing my
patience,” he warned. He licked his dry lips. His icy eyes moved from me to
Cara.
“There it is!” Cara cried. Her beam of light froze at the base of the coffin.
The blue bottle lay there on its side.
I charged across the room, bent quickly, and picked up the Vampire Breath.
Count Nightwing’s eyes flashed in excitement. A pale smile spread over his
face. “Open it—now!” he ordered. “Open it, and I will be gone. Back to my
time. Back to my beautiful castle. Good-bye, children. Good-bye. Open it!
Quickly!”
My hands trembled. I gripped the blue bottle tightly in my left hand. I
lowered my right hand to the glass stopper on top of the bottle.
I grabbed the stopper—and pulled it off the bottle.
And waited.
And waited.
Nothing happened.
13
And then I heard a whoosh.
I nearly dropped the bottle as a green mist sprayed up through the top.
“Yessss!” I cried happily. The bottle wasn’t empty!
The sickening odor made me gasp, then hold my breath. But I didn’t care
about the smell.
I watched the fog thicken, thicken until I couldn’t see the coffin in the
middle of the room. Couldn’t see Cara. Couldn’t see the old vampire.
The dark mist billowed and swirled.
I wanted to cheer and jump up and down. Because I knew that Count
Nightwing would disappear into the fog. And we would be safe. We would never
see him again.
“Cara—are you okay?” I called. My voice sounded hollow, muffled by the
swirling fog.
“It stinks!” she choked out.
“Hold your breath,” I told her. “The last time, it faded away in a few
seconds.”
“It’s soooo disgusting!” she wailed.
Cara was standing close beside me. But I couldn’t see her in the waves of
mist.
So damp and cold. I suddenly felt as if I were standing under water.
Standing under the ocean as wave after wave rolled over me.
I held my breath as long as I could. When my chest started to burn, I let it
out in a long whoosh.
I shut my eyes and prayed. Prayed for the fog to fade, for the mist to lower
to the floor and disappear, as it had before.
Please, please—I thought. Don’t let Cara and me drown in this disgusting
mist.
A few seconds later, I opened my eyes.
Darkness all around.
I blinked several times. A square of pale yellow light glowed in the
distance.
Moonlight pouring in through a window.
Window? There is no window in this room! I told myself.
I turned and saw Cara. She was swallowing hard, her eyes wide, glancing
nervously around the room. “He—he’s gone,” she murmured. “Freddy—the
vampire is gone.”
I squinted into the dim light. “But where are we?” I whispered. I pointed to
the open window far away, at the other end of the room. “There was no window
before.”
Cara chewed her bottom lip. “We’re not in the same room,” she said softly.
“This room is so big and—” She stopped.
“Coffins!” I cried.
As my eyes adjusted to the light, the low, solid shapes formed out of the
shadows. And I realized I was staring at two long, straight rows of coffins.
“Where are we?” Cara cried, unable to hide the fear in her voice. “It must
be some sort of graveyard or something!”
“But we’re indoors,” I said. “We’re not in a graveyard. We’re in a room. A
very long room.”
I gazed up to the high ceilings. Two glass chandeliers hung down, their
crystals gleaming dully in the pale moonlight.
The dark walls were covered with huge paintings. Even in the dim light, I
could see that they were portraits, portraits of stern-faced men and women in
formal, old-fashioned, black clothes.
I turned back to the rows of coffins—and silently started to count them.
“There must be two dozen coffins in this room!” I whispered to Cara.
“All lined up so perfectly in two straight rows,” she added. “Freddy, do you
think—?”
“He took us with him,” I murmured.
“Huh?” Cara chewed her lip.
“Count Nightwing. He took us with him,” I repeated. “He was supposed to
go back to his castle—by himself. He said he would go and never see us again.
But he took us with him, Cara. I’m sure he did.”
Cara stared straight ahead at the rows of coffins. “But he can’t do that!” she
cried. “He can’t!”
I started to reply. But a sound made me stop.
A creaking sound.
I felt a chill sweep down my back as I heard another creaking, closer this
time.
Cara grabbed my arm. She heard it too. “Freddy—look!” she whispered.
I squinted into the dim light. “The coffins—!” I whispered.
They were all creaking open.
14
The coffin lids raised up slowly. I could see pale hands pushing them up from
inside. Creaking, the lids swung open, then stopped.
Cara and I huddled together, unable to move. Unable to take our eyes off
the terrifying sight.
I heard low moans and groans as the vampires sat up. Bony hands gripped
the sides of the coffins. I heard coughing. Dry throats being cleared.
The vampires pulled themselves up slowly. Their faces were yellow in the
moonlight. Their eyes gleamed dully, a pale silver.
“Ohhhhhhh.” Groans echoed off the high walls. Bones creaked and cracked.
They looked so old. Older than the oldest people you see on the street.
Their skin appeared so thin and was wrapped so tight, you could see the bones
underneath.
Living skeletons, I thought. Their ancient bones snapped as they moved.
“Ohhhhhh.” They pulled themselves up. Legs, thin as spider legs, reached
over the coffin sides.
Cara and I finally moved. We backed into the deep shadows against the
wall.
I heard more coughing. Near the window, a white-haired vampire leaned
over the edge of his coffin, making ugly choking sounds.
“So thirsty…” I heard one of them whisper.
“So thirsty… so thirsty…” others repeated.
They lowered themselves from their coffins, stretching and groaning.
“So thirsty… so thirsty…” they chanted. Their voices were dry and raspy,
as if their throats were sore, as if their voices were only air.
They were all dressed in black. Formal black suits. White shirt collars stiff
and high over their chins. Some of them wore long, shiny capes. They adjusted
their capes with bony, white fingers, sweeping them back over bent, skinny
shoulders.
“So thirsty… so thirsty…” Their silver eyes glowed brighter as they began
to wake up.
And then, standing in the aisle between the two rows of coffins, they began
to flap their bony arms. Slowly at first. Their arms creaked as they pulled them
up, then down.
The silver eyes glowed in the pale, old faces.
Up, then down. Up, then down. They flapped their arms faster, groaning
and grunting. The sound echoed off the walls and the high ceiling.
Flapping faster now. Flapping. Flapping.
And as Cara and I gaped in amazement, the sickly, groaning old men began
to shrink. The flapping arms became the flutter of black wings. The red eyes
glowed from rodent-like faces.
In seconds, they shrank and transformed. They all became fluttering, black
bats.
And turned their red eyes to Cara and me.
15
Did they see us?
Could they see us in the deep darkness, our backs pressed against the stone
wall?
The bats fluttered up over the open coffins. Their flapping wings glistened,
silvery in the moonlight.
I heard a rattling, like the warning sound of a snake. But the rattling quickly
became a hiss.
The bats opened their mouths, revealing pointed yellow fangs—and hissed.
What a sound! A shrill, angry whistle that rose higher, higher, until it drowned
out the patter of their fluttering wings.
A hiss of attack.
They were awake and ready now. Ready to swoop at me, to knock me to the
floor, to dig those pointed fangs deep into my skin. And drink… drink…
“Freddy—!” Cara cried. She raised her hands in front of her to shield her
face. “Freddy—!”
The shrill hissing surrounded me. Seemed to be coming from inside my
head. I covered my ears, trying to shut it out.
Covered my ears. Watched their red, glowing eyes—and waited for the
attack.
But to my shock, the hissing bats didn’t swoop toward us.
They fluttered up, up. Turned. And flapped in a line out the open window at
the other end of the room.
My mouth hung open. I realized I had stopped breathing.
I watched them fade into the moonlight, shiny wings fluttering rapidly, the
shrill hissing fading with them.
Then I took a deep breath and slowly let it out. “Cara,” I whispered. “We’re
okay. They didn’t see us back here.”
She nodded but didn’t reply. A thick strand of her black hair had become
matted to her forehead. She brushed it back with a trembling hand.
“Wow,” she murmured, shaking her head. “Wow.”
“We’re okay,” I repeated. My eyes checked out the long room. The open
coffins stretched to the window. Their dark wood gleamed in the moonlight.
Their long shadows crept along the floor.
“We’re okay now,” I repeated to Cara. “We’re all alone.”
Footsteps behind us made us both cry out.
I heard a throat being cleared.
I spun around so hard, I nearly toppled over.
Count Nightwing strode into the room carrying a flaming torch. The
torchlight flickered over his smooth face. His silvery eyes were wide with
surprise.
“What are you two doing here?” he demanded.
I opened my mouth to reply. But a sputtering, choking sound was all I could
force out.
“You do not belong here,” the old vampire boomed. He waved the fiery
torch in front of him. It left a trail of orange light as he swung it. “You have no
right to be here. This is my time. And this is my castle.”
He floated off the floor. His eyes suddenly glowed as brightly as the torch
flame. “You do not belong here!” he repeated menacingly.
“But—but—” I stammered, frightened and angry and confused—all at the
same time.
“But you brought us here!” Cara protested angrily. She waved her finger at
him, accusing him. “We didn’t follow you!”
“She’s right!” I finally found my voice. “You promised us you would go
away and leave us alone. But you brought us back to your castle with you.”
Still floating a few feet above the floor, Count Nightwing held the torch in
one hand and rubbed his frail-looking chin with the other. “Hmmmmmm,” he
murmured. His eyes glowed at us. “Hmmmmm.”
“You have to send us home,” Cara told him, pressing her hands against her
waist.
“Yes!” I agreed. “Send us home—now.”
Count Nightwing lowered himself silently to the floor. In the flickering
torchlight, he suddenly looked weary. The light in his eyes dulled. He sighed.
“Just send us home,” Cara insisted. “We won’t tell anyone we saw you.
We’ll forget this whole thing happened.”
The old vampire brushed back his cape. He shook his head. “I can’t send
you home,” he whispered.
“Why not?” I demanded.
He sighed again. “I don’t know how.”
“Huh?” Cara and I both gasped.
“I don’t know how to send you home,” Count Nightwing repeated. “I’m a
vampire—not a magician.”
“But—but—but—” I started sputtering again. My whole body shook in
total panic.
“Then what are we going to do?” Cara demanded shrilly.
The old vampire shrugged again. “It’s really no problem,” he replied softly.
“No problem at all. As soon as I find my fangs, I’ll drink your blood. And I’ll
turn you both into vampires.”
16
“But we want to go home!” I screamed.
“We don’t want to be vampires!” Cara wailed. “This isn’t fair! We helped
you. Now you have to help us!”
The old vampire didn’t hear us. In the flickering orange light from the
torch, I saw his eyes go all dreamy. His whole body appeared to flicker in and
out with the light.
“The Vampire Breath,” he whispered. “I need it—now.”
“Send us home—now!” Cara ordered him. “I mean it. Send us home!”
I balled my hands into fists. I felt so angry!
I mean, we helped him return to his castle. And how was he going to pay us
back?
By biting our necks and turning us into vampires. By keeping us here
forever.
I tried to imagine what it would be like living here in this castle. Sleeping
all day in a coffin.
Rising up at night and turning into a bat. Flying out night after night in
search of necks to bite.
Forever.
Just thinking about it made me shake with horror.
I’ll never complain about having to baby-sit for Tyler Brown again, I
decided.
And then the horrifying thought made my heart skip: I may never see Tyler
Brown again.
Or Mom and Dad. Or any of my friends.
“You’ve got to send us home!” I cried to Count Night wing. “You’ve got
to!”
He was pacing back and forth in front of us now, the torchlight dipping and
darting. He didn’t pay any attention to us. I don’t think he even remembered that
Cara and I were in the room.
“Vampire Breath,” he repeated. “I must find the Vampire Breath.”
Where is the bottle of Vampire Breath? I wondered. I was holding it in my
hand when we opened it back in the little room.
My eyes searched the floor. No sign of the little blue bottle.
It must have disappeared when we traveled back in time, I realized.
“Why do you need it?” Cara asked.
The old vampire narrowed his eyes at her. “When he is awake, a vampire
needs Vampire Breath every day,” he said softly. “We cannot live by blood
alone.”
Cara and I both stared at him, waiting for him to continue. “We all live
together, here in my castle,” he explained in his hoarse, whispery voice. “We live
here so we can be close to our supply of Vampire Breath. We each have our own
bottles. We guard them closely.”
He sighed. “But now I remember—the supply was running low. I was down
to my last bottle. I must find it. I must!”
“But what does it do for you?” I demanded.
“Everything!” Count Nightwing shouted. “Vampire Breath does everything
for a vampire! It allows us to travel in time. It can make us invisible and
reappear again. It keeps our skin smooth and clear. It gives us energy. It helps us
sleep. It keeps our bones from drying to powder. It freshens our breath!”
“Wow,” I murmured, shaking my head.
“But how will it help you find your fangs?” Cara demanded.
“Vampire Breath restores the memory,” the old vampire told her. “When
you live for hundreds of years, it’s hard to remember things. The Vampire Breath
will help me remember where I put my fangs.”
He spun around. His eyes locked on me. “The bottle. Do you still have it?”
I could feel the power of his silvery eyes. I could feel them burning into me,
searching my mind.
“N-no—!” I stammered. “I don’t have it.”
“But it won’t do you any good!” Cara cried. “We emptied it, remember? We
emptied the whole bottle to get you back here.”
Count Nightwing shook his head impatiently. “That was in the future,” he
snapped. “That was over a hundred years in the future. This is 1880, remember?
In 1880, the bottle is still full.”
My head was spinning. I leaned against a coffin and tried to make sense of
what he was saying.
The old vampire started to pace again, rubbing his chin thoughtfully. “I hid
the bottle somewhere,” he muttered. “I hid it so that the others couldn’t find it
and use it while I took my nap. But where? Where did I hide it? I must find it. I
must.”
He spun away from us, his long purple cape swirling behind him. The
orange torchlight bounced ahead of him as he floated toward the doorway.
“Where? Where?” he asked himself, shaking his head.
A few seconds later, he vanished.
Cara and I were left alone with the rows of coffins in the long room. Cara
sighed unhappily. She motioned to the coffins. “I hope I get one near the
window,” she joked. “I like a lot of fresh air.”
I was still leaning against the nearest coffin. I stood up and slapped the side
angrily with my hand. “I don’t believe this!” I cried.
“I’m only twelve,” Cara moaned. “I’m not ready to die and then live
forever!”
I swallowed hard. “You know what we have to do—don’t you?” I said
softly. “We have to find the Vampire Breath before Count Nightwing does. If he
finds it first and gets his fangs back, we’re doomed.”
“I don’t agree,” Cara replied sharply. “I have a much better plan.”
“A better plan? What is it?” I demanded.
17
Cara glanced to the doorway, then back to me. “We have to get out of here,” she
whispered.
“That’s your plan?” I exclaimed. “That’s it? That’s a plan?”
She nodded and raised a finger to her lips. “Maybe if we run away from the
castle, we can find help,” she explained. “If we stay here, we’re doomed no
matter what we do. If we stay here, we’re in his power.”
“How is anyone going to help us?” I argued. “This is over a hundred years
ago—remember? How will anyone outside the castle help us get back home to
the future?”
“I don’t know,” Cara replied unhappily. “I only know that if we stay here in
this creepy castle, we don’t stand a chance.”
I opened my mouth to argue some more. But I couldn’t think of anything
else to say.
Cara was probably right. Our only chance was to escape.
“Come on,” she whispered. She grabbed my hand and started to pull me
along the rows of coffins.
I held back. “Where are we going?”
She pointed. “To the window. Let’s see if we can climb out.”
The room was as long as our school gym. We walked quickly between the
two rows of open coffins. I couldn’t take my eyes off the old wooden coffins.
Vampires sleep inside them.
Those were the words that floated through my mind as we hurried past
them.
Cara and I may soon sleep in them, too.
I shivered. And stopped. “Cara, look.” I pointed to the window up ahead.
“This is a waste of time.”
She sighed. She saw what I meant. The big window was set very high up in
the wall. It stood way over our heads.
We couldn’t reach it even if we had a ladder.
“The only way to get through that window is to fly,” I said softly.
Cara frowned and stared up at the window. “I hope you and I don’t spend
the rest of our lives flapping our bat wings and flying in and out of that
window,” she said.
“There’s got to be a way out of this castle,” I told her, forcing myself to
sound cheerful. “Come on. Let’s find the front door.”
“Freddy—no.” Cara pulled me back. “We can’t just go running down the
halls. Count Nightwing will see us.”
“We’ll be careful,” I said. “Come on, Cara. We’ll find a way out.”
We turned and jogged side by side past the empty coffins. Through the
door. And into a long, dimly lit hallway.
The hall appeared to stretch for miles. Dark wood doors lined both sides.
The doors were all closed. Above each door, a gas lamp provided a soft glow of
yellow light.
My shoes sank into the thick, blue carpet. The air smelled sour. I glanced
back at the coffin room. An ugly stone gargoyle leered down at me, perched
above the door.
I turned away from its evil stare and gazed up and down the long hall. The
rows of doors stretched in both directions. “Which way?” I whispered.
Cara shrugged. “It doesn’t really matter. We just have to find a door or
window that will take us outside.”
We made our way silently over the thick carpet. The gas lamps cast a
gloomy, dim light. Our shadows seemed to hide behind us as we walked.
Cara and I stopped at the first door we came to. I grabbed the brass knob
and turned it. The heavy door creaked as it opened.
We peered into a large, square room filled with furniture. The furniture was
all covered with white sheets. Chairs rose up like ghosts beside a long, covered
couch. In a corner beside a darkened fireplace, a grandfather clock stood
guarding the room.
Cara pointed to the heavy black drapes that stretched over the far wall.
“There must be a window behind there. Let’s check it out.”
We raced across the room. My shoes slipped on the floor. Glancing down, I
saw nearly an inch of dust spread over the floor.
“I don’t think this room has been used for a while,” I said.
Cara didn’t reply. She grabbed an end of the heavy drape and tugged. I
reached to help her. The drape slid back. A dust-smeared window stood behind
it.
“Great!” I cried.
“Not so great,” Cara replied glumly.
I saw instantly what she meant. The window had thick black bars across it.
“Uggggh.” With a disgusted groan, Cara shoved the drape back into place.
We hurried back into the hall and tried the door across the hall. We stepped into
a small room filled with luggage trunks. The trunks were stacked on top of each
other up to the high ceiling.
No window in this room.
The next room had an enormous, old dark wood desk in its center and
shelves of ancient-looking books from floor to ceiling. Another heavy, black
drape covered the window.
I eagerly pulled the drape back—to find another dust-covered window. And
more thick, black bars. “Weird,” I muttered.
“This castle is like a prison,” Cara said in a shaky whisper. Her dark eyes
glowed with fear. “But there has got to be a way out.”
We crept back into the long hall. I stopped when I heard a soft fluttering
sound.
Bat wings?
Were the vampires returning?
Cara heard it, too. “Hurry,” she whispered.
We pushed open the next door and darted inside. I carefully closed the door
behind us. Then I turned and saw that we had entered a big dining room.
The long table filled most of the room. It was bare except for a tall
candelabra in its center. Stubs of white candles poked up in the candelabra. Wax
had dripped in small puddles onto the tabletop. The puddles were buried in a
gray layer of dust.
“No one has been in here in a long time,” I muttered.
Cara was already at the window. She pulled back the drape to reveal
another barred window.
“Aaaggggh!” She tore at her hair in frustration. “Every window! Every
window has bars!” she wailed. “And we can’t keep walking through these halls.
Someone will find us.”
Staring at the long, dust-covered dining room table, I had an idea.
“Vampires don’t eat,” I said.
“So what?” Cara cried. She slammed her fist against the heavy black drape.
“So they probably never go in the kitchen,” I continued. “We’ll be safe in
the kitchen. And maybe there is a kitchen door. Maybe…”
Cara sighed. “Maybe. Maybe. Maybe.” She shook her head glumly. “There
are a thousand rooms in this creepy old castle. How will we even find the
kitchen?”
I took her by the shoulders and guided her to the door. “Well, this is the
dining room, right? Maybe the kitchen is close to the dining room.”
“Maybe maybe maybe,” she repeated bitterly.
I guided her into the hall, then led the way to the next door. We pushed it
open and peeked inside.
No. Not the kitchen.
We quickly crept down the hall, trying door after door.
No kitchen. No kitchen.
We kept glancing back, watching for Count Nightwing, hoping we wouldn’t
bump into him.
We turned a corner. Found ourselves in a narrower, darker hallway. I tried
the first door.
Yes!
An old-fashioned kitchen with a wide fireplace hearth, a wood-burning
stove, and blackened pots and pans hanging on the wall beside the hearth.
My eyes glanced quickly around the room. And landed at the broad kitchen
window.
No black drape. And no bars!
“Yaaaay!” Cara cheered.
We both dove for the window. Could we open it?
We tried pushing it up from the bottom. But there were no handles, no place
to grip the frame.
“Smash it!” Cara cried. “Smash the window open!”
I ran to the wall and pulled down a heavy metal skillet. I lugged it to the
window. Pulled back my arm. Prepared to swing.
“Oh!” I cried out when I heard a cough.
Behind us. From the hallway.
“It’s him!” I whispered. “It’s Count Nightwing!”
“Smash the window!” Cara insisted.
“No. He’ll hear us! He’ll find us!” I whispered back.
I lowered the skillet to the floor. And turned back to study the window.
Another cough. Closer this time.
“Look,” I whispered to Cara. “It pushes out, I think.” I reached with both
hands and pushed at the dust-smeared windowpane.
Leaned into it. Pushed with all my strength.
Slowly, slowly, the window slid out. With a groan, I pushed it open as far as
it would go.
A gust of cool night air swept over me. I grabbed Cara’s hand and started to
give her a boost.
A noise behind us at the doorway made me jump. “Hurry—!” I whispered.
“He’s coming!”
My heart pounding, I pushed Cara up to the window. Then we both
scrambled frantically out onto the ledge.
18
“Did he see us? Was he in the kitchen?” Cara whispered.
“I don’t know,” I told her. “I didn’t see. But he was definitely in the hall.”
“If he saw us…” Cara started. A gust of wind drowned out the rest of her
words.
The night wind felt cool and refreshing on my skin. Heavy clouds floated
over the full moon, plunging us into total darkness.
We were both on our knees, our backs to the kitchen. Huddled close beside
Cara, I struggled to keep my balance on the narrow stone window ledge.
“Let’s get going,” I urged.
We both turned and faced the window. Then, gripping the stone ledge with
both hands, we began lowering our legs down the wall, lowering ourselves to the
ground.
Lower. Lower…
“Hey—!” I cried out when my feet didn’t touch anything solid.
A shaft of moonlight broke through the clouds.
I looked down.
And opened my mouth in a hoarse scream.
My feet kicked the air. My hands gripped the ledge above me.
I stared down into empty space.
Far below I could see dark, jagged rocks glowing dully in the moonlight.
Far below!
Miles below!
“We—we’re on top of a cliff!” Cara stammered. “The castle—it’s built on a
cliff!”
“Ohhhhh.” I uttered a terrified moan.
The castle was built on top of a sheer rock cliff. And we were now dangling
over the side. Dangling by our arms. Dangling…
My arms started to ache. I could feel my hands slipping, losing their grip on
the stone window ledge above me.
“Cara—!” I gasped.
19
My hands scraped the dark stones of the wall.
I struggled to grab on to something—anything!
But I was falling too fast.
My feet kicked. I thrashed my arms. The wind rushed up at me as if trying
to push me back up.
Was that me howling like that?
I was falling too fast to hear my own scream.
And then suddenly I stopped.
Stopped screaming. Stopped falling.
A black shadow swept around me. I felt something sharp dig into my
shoulders. Hot breath grazed the back of my neck.
I heard a loud flapping sound. A fluttering heartbeat.
Gripped inside this shadow, I felt myself being pulled up.
I twisted my head back—and saw two glowing red eyes. The hot breath
poured from its dark gaping mouth.
It’s going to eat me! I realized.
I’m trapped inside this red-eyed shadow. Trapped in its talons as it carries
me higher. Higher.
And then darkness surrounded me.
I landed somewhere. Landed hard on my feet with a loud thud.
The darkness lifted. I opened my eyes and saw Cara. Her mouth dropped
open in amazement. “Freddy—!” she choked out. “Freddy—?”
I spun toward the big open window to see the giant bat that had carried me
back to the kitchen. Its wings flapped against the floor. The red eyes glowed
angrily from its big, ugly face.
It saved our lives! I realized.
I collapsed to my knees. I grabbed the side of the stove to hold myself up.
I’m okay. I’m going to be okay, I told myself.
I raised my eyes to the enormous bat.
It started to shrink. It tucked itself inside its black wings. Wrapped the
wings around its body.
The wings melted into a cape. A purple cape. And as the cape swept back,
Count Nightwing appeared.
“You made a serious mistake, young man,” he scolded sternly. His strange,
silver eyes burned angrily into mine. “Did you think you could fly?” he
demanded with a sneer. “You are not ready to fly—yet!”
“I—I—I—” I was still shaking too hard to speak.
“When I turn you into a vampire, you can fly every night,” Count
Nightwing snarled. He lowered his face close to mine, so close I could smell the
decay of his pale skin. “Don’t try to escape again,” he growled. “It is a waste of
time. And the next time… I won’t catch you.”
I swallowed hard. I held my breath, trying to force my heart to stop
pounding so hard.
Count Nightwing turned away from me. Swirling the purple cape behind
him, he floated past Cara, through the kitchen.
He stopped at the door and swung back to us. “Don’t just stand there,” he
ordered. “Come help me find the Vampire Breath. I know it’s somewhere in this
wing of the castle.”
He grabbed his pale throat. “I’m so thirsty… so thirsty.” His silvery eyes
locked on Cara, then on me. “I must remember where I hid my fangs. Hurry.
Help find the Vampire Breath. It’s somewhere nearby. I’m certain of it.”
Cara and I had no choice. He stood at the doorway, waiting for us to follow
him.
Holding on to the stove, I pulled myself to my feet. Then I followed Cara
through the kitchen to the hall.
“Perhaps I hid the bottle in the royal guest room,” Count Nightwing said,
talking to himself. He pushed open a door and vanished inside the room.
Cara and I kept walking. The hallways appeared to stretch for miles ahead
of us. Door after door after door. And this was only one wing of the old
vampire’s castle.
“Are you okay?” Cara asked, studying me as we walked. “You still look
kind of shaky.”
“I am kind of shaky,” I confessed. “After all, I fell off a cliff!”
Cara shook her head. “It isn’t going to be easy to escape.”
“We can’t escape,” I replied. “The castle was built up here on top of the
cliff to keep anyone from escaping.”
She brushed a strand of black hair from her eyes. “We can’t give up,
Freddy. We have to keep trying. As soon as he finds his fangs, he’s going to turn
us into vampires.”
“That’s why my first plan is the best,” I insisted. “We have to find the bottle
of Vampire Breath before he does. Maybe we’ll get lucky. Maybe we’ll find it
first.”
“But what will we do with it once we have it?” Cara demanded.
“Mainly keep it from him!” I declared.
I pulled her into the next room. We both gasped when we saw the coffins.
Dozens of them. All lined up perfectly in four rows, the length of the room.
All open.
“Another vampire bedroom!” Cara cried. She shivered. “It’s so creepy,
Freddy. Look how many there are!”
“The vampires are all out somewhere, swooping around, searching for
blood to drink,” I said. “But soon they’ll be flying home. And when they see
us…”
Cara gulped. “We’ll be their dessert!”
“Uh… maybe we should search for the Vampire Breath in another room,” I
suggested. “Somewhere away from these coffins.”
But then my eye fell on something. A coffin against the wall.
A closed coffin.
“Cara—look at that!” I whispered, pointing. “All the other coffins were left
open. That’s the only one with a closed lid. Do you think—?”
Cara squinted at the closed coffin. “Weird,” she murmured. “Very weird.”
My brain whirred with crazy ideas. “Maybe it’s an empty coffin,” I
suggested excitedly. “Maybe no one sleeps in that coffin. That would make it the
perfect place. The perfect place to hide a bottle of Vampire Breath.”
Cara held me back. “Or maybe a vampire is sleeping in the coffin,” she
warned. “If we open the coffin and wake him up…” Her voice trailed off.
“We have to look inside!” I exclaimed. “We have to take that chance.”
We made our way to the coffin. I stared at the polished, dark wood of the
lid. I cautiously ran a hand over the smooth wood.
Then, without saying a word, Cara grabbed one handle, and I grabbed the
other. And slowly, slowly, we began to lift the coffin lid.
20
The lid was solid and heavy. Cara and I leaned into it and pushed. Finally, it
dropped to the other side of the coffin.
I turned to the door to make sure Count Nightwing hadn’t heard.
No sign of him.
I pulled myself up straight and peered into the open coffin. The inside was
covered with dark green felt. It reminded me of the pool table in our basement.
I sighed. I wondered if I’d ever see my basement again.
“It’s empty,” Cara murmured sadly. “Just an empty coffin.”
“We’ve got to keep searching,” I said. I started to back away from the coffin
when I saw the pocket.
A green pocket in the side of the coffin. Like the pockets on the sides of
suitcases. It bulged out a little from the side.
“Whoa. Hold on a minute,” I told Cara. She was already halfway to the
door, I reached into the pocket.
And pulled out a blue glass bottle.
“Cara—look!” I cried. I forgot that we didn’t want Count Nightwing to hear
us. “I found it! The Vampire Breath!”
A smile broke out over Cara’s face. Her dark eyes flashed with excitement.
“Excellent!” she exclaimed. “Excellent! Now we’ve got to hide it from Count
Nightwing. Somewhere he’ll never find it.”
I held the bottle up close to my face and studied it. “Maybe we should open
it and pour it all out,” I said.
Cara rushed up beside me. She took the bottle from my hand. “When we
opened it before, it took us back in time,” she said excitedly. “Maybe if we
opened it now…”
“It will take us forward in time!” I finished her thought for her. “Yes! Count
Nightwing said it can be used for time travel. Maybe if we open it—and think
real hard about where we want to go—it will take us home to my basement.”
We both stared at the blue bottle.
Should we hide it and keep it away from the old vampire to stop him from
getting back his fangs?
Or should we open it up and hope that the smelly mist would carry us
home?
Cara gripped the bottle tightly in one hand.
She raised her other hand to the glass stopper on the top.
She started to pull it open—then stopped.
We stared at each other. We didn’t speak.
“Go ahead. Do it,” I whispered.
Cara nodded in agreement. She squeezed the stopper again and started to
pull.
But she stopped once again. And gasped.
Out of the corner of my eye, I saw something move. I heard a soft footstep.
And I realized that we were no longer alone.
21
I spun around, expecting to find Count Nightwing.
“Oh!” I cried out when a girl stepped out of the shadows.
Her pale blue eyes were wide with shock. I think she was as surprised to see
us as we were to see her!
As she stepped toward us, I saw that she had ringlets of blond curls that fell
past her shoulders. She wore a gray jumper, very long and old-fashioned, with a
white blouse underneath.
She’s about our age, I realized. But definitely from a different time.
She stopped several coffins away. “Who are you?” she asked, eyeing us
suspiciously. “What are you doing here?”
“We—we don’t really know,” I stammered.
“We know who we are. But we don’t really know what we’re doing here!”
Cara corrected me.
“We got here by accident,” I added.
The girl’s confused expression didn’t change. She tucked her hands into the
pockets of her jumper.
“Who are you?” Cara demanded.
The girl didn’t answer right away. Keeping her distance, she continued to
study us with her pale blue eyes. “Gwendolyn,” she said finally. “My name is
Gwendolyn.”
“Are you one of them?” The question popped out of my mouth.
Gwendolyn shuddered. “No,” she answered quickly. Her mouth curled into
an angry sneer. “No. I hate them!” she declared. “I hate them all!”
Cara shifted her weight tensely. I could see that she was really nervous. She
handed the bottle of Vampire Breath to me. The bottle felt cold and damp from
Cara’s hands. I lowered it to my side, out of Gwendolyn’s sight.
“Do you live here?” Cara asked Gwendolyn. “Are you related to Count
Nightwing?”
Gwendolyn’s sneer grew more bitter. “No,” she choked out. Tears welled in
her eyes. “I’m a prisoner here. I’m only twelve. But they treat me as a slave.”
She let the tears run down her pale cheeks. “A slave,” she repeated in a
trembling voice. “Do you know what they force me to do? Clean and polish their
coffins, night and day.”
“Yuck,” Cara murmured.
Gwendolyn sighed. She brushed her blond ringlets off her face and wiped
away a tear. “Night and day. There are a dozen coffin rooms in this castle. All
filled with row after row of coffins. And I must keep them smooth and shiny and
clean for the vampires.”
“What if you refuse?” I asked. “What if you tell Count Nightwing you
won’t do it anymore?”
Gwendolyn uttered a dry laugh. “Then he’ll turn me into a vampire.” She
shuddered again. “I’d rather clean their coffins,” she murmured bitterly.
“Can’t you escape?” I asked.
Another dry laugh escaped her lips. “Escape? If I did, they would track me
down. They would turn into bats and fly after me. And they would drink my
blood until I was one of them.”
I swallowed hard. I felt so bad for her. I didn’t know what to say.
“We don’t belong here,” Cara told her, glancing to the door. “Count
Nightwing brought us here by accident. Can you help us? Is there any way for us
to escape?”
Gwendolyn lowered her gaze to the floor, thinking hard. “There may be a
way,” she said finally. “But we’ll have to be very careful. If he catches us…”
“We’ll be careful,” I promised.
Gwendolyn glanced to the front of the room.
“Follow me,” she whispered. “Hurry. It is almost dawn. If the vampires
return and see you—it will be too late. They will pounce on you and drink your
blood. You will never see daylight again.”
She led us into the hall. Clinging to the wall, we stopped and looked in both
directions.
No sign of Count Nightwing. But we knew he was nearby. Searching for
the bottle of Vampire Breath. The bottle I held tightly in my hand.
“This way,” Gwendolyn whispered.
We followed her through another door. It led to a narrow stairway. Gas
lamps on the wall cast a dim glow, lighting the stairs as we made our way down.
We found ourselves in a long, twisting tunnel. Gwendolyn led us through it,
walking rapidly, silently. The tunnel was so narrow, we had to walk single file. It
twisted and curved, and took us down, deeper into the castle.
“Is there really a way out down here?” Cara asked Gwendolyn. Cara’s voice
echoed in the narrow tunnel.
Gwendolyn nodded. “Yes. Follow me. There is a secret exit through the
castle cellar.”
Our footsteps thudded on the hard tunnel floor. Up ahead of us,
Gwendolyn’s blond hair glowed like a torch leading the way.
The way to freedom. The way to safety.
I leaned close to Cara and whispered. “This is great! We’re getting out of
here—and we’re taking the Vampire Breath with us!”
Cara raised a finger to her lips. “We’re not out yet,” she reminded me.
The tunnel emptied into a huge, dark cellar. Gwendolyn pulled a flaming
torch off the wall and carried it high in front of her to light our way.
“Follow me,” she whispered. “Hurry.”
The flickering torch cast a narrow path of light through the cellar. I couldn’t
see anything on either side of us. Total blackness.
Gwendolyn led us deeper into the darkness. It smelled damp and sour down
here. Somewhere in the distance I heard water dripping.
Cara and I huddled close together, trying to stay in the light of the torch. I
squeezed the bottle of Vampire Breath tightly in my hand.
Gwendolyn stopped so suddenly, we nearly walked into her.
She turned slowly. The torchlight revealed a smile on her face.
“Are we here?” Cara demanded. “Where is the door?”
“Yes. We’re here,” Gwendolyn replied in a whisper. “We’re all alone here.”
“Huh?” I cried. I didn’t understand.
“I have you all to myself here,” Gwendolyn continued. Her smile grew
wider. Her eyes were half-shut. “We won’t be interrupted by Count Nightwing or
the others.”
“But—where do we escape?” I demanded.
Gwendolyn didn’t reply.
“Why have we stopped here?” Cara cried.
“I’m so thirsssssty….” Gwendolyn hissed. “So thirssssty…”
As she lowered the torch, I saw long, pointed fangs slide down her chin.
“I’m so thirsty….” She sighed. “So terribly thirsty…”
She grabbed me by the shoulders. And I felt the scratch of her fangs against
my throat.
22
“No—!” I screamed.
I grabbed her arms and shoved her off me.
“No! Get away! Get away from me!” I howled.
Her eyes flashed excitedly. Saliva dripped from her pointed fangs. “So
thirssssty…” she hissed.
“Get away! Get away!” I pleaded.
“You want to escape, don’t you?” she teased. “This is the only way to
escape!”
She tossed back her head and opened her mouth wide. Then she dove for
me.
“No way!” I cried. I ducked away. Her long, curly hair slapped against my
face. I staggered back. Caught my balance.
She prepared to attack again.
“Freddy—the Vampire Breath!” Cara cried. “Use the Vampire Breath!
Maybe it will take us to the future!”
“Huh?” I had forgotten I had it in my hand.
“So thirsty…” Gwendolyn murmured, licking her dry lips. “So thirsty…”
I raised the Vampire Breath high. The blue glass bottle caught the light from
the torch.
Gwendolyn gasped and drew back in fear.
I grabbed the top. And started to pull.
“No—please!” Gwendolyn begged. “Put that down! Don’t open it! Please
—don’t open it!”
I squeezed the glass top—and pulled open the bottle.
23
Nothing happened.
All three of us stared at the open blue bottle in my hand.
“It takes a few seconds,” I told Cara. My voice came out high and shaky.
“Remember? Back in my basement, it took a few seconds. Then it came
whooshing out.”
Gwendolyn’s eyes were wide, locked on the bottle.
We stared in tense silence.
A few seconds went by. Then a few more seconds.
Gwendolyn broke the silence with a gleeful laugh. “It’s empty!” she
declared through her laughter. “The castle is filled with empties! There’s a whole
room of them over there.” She pointed into the darkness.
I raised the bottle to my face and squinted inside. Too dark to see anything.
But Gwendolyn was right. It was definitely empty.
I let it fall to the floor.
Gwendolyn’s grin was so evil in the shadowy light from the torch. I tried to
back away. But I bumped into a stone column.
Trapped.
As she grinned so hungrily at me, Gwendolyn’s fangs shone in the pale
light. “So thirsty…” she whispered. “Freddy—don’t run away. Help me. I’m so
thirsty….”
“I’m thirsty, too!” a voice boomed from behind me.
I spun around to see a flash of orange torchlight. The light bounced toward
us. And inside it, I saw the angry face of Count Nightwing.
He floated to us, his eyes narrowed at Gwendolyn.
Her mouth dropped open. She raised both hands in front of her, as if to
shield herself.
“Gwendolyn—what are you doing down here with my prisoners?” Count
Nightwing demanded angrily.
He didn’t give her a chance to reply. He floated up off the floor, floated
over her. His cape floated out like bat wings. His silvery eyes locked on hers.
And he opened his mouth in a furious hiss.
Gwendolyn’s fangs glistened wetly in the torchlight. She tossed back her
blond ringlets and, still shielding herself with both hands, hissed up at the old
vampire.
Oh, wow! I thought, They’re going to fight!
I leaned forward, horrified—but eager to watch.
The two vampires floated off the floor. They hissed at each other again, like
two snakes about to strike.
“Freddy—come on!” Cara whispered. She grabbed my arm and pulled.
“This is our chance.”
Cara was right. While the two vampires hissed at each other, we had to try
to get away.
My heart pounding, I grabbed Gwendolyn’s torch off the floor and darted
after Cara.
We ran blindly through the dark basement.
There’s got to be a way out! I repeated to myself. There’s got to be a way to
escape!
Finally, I saw an open door.
Cara and I burst through the door. I glanced back. I saw Count Nightwing
floating high off the floor. His cape swirled behind him. Gwendolyn hissed up at
him weakly from the cellar floor.
No time to watch their fight. I followed Cara into the room. “Where are
we?” I whispered.
I raised the torch in front of us.
“Wow,” Cara murmured as the shelves against the wall came into the light.
“I don’t believe it!”
We had found the room of empty Vampire Breath bottles that Gwendolyn
had told us about. Shelves covered every wall from floor to ceiling. And each
shelf was crammed with blue bottles. Stacks and stacks of blue glass bottles.
“There must be a million empty bottles in here!” I whispered.
We gazed around the room. The bottles sparkled like blue jewels, caught in
the light from the torch.
Cara shook her head hard, as if trying to shake the amazing sight from her
eyes. She turned to me, her expression solemn. “This isn’t helping us escape,”
she whispered.
“Escape?” a hoarse voice rasped from the doorway.
Count Nightwing moved quickly into the room. “There is no need to talk of
escape,” he said, narrowing his strange silver eyes at Cara, then at me. “For there
is no escape from Count Nightwing’s castle.”
He raised his cape and floated off the floor.
“What are you g-going to do?” I stammered.
He tossed back his bald head and uttered a frightening hiss.
I felt myself pushed back, back, deeper into the room. He was using some
kind of force, some kind of ancient power.
He floated higher. The cape billowed around him. He looked like a frail
insect inside a purple cocoon. But I could feel his power.
Pushing me back…. Holding me…. Pushing me….
And then, suddenly, I felt him let go.
He dropped heavily to the floor. His eyes flashed. He snapped his bony
fingers.
A thin-lipped smile creased his face. “Yesssss!” he hissed.
Cara and I backed up to the shelves at the far wall. My legs were trembling
now. He had gripped me in some kind of ancient force. And now I felt totally
shaky. I struggled to catch my breath.
“Yessss!” he hissed again. “I remember now!”
24
Cara and I stared at the old vampire in silence. He turned to the shelves of blue
bottles.
“This is where I hid my full bottle of Vampire Breath,” he told us. “I hid it
here in the empties room. I knew the others would never look here.”
As he smiled, I could see his gums, soft and smooth inside the dry-lipped
mouth. His smile faded. And his silvery eyes narrowed.
“I’m so thirsty,” he whispered, eyeing Cara and me. “I must find the full
bottle—refresh my memory—and get back my fangs.”
He dove for the nearest shelf and began pawing through the blue bottles.
“Which one? Which one?” he muttered to himself. “Thousands of bottles, and
only one is full.”
His small, bony hands moved quickly over the shelf. He pushed aside
empties, muttering to himself. Bottles crashed to the floor, shattering into pieces.
“Cara—quick!” I pointed to the far shelf. “Let’s move!”
She understood me instantly. We had to find the full bottle first. We had to
find it before Count Nightwing did.
I dropped to my knees and began sifting through the bottles on the bottom
shelf. Empty… empty… empty… empty…
I pushed them aside one by one. My fingers moved quickly over the glass
tops. I squinted hard in the dim light, searching, searching for the only full
bottle.
Glass shattered on the hard floor. Bottles rolled and spun all around me.
Beside me, Cara worked frantically over a low shelf. “No. No. No. No.”
She muttered to herself as she moved her hands over the empty bottles.
“You two—” Count Nightwing called from across the room. “Get away
from there!”
We ignored him. We kept pawing through the bottles, working faster, faster.
Desperate to find the full one first.
And then—my hand landed on it.
I sucked in a deep breath when I realized it felt heavier than the others. My
hand trembled as I carefully lifted it out from the others.
Yes! It definitely felt heavy. Yes! It was still sealed shut. Yes!
“I found it!” I cried, jumping to my feet. “Cara—look! I’ve got it!”
I raised the full bottle up to show it to her—and Count Nightwing grabbed
it from my hand.
“Thank you,” he said.
25
With an eager smile, the old vampire raised the bottle and reached to open it.
“Noooo!” I howled.
I leaped at him. Caught him by surprise.
I shoved my shoulder into his chest. He felt light and feathery, as if he had
no bones at all.
He uttered a startled choking sound.
The bottle of Vampire Breath flew from his hand.
I reached out—and grabbed it in the air.
Holding it tightly in both hands, I backed toward the shelves.
Count Nightwing recovered quickly. He narrowed his eyes at me, and once
again, I felt his strange power holding me, holding me in place.
“Freddy, you will hand the bottle to me now,” he ordered in a soft, calm
voice.
I didn’t move. I couldn’t.
“Hand the bottle to me now,” the old vampire insisted, floating toward me,
his bony hand outstretched. “You will hand it to me, Freddy.”
I swallowed hard. I couldn’t give him the Vampire Breath. I knew that Cara
and I were doomed if Count Nightwing opened it.
But I couldn’t move. He had frozen me there. I was helpless!
“Hand it to me,” he insisted. He reached for the bottle.
“Monkey in the Middle!” I heard Cara call.
She seemed far away. And at first, her words didn’t make any sense to me.
“Monkey in the Middle!” she called again.
This time, I understood.
I sucked in a deep breath. It took all my strength to move my arm.
Count Nightwing swiped at the bottle. His bony fingertips brushed against
it.
But I tossed the bottle high over his shoulder.
Cara bobbled it, fumbled it into the air—and then grabbed it. “The catch of
the day!” she cried.
With an angry groan, Count Nightwing spun around. “Give me that!” he
rasped. He dove toward Cara.
She pulled her arm back and heaved the bottle to me. A low toss which
zipped past the old vampire’s knees. I caught it at my shoelaces.
Count Nightwing whirled back to me. His strange eyes narrowed in fury. “I
want that bottle!” he snarled.
I tossed it high, over his head. Cara caught it in one hand.
When we baby-sat for Tyler Brown, Cara and I played Monkey in the
Middle all the time. That little shrimp could never take the ball away from us.
We could keep him running back and forth for hours!
But I knew Count Nightwing would soon run out of patience. There was no
way Cara and I could win this game.
But what else could we do?
The old vampire dove for Cara, his hands outstretched, his cape flying.
Cara tossed off-balance. I stretched for the bottle. But it sailed past my open
hand.
And crashed into a shelf.
Bottles toppled and broke.
Count Nightwing flew to the shelf. He grabbed blindly at the bottles.
But I got there first. I picked up the bottle and tossed it to Cara.
“No—!” Count Nightwing rasped. “Enough!”
He hurtled toward Cara.
She tossed the bottle to me, a high throw over the old vampire’s head.
I raised my hands to catch it.
But to my surprise, Count Nightwing flew straight up—and caught the
bottle in both hands.
As he sailed slowly back to the floor, a pleased smile spread over his face.
“I win,” he said softly, his eyes flashing. “I win. It helps to be able to fly.”
He raised the bottle in front of him.
“No—don’t!” I begged.
His smile grew even wider. He reached out—and pulled the top off the
bottle.
26
All three of us froze. And stared at the open bottle in Count Nightwing’s hand.
“No,” Cara murmured. “No—please.”
A few seconds passed. A few more seconds.
“Nothing is happening,” Count Nightwing whispered. His smile faded. He
raised the bottle to his face and tilted it to see inside.
Beneath the purple cape, his slender shoulders slumped. He sighed, a long,
dry sigh. “Empty,” he said. “This bottle is empty, too.”
Cara and I exchanged glances. I suddenly knew what had happened. In my
wild scramble to pick up the bottle, I had grabbed the wrong one off the shelf.
Sure enough. I turned to the shelf—and spotted the full bottle right in front
of me.
“I have it!” I cried. I picked it up carefully from the shelf. “I have it!”
The old vampire let out a furious growl. He leaped at me.
“Cara—catch!” I screamed.
I heaved the bottle to her.
But Count Nightwing swung his arm. His hand slapped the bottle in midair.
“Oh—!” I gasped as the bottle sailed into the wall.
It bounced off. Crashed to the floor. Cracked open.
And the sour, dark mist poured up into the room.
“We’ve lost,” I murmured. “We’re doomed.”
27
I tried to hold my breath, but it didn’t help. The foul odor of the rising fog
seemed to seep into my skin.
Across the room, I saw Cara cup a hand tightly over her nose and mouth.
Her dark eyes grew wide in fright. She waved her other hand frantically, trying
to fan the smelly fog away from her.
I choked on it. My eyes started to burn. I closed them. Felt hot tears seep
down my cheeks.
When I opened my eyes, I couldn’t see Cara anymore. The fog had grown
too thick.
I could see Count Nightwing’s purple cape, dark inside the mist. Then it
disappeared, too.
And I was alone. Alone inside a thick, billowing cloud.
I dropped to my knees. Covered my face with both hands. I tried not to
breathe. I could taste the foul mist on my tongue!
How long did I kneel there? I’m not sure.
But when I finally opened my burning eyes, the fog was fading.
Count Nightwing’s purple cape came back into view as the mist lowered
itself to the floor. And I saw Cara across the room, shielding her face with one
arm.
The fog continued to melt away.
The room came back into focus.
And I realized I was staring at an air hockey game.
I blinked several times. A pool table stood in the center of the room.
Pool table? Air hockey?
Cara came running over to me, her dark eyes flashing with excitement.
“We’re back, Freddy!” she cried happily. “We’re back in your basement!”
“Yesssss!” I cheered. I pumped both fists in the air. “Yessss!”
I staggered across the room and hugged the air hockey game. Then I kissed
the wall. I actually kissed the wall!
“We’re back! We’re back!” Cara chanted, jumping up and down. “The
Vampire Breath—it brought us back to your house, Freddy!”
“Noooooo!”
I turned to see Count Nightwing toss back his head in a long, angry wail.
He swirled his cape behind him, then clasped his hands into tight fists.
“Noooooo! Noooooo! This can’t be happening!” he cried hoarsely.
Cara and I huddled together as the vampire advanced on us.
“I don’t want to be here!” he declared. “I must go back. I must find my
fangs! Without my fangs, I will not survive. I will perish!”
He rose up over us. His eyes burned angrily down at us. His dry lips
quivered. He stretched out his cape as if to trap us inside it.
“I must go back!” he rasped. “Where is the Vampire Breath? Where is the
blue bottle?”
My eyes glanced quickly around the room.
No sign of it.
“It didn’t come back with us,” Cara announced.
The old vampire tossed back his head in another angry wail.
Then, raising his cape even higher, he swooped down to attack us.
Cara and I staggered back against the pool table.
The vampire moved quickly, wrapping his heavy, purple cape around us
both.
We were trapped. Nowhere to move.
Then, suddenly, the cape slid off. Count Nightwing took a step back. His
mouth dropped open in surprise.
I followed his gaze—and saw Mom and Dad hurrying into the basement.
“Mom!” I cried. “Dad! Look out! He’s a vampire! He’s a real vampire!”
28
Count Nightwing squinted at my parents, his mouth still open in shock. He
locked his stare on my mom. “Cynthia—?” he cried. “Cynthia, what are you
doing here?”
Mom smiled at him. “Daddy, you finally woke up!” she exclaimed.
“Huh?” Cara and I both gasped in shock.
Mom rushed forward and threw her arms around the old vampire. She
hugged him for a long time.
“Daddy, you’ve been napping down here for at least a hundred years,” she
said. “We didn’t know whether to wake you or let you sleep.”
Dad came rushing over, too, a big smile on his face. He rested a hand on my
shoulder. “Did you meet our son Freddy?” he asked Count Nightwing. “This is
Freddy—your grandson.”
Grandson?
Me?
I’m the vampire’s grandson?
Count Nightwing stared down at me, shaking his head. I could see that he
was as confused as I was!
“Cynthia—?” he said to my mom. “Cynthia—my fangs. I’ve lost my
fangs.”
Mom slid her arm around the vampire’s waist. “Daddy, your fangs aren’t
lost,” she told him. “They’re in the glass in the bathroom. Right where you left
them.”
“Here. Over here,” Dad said. He led the way to the little bathroom in the
corner that we never use.
A few seconds later, Count Nightwing stepped out, adjusting the fangs over
his gums with both of his thumbs. “There. That’s better,” he said. “Now let’s fly
out of here. I’m so thirsty! It’s been a hundred years!”
Mom and Dad turned to me. “We’ll be home soon,” Dad said. “Make
yourself a sandwich upstairs, okay? Make one for Cara, too.”
I stared back at him, unable to get over my shock. “But if you and Mom are
vampires, am I a vampire, too?” I asked in a trembling voice.
“Of course,” Mom replied. “But you’re way too young to get your fangs,
Freddy. You have to wait at least another hundred years!”
I wanted to ask a million more questions. But the three of them began to
flap their arms. Up and down. In seconds, they changed into bats and flew out
the basement window.
I stared at the window for a long while, trying to calm down, trying to slow
my racing heart. When I started to feel a little more normal, I turned to Cara.
“Wow,” she said, shaking her head. “Wow.”
“I don’t believe it, either,” I replied softly.
She grinned at me. “I knew you were weird, Freddy. But I didn’t know you
were that weird!”
I wanted to laugh at that. But I was still too shocked to laugh, or cry, or
scream—or do anything!
I turned away from Cara and counted to twenty, trying to get myself
together.
It isn’t easy to find out that you’re a vampire.
I really think Mom and Dad could have broken the news to me in a little
better way.
But I guess they didn’t think it was any big deal…
The door to the bathroom stood open. I stepped inside. “We never use this
bathroom,” I muttered. “We use the one across the basement.”
Cara followed me in. The mirrored door to the medicine chest was partly
open. She pulled it open the rest of the way.
The shelves were jammed with all kinds of jars and bottles. Strange
medicines and tubes of ointments.
I saw a green glass bottle on the top shelf. “What’s that?” I wondered. I
stretched my hand up to pull it down.
But Cara grabbed it first.
“Give it back!” I cried. I shoved her.
She shoved me back.
She turned the glass bottle in her hand and read the name on the label to
me: “WEREWOLF SWEAT”.
“Cara—put it back!” I ordered. “No. Really. Put it back. Leave it alone,
Cara. Don’t open it. Don’t—”
She teased me. Grinning, she pretended to pull off the top.
“No—!” I cried.
I swiped at it. Tried to pull it from her hand.
But I missed—and tugged off the top instead.
“Whooooa!” Cara cried out as a yellow liquid squirted over both of us.
I rolled my eyes. “Now what?” I cried. “Now what do you think is going to
happen?”
“Grrrrrrrrowwwwwrrrrrrrrr!” Cara replied.
Scanning, formatting and
proofing by Undead.

CALLING ALL CREEPS!
Goosebumps - 50
R. L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
At a little after eight o’clock at night, I tiptoed from my bedroom and crept
as silently as I could down the stairs. Three steps from the bottom, I tripped
over a stack of laundry—and fell headfirst the rest of the way.
I landed hard on my elbows and knees, but I didn’t make a sound. I’m
used to falling. I do it all the time.
I jumped quickly to my feet and peeked into the front hallway. Had
Mom and Dad heard me?
They had the TV on in the den. They were watching the Weather
Channel. They can watch the Weather Channel for hours.
What’s so interesting about the weather?
I could hear the woman on TV talking about the wind chill in Nova
Scotia. I pulled on my blue down parka and made my way silently to the
front door.
A few seconds later, I was outside, jogging along the sidewalk. I kept
in the shadows, ducked my head low—and headed for school.
Don’t get the wrong idea about me. I don’t usually sneak out of the
house at night. I’m not a problem child or anything. In fact, my parents are
always telling me to be braver, to be more adventurous.
I never go out without telling my parents where I’m going. But tonight
was a special night. Tonight I had a special mission.
The mission was spelled r-e-v-e-n-g-e.
I slipped as I reached the corner and had to grab a lamppost to keep
myself from falling. Most of the snow from the weekend had melted. But
there were still slick patches of ice on the sidewalk.
I hadn’t bothered to zip up my parka. The wind blew it behind me as I
jogged across the street and past the small houses on the next block. The air
felt cold against my warm cheeks, and wet, as if it might snow again.
Hey—enough about the weather!
Ricky Beamer—that’s me—had more important things on his mind
tonight. Tonight I planned to do a little spying. And then a little nasty
mischief.
A few minutes later, I made my way across the deserted playground
next to the school. Harding Middle School. That’s what the sign beside the
bare flagpole read. Except that someone had spray-painted over all the first
letters. So the sign actually read: ARDING IDDLE CHOOL.
We have a lot of school pride here at Harding.
Actually, most kids like the school. It’s really new and everything is
modern and clean.
I’d like our school too—if the kids would give me a break. If they’d all
get out of my face and stop calling me Ricky Rat and Sicky Ricky, I’d be a
real happy guy.
Maybe you think I sound a little bitter.
Maybe you’re right!
But all the kids think I’m a nerd. They make fun of me every chance
they get.
I stared at the school building. It’s kind of low and flat and curves
around like a snake. The elementary school is at one end, and the middle
school is at the other. I’m in sixth grade, so my classroom is right in the
middle.
A spotlight shone down on the bare flagpole in front of the building.
Behind it, most of the classrooms were dark. I saw lighted windows at the
eighth-grade end—and that’s where I headed.
A car rumbled past slowly. Its headlights washed over the front of the
building. I ducked behind a tall evergreen bush. I didn’t want to be seen.
In my rush to hide, I stumbled into the bush. A clump of cold, wet
snow plopped onto my head. With a shiver, I shook my wavy black hair to
toss it off.
When the car had passed, I crept up to the lighted classroom window.
My sneakers made squishing sounds in the soft ground. I glanced down. I
had stepped into a deep, muddy rut.
Ignoring the mud, I leaned against the low window ledge and pressed
my face to the glass. Were the lights on because the night janitor was
cleaning in there? Or was Tasha McClain hard at work?
Tasha McClain. Just saying her name made my teeth itch!
The windowpane was steamed up. I squinted through the glass. Yes!
Tasha sat at the desk against the wall. She leaned over her computer, typing
away. Her long, curly red hair fell over the keyboard as she typed with two
fingers.
Ms. Richards, the newspaper advisor, stood beside her, one hand on
the back of Tasha’s chair. Ms. Richards is young and very pretty. She had
her blond hair pulled back in a ponytail. In her baggy gray sweatshirt and
faded jeans, she looked more like a student than a teacher.
Ms. Richards was nice to me last September when I signed up for the
school newspaper staff. But she’s been pretty mean lately. I think Tasha
turned her against me.
Tasha is an eighth-grader, so she thinks she’s hot stuff. Sixth-graders
are nothing at Harding. Believe me. We’re nothing. Maybe even less.
I knew Tasha and Ms. Richards would be working late on the Harding
Herald tonight. Because tomorrow is Tuesday, the day the paper comes out.
Ms. Richards leaned over Tasha and pointed to something on the
computer monitor. I squinted harder to see the screen. I could see a headline
with a photo beneath it.
Tasha was laying out the Herald front page.
Once she had the front page finished, she would save it on a disk. Then
Ms. Richards would take the disk to the laser printer in the main office and
print out two hundred copies.
Ms. Richards turned suddenly to the window. I dropped to the ground.
Had she seen me?
I waited a few seconds, then pulled myself up. Tasha was typing away.
She stopped every few seconds to click the mouse and move things around
on the screen.
Ms. Richards walked out of the room.
I shivered. The wind swirled, fluttering my parka hood. I hadn’t
brushed all the snow from my hair. Cold water dripped down the back of
my neck. I heard a dog howling sadly in the distance.
Please get up! I silently urged Tasha.
Please leave the room too—so I can play my little joke.
On the street behind me, another car rumbled past. I pressed myself
against the dark wall, trying to make myself invisible.
When I moved back to the window, the classroom stood empty. Tasha
had also left the room.
“Yesss!” I cheered softly.
My heart pounded with excitement. I raised both hands to the
windowsill. I struggled to push up the window so that I could climb inside.
I knew I had to be quick. Tasha probably had gone down the hall to the
juice machine. I had only a few seconds to get in the room—do my damage
—and get out of there.
I pushed and strained. The window didn’t budge.
At first I thought it might be frozen shut. But finally, on the fourth try,
it started to slide up. I pushed with all my strength—and opened the
window just enough to squeeze through.
My wet sneakers slid on the linoleum floor. I was leaving a trail of
muddy footprints, but I didn’t care.
I crept across the room and hunched down in front of the computer.
My hand shook as I grabbed the mouse and moved to the bottom of the
newspaper page.
I heard voices. Tasha and Ms. Richards talking out in the hall.
Taking a deep breath, I frantically studied the page.
Then I typed a few words—in tiny, tiny type—at the bottom of the
front page. Giggling softly to myself, I wrote:
Calling All Creeps. Calling All Creeps. If you’re a real Creep, call
Tasha at 555-6709 after midnight.
Why did I add this little message to the front page of my school
newspaper?
Why did I sneak in at night and risk getting caught?
Why did I desperately need to get revenge against Tasha?
Well… it’s sort of a long story….
2
A few days ago, a new girl started at our school. Her name is Iris Candler.
She walked into my class and stood awkwardly at the front of the room,
waiting for Ms. Williamson to assign her a seat.
I was busy trying to do the math homework assignment before the bell
rang. Somehow I forgot all about it the night before.
I took a few seconds from my furious scribbling to check out the new
girl. Kind of cute, I thought. She had a round face with big blue eyes and
short blond hair parted in the middle. She wore long, red plastic earrings
that jangled when she moved her head.
Ms. Williamson gave Iris a seat near the back. Then she asked me to
show Iris around the school during the day. You know. Point out where the
lunchroom is and all the bathrooms and everything.
I nearly cried out in surprise. Why did Ms. Williamson pick me? I
guess it was because Iris just happened to be sitting right next to me.
I heard a couple of kids laugh. And I heard someone mutter, “Sicky
Ricky.”
Kids in my class are always on my case. I hoped that Iris didn’t hear
them.
I admit it. I wanted to impress her. I liked having someone new to talk
to, someone who didn’t know that everyone thought I was a loser.
At lunchtime I walked Iris downstairs to the lunchroom. I told her
about how new the school was. And how when we moved in for the first
time, hot water came out of all the cold water faucets, and cold water came
out of the hot.
She thought that was pretty funny. I liked the way her earrings jangled
when she laughed.
She asked me if I was on any sports teams.
“Not yet,” I answered.
Not in a million years! I thought.
Whenever guys are choosing up teams on the playground, the captains
always fight over who gets me. It’s always:
“You take him!”
“No fair! You have to take him!”
“No. You take him! We had him last time!”
I’m not exactly a super jock.
“This is the lunchroom,” I told Iris, leading the way through the door. I
instantly felt really dumb. I mean, what else could it be? The band room?
As soon as I entered, I saw my four enemies at their usual table in the
middle of the room. I call them my four enemies because… they’re my four
enemies!
Their names are Jared, David, Brenda, and Wart. Wart’s name is really
Richard Wartman. But everyone calls him Wart—even the teachers.
These four seventh-graders are always making fun of me. When
they’re not making fun of me, they’re trying to injure me!
I don’t know what their problem is. I never did anything to them. I
guess they pick on me because I’m easy to pick on.
I grabbed two food trays and guided Iris to the food counter. “This is
hot food over here,” I explained. “No one ever eats the hot food unless it’s
pizza or hamburgers.”
Iris flashed me a nice smile. “Just like at my old school,” she said.
“Be sure to stay away from the macaroni,” I warned. “No one ever eats
the macaroni. We think they serve the same macaroni all year. See that crust
on top? Whoever heard of macaroni with a crust?”
Iris laughed. I brushed back my hair. I wondered if she liked me.
We both picked up sandwiches and bags of potato chips. I put a bowl
of red and green Jell-O and a bottle of kiwi-strawberry drink on my tray.
“The cashier is over here,” I told Iris.
I showed Iris how you hand your food ticket to the cashier and get it
punched. I was feeling pretty good. I think Iris was impressed by all my
helpful instructions.
I spotted a couple of seats at a table near the window. I motioned to
them with my head. Then I started through the crowded, noisy room,
holding my tray high in both hands.
Of course I didn’t see Wart stick his foot out.
I tripped over it. Fell forward. And my whole tray went flying.
I hit the floor in time to look up and see the red and green Jell-O bound
across a table and onto a girl’s lap. The rest of my food slid over the floor.
Kids laughed and cheered and clapped.
“There goes Ricky!” someone exclaimed. “Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!”
Wart and his three pals started chanting: “Sicky Ricky… Sicky
Ricky!”
I glanced up and saw Iris laughing too.
I just wanted to disappear.
My face suddenly felt burning hot. I knew I was blushing.
What am I going to do? I thought, lying there on my stomach. I really
can’t take this any longer.
What can I do?
3
After school I made my way to the eighth-grade classrooms at the end of
the building. The school newspaper office is in Ms. Richards’ room.
Ms. Richards sat at her desk, grading papers. As I stepped into the
doorway, she glanced up and frowned. Then she returned to her work.
I saw Tasha typing furiously at the computer in the corner. Her lips
moved as she wrote. Her forehead furrowed in heavy concentration.
I walked over to the assistant editor, an eighth-grader named Melly.
Melly has short, straight brown hair and wears glasses with brown frames
that match her hair. She was leaning over a long news story, running her
finger down the page as she read.
“Hi, Melly,” I said.
She glanced up and frowned too. “Ricky—you made me lose my
place.”
“Sorry,” I said. “Any stories for me today?”
You probably wonder why I signed up to be a reporter on the Harding
Herald. It’s not that I’m a great writer or anything.
Every kid at Harding needs twenty activity points a year. That means
you have to try out for sports or join clubs or other after-school activities.
No way I was going to try out for a sport. So I signed up for the
newspaper. I thought it would be easy.
That’s because I hadn’t met Tasha yet.
Tasha treats all sixth-graders like bugs. She makes a disgusted face
when a sixth-grader walks into the room. Then she tries to step on us.
She gives all the good story assignments to eighth-graders. Do you
know the first story she asked me to write? She asked me to count the dirt
patches in the playground and write about why grass didn’t grow there.
I knew she was just trying to get me out of the office. But I wrote the
story anyway. It’s hard to write a good story about dirt patches. But I did a
really good job. My story was five pages long!
She never printed it in the paper.
When I asked her why, she said, “Who cares about dirt patches?”
My next assignment was to interview the night janitor about the
differences between working days and nights.
That one didn’t get into the paper, either.
I wanted to quit. But I really needed the activity points. If I didn’t earn
twenty activity points, I couldn’t graduate from sixth grade. I’d have to go
to summer school. Really.
So I kept coming to the Harding Herald office two or three afternoons
a week after school, asking Tasha for more news stories to write.
“Anything for me?” I asked Melly.
She shrugged. “I don’t know. Ask Tasha.”
I moved over to Tasha’s desk. Her face reflected the blue monitor as
she typed away. “Any stories for me?” I asked her.
She kept typing. She didn’t glance up. “Wait till I’m finished,” she
snarled.
I backed away. I turned and saw Ms. Richards walk out of the room.
Some kids were talking by the table near the window, so I crossed over to
them.
David and Wart—two of my enemies—were arguing about something.
They’re both sports reporters for the paper. They write about all the
Harding games. The rest of the time they hang around the office, making
trouble.
David is tall and blond. Wart is short and lumpy and red-faced. He
looks a little like a wart!
I saw some cookies and cans of soda on the table. I tried to walk
around David and Wart to get to the drinks. But Wart stepped in front of
me.
He and David both grinned. “How was your lunch, Ricky?” Wart
asked.
They laughed and slapped each other a high five.
I glared at Wart. I wanted to wipe the grin off his face. “Why did you
trip me?” I could feel my face growing hot.
“I didn’t,” he lied.
David laughed.
“You did too!” I insisted. “You stuck out your foot—”
“No way,” he said. “I didn’t touch you.”
“You tripped over a crack in the floor,” David chimed in. “Or maybe it
was an air pocket.”
They both laughed.
They’re so lame.
I grabbed a can of Pepsi off the table, popped it open, and started to
walk away.
“Hey, wait—” Wart held me by the shoulder.
I spun around. “What’s your problem?”
“That’s the can I wanted,” he said.
“Too bad. Get your own,” I told him.
“No. I want that one.” He swiped at the can.
I swung my hand out of his reach.
Lost my grip. And the can went flying across the room.
It sprayed Pepsi as it flew. Then landed in the middle of Tasha’s
keyboard.
She let out a squeal. Jumped up. Knocked her chair over.
I quickly grabbed up a handful of paper napkins from the table and
darted across the room.
“Don’t worry. I’ll clean it up!” I told Tasha. The keyboard was soaked.
I frantically started to mop the keys. “No—Ricky—stop!” Tasha shrieked.
Too late. I stared in horror at what I had done.
4
“Aaaaiiiiii!” Tasha opened her mouth in an angry scream. She tugged at her
red hair with both hands.
“You creep! Ricky, you creep!” she cried.
She shouldn’t call people names. But she had good reason to be angry
at me.
I had erased the whole front page.
The screen glowed at us. Bright blue. Solid blue.
No words. No pictures.
“Uh… sorry,” I murmured.
“Maybe I can get it back,” Tasha told Melly. “Maybe there is a way to
find it and pull it back up.”
Tasha shoved me out of the way, picked up her chair, and sat down.
“Oh!” She let out another cry when she realized she had sat in a puddle of
soda.
Staring at the solid blue screen, she began typing furiously.
I could see that the keys were still wet and sticky. She kept making
mistakes. Backing up. Typing again. Typing. Typing. Muttering under her
breath the whole time.
No use. No good.
The front page refused to come back.
Finally, she gave up with a loud groan. She tossed her hair in the air
with both hands. And turned to me with a growl.
“You creep!” she cried. “All that work! All that work—lost!”
I swallowed hard. “Tasha, it was an accident,” I muttered. “Really. It
was just an accident.”
“You little creep!” Tasha shrieked. Melly stood beside her, glaring at
me angrily, shaking her head.
“Wart pushed me!” I cried. I turned to the table. Wart and David had
vanished from the room.
“You’re off the paper!” Tasha screamed. “Get out, Ricky. You’re out of
here!”
“Huh?” My heart stopped for a second. “No, Tasha—wait!” I pleaded.
“Get out! Get out!” She made shooing motions with both hands. The
way you shoo away a dog. “You’re off the paper! I mean it!”
“But—but—but—” I sputtered like an outboard motor. “But I need the
activity points! Please give me a second chance! Please!” I begged.
“Out!” Tasha insisted.
Melly tsk-tsked and shook her head.
“You’re so unfair!” I wailed.
I know, I know. I sounded like a baby. But, give me a break. It really
was unfair.
I turned and slunk to the door. And guess who was standing there.
Guess who had watched the whole ugly scene.
You’re right.
Iris.
Her first day of school. And she already knew what a loser I was.
“What are you doing here?” I asked glumly.
“They said I needed an after-school activity. So I thought I’d try the
newspaper,” Iris replied. She followed me down the empty hall. “But I
don’t think I want to join the newspaper. That red-haired girl is really
mean.”
“Tell me about it,” I muttered, rolling my eyes.
“She shouldn’t have called you a creep,” Iris continued. “It was just an
accident. She’s horrible! She should give you another chance.”
Maybe Iris and I will become good friends, I thought.
I pulled my blue parka from my locker. Then Iris and I made our way
out of the building.
The afternoon sun was already dropping behind the houses and bare
trees. It gets dark so early here in the winter. Patches of snow on the lawns
and sidewalk gleamed dully as we walked toward the street.
“Which way is your house?” I asked, shifting my backpack over my
parka.
Iris pointed.
“Mine too,” I said. We started walking together. I didn’t really feel like
talking. I was still totally upset about getting kicked off the newspaper.
But I felt glad that Iris was on my side.
We crossed the street and made our way up the next block. A tall
hedge stretched along the entire block, broken only by driveways.
Some kids had marked off the street for a street hockey game. They
were skating back and forth, leaning on their sticks, cheering and shouting.
“Do you skate?” Iris asked.
“A little,” I told her. “My Rollerblades are kind of broken. The brakes
came loose and—”
“I always take off the brakes,” she said. “It’s a lot more fun without the
brakes—don’t you think?”
I started to answer. But a sound from behind the tall hedge made me
stop.
Was someone whispering?
Did I hear someone giggling?
Iris and I kept walking. She was telling me something about how kids
skated in the town she moved from. I didn’t really listen.
I kept hearing footsteps. Whispers. Scraping sounds. From the other
side of the hedge.
Finally, I raised a finger to my lips. “Iris—shhh,” I whispered.
Her blue eyes widened in surprise. “Ricky—what’s the matter?”
“I think we’re being followed,” I told her.
5
“I don’t hear anything,” Iris whispered. She narrowed her eyes at me.
We both listened.
Silence. Except for the cheers of the street hockey players behind us
down the block.
We started walking.
I heard a giggle. Some whispers.
I turned into the next driveway and darted behind the hedge.
“Who’s there?” Iris called. She came running up behind me. Her eyes
searched the hedge, then the front yard.
“No one here,” I said.
She laughed, “Ricky, why do you look so worried? You probably
heard a bird or something.”
“Yeah. A bird,” I repeated. I led the way around the hedge to the
sidewalk. I didn’t want Iris to think I was crazy. But I knew I’d heard
something.
We walked past a few more houses. Then I heard a whispered chant
from behind the hedge: “Sicky Ricky… Sicky Ricky…”
“Did you hear that?” I asked Iris.
She shook her head. I heard the distant hum of a plane, high overhead.
“Do you mean that plane?” she asked.
“No,” I replied. “I heard a voice.”
A soft giggle floated out from the hedge.
I ran to check it out. Nearly slipped on a slick patch of ice.
I grabbed the hedge to catch my balance. No one back there. An empty
front yard.
Straightening my backpack, I hurried to Iris on the sidewalk.
“Ricky, you’re a little weird,” she said. She laughed. But I could tell
she was starting to wonder about me. Starting to think maybe I was too
weird to be her friend.
“I heard someone back there. Really,” I insisted. “They must be hiding
in the hedge or—”
“AAAAAIIIIIII!” I heard a scream of attack!
The hedge shook.
I staggered backwards toward the street.
And four figures came leaping out of the hedge. Four kids shrieking
and cheering.
My four enemies!
I saw Iris’ face twist in surprise. And then Wart grabbed me. David
grabbed me too. Brenda and Jared joined them.
They pushed me one way. Then pulled me back.
Laughing and shouting, they spun me around.
Then David tackled me to the ground.
They swarmed around me. Pushed me down. Held me in the cold, wet
mud.
“Let go of me!” I shrieked.
I tried to kick and thrash and squirm free. But the four of them held me
firmly.
“Let go of me!” I wailed. “What are you going to do?”
6
“Let him go!” I heard Iris cry.
“Okay,” Wart replied. “No problem.” The big chubby wart had been
sitting on my chest. He climbed to his feet.
I took a deep breath.
The other three let go of me and took a step back.
I sat up, rubbing mud off my parka sleeve. I glanced at Iris. She stood
near the curb, hands balled into fists, her eyes wide with alarm.
With a groan, I started to stand up.
But Wart and Jared shoved me back down. “Not so fast,” Jared said.
Jared is short and skinny, but he’s real mean.
“What do you want?” I demanded.
Wart leaned over me. “Why did you tell Tasha that the soda can
accident was my fault?” he asked.
“Because it was your fault,” I shot back. I pulled a dead brown leaf
from my hair.
“But why did you tell Tasha?” Wart asked nastily.
“Because he’s a wimp,” David chimed in.
“Because he was scared,” Brenda said.
“Because you’re a snitch,” Wart accused.
“But it was your fault!” I cried. I tried to climb up, but they pushed me
down again.
Iris let out a short cry, then covered her mouth with both hands. I could
see she was really scared. “Don’t worry,” I called to her. “They’re not really
going to hurt me.”
I turned to Wart. “Right?”
All four of them laughed.
“What should we do to Ricky Rat?” Brenda said.
“Hurt him,” David replied.
They laughed again.
“No. Let’s make him sing,” Wart said, grinning at me.
“Oh, no!” I groaned. “Not again!”
They think it’s a riot to make me sing songs to them. They force me to
sing all the time. It’s because I have a terrible voice, and I can’t carry a
tune. “Please—” I begged.
“Yes. Sing a song—for your new friend,” Brenda said, motioning to
Iris.
“No. No way!” I insisted.
David and Jared bent down and grabbed my shoulders. They started to
push me deeper into the mud. “Sing a song,” Jared ordered.
“Sing The Star-Spangled Banner,” Wart said.
The others cheered and clapped. “Yes! The Star-Spangled Banner!
That’s the best!”
“Noooo,” I groaned. “Not again. Please, guys! Please! I don’t know
the words. Really. Don’t make me sing that song again!”
I begged and pleaded. Iris begged and pleaded.
But the four of them stood over me, staring me down, not letting me
up from the mud.
What choice did I have? I knew only one way to get them to leave. So,
sitting there on the cold, muddy ground, I started to sing.
“Oh, say can you see… ?”
They burst into loud laughter. They hooted and howled. They shoved
each other and slapped each other high fives. They practically fell down in
the mud themselves, they were laughing so hard.
“…and the hooooome of the brave.”
Somehow I made it through the whole song. Of course, I forgot most
of the words. And of course my voice cracked at the high parts.
And of course I’d never been so embarrassed in all my life.
Iris must think I’m the biggest jerk on the planet, I told myself. She
must think I’m a total loser.
I wanted to sink into the mud like a worm and never come back up.
I took off. I just started to run.
I didn’t glance back. Not at my four enemies. Not at Iris.
Especially not at Iris. I didn’t want to see her laughing at me too.
Or feeling sorry for me.
I ran all the way home without slowing down. Then I burst into the
house. Slammed the door behind me. And ran up to my room.
This is all Tasha’s fault, I decided.
First Tasha kicked me off the newspaper staff—because of an accident.
Then Tasha told Wart that I had blamed him.
So Wart and his pals had no choice. They had to chase after me and
embarrass me in front of Iris.
All Tasha’s fault… all Tasha’s fault…
I was still thinking about her as I struggled to fall asleep that night.
Still thinking about how I’d pay Tasha back some day.
It took hours and hours to fall asleep.
The phone beside my bed rang and woke me up Saturday morning.
Sleepily, I grabbed up the receiver.
Guess who was on the other end?
Tasha.
Yes. A surprise call from Tasha.
A call that would change my life.
7
“Huh?” I managed to choke out, still half asleep. I cleared my throat.
“I need your help,” Tasha said.
“Huh?” I sat straight up in bed. Tasha needed my help? Was I totally
asleep? Was I dreaming this?
“I need you to cover a story for me,” Tasha continued. “For the
newspaper. I’ve tried everyone else I know. They couldn’t do it. You are the
last person I wanted to call. But you’re my only hope.”
“Huh?” I replied.
“Ricky—is that all you can say?” Tasha demanded shrilly. “Did I wake
you up or something?”
“Huh? Uh… no.” I cleared my throat again. I shook my head, trying to
force myself to be alert.
Tasha needed my help?
“I need you to come to school and cover the Midwinter Car Wash,”
Tasha said. “I need a story and photos. Right away.”
“Huh?” I replied. Why couldn’t I stop saying that? I guess I was in
shock or something. “A car wash in winter?”
Tasha sighed. “You don’t know about the school car wash? Didn’t you
see all the signs? Don’t you read the newspaper?”
“Oh. Right. I just forgot,” I lied. I peeked out the window. Golden
sunshine. Nice day for a car wash.
“Great! I’ll come right to school, Tasha,” I told her. “Thanks for giving
me another chance.”
“I didn’t want to call you,” she said coldly. “But most of my reporters
went on a field trip. And the others are working at the car wash. If my dog
could take pictures, I would have used him.”
“Thanks a lot!” I cried.
I know. I know. She was trying to insult me.
But she was also giving me a chance. Maybe I wouldn’t have to take
summer school after all.
I pulled on a pair of faded jeans and a sweatshirt. Gulped down a fast
breakfast—some kind of pink, blue, and green cereal and a glass of orange
juice. Then I ran all the way to school.
It was a warm day. On the radio, they said it would snow tonight and
tomorrow. But it felt too warm to snow.
As I crossed the street to the school, I saw kids setting up the car wash
on the playground. A white banner, fluttering in the morning breeze,
proclaimed: HARDING CAR WASH—$5.
Kids were stretching long hoses from the back of the school building.
Several buckets were set on a long wooden table, along with sponges and a
stack of white towels. A blue Pontiac and a mini-van were already in line to
be washed.
I hurried into the building and down the hall to the newspaper room. I
found Tasha all alone in the classroom. She leaned over her computer,
typing away.
She frowned when she saw me run in. “I’d do the story myself,” she
said. “But I have to finish up the features page. I’ve never been this
desperate.”
Nice greeting, huh?
“I’ll do a good job. I promise,” I said.
She crossed the room and picked up a camera from Ms. Richards’
desk. “Here. Take this, Ricky.” She handed it to me. “And be careful with
it. It’s my dad’s Pentax. It’s really expensive, and it’s his favorite camera.”
I held the camera carefully in both hands and examined it. I raised it to
my eye. “Say cheese,” I said.
Tasha didn’t smile. “I’m warning you, Ricky,” she said sternly. “Don’t
let anything happen to that camera. Take four or five different shots of kids
washing cars. Then bring it right back to me.”
“No problem,” I told her.
“I want the story to be six or eight paragraphs,” she continued. “You’ll
have to write it today and get it to me by tomorrow at the latest. Ms.
Richards and I are going to finish laying out the paper and print it Monday
night.”
“No problem,” I repeated.
“I’m saving a column on page two,” Tasha said. “So promise me you
won’t mess up this time.”
“I promise,” I said.
Then I turned and hurried out to the playground.
I can do this, I told myself. I can handle it.
I can turn my life around this morning. Everything will be great after I
do this assignment.
That’s what I told myself.
But as soon as I arrived at the car wash, my life was ruined.
8
Squinting into the bright morning sun, I jogged across the playground. My
sneakers slipped in the wet grass. I carried the camera carefully in front of
me in both hands.
As I came closer, I shielded my eyes from the sun with one hand. I
recognized the blue Pontiac. It belonged to Wart’s parents. Kids with hoses
surrounded it, spraying it on all sides.
Raising the camera, I ran toward the car. “Hold it right there!” I called.
“Let me take a picture for the Herald!”
The first spray of water shocked me.
I felt something hit the front of my sweatshirt. Something cold.
I let out a startled cry.
The next two sprays hit me in the face and the chest—and sent me
sprawling backwards.
“Hey—!” I managed to shout. “Stop it! Are you crazy?”
I tried scrambling out of the way. But now there were four hoses
trained on me.
“Ohhhh.” The water was freezing cold!
Ducking out of the way, I recognized the four grinning faces aiming
the hoses. Brenda, Wart, David, and Jared.
Who else?
Sputtering, I turned and tried to run out of range. Cold water sprayed
down on me like a shower. Another hose caught me in the back.
“Stop it! Hey—stop it, you guys!” I cried.
And then I remembered the camera.
Ducking my head from another hard blast of water, I raised the
camera.
Drenched. Totally drenched.
“Aaaaaiiiiii!” An angry scream tore from my throat.
Staring in horror at the dripping wet camera, I lost it. For the first time
in my life, I totally lost it.
I strapped the camera around my neck. Then I spun around and hurtled
toward my four attackers.
My last chance! I told myself.
My last chance on the newspaper—and they’re ruining it!
Howling and giggling, the four seventh-graders tried to blast me back
with their hoses. But I lowered my head and came at them.
Sputtering, shaking off water, I leaped on Wart. I tackled him around
the waist and dragged him to the ground.
He cut his laugh short with a startled gasp.
I grabbed the hose from his hand. Pulled open the door to his parents’
car. And sent a spray of water into the car.
“Hey—noooooo!” Wart wailed.
Water from David’s hose shot against my back. Water sprayed the air
like a fountain. At the next car, I heard kids laughing and shouting in
surprise.
I drenched the backseat and then the front.
When I saw Brenda, David, and Jared drop their hoses, I dropped mine
too. And started to run.
They all chased after me.
I didn’t get far.
The grass was so slippery and wet. I ran a few steps—and then my
sneakers slid out from under me.
I went down hard.
Fell facedown into the grass.
On top of the camera.
9
“Does this mean I’m off the paper?” I asked meekly.
Tasha scowled and turned the camera over in her hands. “The lens is
cracked,” she murmured, shaking her head. “The whole camera is soaked
and bent.” Her voice trembled. “It—it’s wrecked.”
“It really wasn’t my fault,” I said softly.
She angrily blew a strand of red hair off her forehead. “You’ll pay for
it!” she cried. “You’ll pay for the camera, Ricky. If you don’t, my father
will sue you!”
“But, Tasha—” I pleaded. “You know it wasn’t my fault!”
“Go away,” she snapped. “Just go away. Nothing is ever your fault—
right?”
“Well… it wasn’t,” I insisted. “If you’d listen to me, Tasha—”
“You’re just bad news, Ricky,” she said, scowling at me again. She
examined the broken camera one more time, then dropped it onto a desk.
“You don’t take anything seriously,” she accused. “You think
everything is a goof.”
“But, Tasha—” I started to plead.
“Go away,” she said. “That was your last chance. You didn’t deserve
it. You’re just a creep. Why do you think all the kids call you Ricky Rat?
Because that’s what you are—a little rodent!”
Those words really stung.
I felt a stab of pain in my chest. I struggled to breathe.
I spun around so that Tasha couldn’t see how upset I was. And I
hurried out of the room and out of the school.
As I ran across the playground, I heard kids at the car wash singing
and laughing. They were soaping up cars, spraying them clean, having a
great time.
As I passed by, I heard some kids start to chant, “Sicky Ricky, Sicky
Ricky.” And I heard some other kids laugh.
I turned my head away and kept running. I knew that by Monday,
Tasha would have told everyone about how I ruined her father’s camera.
The story would be all over school. Everyone would know how Ricky
Rat had messed up again.
Running home with Tasha’s words still in my ears, I felt more angry
with each step. I wanted to scream. I wanted to explode!
That’s when I decided to pay Tasha back.
That’s when I decided to play a mean joke.
Creep… creep… creep…
The word repeated and repeated in my mind.
Ricky, you’re just a creep. Just a little rodent.
You’ll pay, Ricky. If you don’t, my father will SUE you!
Rodent. Rodent. Rodent.
She had no right to call me that. It wasn’t fair.
I had been so hurt, so angry. But by the time I reached home, I was
smiling. I knew what I wanted to do. I knew how I was going to take my
revenge.
I had my plan all worked out in my mind.
It couldn’t fail. It couldn’t.
So, here I am.
Monday night. I sneaked into the classroom where Tasha and Ms.
Richards were working.
I gleefully typed my little message on the bottom of the front page of
the newspaper.
I knew I had to hurry. Tasha and Ms. Richards would return any
second.
I listened tensely for any sound, for any sign that they were near.
I had never been so nervous in all my life. But I also had a smile on
my face.
Ricky, they all think you’re a loser. But you’re a genius! I
congratulated myself.
Only you could have dreamed up such a wonderful, nasty revenge.
Glancing up at the doorway every two seconds, I finished typing in my
message for Harding Middle School newspaper readers:
Calling All Creeps. Calling All Creeps. If you’re a real Creep, call
Tasha at 555-6709 after midnight.
I read it over. It made me smile again.
I felt like jumping up and down and laughing out loud.
But I knew I couldn’t make a sound.
I stood up. Turned to the window. Started to make my escape.
Halfway to the window, I heard Tasha cough and step into the room.
I was caught.
10
I froze.
So close, I thought. So close. The window stood only five steps away.
Five steps—and I would have been out of there.
But the five steps seemed as far as five miles now!
I shut my eyes and waited for Tasha to cry out.
Instead, I heard Ms. Richards’ voice from out in the hall. “Tasha—
would you come here for a moment?”
I opened my eyes in time to see Tasha disappear back out the door.
Had she seen me? No. No way. She would have screamed.
Whewwwwww! I let out a long sigh—and dove out the window.
I landed on my elbows and knees. Scrambled frantically to my feet.
And started running.
I didn’t even bother to close the window. Too risky, I decided.
For the third time in four days, I ran all the way home.
On Friday and Saturday I ran home a disgrace, a loser, a creep.
Tonight I ran home a winner. A champion! A genius!
I let myself silently into the house. I could hear voices from the TV in
the den. Mom and Dad were still watching the Weather Channel.
I listened for a moment in the front hallway, catching my breath. Bad
storms in the Pacific Northwest… flood warnings…
A few weeks ago, I tried to get Mom and Dad to switch channels to
MTV. But they hated MTV because it never gave the weather.
I felt so happy, so excited. I wanted to rush into the den and tell them
about my great joke.
But, of course, I couldn’t do that.
Instead, I made my way silently up to my room and closed the door.
Who could I call? I had to call someone. I had to share my little secret
with someone. But who?
Iris.
Yes. Iris. She would appreciate it. Iris would understand.
My heart pounding, I reached for my phone. It took me a while to
remember Iris’ last name. I had only heard it once. Chandler? Candle?
Candler. Yes. Iris Candler.
I got the phone number from information and called her. The phone
rang once. Twice. Iris picked it up after the third ring.
We both said hello. She sounded surprised to hear from me.
“Guess where I went tonight?” I asked her. But I didn’t wait for her to
guess. I blurted out the whole story. It all just burst out of me. I don’t think I
took a breath!
“Is that great or what?” I demanded when I had told her every detail. I
laughed. “The paper comes out tomorrow,” I said. “Tasha won’t be sleeping
much tomorrow night. She’ll be getting calls all night from every kid in
school!”
I waited for Iris to laugh. But I heard only a long silence on her end of
the line.
“Don’t you think it’s funny?” I asked finally.
“Kind of,” she replied. “But I have a bad feeling about it, Ricky. A
very bad feeling.”
“Iris, it’s just a joke,” I told her. “What could go wrong?”
11
When I arrived at school the next morning, guess who I saw first.
You’re right. Tasha.
She turned her nose up as if she smelled rotten fish. Then she hurried
past me without saying a word.
I didn’t care. I thought about my little surprise for Tasha on the bottom
of the Herald’s front page. I knew it would keep me smiling all day.
Believe me, I needed something to smile about.
As I turned the corner to go to my locker, Josh and Greg, two kids
from my class, deliberately bumped into me. “Ricky, stop bumping into
me,” Josh said.
Greg bumped me again. Then he pushed me into Josh.
“Hey—give me a break! I said stop bumping into me!” Josh cried.
“Get a life,” I muttered. I dodged away from them.
They walked off laughing, bumping each other from one side of the
hall to the other.
Funny guys, huh? About as funny as a broken arm.
I pulled open my locker and started unloading books from my
backpack.
“Hey, Ricky—want to wash my dad’s car?” a kid named Tony shouted
from across the hall.
I had my head in my locker. I didn’t look around.
I heard kids laughing at Tony’s hilarious joke.
“Hey, Ricky—want to wash something?” Tony called. “Wash your
face!”
What a joker.
Everyone laughed again.
I slammed my locker door and walked past them without saying a
word. This is all Tasha’s fault, I told myself. But I’m going to have the last
laugh tonight.
I turned the corner and headed to class. I saw Brenda and Wart at the
water fountain against the wall. I tried to run past them. But I wasn’t fast
enough.
Brenda pressed her hand over the fountain—and shot a spray of cold
water onto the front of my shirt.
“Have a squirt—Squirt!” Wart called.
Big laughter, up and down the hall.
“My dad is suing you for wrecking his car!”
Wart called. “He’s suing your family for every penny they’ve got!”
“Tell him to get in line,” I muttered under my breath.
“Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!” someone chanted.
Welcome to “Pick on Ricky Day” at Harding Middle School.
Unfortunately, every day is “Pick on Ricky Day.”
But today I didn’t care. Today I knew I’d end up a winner.
Today the joke was on Tasha. The student newspaper would be handed
out this afternoon. And Tasha would be up all night, answering phone calls.
Sweet, sweet revenge was mine.
That night I had to go out for dinner with my parents and my cousins who
live across town. Mom and Dad didn’t bring me home until nine thirty, and
I had about two hours of homework to do.
So I didn’t tuck myself into bed until nearly twelve—very late for a
school night.
I just started to drift off to sleep when the phone beside my bed rang.
I squinted at my clock radio—two minutes until twelve.
“Now who would call this late?” I asked myself.
12
I fumbled for the phone in the dark. Knocked it off the bed table. It clattered
loudly onto the floor.
I dove out of bed and grabbed the receiver. Then I hunched on my
knees, listening for Mom and Dad. Did they hear the phone ring? I’m not
allowed to get calls after ten o’clock.
I cleared my throat and raised the phone to my ear. “Hello?”
“Ricky—it’s me. Iris.”
I glanced at my clock radio again. “Iris? It’s midnight. How come
you’re calling so late?” I asked. “Are you okay?”
“My father was on the phone practically the whole night. Ricky—did
you see the school paper?” she demanded in an urgent whisper.
“Huh? No,” I replied, climbing onto the edge of my bed. “When they
started to pass out the newspapers, I got called to the library. The librarian
wanted to ask me about a bunch of books I lost. When I came back to the
room, all the papers were gone.”
“So you didn’t see the paper?” Iris asked shrilly.
“No,” I repeated. “I didn’t get my copy. Is it great? Can you read the
message at the bottom okay?”
“Well…” Iris hesitated.
“Is it great?” I asked excitedly.
“Not exactly,” Iris replied softly. “Actually, Ricky, you’re in… major
trouble.”
“I’m what?” I squeezed the phone to my ear. She was talking so softly,
I could barely hear her. “Iris… I’m what?”
“In major trouble,” she repeated.
A chill swept down my back. “Major trouble? But—why, Iris? What
do you m-mean?” I sputtered.
“The message—” she started.
Then she stopped. Silence on the other end.
“Iris—I can’t hear you!” I said. “Iris—?”
“Uh-oh,” she murmured. “I’ve got to get off. My dad is screaming at
me.”
“But, Iris—” I insisted. “Why am I in trouble? You’ve got to tell me!”
“I’m getting off!” I heard her call to her father. “It was only a short
call, Dad. I know it’s midnight!”
“Iris, please—tell me. Tell me before you hang up!” I begged.
“Got to go. Bye,” she said. I heard a click. The line went dead.
I slammed the receiver down angrily. What was her problem? Why
couldn’t she tell me why I was in trouble?
I slid the phone back in place beside the clock radio and climbed into
bed. I punched my pillow a few times, puffing it up. Then I pulled the
blankets up to my chin.
I shut my eyes and tried to calm down enough to fall asleep.
The phone rang again.
I sat straight up with a startled gasp. This time I managed to pick up
the phone without knocking it to the floor.
“Iris, thanks for calling me back,” I whispered.
“I saw your message in the school newspaper,” a voice whispered.
“Iris—?” I swallowed hard. I knew it wasn’t Iris.
“I saw your message,” the voice whispered. “I am calling as you
instructed.”
“Huh? You’re calling me?” I cried.
“Yes. I’m following your instructions,” came the whispered reply.
“Hey—who is this?” I demanded.
“I’m a Creep.”
13
I slammed down the phone.
Then I settled back into my bed. I puffed up my pillows again, and
pulled the blanket over my shoulders.
The wind howled outside my bedroom window. Shadows cast by the
street lamp in front of our house danced over my wall.
My brain was spinning.
Who was that?
I couldn’t be sure, but it sounded like a boy. Why did he call me? The
message I put in the newspaper gave Tasha’s phone number.
I didn’t have long to think about it. The phone rang again.
I grabbed up the receiver before the first ring ended. My eyes shot to
the bedroom door. If Mom or Dad heard me getting these calls, I’d really be
in major trouble!
“Hello? Who is it?” I demanded.
“Hi. I’m a Creep.” A different voice. A boy. Speaking softly.
“Huh?” I gasped.
“I’m a Creep. I called as soon as I saw your orders.”
“Give me a break!” I cried. I slammed down the phone.
“What is going on?” I muttered out loud. I sat staring at the phone.
Watching it in the dim light. Waiting.
Was it going to ring again?
“Ricky—!” a voice boomed.
I jumped a mile.
The ceiling light clicked on. Dad stood in the doorway in his blue-andwhite striped pajamas. He scratched his cheek. “Ricky—what are all those
calls about?” he demanded.
I shrugged. “Calls?”
He narrowed his eyes at me suspiciously. “I heard the phone ring three
times,” he growled.
“Oh. You mean those calls!” I tried to sound innocent. But I knew I
didn’t stand a chance.
“You know you’re not allowed to get calls after ten,” Dad said sharply.
He yawned. “It is after midnight. Now who is calling so late?”
“It’s some kind of a joke,” I told him. “You know. Kids from school.”
He brushed his sandy hair off his forehead. “I don’t think it’s funny,”
he said.
I lowered my head. “I know. But it isn’t my fault—”
He raised a hand to silence me. “Tell your friends to stop,” he said. “I
mean it. If they keep calling so late, I’ll have to take your phone away.”
“I’ll tell them,” I promised.
I’d tell them to stop, I thought, if I knew who they were!
Dad yawned again. He has the loudest yawn in the world. It sounds
more like a roar.
When he finished yawning, he clicked off the light and disappeared
back to his room.
As soon as he left, the phone rang again.
“Please—” I started.
“I’m a Creep,” a whispered voice told me. A girl this time. “I saw your
message. I’m ready. Ready to plant. Ready to rule. When will the Creeps
meet?”
“Huh? Meet?” I didn’t wait for an answer. I hung up the phone.
Staring at the phone, I felt totally confused.
Why am I getting all these calls? I wondered.
Is there some kind of a mix-up?
And why are the calls so strange? Why did that girl say she’s ready to
plant? Ready to rule?
What is going on?
The phone rang again…
14
The next morning, I dragged myself to school. The phone hadn’t stopped
ringing until two in the morning. That’s when I took it off the hook. I spent
the rest of the night twisting and turning, thinking about all the weird calls.
I didn’t fall asleep until seven. Which is the time my alarm goes off to
wake me up!
At breakfast, my head nearly dropped into my corn flakes. I just
wanted to go back to bed. But Mom and Dad didn’t feel sorry for me at all.
They were furious. The ringing phone had kept them awake too.
“You tell those kids not to call again,” Mom warned. “Or else I’ll go in
to your school and tell them myself!”
“No—please!” I begged. “I’ll tell them. I’ll tell them this morning!
They won’t call again. I promise!”
Can you think of anything more embarrassing than having your mom
come to school, barge into your classroom, and lecture the kids in your
class?
They already make fun of me every day and call me “Sicky Ricky.”
Can you imagine what they would call me if my mom came to school and
yelled at them all?
Whoa!
Just thinking about it gave me icy chills.
It took all my strength to pull myself to school and slump through the
crowded hall to my locker.
“There you are!” Iris cried.
I saw her waiting across from my locker. She wore a loose plaid shirt
over navy blue corduroy pants. Her long plastic earrings jangled softly.
She had been leaning against the tile wall. Now she pushed through a
group of girls to get to me. “Here, Ricky. Take a look.”
She handed me the latest copy of the Harding Herald. I grabbed it
eagerly and lowered my eyes to the bottom of the front page.
Yes. There it was. In tiny type across the whole bottom margin. My
message.
Except it had been changed a little.
I moved my lips, reading it softly to myself:
“Calling All Creeps. Calling All Creeps. If you’re a real Creep, call
Ricky after midnight.” Then it gave my phone number.
My phone number. Not Tasha’s.
My name and number.
I let out a low moan and weakly handed the paper back to Iris.
She shook her head and tsk-tsked. “You look terrible. Did you get any
sleep at all?” she asked.
“No,” I murmured.
I grabbed the newspaper back and read it again. “How did this
happen?” I cried.
Tasha’s grinning face flashed into my mind.
“Tasha!” I screamed her name. And then I took off, pushing my way
through groups of kids, hurtling over someone’s backpack.
I ran down the long, curving hall to the eighth-grade classrooms. And
burst into Tasha’s room just as the early bell rang.
My eyes frantically swept the room. I spotted her near the front,
handing a notebook to another girl.
“Tasha—” I called, running up to her. I waved the newspaper in her
face. “I—I—” I sputtered breathlessly.
She tossed back her red curls and laughed. “I caught your little joke
just in time,” she said. “Did you get any calls last night, Ricky?”
“A few,” I muttered angrily.
The whole class burst out laughing at me. Even the teacher.
All morning, I had the feeling that everyone was watching me. Laughing at
me. Maybe I imagined it. Maybe I didn’t.
I kept thinking about the calls I’d received the night before. I knew
they were all from kids at school. But why were they saying such strange
things?
I saw your instructions…
I’m ready to plant. Ready to rule.
When will the Creeps meet?
At lunch, I carried my tray toward the back corner of the lunchroom. I
didn’t feel like eating with anyone. I didn’t feel like hearing more jokes,
more kids laughing at me.
I had to walk past the table where my four seventh-grade enemies
always sit.
Uh-oh, I thought. Wart and David were squirting their milk cartons at
each other. Brenda laughed so hard, chocolate milk ran out of her nose.
They see me. I’m going to get a milk shower, I realized. Too late to go
the other way.
To my shock, I passed right by the table without getting splashed or hit
by anything. Wart didn’t call out any nasty jokes. David and Jared didn’t try
to trip me.
What’s going on? I wondered as I hurried to the far corner of the room.
I know they saw me.
Why didn’t they chant “Sicky Ricky” and toss their drink cartons at
me the way they always do? They let me pass by as if they didn’t know me.
I slid my tray across the back table. No one ever sits in that corner. It’s
next to the furnace duct. Hot air blows out over the table while you eat.
I had picked up a sandwich of some kind of lunchmeat and a bowl of
tomato soup. I tilted my chair back against the wall and sat chewing on the
sandwich, watching the other kids.
Waiting. Waiting for someone to come over and make a joke about
how my tomato soup looked like clotted blood. Or make a joke about all the
calls I got after midnight.
Waiting for kids to start chanting “Sicky Ricky.” Or for Wart or one of
my other pals at his table to start throwing food at me.
But no.
No one paid any attention to me. I leaned back and ate my lunch in
peace.
I finished the soup and half the sandwich. I had picked up a bowl of
chocolate pudding for dessert. But the crust was too thick to force my spoon
through.
I gathered up my tray and stood up to leave.
And someone hit me in the forehead with a wadded-up piece of paper.
“Hey—!” I called out angrily. But secretly I felt glad. I mean, I just
didn’t feel normal going a whole lunch hour without anyone getting on my
case.
Rubbing my forehead, I glanced down at the paper. And realized it had
writing on it. A note. Someone had passed me a note.
I unfolded it and quickly read the scribbled words:
When will the Creeps meet?
15
I glanced around the room, trying to see who tossed the note to me. But no
one seemed to be looking at me. Wart and his three friends were pushing in
their chairs, carrying their trays to the tray deposit window.
Did one of them throw it? I wondered.
I read the note again, folded it up, and shoved it into my jeans pocket.
Then I carried my tray to the window and hurried out of the lunch room.
I bumped into Iris in the hall. “What’s up?” she asked.
I shrugged. “More Creeps,” I told her. “They seem to be following
me.” I sighed. “I guess I asked for it.”
“I told you I had a bad feeling about that joke of yours,” Iris replied.
“No way Tasha was going to let you get away with it.”
“Don’t rub it in,” I murmured unhappily. “If kids start calling me again
tonight, my parents will go totally ballistic. I’ll lose my phone for sure.”
“Maybe you should take it off the hook when you go to bed,” Iris
suggested.
Smart. Iris is very smart, I realized. I’m not sure I would have thought
of that.
I led the way upstairs. Lockers were banging all around us. Kids were
shoving in coats, pulling out books and notebooks, jamming stuff into their
backpacks. It was almost time for the bell to ring.
Iris stopped at her locker and turned to me. Her cheeks suddenly had
pink circles on them. “Would you do me a favor?” she asked.
“Sure,” I told her.
Was she blushing? What was she going to ask?
“It’s so hard being the new girl in school,” she said. “I thought I’d try
to make something really special for the school bake sale on Saturday. You
know. Try to impress everyone with my school spirit. Rah rah!” She shot up
both hands like a cheerleader.
I laughed and waited for her to continue.
“Well…” she hesitated. “Would you come with me after school
tomorrow to help me buy supplies? Flour and sugar and stuff? We could go
—”
“Of course!” I interrupted.
I felt so excited, I almost blurted out, “No girl ever asked me to go
anywhere before!”
But somehow I managed to stay cool enough not to tell her that.
“I’ll meet you behind the playground after school tomorrow,” I said.
“We can shop for whatever you need, and I’ll help you carry it all home.”
Big man, huh?
She thanked me, and I jogged down the hall to my locker. I actually
felt like skipping—or flying! Iris likes me, I decided. A girl in my school
likes me.
You probably think this is no big deal. But it was a very big deal to me.
It changed my whole mood. It made me forget about all the trouble I’d
been having. It made me forget I was me!
What a great day! I told myself. What an awesome day!
My happy mood lasted until I opened my locker.
16
Humming to myself, I slipped open the locker door. I squatted down and
started to pull some notebooks from the locker floor—when a flash of red
caught my eye.
Dripping red. Thick, dripping, red liquid oozing down the side of the
locker door.
I gasped. At first I thought it was blood.
Then I quickly realized I was staring at paint. Bright red paint.
I scrambled to my feet—and read the scrawled message someone had
painted on the door:
WHEN WILL THE CREEPS MEET?
“Whoa!” I cried out. I poked a finger in the paint and pulled it out
smeared with red.
The paint was fresh. The letters dripped down the locker door.
Someone had painted it just moments ago.
But who?
And why? Was it supposed to be a joke? What was the funny part?
It was all a mystery to me.
The bright red words glowed angrily out at me. I picked up my
backpack and slammed the door.
I didn’t have time to think about it all now. I had to get to class.
That night, the calls started early.
I finished my homework by eight thirty. I was in the den watching a
basketball game on TV with my dad. The phone rang, and Dad picked up
the cordless phone from the table beside him.
He muttered a few words, then shoved the phone toward me. “It’s for
you, Ricky.”
I carried the phone out into the hall to get away from the noise of the
basketball game. “Hello?”
“This is a Creep,” a whispered voice replied. “When will the Creeps
meet?”
I didn’t say another word. I clicked the phone off and carried it back
into the den.
I tried to watch the basketball game. But the phone kept ringing. One
whispered voice after another.
“I’m a Creep. I saw your message.”
“Are we ready to plant the seeds?”
“I’m a Creep. When are we meeting?”
This isn’t funny, I thought. This is too strange to be funny.
17
As soon as school let out the next day, I ran to my locker. I stuffed the
books I needed for homework into my backpack. Pulled on my blue parka.
And ran out to the playground to meet Iris.
Was I a little pumped up?
You guessed it. I couldn’t wait to take Iris shopping for baking
supplies. I’ll help her carry it all back to her house, I told myself. And then
maybe she’ll ask me to help her bake things for the bake sale.
Iris and I will work together. No girl had ever wanted to work together
with me. When Brittany Hopper found out I was going to be her lab partner
for frog dissection, she stayed home from school for two weeks!
I had to cut up my frog all by myself. And of course I made a
disgusting mess of it.
But Iris was different. Iris was new.
Do they give prizes at bake sales?
Probably not. But if they did, I’m sure Iris and I could win one. And
then the other kids in the school would see that I’m not such a loser.
These were my thoughts as I made my way to the back of the
playground. I had big plans. Big, BIG plans.
But my plans never came true. No chance.
Because I never met Iris.
I turned to the school to look for her—and Wart, David, Jared, and
Brenda jumped me from behind.
“Hey—let go!” I cried. I tried to squirm free.
But they swarmed over me and dragged me off the playground.
“Let go! What are you doing? Give me a break!” I screamed. I twisted
and kicked. But I wasn’t strong enough to break free.
They dragged me into the woods across from the playground. My
sneakers scraped and slid over the carpet of wet, dead leaves.
They pulled me between the bare trees, trembling in the soft afternoon
breeze. A scrawny squirrel scampered in front of us, searching the wintry
ground for food.
“What are you going to do?” I cried. “Let me go! I mean it!”
They ignored my cries and dragged me through a clump of tall white
weeds. “This way,” David muttered.
He guided us to a line of high evergreen shrubs. Clumps of gray snow
clung to the limbs of the shrubs.
Behind the evergreens, we were completely hidden from the street.
With a hard tug, I pulled free.
Actually, I think they let me pull free.
I spun around. My eyes searched for the best way to escape. It
wouldn’t be easy. The snow-covered evergreen shrubs surrounded us on all
four sides.
Wart and his friends stood tensely around me. They stared at me, as if
waiting for me to speak.
“Why did you drag me here?” I demanded. I tried to sound calm, but
my voice cracked. “What are you going to do to me?”
Their faces remained blank. Stern and serious. They didn’t even laugh
when my voice cracked.
Finally, Wart broke the tense silence. “We wouldn’t harm you,
Commander,” he said.
I was sure I hadn’t heard him correctly. “Excuse me?” I cried.
“We are the Creeps,” Wart continued.
My mouth dropped open. “So you’re the ones who have been calling
me? And sending me messages?”
All four of them nodded solemnly. “Yes, Commander,” Brenda said.
She shook off some wet snowflakes that had fallen from the trees onto her
long black hair.
“I should have known it was you,” I muttered through clenched teeth.
“Yes. You should have known,” Jared repeated.
“We called as soon as we got your message, Commander,” David
chimed in.
“What is this ‘Commander’ stuff?” I snapped. “Why are you calling
me that?”
“We didn’t guess that you were the Commander,” Wart replied. “If we
had known who you were, we never would have teased you and played
mean jokes.”
“Please accept our apology, Commander,” Brenda added. “We are so
sorry.”
“You should have made yourself known to us sooner,” David said.
“Yes. Now we must act quickly,” Wart added.
“What are you talking about?” I screamed. “What is your problem?”
Were they trying to drive me crazy? What was this stupid new game
about?
“I have to meet someone,” I told them impatiently. “I don’t have time
for dumb games.”
Some kids in my school were into fantasy games. They spent hours
and hours role-playing characters in different fantasy worlds. You know.
With dragons and elves and things.
But I never saw Wart and his pals playing those games.
So what on earth did they think they were doing now?
I knew it was all a stupid joke. It had to be a joke.
So why weren’t they laughing? Why did they appear so grim?
Brenda trained her round dark eyes on me. “You no longer have to
pretend,” she said. “Now that we know you are the Commander, we must
act quickly.”
“We Creeps have so little time,” Wart said, his eyes also locked on
mine.
“It is urgent,” David added. “That is why we have been calling you. To
meet as soon as possible.”
I saw the squirrel poking its head out from behind the evergreen shrub
on the end. I wondered if I made a run for it, could I escape?
“Commander, we cannot understand why you have been delaying,”
Brenda said.
“Guys, this isn’t funny—” I started.
They nodded solemnly. “We know,” Jared said softly. “We have so
little time to complete our mission.”
Mission? Had they all totally lost it?
How long had it taken them to dream up this dumb joke? Did they
really think I would buy it?
“What is the point of this?” I demanded.
“The Identity Seeds will grow stale in one week,” Brenda said.
“We have so little time to plant them,” David added fretfully. “So little
time to turn everyone in the school into Creeps.”
“Seeds? Plant seeds?” I laughed. What else could I do? I laughed in
their faces. “Am I going crazy, or are you?” I asked.
“If we do not plant the seeds in time…” Wart started. But his voice
trailed off before he finished his sentence.
Brenda picked up where Wart left off. “If we fail to plant the Identity
Seeds,” she said, keeping her eyes on me, “our mission will fail.”
Wart placed a hand on my shoulder and gazed at me solemnly. “And of
course, Commander, you know what will happen to you if the mission
fails.” He made a slicing motion across his throat.
A heavy silence fell over the woods. A burst of wind shook snow off
the evergreens. I suddenly felt cold all over.
Brenda reached into her backpack. She pulled out a clear plastic bag
and raised it toward me. “I have the Identity Seeds with me, Commander,”
she announced.
I studied the seeds inside the bag. They looked exactly like chocolate
chips.
“As you know, Commander, every student must eat a seed,” Wart said.
“It takes only one seed to turn a human into a Creep.”
“The Creeps must rule!” Jared declared loudly.
“Humans are the past!” Brenda cried, raising the bag of seeds high.
“Creeps are the future!”
All four of them cheered. And as they cheered, they began to change—
into MONSTERS!
18
“Creeps rule! Creeps rule!” they chanted.
I stared in horror as their faces twisted and their bodies began to
transform.
Bumps popped out all over their heads. Bumps about the size of
quarters rose up on their arms and hands.
Their skin began to darken. In seconds, they were all bright purple.
The big purple bumps trembled and shook on their skin.
Their faces stretched. Their hair disappeared into their purple skulls.
Their eyes sank into their flat, purple heads.
Long, ropy tongues flicked from between jagged rows of teeth. Bumpy
purple tongues, glistening as they whipped them from side to side.
I stared at them, unable to move, unable to run. Unable to take my
eyes off the four creatures. Bumpy lizard creatures.
Creeps.
They grunted and wheezed. Their eyes rolled wetly. Their long snouts
dripped. Their lizardy jaws snapped open and shut.
“NOOOO!” I cried out as Wart sprang at me.
I thought he was attacking.
But he scrambled past me—and grabbed the scrawny squirrel between
both purple hands. Instantly, his jaws flew open, and he stuffed the squirrel
inside.
He swallowed it without chewing. The furry tail slid down last.
His bumpy tongue licked his wet lips. “Sorry there wasn’t enough to
share.” He grinned at the others.
“How was it?” Brenda hissed.
“A little dry,” Wart replied.
“I don’t like them with the skin on,” Jared chimed in.
For some reason, that made them all laugh. Ugly, dry laughs that
sounded like choking.
All four of them flicked out their long, bumpy tongues and slapped
each other’s tongues, as if slapping high fives.
I took a deep breath. My legs felt so weak, I thought I might fall to the
ground. “I—I have to go now,” I stammered.
In her purple fingers, Brenda raised the bag of seeds in front of my
face. “Only one week left, Commander,” she said. “How will we plant them
inside the students? We have waited so long for you. Do you have a plan?”
“Yes. My plan is to get out of here—now!” I replied.
I turned to leave. But they had me surrounded. Their wet eyes studied
me. Their purple chests heaved noisily in and out. The bumps on their skin
quivered.
Wart made a little bow, like a servant. “But if you leave, Commander,
when will the Creeps meet again?” he asked softly.
“Yes. We must meet again soon. We must make a plan,” David added
solemnly.
“Before the week is out, every student at Harding Middle School must
eat an Identity Seed,” Brenda declared.
The others nodded.
“The Creeps will rule,” Wart said softly. “The student humans will all
become Creeps!”
Their tongues flicked out again and slapped each other in a fourtongued high five.
I’ve got to get away from them—now! I told myself.
I’ve got to report them. I’ve got to tell someone at school who they are
—and what they’re planning to do.
But—how?
19
I decided to play along with them. To stall. To act as serious as they were.
If they figure out that I’m not their Commander, they’ll do something
horrible to me! I realized.
I pictured the squirrel tail sliding down Wart’s throat.
And I started to gag.
How can I get away from them? I wondered.
As soon as I escaped, I could report them to someone—to anyone who
would listen!
“Brenda, let me see those seeds,” I said, trying to sound as if I were
giving an order. My voice came out strong and steady. But my hand
trembled as I reached for the bag.
I took the bag and carefully unwrapped the twist-tie on top. Then I
raised the bag to my face, studied the seeds for a long time, and took a deep
sniff.
No. Definitely not chocolate chips.
The seeds had a faintly sour smell. Not terrible. But not sweet or
chocolatey either.
“One for each kid,” I murmured, eyeing them carefully. “One seed for
each.”
The four Creeps nodded their purple heads. “At least one for each
student,” Brenda said. “That’s all it will take to turn them all into Creeps.”
She snapped her long rows of jagged teeth.
It’s not going to happen, I decided.
No way.
I’m not going to let it happen. I’m going to get help. I’m going to stop
them.
But first I had to get out of the woods.
“Well, we Creeps will meet again soon,” I said. I handed the seed bag
back to Brenda. “We must all think of the best plan. And then we will call
each other, and pick a good time, and meet again.”
I turned and took two steps toward the street.
That’s as far as I got.
Wart’s long, bumpy tongue wrapped around my neck. He turned me
around by pulling in his tongue. “But, Commander—I have a good plan!”
he declared.
“Good,” I said, trying not to gag again. I could still feel the wet,
bumpy tongue on my skin. “We will meet soon and talk about your plan.”
“No—now!” Wart insisted. “Commander, we must talk now. We can
put my plan into action tomorrow morning!”
“Huh? Tomorrow?” I gasped. “I think we’d better wait a day,” I
started. “You see, if we all wait—”
They eyed me suspiciously. Their purple jaws opened and closed.
I turned back to Wart. “What’s your plan?”
He took a deep, wheezing breath and began. “Tomorrow morning, we
get to school very early. The lunchroom cooks all arrive early. They prepare
lunch first thing in the morning.”
“Yes. That gives the chocolate pudding plenty of time for the crust to
harden!” I joked.
No one laughed.
“I’ve been studying the kitchen carefully,” Wart continued. “After the
cooks set out the food in the morning, they take a ten-minute break. That’s
our chance. If we sneak in during their break, we can plant the seeds in the
lunchroom food.”
“Everyone eats in the lunchroom. It’s a school rule,” David chimed in.
“So every student will eat at least one seed.”
“And by nighttime, they will no longer be humans. They will all be
Creeps like us,” Jared added.
“What do you think of my plan? Will it work?” Wart asked.
They all stared at me, waiting for my answer.
“The plan sounds pretty good,” I said finally. I rubbed my chin,
pretended I was thinking hard about it. “I will talk to you all tomorrow and
let you know my decision.”
Their lizardy faces drooped with disappointment. “Tomorrow?” Wart
cried unhappily. “But we could do it tomorrow morning, Commander. We
could plant the seeds, and by tomorrow night—”
I raised a hand to cut him off. “Tomorrow,” I said firmly.
They were still grumbling to each other as I turned and hurried away. I
expected one of them to grab me and pull me back. But this time, they let
me go.
I edged through an opening in the evergreen shrubs. Then I started to
jog. Between the bare, trembling trees. Across the street. And down the
block toward my house.
What am I going to do? I asked myself as I ran.
I can’t let them turn everyone in school into Creeps. I can’t let them
drop their Identity Seeds in the lunchroom food.
But how can I stop them?
If I tell them not to do it, they will figure out that I’m not their
Commander. They will figure out that they made a mistake.
And then what? What will they do to me if they find out I’m not a
Creep? Will they gobble me up the way Wart swallowed that poor squirrel?
My side started to ache, but I kept running. I pictured all the kids in
my school turning into bumpy, purple lizard creatures. I pictured them all in
the woods, grabbing squirrels and swallowing them whole.
I pictured us all slouching around, slapping high fives with our
tongues.
Yuck!
“What am I going to do?” I asked myself out loud.
I was the only one who knew about the Creeps—and the only one who
could stop them.
And I had to act fast.
20
“Pass the mashed potatoes,” Dad said with a mouthful of chicken. “And the
biscuits, please.”
I passed the food down the table. I took another drumstick from the
bucket. Mom and Dad both work hard, so they don’t have time to cook.
They usually pick up something on the way home. Tonight it was a fried
chicken bucket, with a bunch of side dishes.
They are always starving when they get home. There’s no point in
talking to them until they’ve finished their first helping. They can’t even
hear you over the sound of their chewing!
I really wasn’t hungry. My stomach felt as if it were tied in tight knots.
I kept staring at the chicken and picturing squirrel.
I waited until most of the chicken had been gobbled up. Then I took a
deep breath and started my story.
“There’s something I have to tell you,” I said softly.
They both raised their eyes from their plates. Dad had a swirl of
mashed potatoes on his cheek. Mom reached over and brushed it off with
her fingers.
“Are you in trouble at school again, Ricky?” she asked sternly. “Have
the kids been picking on you?”
“No. That’s not it,” I replied quickly. “I have to tell you something. I
mean, I need your help. You see—these four kids—”
“Take a deep breath,” Dad said. “Start at the beginning.”
“Calm down,” Mom added. “What’s gotten you so wired?”
“Please—let me tell it!” I cried.
They both settled back and lowered their forks to the table.
“These four kids,” I started again. “They’re not really kids. I thought
they were seventh-graders. But they’re not. They’re Creeps. They’re not
kids at all. I mean, they’re new to the school. I never saw them before this
year. But I thought…”
Mom and Dad exchanged glances. Dad opened his mouth to say
something—then changed his mind.
“They came here with a mission,” I told them. “They want to turn all
the kids in school into Creeps. They have these Identity Seeds, a big bag of
them. They’re going to feed the seeds to all the kids.”
I ran out of air. I hadn’t taken a breath. I took a long one now, and
continued my story.
“They think I’m a Creep, too. They think I’m their Commander.
Because of a message I typed on the bottom of the school newspaper. They
want me to help them turn all the kids into Creeps. Horrible monsters!”
I took another breath. I was so excited, so nervous, I felt as if my heart
had jumped to my throat.
I leaned across the table and stared first at Mom, then at Dad. “We
have to stop them!” I cried. “You have to help me. We can’t let them turn
everyone into Creeps. But what can we do? How can we let people know
that they’re not really kids? How can we stop them? You’ve got to help me.
You’ve got to!”
I let out a long whoosh of air and dropped against the back of the chair.
I struggled to slow down my racing heart.
My parents glanced at each other again. I could see the troubled
expressions on their faces.
Dad was the first to speak. “Ricky,” he said softly, “your mom and I
are Creeps too.”
21
I gasped and nearly tumbled off my chair.
Mom and Dad burst out laughing.
“No. Actually we’re Martians!” Dad declared.
“No way. We’re not Martians,” Mom argued. “We’re werewolves!”
She picked up a chicken bone and pretended to chomp on it like a wolf.
“We’re Martian werewolves!” Dad cried. He tossed back his head and
howled like a wolf.
Then they both laughed loudly again. They really thought they were a
riot.
“You’ve got to take me seriously!” I pleaded.
For some reason, that made them laugh even harder. Dad actually had
tears in his eyes from laughing so hard. He raised his napkin and dabbed at
his eyes.
“Ricky, sometimes you come up with the greatest things,” he said. He
reached over and slapped my shoulder.
“What an imagination,” Mom commented. She shook her head. “You
really should write that story down, Ricky. It could win a prize.”
“But it isn’t a story!” I cried. I jumped to my feet and angrily tossed
my napkin onto my plate. “Why don’t you believe me?”
“Oh, we believe you—Commander!” Dad exclaimed. “Commander of
the Creeps!”
They both burst out laughing again.
I uttered an angry cry, turned, and stomped out of the dining room. I
could still hear them laughing as I stormed up the stairs to my bedroom.
I slammed the door behind me. And shook my fists in the air.
I had to find some help. I had to make someone believe me.
I slumped onto my bed and just sat there for a long while, staring at the
darkness outside the window. I waited for my heart to stop racing, for my
mind to calm down.
But I couldn’t get calm. My whole body tingled. My brain spun.
I grabbed the phone off my bedtable and punched in Iris’ number. Iris
will listen to me, I told myself. Iris will know I’m not making up a wild
story.
The phone rang three times. Four. Five.
No one home?
“Come on, Iris!” I begged into the ringing receiver. “Be there!”
I let it ring twelve times before I hung up.
I slammed the phone back onto the bed table. After I calmed down a
little, I sat down at my desk and tried to do my homework.
But I couldn’t keep my mind on it.
At least the phone isn’t ringing and ringing tonight, I told myself. The
Creeps weren’t calling me tonight.
They were waiting to hear from me. They were waiting to hear if I
okayed Wart’s plan to go to school early and plant the seeds in the
lunchroom food.
I slammed my science textbook shut.
“I will go to school early,” I said out loud.
But not to meet the four Creeps. Not to drop Identity Seeds into
everyone’s lunch.
I’ll go to school early and talk to Ms. Crawford, the principal. I’ll tell
her the whole story. I’ll tell her what the Creeps are planning to do at her
school.
She’ll help me stop them. I know she will.
My clock radio woke me half an hour earlier than usual. I clicked it off and
listened to a soft patter against my bedroom window.
Staggering across the room, I peeked through the blinds. A gloomy
gray day outside. Frozen rain dribbling down.
I yawned. I had tossed and twisted all night.
I got dressed quickly, pulling on a large red and brown flannel shirt
and baggy brown corduroy pants. I gulped down a fast breakfast of orange
juice and corn flakes.
“You’re up early this morning,” Mom commented sleepily. She stood
waiting for the coffeemaker to drip.
“Yeah. Got to go,” I mumbled. I grabbed my parka and backpack and
hurried out the back door.
I pulled my baseball cap down over my eyes and jogged through the
cold, drizzling rain. Such a dreary day. Everything looked gray this
morning. No bright color anywhere.
As I made my way to school, I practiced my speech to Ms. Crawford. I
wanted to tell the story right. I wanted everything in the right order. I didn’t
want to leave out any important parts.
I passed a man in a gray rain slicker, out walking his Dalmatian. I
didn’t see anyone else on the street.
The school appeared empty when I arrived. The halls were silent. My
wet shoes skidded over the floor.
I stepped into the front office. The room was empty. The two
secretaries hadn’t arrived yet. But I saw a light from the principal’s office in
back. And I heard a cough.
“Ms. Crawford, are you back there?” I called.
“Yes,” she called back. “Who is it?”
I heard her chair scrape. And then she poked her white-haired head out
of the office door. “Ricky?” She squinted at me in surprise. “You startled
me. You’re here awfully early, aren’t you?”
“I—I need to talk to you,” I stammered.
She motioned for me to step around the front counter and into her
office. “What is the problem?” she asked, closing the door behind me.
“It’s kind of a long story,” I began.
Would she believe me?
22
Ms. Crawford always reminds me of a black-and-white movie. She has
short, curly white hair, gray eyes, and a very pale face. And she always
wears black—black pants suits and black skirts and tops.
I don’t know how old she is. I think she’s pretty old. But she’s very
lively and athletic. Sometimes she joins in during volleyball games in the
gym.
I sat down in the stiff-backed chair in front of her desk. She moved
some files aside and leaned across the desk toward me. “I’m glad you came
by,” she said, her smile fading.
“Huh? Really?”
“I’ve been meaning to talk to you, Ricky,” she continued. “I
understand there was some trouble at the car wash last Saturday.”
She waited for me to say something. But I didn’t know what to say.
“I’ve been told that you started a water fight last Saturday,” Ms.
Crawford said sternly.
“Me?” I cried. “I didn’t start it! I—I—”
She motioned with one hand for me to be silent. “Mr. Wartman—
Richard’s father—called me to complain. He said that the inside of his car
was totally soaked. He told me that—”
“That’s who I want to talk to you about,” I interrupted. I could see that
this conversation was not going as I had planned. I decided I’d better jump
in as fast as possible.
“I want to talk to you about Wart,” I said. “I mean, Richard. He’s not a
kid, see. He told me. He’s a Creep.”
Ms. Crawford’s mouth dropped open. She blinked at me.
“And you know his three friends?” I blurted out. “They’re Creeps too.
They’re monsters. Purple monsters.”
Ms. Crawford twisted her face into a frown. “Ricky—” she started.
“No—really!” I insisted. “They’re monsters. They call themselves
Creeps! They told me so themselves. I saw them! Wart ate a squirrel! He’s a
Creep!”
This wasn’t going over well. I could see that by the deepening furrows
in Ms. Crawford’s forehead. It wasn’t the way I’d planned to tell the story.
But it was too late now. I had to get it all out.
“I’m their Commander,” I told the principal. “At least, they think I’m
their Commander. But I’m not really. And they—”
Ms. Crawford jumped to her feet. “Ricky—are you okay?” she asked.
“They want to plant seeds and turn the whole school into Creeps,” I
continued frantically. “They want…”
She stepped around her desk and placed a hand on my forehead. “Do
you have a temperature? You feel a little warm.”
She moved back and studied my face. “Would you like to see the
nurse? She usually comes in early.”
“No. Not the nurse!” I cried. “You don’t understand. We can’t let
anyone eat the lunchroom food! Because they’re monsters!”
Ms. Crawford scratched the top of her head. “Should I send you
home?” she asked. “Do you feel sick? I could have someone take you
home.” She reached for the phone. “Are your parents still home? I could
call them.”
“No—please!” I jumped to my feet. “I’m okay. Really.”
She wasn’t going to believe me. No way I could get her to listen to me.
“Just a joke,” I said, backing to the door. “Just a joke. Really. I’m sorry
about Mr. Wartman’s car. It was an accident. The hose just slipped.”
I fumbled for the door. Pushed it open. Backed out.
“Ricky, wait,” Ms. Crawford called. “I really think you should see the
nurse. Just talk to her. You seem very excited. Perhaps if you talk to her…”
“I’m fine. Really,” I insisted.
I turned and ran through the front office and out the door.
Into the long, empty hallway.
My heart flip-flopping in my chest, I turned the corner—and bumped
into Wart and his three friends.
“Ohh!” I let out a startled cry. “What are you doing here?”
“Glad you joined us, Commander,” Wart said in a whisper. His eyes
glanced up and down the hall. “Let’s go.”
“Go? Go where?” I demanded.
“To the lunchroom,” he replied.
23
I turned and looked for Ms. Crawford. But she had stayed in her office. The
long hall stood empty.
Wart and David moved to my sides. Brenda led the way to the stairs
that went down to the lunchroom and the kitchen. Jared walked close
behind me.
They had me surrounded. I had no choice. I had to go with them.
When we reached the bottom of the stairs, I could see the open doors
to the kitchen. Bright white light poured out to the hall.
I took a deep breath.
What was that smell? Tuna casserole?
I could hear women’s voices, the cooks working away at the stoves.
With Brenda leading the way, the five of us moved silently to the
kitchen doorway. Now I could hear the clatter of pots and the hiss of
something cooking on the stove. A woman coughed. Another one laughed.
Brenda turned suddenly, and I nearly walked into her. She shoved
something into my hand.
The plastic bag of seeds.
“You may have the honor, Commander,” she whispered solemnly.
“You may hide the seeds in the food.”
“Uh… well…” I pressed my back against the tile wall. I didn’t want to
go in there. I didn’t want the honor of planting the seeds.
“Maybe we should come back later,” I suggested. “Remember I
suggested that we wait? I told you to wait until—”
“We have no choice,” Jared whispered. “We know you want the
mission to succeed.”
“Good luck,” Brenda said softly.
David and Jared gave me a hard push into the kitchen.
Squeezing the bag of seeds between my hands, I blinked in the bright
light. I could see three women in white uniforms and white aprons. They
stood across the big room at the stoves against the wall.
They had their backs to me. Tall soup pots bubbled and steamed on the
stoves.
I swallowed hard. If one of them turned around, she’d see me instantly.
I slid beside a cabinet near the doorway. Ahead of me stood a long,
shiny aluminum counter. Enormous trays of food stood cooling on the
counter. I saw a big tray of macaroni and cheese, a tray of steamed broccoli,
a huge tray of tuna casserole.
I guessed it would take about ten steps to reach the counter. So close!
I could probably dive to the counter, pour the seeds out into one of the
big food trays, and run out the door in less than ten seconds.
Even if one of the cooks turned around, I could accomplish the
mission and be out of there before she could even cry out.
What am I thinking? I asked myself, pressing against the side of the
cabinet.
I don’t WANT to accomplish the mission!
I glanced back to the kitchen doorway. All four Creeps huddled there,
watching me. They waved their hands frantically, motioning me to get on
with it.
I had no choice. No way to escape.
I had to go ahead and plant the seeds.
I sucked in a deep breath and held it. Then, my eyes on the whiteuniformed backs of the three cooks, I crept up quickly to the long food
counter.
I stopped a few feet away. In front of me on the counter stood an
enormous square metal pan of macaroni and cheese. It was steaming hot,
fresh from the oven. The tangy cheese smell floated up to me.
I can’t do this! I decided. I can’t!
I turned back. The four Creeps leaned into the doorway, blocking my
escape. All four of them were signaling wildly for me to pour the seeds.
I turned back to the macaroni tray.
I raised the seed bag.
I pulled open the top.
They’re watching me, I knew. They’re all watching. I have to do this.
Or else they will know that I’m not their Commander.
I have to go ahead with it.
But then—in a flash—I had an idea.
24
I held the seed bag in one hand from the bottom. I raised it in front of me.
I turned and flashed the four Creeps a thumbs-up sign. Then I took a
step toward the food counter.
Another step.
And I pretended to trip over something.
I stumbled forward. My hands shot up. And the seed bag flew into the
air.
I faked a frantic attempt to catch it as I went down.
But the bag hit the side of the aluminum counter. Turned upside down.
And dropped to the floor, spilling the seeds all over the floor. I watched
them roll in all directions.
The bag lay on its side in front of me. Empty.
Yessss! I thought happily. I’ve done it! I’ve destroyed their plan!
I forced an unhappy expression on my face.
And scrambled on my hands and knees out the kitchen door.
Wart pulled me up and dragged me away from the open doorway.
I shook my head sadly. “Sorry,” I murmured. “I’m so sorry. I have
failed you all.” I pretended to be near tears. “Really. I’m so sorry.”
“No problem,” Jared replied.
He pulled another bag of seeds from his coat pocket and slapped it into
my hand.
“We always carry a spare,” Brenda whispered. “You never know when
you’ll need more Identity Seeds.”
“Uh… that’s lucky,” I replied.
“Now go do it!” Wart cried softly, slapping me on the back. “This time
you will not fail, Commander.”
The four of them pushed me back through the doorway.
I blinked, waiting for my eyes to adjust to the bright kitchen lights.
The three cooks were still working at the stoves. They still had their backs
to me.
I crept up to the food counter and peered down at the huge tray of
simmering macaroni. I had the seed bag gripped tightly in my right hand.
The little bag felt as if it weighed a hundred pounds!
I raised the seed bag over the steaming macaroni.
Glanced back to the doorway. All four of the Creeps leaned into the
opening, their eyes locked on me.
I turned back to the food counter. Raised the bag higher over the
macaroni tray.
I have no choice, I told myself. I have to do this now.
I poured the whole bag of seeds over the top of the macaroni and
cheese. Then I turned quickly to the door. And tiptoeing silently, started to
sneak out of the kitchen.
“Stir them!” Brenda whispered. She made a stirring motion with her
hand.
“Huh?” I stopped a few feet from the door.
“Stir the seeds in!” she whispered urgently. “You’ve got to hide them!”
“Oh. Right.”
I turned and crept back up to the big tray of macaroni and cheese. I
picked up a long wooden spoon and stirred the seeds into the macaroni.
Then I turned to sneak back out.
I took three steps—when two strong hands grabbed my shoulders
roughly from behind. “What are you doing in here, young man?” a woman
barked.
25
The hands spun me around. I stared up into the angry face of Mrs. Marshall.
“What are you doing in here?” she repeated.
Mrs. Marshall is the nice cook. She’s our favorite. She always kids
around with everyone at lunchtime when she dishes out the food.
But she wasn’t kidding around now. She knew I didn’t belong in the
kitchen.
Her black curls pressed against her hair net. She tilted her head, hands
in her white apron pocket, waiting for me to answer her question.
I glanced to the door. Saw the four Creeps peeking in.
“Mrs. Marshall,” I whispered. “Don’t serve the macaroni.”
She squinted at me. “Huh? Speak up, young man.”
“Don’t serve the macaroni,” I whispered, a little louder. I couldn’t say
it much louder. Wart and his three friends would hear me. “Please—don’t
let anyone eat the macaroni,” I begged.
“What are you saying?” she demanded loudly. “Why are you
whispering?”
“Don’t serve the macaroni,” I repeated, still in a whisper. “It’s
poisoned!”
She uttered an angry groan. “Young man, our macaroni is delicious,”
she declared. “I’m so sick and tired of jokes about our food.”
“She’s right!” Another cook, Mrs. Davis, chimed in from across the
room. She waved a long mixing spoon at me. “We make good, wholesome
food here. It’s like home-cooked. And we’re tired of all the horrible jokes.”
“We have feelings, you know,” Mrs. Marshall added.
“We use real cheese in the macaroni,” Mrs. Davis called, still waving
her spoon. “None of that artificial stuff. And real macaroni noodles.”
“That’s right!” the third cook called. She was new. I didn’t know her
name. “Give him a taste, Alice. Give him a taste of the macaroni. He’ll see
how good it is.”
Mrs. Marshall leaned over me. “Good idea. Would you like a little
bowl of macaroni?” She stepped over to the food counter.
“Try it. You won’t make any more jokes,” Mrs. Davis said.
Mrs. Marshall started to spoon out a little bowl of macaroni for me.
I backed up toward the door. “No. Please. No thank you,” I sputtered.
I reached the doorway. “I… I had a big breakfast,” I told them.
I turned and ran out. And bumped into the four Creeps. They all
cheered.
“Commander… you have done it!” Wart cried happily. “You have
planted the seeds!”
They cheered again, and clapped and slapped me on the back. All four
of them were grinning their heads off.
“Now we just have to wait till this afternoon,” Brenda declared. “This
school will be crawling with Creeps!”
26
I didn’t go near the lunchroom at lunchtime. I hid in a stairwell instead. My
stomach was growling, but I didn’t care.
I couldn’t bear to see all the kids gobbling down the macaroni.
Swallowing the little seeds that would turn them into squirrel-eating
Creeps.
A school full of purple lizard monsters, I thought miserably. And all
my fault… my fault.
All afternoon, I didn’t hear a word my teacher said. Iris tried to talk to
me, but I pretended to be listening really hard to the teacher.
I sat at my desk, studying the other kids. Watching for signs that they
were changing. Waiting for the seeds I had planted to do their evil.
But I didn’t see anything odd. No bumpy purple skin. No long, flicking
tongues.
The kids all appeared normal.
After school, the four Creeps were waiting for me in the playground.
They surrounded me and led me to our hiding place in the woods across the
street.
Wart angrily kicked a stone out of his way. David and Jared were
muttering unhappily and shaking their heads.
“It didn’t work,” Brenda said softly. “The seeds didn’t work. No one
changed.”
“What went wrong?” Wart asked. “What could have gone wrong?”
They all stared at me.
Suddenly, I knew the answer. I knew exactly why none of the kids had
turned into Creeps. “No one ate the macaroni,” I blurted out.
I could have kicked myself. Why did I tell them? Why did I tip them
off?
They narrowed their eyes at me. “Huh?”
“No one ever eats the macaroni,” I said. I’d already started. I had to
explain. “It’s sort of a school rule. The macaroni hasn’t been touched by
anyone in years and years!”
All four of them groaned.
Wart stepped up to me and stared at me suspiciously. “How do you
know that, Commander?” he demanded. “You arrived here only a few days
before we did. So how do you know that the macaroni hasn’t been eaten in
years?”
I had to think fast. If they discovered that I wasn’t a Creep, they’d
probably disintegrate me—or eat me—or something!
“Uh… one of the kids in my class told me,” I replied. I lowered my
head. “I should have remembered sooner. I have failed you. Our mission is
a failure.”
“No, it isn’t,” Brenda chimed in. “I have more seeds—and a new plan.
A better plan.”
The other Creeps turned to her. “Tell us your plan,” Jared demanded.
“We don’t have much time before the seeds lose their power.”
“It’s simple,” Brenda replied with a shrug. “We bake the seeds into
cookies. Then we hand out the cookies for free at the school bake sale on
Saturday.”
“Excellent idea!” David cried.
“Yaaaay!” Wart and Jared cheered.
“Everyone gets a free cookie,” Brenda said, grinning an evil grin.
“And everyone becomes a Creep.”
Brenda’s grin made me feel cold all over. I swallowed hard. My mouth
suddenly felt so dry.
I knew that her plan would work. I knew that no one in my school
could pass up a free cookie.
What can I do? I asked myself. How can I stop them?
They all turned to me. “Shall we bake the cookies, Commander?” Wart
demanded. “Shall we put Brenda’s plan into action?”
I stared back at them. They were eagerly waiting for my answer. I
wondered if they could see my knees shaking.
“Well…” I took a deep breath. I had to try something. I had to think of
something to stop them.
“I don’t like Brenda’s plan,” I said, trying to keep my voice low and
steady. “I think we must prepare the seeds for a later time. I think we should
bury the seeds in the ground and see if they sprout. That way, we’ll have
lots and lots of seeds!”
I know. I know. It was a really lame idea.
But it was the only thing that popped into my mind.
Would they buy it? I wondered.
Would they forget about Brenda’s plan and go along with it?
Would they agree to bury the seeds?
No way.
It took me only a few seconds to realize I had made the worst mistake
of my life.
27
“Bury the seeds?” Brenda cried. “Bury them?”
The four of them moved in closer. They formed a tight circle around
me.
I glanced nervously around, searching the woods for the best path to
escape. But they had me trapped.
“Are you sure you are our Commander?” Wart demanded.
David and Jared sneered at me. “A Creep Commander would never tell
us to bury the Identity Seeds,” Jared said menacingly.
Wart stuck his face up close to mine. “Prove you are our Commander,”
he ordered.
“Yes. Prove you are a Creep!” David cried.
“Prove it! Prove it!” All four of them began to chant.
I gasped and tried to back away. But they had me surrounded.
“Prove it! Prove it!”
And as they chanted, they began to change once again. Their skin grew
bumpy and turned bright purple. Their hair slid into their heads, and their
jaws stretched into long, toothy snouts.
“Prove it! Prove it!” they chanted. “Prove that you’re a Creep!”
I stared at them, unable to move, unable to run. What could I do?
“Prove you’re a Creep!” they demanded. “Prove it—now!”
Eyes flashing wildly, purple bumps quivering all over their bodies,
they slithered toward me.
And I knew I was doomed.
28
“Prove it! Prove it!”
Their long, bumpy tongues flicked at me as they chanted.
“Prove that you’re one of us! Change now! Let us see you change like
us!”
I swallowed hard. They were chanting for me to change, staring,
waiting.
They’d have to wait a long, long time!
“Change! Change! Change!”
They were about to learn the truth about me.
I decided I had to confess. And beg them for mercy. “Uh… guys…?” I
started.
But then a girl’s shout rose over the chanting of the Creeps. “Stop at
once!” she cried.
We all turned to see Iris come running out from behind a tall
evergreen. The four Creeps uttered grunts of surprise. Their eyes rolled
wildly in their purple lizard heads.
“I am the Commander’s second-in-command!”
Iris declared, her long earrings jangling wildly. “I am his sergeant!”
The Creeps pulled their long, bumpy tongues into their snouts. They
stared at Iris, suddenly silent.
“The Commander and I do not choose to transform now,” Iris told
them sternly. “We do not have time. We must bake the cookies now. We
must prepare the seeds for the bake sale.”
“Yaaaay!” The Creeps cheered Iris.
“Thank you, Sergeant,” Brenda said. “I am glad you like my plan.”
“Your plan will work,” Iris replied. “We will turn the whole school
into Creeps like us. Quickly. Let us hurry to my house and bake the
cookies.”
The four lizard creatures offered up another cheer. They slapped
tongues. Then they quickly began to change back into kids.
The purple on their skin faded. The quivering bumps slid into their
skin. Their snouts shrunk and their faces twisted back into the faces of the
kids I knew.
As they changed back, I leaned close to Iris and whispered in her ear.
“Iris—you’re really one of them?”
“Yes, Commander,” she replied, keeping her eyes on the four Creeps.
“Do not worry. This new plan will not fail.”
I opened my mouth to say something, but no sound came out. I
couldn’t believe it. Iris—a Creep!
We began making our way through the woods. Iris led the way to her
house.
The afternoon sun was sinking behind the bare trees. The air suddenly
felt cold and heavy. I couldn’t stop the chills that rolled down my back.
I’d had a close call in the woods. Iris had saved me. But I knew my
troubles weren’t over.
I was in terrible danger.
So were all the kids at school.
We stepped into Iris’ kitchen. Why did Iris save me? I wondered. She
knows I’m not one of them. She knows I’m not a Creep.
So, why did she rescue me from the other four Creeps?
As the four of them took out flour and eggs and other ingredients, I
pulled Iris aside. “You know I’m not a Creep,” I whispered. “Why did you
rescue me?”
“I’m not a Creep either,” she whispered back. “But I saw you were in
big trouble.”
“How did you know—?” I started. I glanced back into the kitchen to
make sure the Creeps weren’t watching us.
“You were supposed to meet me on the playground—remember?” Iris
whispered. “I saw them drag you into the woods. I followed you. I heard
everything. And I saw everything.”
“Well, thanks for saving me,” I replied. “But now you are in danger
too.”
She nodded. “I know. But I had to save you—didn’t I?”
“How are we going to save the rest of the school?” I whispered.
“Good question,” Iris replied. “We have to bake the cookies now. We
don’t have a choice. When we get to the bake sale, we’ll figure out a way to
keep kids from eating them.”
“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes.
How would we keep kids from grabbing up free cookies?
How?
29
On Saturday morning, Iris and I and the four Creeps carried our big trays of
cookies into the gym.
What a crowd!
Every kid in school was there. They were running back and forth,
carrying trays of baked goods to the tables. Talking and laughing and
kidding around.
A podium with a microphone had been set up under the basket at one
end of the gym. The long row of tables stretched from one wall to the other.
As Iris and I walked to the tables, the four Creeps stayed close at our
sides. Protecting the cookies. Watching our every move.
The cookies with the Identity Seeds inside were piled high on the two
trays. We had baked hundreds of them. More than enough for every kid in
school.
We passed by a group of kids gobbling down brownies. At the near
table, Ms. Williamson, our teacher, was busy cutting slices in a cheesecake.
I saw dozens of plates of cookies spread over the tables.
Signs were posted, giving the prices. Just about everything cost a
dollar. Nothing was free.
Our cookies were the only free items.
How could I stop kids from taking them? How could I make sure that
no one ate them?
We headed to the tables. But Wart stepped in front of us. “Start giving
them out now,” he urged.
“Yes. There’s no reason to wait,” Brenda agreed. “Let’s pass out the
cookies. The gym is totally jammed with kids. In a few minutes, we’ll have
dozens of new Creeps.”
Wart grabbed for the tray.
David and Jared pulled the plastic wrapping off the cookies.
I’ve got to act—now! I knew.
But what could I do?
As Wart lifted the cookie tray from my hands, I had an idea.
I dodged past him. Swung my way around a group of chocolate cake
eaters. Leaped behind the podium where Tasha was about to make a
welcoming speech. And grabbed the microphone.
“Attention! Attention, everyone!” I screamed.
A loud squeal from the speakers got everyone’s attention. My panicky
voice echoed off the high gym walls.
“Don’t eat the free cookies!” I shouted. “Please—listen to me,
everyone! Don’t eat the free cookies! You will all become monsters! Bumps
will grow all over you, and you’ll look like purple lizard creatures! And…
and… you’ll eat squirrels whole!”
Everyone laughed. The laughter drowned out my desperate words.
“You’ve got to believe me!” I shrieked into the microphone. I could
see Wart and David running toward the podium. “You’ve got to! Stay away
from the free cookies!”
The laughter rose up until I couldn’t hear myself.
“Get away from that mike!” Tasha screamed. She tried to grab the
microphone from my hands.
Two teachers rushed up to pull me away.
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” Tasha started to chant. And then the rest
of the huge crowd of kids joined in.
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” The gym rang with their chanting and
wild laughter.
I could feel my heart sink to my stomach.
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” The chanting made me feel as if my head
was about to burst.
I wanted to cover my ears. I wanted to run. I wanted to disappear.
How can I save them if they’re just going to laugh at me? I wondered.
What can I do if they refuse to listen to me?
And then I had another idea. An even more desperate plan than
grabbing the microphone and begging them.
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” Tasha led the chanting.
I tried to ignore the laughing, shouting voices. I knew I had only a few
seconds to act.
Would my plan work?
Probably not. But it was the only thing my panicked brain could come
up with.
I’ll gobble down all the cookies myself, I decided.
I’ll grab the trays and eat all the cookies—and save everyone in the
school.
With a wild leap, I pushed past a bunch of chanting kids. I grabbed the
tray of cookies from Wart’s hands. And I opened my mouth to start
swallowing them down.
30
“Ow!”
I cried out when something smacked me in the forehead.
I wasn’t hurt. Just startled.
I reached a hand up and felt something wet and gooey. Someone had
thrown a piece of chocolate pie.
Kids laughed. Tasha ran up and flashed my picture.
“Hey—!” I cried out angrily.
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” some kids chanted.
“Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!” I heard other kids sing.
Someone threw a brownie. I ducked and it sailed over my shoulder. I
nearly dropped the tray of cookies. Laughing, Tasha snapped another photo.
“What’s wrong with you?” I shouted. “I’m trying to save you!”
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!”
“Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!”
Don’t they realize what danger they’re in? I asked myself. Why are
they making fun of me? Why do they always make fun of me? I’m only
trying to save them!
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!”
Someone hit me in the chest with a gooey slice of cheesecake.
I raised the cookie tray. I’ve got to save them, I told myself. I have to
ignore all the teasing and chanting and laughing. I’ve got to save them all!
Wart and Brenda closed in on me. “Commander, what are you waiting
for?” Wart asked. “Pass out the cookies.”
“Ignore their chanting,” Brenda said. “Once they eat the cookies, they
will all be Creeps. You will be their leader. They will all be your slaves!”
I’ve got to save them, I repeated to myself. Got to save them. Got to
save them…
I turned to Brenda. “Huh? What did you say?”
“I said they will all be your slaves!” Brenda shouted over the chanting
and laughter.
My slaves?
My slaves?
My slaves???
I ducked as someone tossed another slice of cheesecake at me.
“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” they chanted.
“Here—Tasha—have a cookie!” I cried. I held the tray out to her and
watched her take it.
“Have a cookie! Free cookies!” I shouted at the top of my lungs.
Hands grabbed eagerly for the cookies. I moved quickly, happily
around the gym, handing out cookies to every kid.
“Plenty for everyone!” I shouted. “That’s right—they’re free! And
they’re the best! Free cookies! Free cookies! That’s it, everyone! Gobble
them up! One for everyone! Free cookies!”
I flashed my four friends a thumbs-up. And I took a cookie for myself.
Not bad. A little chewy, but very sweet.
I gazed around the gym. Watched everyone chewing up the free
cookies.
From now on, I told myself, things are going to be very different
around here.
And I can’t wait!
Scanning, formatting and basic
proofing by Undead.

BEWARE, THE SNOWMAN
Goosebumps - 51
R.L. Stine
(An Undead Scan v1.5)
1
When the snows blow wild
And the day grows old,
Beware, the snowman, my child.
Beware, the snowman.
He brings the cold.
Why did that rhyme return to me?
It was a rhyme my mother used to whisper to me when I was a little
girl. I could almost hear Mom’s soft voice, a voice I haven’t heard since I
was five….
Beware, the snowman.
He brings the cold.
Mom died when I was five, and I went to live with my aunt Greta. I’m
twelve now, and my aunt never read that rhyme to me.
So what made it run through my mind as Aunt Greta and I climbed out
of the van and gazed at our snow-covered new home?
“Jaclyn, you look troubled,” Aunt Greta said, placing a hand on the
shoulder of my blue parka. “What are you thinking about, dear?”
I shivered. Not from Aunt Greta’s touch, but from the chill of the
steady wind that blew down from the mountain. I stared at the flat-roofed
cabin that was to be our new home.
Beware, the snowman.
There is a second verse to that rhyme, I thought. Why can’t I
remember it?
I wondered if we still had the old poetry book that Mom used to read
to me from.
“What a cozy little home,” Aunt Greta said. She still had her hand on
my shoulder.
I felt so sad, so terribly unhappy. But I forced a smile to my face. “Yes.
Cozy,” I murmured. Snow clung to the windowsills and filled the cracks
between the shingles. A mound of snow rested on the low, flat roof.
Aunt Greta’s normally pale cheeks were red from the cold. She isn’t
very old, but she has had white hair for as long as I can remember. She
wears it long, always tied behind her head in a single braid that falls nearly
all the way down her back.
She is tall and skinny. And kind of pretty, with a delicate round face
and big, sad dark eyes.
I don’t look at all like my aunt. I don’t know who I look like. I don’t
remember my mom that well. And I never knew my father. Aunt Greta told
me he disappeared soon after I was born.
I have wavy, dark brown hair and brown eyes. I am tall and athletic. I
was the star basketball player on the girls’ team at my school back in
Chicago.
I like to talk a lot and dance and sing. Aunt Greta can go a whole day
without barely saying a word. I love her, but she’s so stern and silent….
Sometimes I wish she were easier to talk to.
I’m going to need someone to talk to, I thought sadly. We had left
Chicago only yesterday. But I already missed my friends.
How am I going to make friends in this tiny village on the edge of the
Arctic Circle? I wondered.
I helped my aunt pull bags from the van. My boots crunched over the
hard snow.
I gazed up at the snow-covered mountain. Snow, snow everywhere. I
couldn’t tell where the mountain ended and the clouds began.
The little square houses along the road didn’t look real to me. They
looked as if they were made of gingerbread.
As if I had stepped into some kind of fairy tale.
Except it wasn’t a fairy tale. It was my life.
My totally weird life.
I mean, why did we have to move from the United States to this tiny,
frozen mountain village?
Aunt Greta never really explained. “Time for a change,” she muttered.
“Time to move on.” It was so hard to get her to say more than a few words
at a time.
I knew that she and Mom grew up in a village like this one. But why
did we have to move here now? Why did I have to leave my school and all
of my friends?
Sherpia.
What kind of a name is Sherpia? Can you imagine moving from
Chicago to Sherpia?
Lucky, huh?
No way.
It isn’t even a skiing town. The whole village is practically deserted! I
wondered if there was anyone here my age.
Aunt Greta kicked snow away from the front door of our new house.
Then she struggled to open the door. “The wood is warped,” she grunted.
She lowered her shoulder to the door—and pushed it open.
She’s thin, but she’s tough.
I started to carry the bags into the house. But something standing in the
snowy yard across the road caught my eye. Curious, I turned and stared at
it.
I gasped as it came into focus.
What is that?
A snowman?
A snowman with a scar?
As I squinted across the road at it, the snowman started to move.
2
I blinked.
No. The snowman wasn’t moving.
Its red scarf was fluttering in the swirling breeze.
My boots crunched loudly as I stepped up to the snowman and
examined it carefully.
What a weird snowman. It had slender tree limbs for arms. One arm
poked out to the side. The other arm stood straight up, as if waving to me.
Each tree limb had three twig fingers poking out from it.
The snowman had two dark, round stones for eyes. A crooked carrot
nose. And a down-turned, sneering mouth of smaller pebbles.
Why did they make it so mean looking? I wondered.
I couldn’t take my eyes off the scar. It was long and deep, cut down the
right side of the snowman’s face.
“Weird,” I muttered out loud. My favorite word. Aunt Greta is always
saying I need a bigger vocabulary.
But how else would you describe a nasty-looking, sneering snowman
with a scar on its face?
“Jaclyn—come help!” Aunt Greta’s call made me turn away from the
snowman. I hurried back across the road to my new house.
It took a long while to unpack the van. When we lugged the final
carton into the cabin, Aunt Greta found a pot. Then she made us hot
chocolate on the little, old-fashioned stove in the kitchen.
“Cozy,” she repeated. She smiled. But her dark eyes studied my face. I
think she was trying to see if I was unhappy.
“At least it’s warm in here,” she said, wrapping her bony fingers
around the white hot-chocolate mug. Her cheeks were still red from the
cold.
I nodded sullenly. I wanted to cheer up. But I just couldn’t. I kept
thinking about my friends back home. I wondered if they were going to a
Bulls game tonight. My friends were all into basketball.
I won’t be playing much basketball here, I thought unhappily. Even if
they play basketball, there probably aren’t enough kids in the village for a
team!
“You’ll be warm up there,” Aunt Greta said, cutting into my thoughts.
She pointed up to the low ceiling.
The house had only one bedroom. That was my aunt’s room. My room
was the low attic beneath the roof.
“I’m going to check it out,” I said, pushing back my chair. It scraped
on the hardwood floor.
The only way to reach my room was a metal ladder that stood against
the wall. I climbed the ladder, then pushed away the flat board in the ceiling
and pulled myself into the low attic.
It was cozy, all right. My aunt had picked the right word.
The ceiling was so low, I couldn’t stand up. Pale, white light streamed
in through the one small, round window at the far end of the room.
Crouching, I made my way to the window and peered out. Snow
speckled the windowpane. But I could see the road and the two rows of
little houses curving up the mountainside.
I didn’t see anyone out there. Not a soul.
I’ll bet they’ve all gone to Florida, I thought glumly.
It was midwinter break. The school here was closed. Aunt Greta and I
had passed it on our way through the village. A small, gray stone building,
not much bigger than a two-car garage.
How many kids will be in my class? I wondered. Three or four? Just
me? And will they all speak English?
I swallowed hard. And scolded myself for being so down.
Cheer up, Jaclyn, I thought. Sherpia is a beautiful little village. You
might meet some really neat kids here.
Ducking my head, I made my way back to the ladder. I’m going to
cover the ceiling with posters, I decided. That will brighten this attic a lot.
And maybe help cheer me up, too.
“Can I help unpack?” I asked Aunt Greta as I climbed down the ladder.
She pushed her long, white braid off her shoulder. “No. I want to work
in the kitchen first. Why don’t you take a walk or something? Do a little
exploring.”
A few minutes later, I found myself outside, pulling the drawstrings of
my parka hood tight. I adjusted my fur-lined gloves and waited for my eyes
to adjust to the white glare of the snow.
Which way should I walk? I wondered.
I had already seen the school, the general store, a small church, and the
post office down the road. So I decided to head up the road, toward the
mountaintop.
The snow was hard and crusty. My boots hardly made a dent in it as I
leaned into the wind and started to walk. Tire tracks cut twin ruts down the
middle of the road. I decided to walk in one of them.
I passed a couple of houses about the same size as ours. They both
appeared dark and empty. A tall, stone house had a Jeep parked in the
driveway.
I saw a kid’s sled in the front yard. An old-fashioned wooden sled. A
yellow-eyed, black cat stared out at me from the living-room window.
I waved a gloved hand at it. It didn’t move.
I still hadn’t seen any other humans.
The wind whistled and grew colder as I climbed. The road grew
steeper as it curved up. The houses were set farther apart.
The snow sparkled as clouds rolled away from the sun. It was
suddenly so beautiful! I turned and gazed down at the houses I had passed,
little gingerbread houses nestled in the snow.
It’s so pretty, I thought. Maybe I will get to like it here.
“Ohh!” I cried out as I felt icy fingers wrap themselves around my
neck.
3
I spun around and pulled free of the frozen grip.
And stared at a grinning boy in a brown sheepskin jacket and a redand-green wool ski cap. “Did I scare you?” he asked. His grin grew wider.
Before I could answer, a girl about my age stepped out from behind a
broad evergreen bush. She wore a purple down coat and purple gloves.
“Don’t mind Eli,” she said, tossing her hair off her face. “He’s a total
creep.”
“Thanks for the compliment,” Eli grinned.
I decided they must be brother and sister. They both had round faces,
straight black hair, and bright, sky-blue eyes.
“You’re new,” Eli said, squinting at me.
“Eli thinks it’s funny to scare any new kids,” his sister told me, rolling
her eyes. “My little brother is a riot, isn’t he?”
“Being scared is about all there is to do in Sherpia,” Eli said. His grin
faded.
What a weird thing to say, I thought.
I introduced myself. “I’m Jaclyn DeForest,” I told them. Their names
were Rolonda and Eli Browning.
“We live there,” Eli said, pointing to the white house. “Where do you
live?”
I pointed down the road. “Farther down,” I replied. I started to ask
them something—but stopped when I saw the snowman they were building.
It had one arm out and one arm up. It had a red scarf wrapped under its
head. And it had a deep scar cut down the right side of its face.
“That s-snowman—” I stammered. “It looks just like one I saw across
the street from me.”
Rolonda’s smile faded. Eli lowered his eyes to the snow. “Really?” he
muttered.
“Why did you make it like that?” I demanded. “It’s so strange looking.
Why did you put that scar on its face?”
They glanced at each other tensely.
They didn’t reply.
Finally, Rolonda shrugged. “I really don’t know,” she murmured. She
blushed.
Was she lying? Why didn’t she want to answer me?
“Where are you walking?” Eli asked, tightening the snowman’s red
scarf.
“Just walking,” I told him. “Do you guys want to come with me? I
thought I’d walk up to the top of the mountain.”
“No!” Eli gasped. His blue eyes widened in fear.
“You can’t!” Rolonda cried. “You can’t!”
4
“Excuse me?”
I gaped at them in shock. What was their problem?
“Why can’t I go up to the top?” I demanded.
The fear faded quickly from their faces. Rolonda tossed back her black
hair. Eli pretended to be busy with the red snowman scarf.
“You can’t go because it’s closed for repairs,” Eli finally replied.
“Ha ha. Remind me to laugh later,” Rolonda sneered.
“So what’s the real reason?” I demanded.
“Uh… well… we just never go up there,” Rolonda stammered,
glancing at her brother. She waited for Eli to add something. But he didn’t.
“It’s kind of like a tradition,” Rolonda continued, avoiding my eyes. “I
mean… well… we just don’t go up there.”
“It’s too cold,” Eli added. “That’s why. It’s just too cold up there for
humans to survive. You would turn to ice in thirty seconds.”
I knew he was lying. I knew that wasn’t the real reason. But I decided
to drop the subject. They suddenly seemed so tense and worried.
“Where are you from?” Rolonda asked. She dug her gloved hands
deep into her coat pockets. “The next village?”
“No. Chicago,” I told her. “We lived in an apartment right on the lake.”
“And you moved here?” Eli cried. “From Chicago to Sherpia? Why?”
“Good question,” I muttered, rolling my eyes. “I live with my aunt,
see. And Aunt Greta decided to move here. So…” I couldn’t keep the
sadness from my voice.
We talked for a few more minutes. I learned that they had lived in
Sherpia their entire lives. “It isn’t so bad. You get used to not seeing many
people,” Rolonda told me.
“And it’s nice if you like snow,” Eli added. “Lots and lots of snow!”
We all laughed.
I said, “See you guys later,” and started walking up the road.
“You’re not going to the top—are you?” Eli called. He sounded really
frightened again.
“No,” I called back. I pulled my hood tight. “It’s getting kind of windy.
I’ll just go a little farther.”
The road curved higher. I crunched my way past a wide, woodsy lot
filled with pine trees nearly as thin as pencils. The trees tilted at all angles.
Not one of them stood straight up.
I saw animal tracks in the snow. Raccoon or squirrel? No. Too big.
Deer tracks? I couldn’t tell.
I raised my eyes—and cried out in surprise.
Another sneering snowman stared back at me with its twisted carrot
nose and coal-black eyes.
Its red scarf fluttered in the strong wind.
I stared at the long scar cut deep in its face.
Its twig arms waved in the wind, as if greeting me.
“Why do they build these creepy snowmen?” I asked out loud.
I turned—and saw another one in the front yard across the street. Same
tree-branch arms. Same red scarf. Same scar.
It must be some kind of village decoration, I decided.
But why didn’t Rolonda and Eli want to tell me about it?
Heavy gray clouds rolled over the sun. The snowman’s shadow
appeared to stretch until it swept over me.
I felt a sudden chill. I stepped back.
The sky quickly turned evening dark. I gazed up to the top of the
mountain. Clumps of pine trees hid the top from view.
Should I head back or keep going?
I remembered the fear on Eli’s face when I said I was climbing to the
top. And I remembered Rolonda’s cry: “You can’t!”
It only made me more curious.
What were they afraid of? What was up there?
I decided to keep going.
A van in the next driveway was buried under a thick sheet of snow. It
looked as if it hadn’t been driven all winter.
I followed the road as it curved away from the houses. The snow
became deeper and softer. My boots sank in as I walked.
I imagined that I was walking on another planet, a planet never
explored before.
The road climbed steeper. Large white rocks jutted up from the snow.
Clumps of slender pine trees tilted in every direction.
There were no houses up this high. I could see only trees and snowcovered shrubs and jutting rocks.
The road curved again. The wind whistled. I rubbed my cheeks and
nose to warm them. Then I leaned into the wind and kept walking.
I stopped when a small log cabin came into view. I shielded my eyes
with a gloved hand and stared at it.
A cabin way up here?
Why would anyone want to live this high up, away from everyone?
The cabin stood in a square, cleared-out area, surrounded by scraggly,
tilting pine trees. I didn’t see any car or sled. I didn’t see any boot-prints in
the snow.
I crept closer to the cabin.
The windows were steamed over. I couldn’t tell if there were lights on
inside or not.
I stepped closer, my heart pounding. I leaned my arms on a windowsill
and pressed my nose against the glass. But I couldn’t see in.
“Anyone home?” I called.
Silence. The wind whistled around the corner of the cabin.
I knocked on the door. “Hello?”
No reply.
“Weird,” I muttered.
I tried the door. I just pushed it lightly.
Maybe I shouldn’t have. But I did.
The door slid open.
I felt a rush of warm air from inside.
“Anyone home?” I called in.
I peeked beyond the door. Dark in there.
“Hello?”
I stepped inside. Just to take a look.
The snow had been so bright outside. My eyes adjusted slowly to the
dim light.
And before I could focus, I saw a white blur.
A growling white blur. It leaped on me.
Hot breath. Hot breath on my face.
And a snarling, white creature tackled me to the floor.
5
“Down! Down, Wolfbane!”
The snarling stopped instantly.
The creature backed off.
“Down, Wolfbane!” a man’s voice ordered sternly.
Gasping for breath, I wiped hot saliva off my face. And realized I was
staring up at a white-furred wolf.
The wolf was breathing hard, too, jaws open, tongue snaking down
nearly to the cabin floor. Its head was lowered as if preparing to attack
again. Its round, dark brown eyes locked on me suspiciously.
“Down, Wolfbane. It’s okay, boy.”
I rolled away from the panting creature and climbed to my knees. Two
hands reached down to grab my hands and tug me to my feet.
“Are you okay?” The man studied me with round, silver-gray eyes. He
was tall and thin, dressed all in denim. He had long, gray hair tied back in a
short ponytail. And a thick, pure-white beard.
His eyes glowed like steel marbles. I could almost feel them burning
into me.
“Is that… really a wolf?” I demanded.
He nodded, his expression stern, his eerie eyes not moving, not
blinking. “He won’t hurt you. Wolfbane is well trained.”
“But he—” My mouth suddenly felt so dry it was hard to talk.
“You startled us,” the man said, still not blinking, not looking away.
“We were in the back room.” He motioned toward a doorway in the back
wall.
“Sorry,” I murmured. “I didn’t know anyone was in here. I thought—”
“Who are you?” the man demanded angrily. He narrowed his silvery
eyes at me. Behind the bushy white beard, his slender face reddened.
“I didn’t mean to—”
“Who are you?” he repeated.
“I was taking a walk,” I struggled to explain. If only my heart weren’t
pounding so hard. If only my mouth weren’t so dry.
The white wolf uttered a low growl. It stood tensely, head lowered,
eyes locked on me, as if waiting for a command to attack.
“Why did you break into my house?” the man demanded, taking a step
toward me.
He’s dangerous, I realized.
There’s something very strange about him. Something very angry.
“I didn’t break in,” I started. “I just—”
“You broke into my house,” he insisted. “Don’t you realize how
dangerous that is? Wolfbane is trained to attack strangers.”
“S-sorry—!” I choked out.
He took another step toward me. He still hadn’t blinked those weird,
round eyes.
My chest tightened in fright.
What did he plan to do?
I didn’t want to find out.
I took a deep breath. Then I spun around—and ran out the door.
Could I get away?
6
Behind me, the door slammed hard against the cabin wall.
I glanced back—and saw him burst out of the cabin after me. “Where
are you going?” he cried. “Hey—stop! Where are you going?”
I pointed. “Up to the top!” I cried.
“No, you’re not!” he shouted back furiously. “You will not go up
there!”
He’s crazy! I realized.
He has no right to shout at me like that!
I can go anywhere I want to!
He’s crazy.
It had started to snow, large wet flakes, blowing hard in swirls of wind.
I brushed a snowflake from my forehead and ran to the road.
To my horror, the bearded man followed me, half-walking, halfrunning over the deep snow.
“Beware, the snowman!” he called.
“Huh?” I turned back to face him. “What did you say?” I cried
breathlessly.
The old rhyme flew through my mind for the second time that day…
When the snows blow wild
And the day grows old,
Beware, the snowman, my child.
Beware, the snowman.
He brings the cold.
I don’t believe this! I thought. I haven’t thought about that rhyme since
I was five. And now it has run through my mind twice in one day!
We stood staring at each other from opposite sides of the road. I saw
the man shiver. He wore only his denim workshirt, no coat. Big snowflakes
clung to his gray hair and his shoulders.
“What did you say?” I asked.
“The snowman lives in the ice cave,” he called, cupping his hands
around his mouth to be heard over the wind.
“Huh? A snowman?”
He’s really nuts! I decided. Why am I standing here listening to him?
The man lives in a cabin on a mountaintop all by himself except for a
white wolf! And now he’s yelling insane things about a snowman!
“Beware, the snowman!” he repeated. “You cannot go up to the top!
You cannot!”
“Why not?” I demanded. My voice came out higher and more shrill
than I had intended.
“You do not want to meet the snowman!” the man cried. The big
snowflakes covered his beard. His silvery eyes glowed eerily.
“If you meet the snowman,” he called, “you will never return!”
Totally nuts, I realized.
That’s why he lives all alone up here.
I spun away. I knew I had stayed too long.
Slipping and sliding, I ran through the deep snow.
Ran as fast as I could. Cold snowflakes slapping my hot face. Heart
pounding.
Down the road. Down the curving mountain road.
Panting… panting.
Was that me breathing so hard?
Were those my thudding footsteps?
No.
Glancing back, I saw the white wolf chasing me. Gaining fast.
Teeth bared. Head lowered to attack.
“Noooo!” I wailed. The big snowflakes stung my eyes as I ran. The
white ground tilted. I stumbled but kept running.
I suddenly felt as if I were trapped in one of those glass balls that
snows inside when you shake them.
I tumbled downhill. The snowflakes flew at me in all directions. The
whole mountainside seemed to quiver and shake.
The road! Where was the road?
I lost it in the falling snow. My boots sank into deep drifts.
But I kept running. Down… down.
The steady thud of the wolf’s heavy paws in my ears.
I glanced back and saw it gaining on me, moving rhythmically, easily
over the snowdrifts. Its teeth were bared. Puffs of steam rose from its open
mouth.
Running hard, I didn’t see the smooth rocks jutting up along the side
of the road.
My boot caught on one.
“Ohhhh!” I let out a cry as pain shot up my leg. I lost my balance.
Stumbled forward.
Landed hard on my stomach in the deep snow.
I gasped for breath. The fall knocked the wind out of me.
Scrambling to my knees, I watched helplessly as the white wolf closed
in on me.
7
To my surprise, the wolf stopped a few feet away.
It lowered its head and stared, breathing hard. Beneath the thick, white
fur, its chest heaved up and down. Snowflakes melted on its tongue.
Staring at it in fear, I pushed myself to my feet. I brushed my hair
back, and brushed snow off the front of my parka.
Was the wolf just catching its breath? Would it attack the moment I
tried to run?
“Go home, boy,” I whispered. “Go home.”
My voice barely carried over the wind and snow. The white wolf
stared up at me, still panting.
I started to back up. I was afraid to take my eyes off it.
I took one step back. Then another.
The wolf watched me but didn’t move.
My boots crunched onto the road. Yes! I had found the road! I kept
backing up.
The wolf stood taller. Lowered its tail. Tensed its back.
Its brown eyes followed me. Such human eyes.
What was it thinking? Why did it chase after me?
Was it just making sure that I went down the mountain? Did the
strange man send it to keep me from heading to the mountaintop?
I took another step back. Then another.
The wolf didn’t move.
The snow-covered road curved away. I kept backing up until I was out
of the creature’s sight.
“Whew!” I uttered a loud sigh of relief. Turned. And continued
walking fast toward the village and my new house.
Every few seconds, I glanced back. But the wolf didn’t follow me.
The snow came down hard. I pulled my parka hood over my hair. I
held it with both hands and started to trot along the road.
I wondered if Aunt Greta would be worried about me. I had been gone
a lot longer than I had planned.
Low snow clouds hid the sun. The sky became nearly as black as
night.
I started to pass houses on both sides of the road. I could see lights on
in some of them. One house had a blazing fire going in a fireplace. Black
smoke curled up from the chimney.
I passed one of the strange, scar-faced snowmen. His tree-limb arms
trembled in the wind. He appeared to be waving at me as I passed.
I broke into a run.
Another snowman greeted me as I rounded the next curve.
I hate this village! I thought.
It’s too weird. Too weird!
I’m never going to be happy here. Never!
Why did Aunt Greta bring us here?
A thudding sound behind me forced away my unhappy thoughts.
I’m being followed! I realized.
The wolf?
No. These heavy footsteps were different.
Human footsteps.
The crazy, bearded man—he followed me!
“Ohhh!” A frightened moan escaped my lips.
Taking a deep breath, I spun around to face him.
8
“Jaclyn—hi!”
I gasped—and stared through the falling snow at Rolonda. She jogged
across the road to me. Snowflakes dotted her black hair.
“You ran right past our house,” she said breathlessly, pointing to her
yard. “Didn’t you see us?”
I glanced over her shoulder and saw her brother, Eli, waving to me
from their driveway.
“No. I… uh… the snow was falling so hard, and—” I stammered.
“Are you okay?” Rolonda demanded.
“Well…” I hesitated. “A white wolf chased me,” I blurted out. “A
crazy man. He has a cabin near the top. His wolf chased me and he—”
“You ran into Conrad?” Rolonda cried.
“Huh? Conrad?” The wind blew my hood off my head. I squinted hard
at Rolonda. “Is that his name?”
She nodded. “He has a cabin that he built himself. And he keeps a
white wolf named Wolfbane. I meant to warn you before, Jaclyn—”
“Warn me?” I interrupted.
“Yeah. To stay away from him. He and that animal he keeps—they’re
both really strange.”
“Tell me about it!” I groaned. I rolled my eyes. “Is that why you and
Eli never go up to the mountaintop?”
Rolonda lowered her eyes. “Well… it’s one of the reasons.”
I waited for her to go on. But she didn’t. She continued to stare down
at the snow. She kicked a clump of wet snow off one boot with the other.
Behind her, Eli stood watching us, his hands jammed into his coat pockets.
“Well, why does Conrad live up there so far away from everyone?” I
demanded.
Rolonda hesitated. She glanced back tensely at her brother. “No one
knows for sure,” she answered finally. “He—maybe he works for the
snowman. I mean…” Her voice trailed off.
“Excuse me?” I cried. I was sure I hadn’t heard her correctly. “What
did you say, Rolonda? He works for the snowman? What do you mean?
What does that mean?”
She didn’t answer. Again, she glanced back nervously at Eli.
“Come on, Rolonda. What do you mean?” I insisted. “What do you
mean, he works for the snowman?”
She backed away, brushing snowflakes from her hair. “I’ve got to go
inside,” she said. “It’s almost dinnertime.”
I followed after her. “But first you have to explain,” I demanded.
“I can’t,” she whispered. “Because of Eli. He’s too frightened.”
“But, Rolonda—” I started. I saw Eli watching us intently from the
driveway.
“Go home,” Rolonda snapped. “Just go home, Jaclyn.”
“Not until you tell me what you meant.” I can be stubborn when I want
to be.
“Okay, okay,” she whispered, glancing over her shoulder at Eli. “Meet
me tomorrow night, okay? Meet me tomorrow night at the church—and I’ll
tell you everything.”
9
“Hi—I’m back!”
I burst into the house. Aunt Greta was bending over a carton in the
small kitchen, pulling out coffee mugs and placing them in a cabinet. She
spun around as I walked in.
“Is it snowing?” she asked.
I nodded my head furiously, tossing snowflakes from my hair. “The
biggest flakes I ever saw,” I replied breathlessly.
Aunt Greta frowned. “I’ve been so busy in here, I didn’t even look out
the window.”
I pulled off my coat and carried it to the front closet. But there were no
hangers in the closet yet. So I tossed the wet coat on top of a stack of
cartons.
Then I walked back into the kitchen, rubbing the sleeves of my
sweater. “Aunt Greta, do you know anything about a snowman?” I asked.
I heard her gasp.
But when she turned to me, her face was a blank. “Snowman?”
“Do you know anything about a snowman on top of the mountain?” I
asked.
Aunt Greta bit her bottom lip. “No. No, I don’t, Jaclyn.” Her voice
trembled. Why did she look so tense?
She bent down to pull more mugs from the carton. I crossed the room
to help her unpack them.
“Someone told me I shouldn’t go to the top of the mountain because of
a snowman,” I told her. “A snowman who lives up there.”
Aunt Greta didn’t say anything. She handed me two mugs. I lifted
them onto the cabinet shelf.
“This man told me that if I met the snowman up there, I would never
return,” I continued.
My aunt let out a short, dry laugh. “Village superstition,” she muttered.
I squinted at her. “Really?”
“Of course,” she replied. “These tiny villages all have their scary
stories. Someone was just having fun, giving you a little scare.”
“Fun?” I frowned. “I don’t think so.”
That weird, white-bearded guy, Conrad, had screamed at me that I
couldn’t go up to the mountaintop. He wasn’t joking. I knew he wasn’t
joking.
He was serious. He was threatening me. He wasn’t having a little fun.
No way.
“Aunt Greta, do you remember a rhyme about a snowman?” I asked.
She straightened up and stretched, pushing her hands against her back.
“Rhyme?”
“I remembered a rhyme today. From when I was little. It just popped
into my head.”
Aunt Greta chewed her lip again fretfully. “I don’t think I remember
any rhyme,” she said. She glanced away, avoiding my eyes.
“I only remember the first verse,” I told her. And then I recited it:
“When the snows blow wild
And the day grows old,
Beware, the snowman, my child.
Beware, the snowman.
He brings the cold.”
When I finished, I looked up to find the strangest expression on Aunt
Greta’s face. Her eyes had gone all watery. And her chin trembled. Her
cheeks were even paler than usual.
“Aunt Greta—are you okay?” I asked. “What’s wrong?”
“Nothing,” she replied sharply, turning her face away from me.
“Nothing at all, Jaclyn. But I don’t remember that rhyme. I don’t think I’ve
ever heard it before.”
She fiddled nervously with her long, white braid.
“Are you sure?” I asked timidly.
“Of course I’m sure,” she snapped. “Now, come on. Help me finish up
in here so I can begin dinner.”
What is wrong? I wondered. Why is she suddenly angry at me?
And why do I have the feeling that she isn’t telling the truth?
Aunt Greta has never lied to me before.
Why is she acting so strange now?
10
I couldn’t sleep that night.
My new bed felt hard. I kept imagining that the low ceiling was
sinking, dropping down on me.
The snow clouds had drifted away, and a half moon appeared, low in
the sky. The moonlight washed in through my round window, casting long,
shifting shadows over my room.
I shuddered under my quilt. It was all so new and strange. I wondered
if I’d ever be able to sleep up here.
I shut my eyes and tried to think nice, soothing thoughts. I pictured my
friends back in Chicago. I called up their faces one by one. I wondered what
they were all doing today while I was having my frightening adventure on
the mountain.
I wondered if they missed me.
I had just about fallen asleep when the howls began.
Wolf howls?
I climbed out of bed and made my way to the window. Down below,
the moonlight made the snow sparkle, almost as bright as during the day.
Bushes trembled in a soft breeze. The wind carried another frightening
howl. I raised my eyes to the mountain. But I could see only houses, dark
and silent, and the silvery road that curved its way to the top.
My whole body tingled. I knew I couldn’t fall asleep. It was chilly up
here in my little attic room, and the air felt heavy and damp.
I decided to take a walk. Maybe it will help me relax, I told myself.
I pulled on a pair of jeans and a sweatshirt. Then I crept downstairs—
careful not to wake Aunt Greta—and found my parka and boots.
Stepping out into the night, I silently closed the front door behind me.
My eyes swept over the glittering snow of the small front yard.
I made my way to the road, my breath streaming up in wisps of fog.
“Wow!” I murmured. “Wow!”
The cold, fresh air felt so good on my face.
The wind had stopped. The whole world seemed still and silent.
No cars, I realized. No horns honking. No buses roaring past. No
people laughing and shouting on the street.
I’m all alone out here, I told myself. The whole world is mine.
A long, frightening howl brought me out of my crazy thoughts.
I shivered and raised my eyes to the mountaintop. Was the white wolf
howling up there? Did it howl like that every night?
Why did the howls sound so human?
I took a deep breath of cold air and held it. Then I began walking
slowly along the road. My boots crunched on the hard, crusty snow. I
passed a few houses and kept walking.
I stopped as a shadow slid over my path.
11
I gasped. At first, I thought someone was following me.
But then I realized I was staring at a long shadow of a snowman. The
shadow tilted over the road. The tree branch arms, one raised, one out to the
side, appeared long and menacing.
I stepped over the shadow and crossed the street. But another shadow
fell over me.
Another snowman. An identical snowman.
The shadows of the strange snowmen fell over each other. I suddenly
felt as if I were walking in a black-and-white world of shadowy heads,
fluttering scarves, and sticklike arms—all saluting, all waving.
Why were there so many of them?
Why did the people in this village build them all alike?
Another howl made me raise my eyes from the crisscrossing shadows
over the snow. This howl sounded closer. And it definitely sounded human!
A chill ran down my back.
I turned. Time to head home, I decided.
My heart was pounding now. The howl—so near—had really
frightened me.
I started to walk fast, swinging my arms as I walked, leaning into the
gusting wind.
But I stopped when I saw the scarfaced snowman in the driveway up
ahead.
And I gasped when it nodded its head at me.
“Noooo!” A low cry escaped my lips.
It nodded. The snowman nodded!
Then the head rolled to the ground. And cracked apart with a soft thud.
And I realized the wind had made its head nod. The wind had blown
the scarred head off the body.
What am I doing out here? I asked myself. It’s late and it’s cold.
And it’s weird.
And some kind of creature nearby is howling its head off.
I gazed across the yard at the headless snowman. The head was a
shattered clump of white at the snowman’s base. But the scarf had remained
on top of the round body. It flapped in a gust of cold wind.
I felt another shiver. I turned and ran toward home.
Ran through the blue-black shadows of snowmen. My boots crunched
over the shadows of their waving arms, their scarred heads.
A snowman in each yard. Snowmen lining the street like night
watchmen.
This walk was a crazy idea, I thought, feeling panic tighten my chest. I
want to be home now. I want to be back in the safety of my new home.
A snowman waved its three-fingered limb at me and sneered its coaldark sneer as I ran past. And as I scrambled for home, the rhyme forced its
way back into my mind….
“When the snows blow wild
And the day grows old,
Beware, the snowman, my child.
Beware, the snowman.
He brings the cold.”
My house came into view down the road. I sucked in a deep breath and
ran harder.
The old rhyme had been haunting me ever since I arrived in the
village. The old rhyme had followed me from my childhood, followed me
to my strange, new home.
Why did I suddenly remember it today?
What was it trying to tell me? Why had the cold words returned after
being forgotten for so many years?
I had to find the rest of it. I had to find the second verse of the poem.
An eerie howl, rising like an ambulance siren, sounded so close behind
me I spun around.
I searched the road and the frozen yards. No one there. No wolf. No
human.
Another howl sounded even closer.
Was someone following me?
I held my hands over my ears to keep out the frightening sounds—and
I flew over the snow, flew the rest of the way home.
I reached the narrow front door as another long howl sent a chill down
my body.
Closer. It’s so close, I realized.
Someone is following me!
I grabbed the doorknob. Twisted it. Pushed.
No!
The door didn’t budge.
I twisted again. This way. The other way.
Pushed the door. Pulled it.
Locked.
I had locked myself out!
12
Another frightening howl.
So close. From the side of my house!
My whole body trembled. Panic tightened my throat. I stumbled back
from the front door.
And saw that the front window—the only window on this side of the
house—was open a crack. Snow streaked the windowpanes and clumped on
the narrow sill.
I stared at the tiny opening at the window bottom.
Then I sucked in a deep breath—and hurtled to the window.
I grabbed the snowy wooden frame. Uttering a loud groan, I pushed.
Pushed up with all my strength.
To my surprise, the window slid up easily.
I pushed it all the way up. Then I grabbed the sill with both hands. I
hoisted myself up, up—as another howl rang through the night air.
So close.
So close and frightening.
I tumbled headfirst into the house. Landed hard on my hands and
knees on the wooden floor.
With a gasp, I scrambled to my feet. Grabbed the window and pulled it
shut.
Then I stood, leaning against the wall, listening. Waiting to catch my
breath.
Had I awakened Aunt Greta?
No. The house stood dark and silent. The only sound I could hear was
my rapid, shallow breathing.
Another howl, distant this time.
Had I only imagined that I was being followed? Were the terrifying
howls rolling down from the mountaintop, carried by the wind?
Still breathing hard, I stepped away from the front wall. Making my
way slowly through the darkness, I headed to the little back room where we
had piled all of the packing cartons.
My books were still stuffed in one of the cartons.
I was sure that I had packed the old poetry book Mom used to read to
me.
White moonlight flooded in from the window against the back wall. I
found the book carton on top of a stack and pulled it down to the floor.
My hands trembled as I struggled to pull off the heavy packing tape
and open the box.
I have to find that poem, I told myself. I have to read the second verse
of that rhyme.
I tugged open the carton and began pulling out books. I had packed a
bunch of paperbacks on the top. Underneath them, I found some textbooks
and anthologies I had used at school.
As I pulled them out and stacked them carefully on the floor, I heard a
cough.
And then a footstep.
Someone else is in here! I realized.
“Aunt Greta? Is that you?” I cried.
But the voice that replied wasn’t Aunt Greta’s.
“What are you doing?” a strange voice demanded in a raspy whisper.
13
The ceiling light flashed on.
I blinked.
Swallowed hard.
And stared up at Aunt Greta.
“You frightened me, Jaclyn!” she croaked.
I jumped to my feet. “You frightened me, too!” I replied, waiting for
my heart to stop pounding. “What happened to your voice?”
Aunt Greta rubbed her pale throat. “I’ve lost it,” she rasped. “Horrible
sore throat. It must be the cold. I’m not used to the cold of this village yet.”
Her straight, white hair hung loose behind her. She tugged it off the
collar of her flannel nightshirt, brushing out tangles with one hand. “What
are you doing, Jaclyn? Why are you down here in the middle of the night?”
she croaked.
“That old poem,” I replied. “I want to find it. I can’t remember the
second verse. I—”
“We’ll unpack the books tomorrow,” she cut in.
She yawned. “I’m so tired. And my throat hurts so badly. Let’s try to
get some sleep.”
She suddenly appeared so tiny and frail.
“I’m sorry,” I said, following her from the room. “I didn’t mean to
wake you up. I couldn’t sleep, so…”
Her eyes fell on my parka, which I had tossed onto a living room chair.
“You went out?” she cried, spinning to face me. I could see alarm on her
face.
“Well… yes,” I confessed. “I thought maybe a short walk…”
“You shouldn’t go out in the middle of the night,” she scolded. She
rubbed her sore throat. Her eyes narrowed at me.
“Sorry,” I muttered. “What’s the big deal, anyway? What’s so terrible
about going out at night?”
She hesitated, chewing her lower lip the way she always does when
she’s thinking hard. “It’s just dangerous. That’s all,” she whispered finally.
“What if you fell in the snow or something? What if you broke your leg?
There is no one outside to help you.”
“I’d roll home!” I joked. I laughed but she didn’t join in.
I had the strong feeling she had something else on her mind. She
wasn’t worried about me falling down. She was worried about something
else.
But she didn’t want to say it.
Did it have anything to do with the animal howls?
Did it have something to do with the snowman on the mountain that
Conrad had warned me about? The snowman that Aunt Greta said was just
a village superstition?
I yawned. I finally felt sleepy. Too sleepy to think any more about
these questions.
I put my arm around Aunt Greta’s slender shoulders and walked her
across the hall to her room. “Sorry I woke you,” I whispered. Then I said
good night and climbed the ladder to my attic bedroom.
Yawning, I pulled off my jeans and sweatshirt and tossed them on the
floor. Then I jumped into bed and pulled the quilt up to my chin.
Pale moonlight washed in from the round window at the other end of
the room. I shut my eyes. No howls outside. No sounds at all.
I snuggled my head into my soft pillow. My new bed still felt hard. But
I was too tired to care.
I had just about drifted off to sleep when the whispered words floated
into the room….
“Beware, the snowman, Jaclyn…. Beware, the snowman….”
14
I sat straight up with a gasp. “Huh? Who’s there?” I choked out.
I stared across the room at the window. The unfamiliar shapes of my
furniture appeared silvery, ghostlike in the white moonlight.
“Beware, the snowman…” the whispered words were repeated.
“Jaclyn, beware, the snowman.”
“Who are you?” I cried. “How do you know my name?”
Sitting up in the strange bed, I grabbed the end of the quilt, gripping it
tightly in both hands, squeezing it.
And I listened.
Silence now.
“Who are you?” My cry so tiny and shrill.
Silence.
“Who are you?”
Silence…
I don’t know how long I sat there, waiting for a reply. But after a
while, I somehow drifted off to sleep.
The next morning I told Aunt Greta about the whispered warning.
She sipped her coffee before replying. Then she reached across the
table and squeezed my hand. “I had bad dreams, too, last night,” she said,
still whispering because of her sore throat.
“Dream?” I replied. “Do you think it was a dream?”
Aunt Greta nodded and took another long sip of coffee. “Of course,”
she croaked.
I spent the day helping my aunt unpack the cartons and arrange our
new house. I searched every carton for the poetry book, but I couldn’t find
it. I didn’t realize how much stuff we had brought from our apartment in
Chicago. Such a small house. It was a real struggle to find a place for
everything.
As we worked, I found myself thinking about Rolonda. She had
promised to meet me at the little village church after dinner. She said she
would tell me the truth about the snowman tonight.
The truth…
I pictured her brother Eli’s frightened expression as he stood in the
snowy driveway, watching Rolonda and me. And I remembered how
frightened they became when I told them I was walking to the mountaintop.
So much fear here in this village. Was it all because of silly
superstitions?
After I washed and dried the dinner dishes, I pulled on my parka and
my boots and prepared to meet Rolonda. I told Aunt Greta the truth. I told
her I was meeting a village girl my age I’d met during my walk.
“It’s snowing really hard,” Aunt Greta said in her raspy whisper.
“Don’t stay out late, Jaclyn.”
I promised I’d be home before nine. Then I pulled up my hood, tugged
on my gloves, and stepped outside.
Does it snow here every day? I asked myself, shaking my head.
I’ve always liked snow. But enough already!
The snow came down hard, in sheets driven by a strong wind. I
lowered my head and trudged down the road toward the church. Snowflakes
blew into my face and stung my eyes. I could barely see.
What a blizzard!
I wondered if Rolonda would show up.
The little stone church stood across from the post office. It wasn’t far
down the road from my house. But walking into the blowing snow, it
seemed miles away.
Keeping my head down, I stepped into a deep drift. Cold snow
dropped into my boot, soaking my sock. “Ohhh.” I let out a shuddering
groan. “I’m going to freeze!” I cried out loud.
There was no one around to hear me. The road stood empty. Nothing
moved. I passed a brightly-lit house, but I couldn’t see anyone inside.
The snow blew against my face, my coat, as if trying to push me back.
As if trying to make me turn around.
“This is crazy,” I murmured. “Crazy. No way Rolonda will meet me
tonight.”
Squinting into the gray evening light, I saw the steeple of the church,
white against the falling snow. “I hope it’s open,” I said out loud.
Ducking my head, I ran across the road—and thudded into something
hard. And very cold.
Evil black eyes glared into mine.
And I started to scream.
15
A second later, hands jerked me away.
And a voice cried, “Jaclyn—what’s wrong?”
My scream caught in my throat. I stumbled back, my boots slipping in
the slick, wet snow.
I turned to see Rolonda, tugging on my coat sleeve. “I saw you run
right into that snowman,” she said. “But why did you scream?”
“I—I—” I sputtered. I squinted through the falling snow at the
snowman, at his dark eyes, at the scar down his round face. “I—I just
freaked,” I stammered.
I scolded myself for acting so stupid. Now Rolonda must think I’m a
real jerk, I thought unhappily.
What is wrong with me, anyway? Screaming because I bumped into a
snowman!
“Why did someone build a snowman like that in front of the church?”
I asked.
Rolonda didn’t reply. Her dark eyes peered into mine. “Are you
okay?” she asked.
I nodded. “Yeah. Fine. Let’s get out of this snow.”
I took one last glance at the sneering snowman. Then I followed
Rolonda to a wooden door on the side of the small church. We stepped
inside and stamped the snow off our boots on a straw mat.
“Does it ever stop snowing here?” I grumbled, pulling back my hood
and unzipping my parka.
“Sure. It stopped once for ten minutes. We all took a summer
vacation!” Rolonda joked. She shook out her long, black hair.
I glanced around. We were in some kind of waiting room. A long
wooden bench stood against the back wall. Two lights shaped like oldfashioned gas lamps hung on the wall beside the bench, giving off a soft
glow.
We dropped our coats beside the bench and sat down. I rubbed my
hands, trying to warm them. My cheeks burned.
“It’s nice and warm in here,” Rolonda said, keeping her voice low.
“The pastor keeps the heat up really high. He doesn’t like to be cold.”
“Who does?” I murmured, rubbing my ears, trying to return some
feeling to them.
“It’s a nice, quiet place to talk,” Rolonda continued. “Especially to talk
about things that are… kind of scary.”
“Scary?” I replied.
She glanced around the small, white-walled room. She suddenly
seemed tense. Uncomfortable.
“Did your aunt tell you anything about the village?” Rolonda
whispered. “Anything about the history of the village?”
I had to lean closer to hear her. She was whispering so softly.
Why is she so nervous? I wondered. We’re the only ones in the entire
church.
“No,” I replied. “Not a thing. I really don’t think Aunt Greta knows
much about this village at all.”
“Then why did you move here?” Rolonda demanded.
I shrugged. “Beats me. Aunt Greta never explained. She said it was
time for us to leave Chicago.”
Rolonda leaned forward tensely and brought her face close to mine.
“I’ll tell you the story,” she whispered. “The history of this village is very
strange. People don’t talk about it much.”
“Why not?” I interrupted.
“Because it’s so frightening,” Rolonda replied. “My brother, Eli, is
terrified all the time. That’s why I met you here at the church. He doesn’t
like for me to talk about any of this. He doesn’t like for me to talk about the
snowman.”
“Snowman?” I demanded. I stared at her eagerly. “What about the
snowman?”
16
Rolonda shifted her weight. The wooden bench creaked beneath us. She
took a deep breath and began her story.
“Years ago, two sorcerers lived in this village. A man and a woman.
Everyone knew they were sorcerers. But everyone left them alone.”
“Were they evil sorcerers?” I interrupted.
Rolonda shook her head. “No. I don’t think they were evil. At least, I
don’t think they meant to be.”
She glanced around the room again. I settled back against the bench
and waited impatiently for her to continue.
“One day, the two sorcerers were fooling around, having fun. They
cast a spell on a snowman. And the snowman came to life.”
I gasped. “Really?”
Rolonda narrowed her eyes at me. “Please, don’t interrupt, Jaclyn.
Please let me tell the whole story first.”
I apologized.
Leaning close to me, she continued her story in a whisper.
“The sorcerers used their magic to bring the snowman to life. But then
they lost control of it.
“The snowman was powerful. And it was evil. The sorcerers had given
it life. But they didn’t really know what they were doing. And they didn’t
know that the snowman would try to destroy the village and everyone in it.
“The sorcerers tried to use magic to put the snowman back to sleep.
But their magic wasn’t powerful enough.
“The villagers all gathered together. Somehow they managed to force
the snowman up to the top of the mountain.
“There is a big cave at the very top of the mountain. The cave is cut in
ice. Everyone calls it the ice cave.
“The villagers chased the evil snowman into the ice cave. Then most
people moved away from the village. Few people wanted to stay, knowing
that the evil creature was alive at the top of the mountain.
“So most people left,” Rolonda continued, whispering so softly I could
barely hear her. “The two sorcerers probably left, too. No one really knows
what happened to them.
“And that’s when Conrad comes into the story,” Rolonda said.
I stared at her. “Conrad? The weird guy with the white beard?”
Rolonda nodded. “After the evil snowman was chased into the ice
cave, Conrad moved up there. He built a cabin just beneath the ice cave. No
one could figure out why.
“Is Conrad trying to protect the town?” Rolonda continued. “Does he
work for the snowman? Does he help the snowman? Or does he think that
living so close to the evil snowman will keep him safe?
“No one knows. Conrad very seldom comes down from the
mountaintop. And when he does come into the village, he doesn’t talk to
anyone.
“No one knows for sure who he is or why he stays up there,” Rolonda
continued. “No one has anything to do with Conrad. We don’t know if he’s
crazy or evil.”
She sighed. Once again, her eyes darted around the room. She seemed
so nervous, as if she didn’t want anyone else to know that she was telling
me the history of the village.
“Some nights,” she continued, “we can hear the snowman up there on
top of the mountain. Some nights we can hear him roaring and bellowing
with rage. Some nights, we can hear him howling, howling like a wolf.
“We’ve all built snowmen. Snowmen that look like him. Everyone in
the village builds them.”
I jumped to my feet. “So that’s why I see those weird snowmen
everywhere!” I cried.
Rolonda raised a finger to her lips. She motioned for me to sit back
down.
I dropped back onto the bench. “Why do you build the snowmen?” I
demanded. “Why is there one in just about every single yard?”
“To honor him,” Rolonda replied.
“Huh? Honor him?” I cried.
“You know what I mean,” she said sharply. “People hope that if the
evil snowman comes down from the ice cave, he’ll see the little snowmen
that look like him. It will make him happy and keep him from doing any
harm.”
Rolonda squeezed my hand. Her dark eyes burned into mine. “Now do
you understand?” she whispered. “Now do you understand why we’re all so
afraid?”
I stared back at her—and burst out laughing.
17
I shouldn’t have laughed. But I just couldn’t help it.
I mean, Rolonda seemed like a really smart girl. She couldn’t really
believe that story—could she?
It’s a joke, I decided. A story the villagers tell to scare people who
move here.
I stopped laughing when I saw the startled expression on Rolonda’s
face. “Hey, come on,” I said. “You’re kidding—right?”
She shook her head solemnly. Her dark eyes glowed in the dim light.
Such serious eyes.
“You don’t really believe that a snowman can walk, do you?” I
demanded. My voice echoed shrilly in the small room. “You don’t really
believe that a snowman can be alive!”
“I believe it,” Rolonda replied in a low, trembling voice. “It’s not a
joke, Jaclyn. I believe it. And everyone in the village believes it.”
I stared at her. The ceiling creaked, probably from the weight of the
snow on the roof. I shifted my weight on the hard wooden bench.
“But have you ever seen it?” I asked. “Have you ever seen the
snowman walk?”
She blinked. “Well… no,” she confessed. “But I’ve heard him late at
night, Jaclyn. I’ve heard his howls and his angry cries.”
She climbed to her feet. “I won’t go close enough to see him. I’m too
afraid,” she said. “I won’t go up to the ice cave. No one will.”
“But, Rolonda—” I started.
Then I stopped. Her chin trembled. I could see the fear in her eyes.
Just talking about the snowman had frightened her.
I wanted to tell her that the story couldn’t be true. I wanted to tell her
that it sounded like a silly superstition. A fairy tale.
But I didn’t want to insult her.
She might be my only friend here, I thought.
I stood up and pulled on my coat. Then the two of us made our way
out of the church.
The snow had stopped. But a gusting wind blew down from the
mountain. The wind made the fresh snow swirl and dance around our boots.
I pulled my hood over my hair and lowered my head into the wind. No
way I could ever believe such a wild story, I thought. Why doesn’t Rolonda
see how crazy it is?
We made our way up the road, our boots sinking into the powdery,
fresh snow. We didn’t talk. Our voices wouldn’t carry over the loud rush of
the wind.
I walked Rolonda home. We stopped at the bottom of her snowcovered driveway. “Thanks for telling me about the snowman,” I said.
Her eyes locked on mine. “You had to be told,” she said solemnly. And
then she added, “You’ve got to believe me, Jaclyn. It’s true. All of it.”
I didn’t reply. I said good night. Then I turned and, leaning into the
wind, headed for my house.
I was nearly there when I heard a sound over the roaring wind.
A heavy THUD THUD THUD coming up rapidly behind me.
18
I froze.
For a moment, I thought it was my imagination.
I pictured an enormous, evil snowman, as tall as a house, lumbering
after me.
“No!” I murmured. And spun around. And saw Rolonda’s brother, Eli,
running up to me.
His heavy workboots thudded over the snow. His sheepskin coat was
open, flapping out as he ran.
“Eli—it’s late!” I cried. “What are you doing out here?”
He didn’t reply. Breathing hard, his chest heaving up and down under
his sweater, he eyed me suspiciously.
“She told you—didn’t she?” he demanded breathlessly.
“Huh?” We moved behind a wide tree, out of the wind. “Eli—what is
your problem?” I demanded.
“Rolonda told you—didn’t she?” he repeated. “She told you about the
snowman.” He pointed toward the mountaintop.
“Well… yeah,” I replied. A clump of snow dropped from the tree onto
the front of my parka. I brushed it away.
“Eli, are you crazy? It’s freezing out here! Zip up your coat,” I
scolded.
“Rolonda doesn’t know one thing,” Eli continued, still breathing hard.
“She doesn’t know that I saw it. I saw the snowman.”
I stared at him. “You saw the snowman? You saw the living
snowman?”
Eli nodded. “Yes. I saw him. But that’s not the scary part.”
“Eli—what is the scary part?” I demanded.
19
He stared at me. The wind ruffled his dark hair, but his eyes remained
steady, hard.
“What is the scary part?” I repeated.
“The scary part,” Eli replied, “is that the snowman saw me!”
The wind howled around the tree. I dragged Eli to the side of the
nearest house. We pressed against the wall. Shivering, he finally zipped up
his coat.
“Eli—the story is crazy,” I insisted. “I really don’t think—”
“Just let me tell you what happened,” he pleaded. “Then you can
decide if it’s crazy or not.”
He shivered again. “It saw me, Jaclyn. The snowman stared at me. It
saw me. It knows who I am. It knows that I saw it. And that’s why I’m so
afraid of it.”
“But, Eli—” I started.
He raised a gloved hand to silence me. “Wait. Please.” He took a deep
breath. “It happened a few weeks ago. My two friends and I—we climbed
up the mountain. We wanted to see the ice cave. So we sneaked around
Conrad’s cabin.”
“I don’t get it,” I said. “What does Conrad have to do with it?”
“He won’t let anyone near the ice cave,” Eli replied. “He keeps
everyone away. Conrad is so weird. Some people think he works for the
snowman. He protects the snowman by keeping everyone from the village
away.”
“But you sneaked past Conrad?” I asked.
Eli nodded. “Yeah. My friends and I. And we climbed up close to the
ice cave. I had never seen the cave before.”
“What does it look like?” I asked.
Eli made a sweeping motion with both hands, outlining the shape of
the cave for me. “It’s a huge cave, cut into the side of the mountain,” he
said. “It’s made of ice. All smooth and shiny. It looks like glass.
“The cave entrance is wide and totally black. And it has huge icicles
hanging down all along the front. With points as sharp as knives.”
“Wow,” I murmured. “It sounds kind of pretty.”
“Yeah. In a way,” Eli agreed. “But we didn’t think it was pretty when
the snowman came out.”
I stared hard at Eli, studying his face. “You really saw a snowman
walking?” I demanded.
Eli nodded. “We heard a rumbling sound. The ground started to shake.
My friends and I got scared. We thought it was an earthquake or an
avalanche or something.
“My friends started to run down the mountain. But I stayed. And I saw
it. The snowman poked his head out of the cave. He was as big as a grizzly
bear. And he had a scar cut deep into his face.
“His eyes searched around. Then they stopped on me. And his mouth
opened in an angry roar. He—he—”
Eli took a deep breath. Then he started again. “The snowman stepped
out of the cave. The ground shook. It really did. Snow blew all over the
place.
“The snowman stared at me. And he roared again. And—and I took
off,” Eli continued breathlessly. “I ran past Conrad’s cabin. I ran all the way
down the mountain. And I never looked back.”
“What about your friends?” I asked.
“They were waiting for me down at the bottom,” Eli replied. “We just
went to our houses. We never talked about it.”
“Why not?” I demanded.
“Too afraid, I guess,” Eli said, glancing down. “We never talked about
it. We never mentioned it. I never even told Rolonda. It was just too
frightening to talk about.”
He raised his eyes to me. “But now I have dreams,” he confessed.
“Bad dreams about the snowman. Every night.”
I stared at him, unsure of what to say. His whole body was trembling.
From the cold? I wondered. Or from being so afraid?
He gazed back at me, waiting for me to say something. “Eli, you didn’t
tell Rolonda about this. Why are you telling me?” I asked.
“So you will believe the story,” he replied solemnly. “You’re new,
Jaclyn. You probably think it’s all silly. But you have to stay away from the
ice cave.”
“But, Eli—” I started.
“You didn’t believe my sister—did you!” he accused. “You didn’t
believe her story.”
“Well…” I hesitated.
“That’s why I waited for you,” he explained. “I waited to tell you my
story. Do you believe me, Jaclyn? Do you believe that I saw the snowman?”
“I—I don’t know,” I told him.
The wind swirled around the wall of the house. I felt my nose and
cheeks. My whole face was numb. “I’ve got to get home,” I said.
Eli grabbed my parka sleeve. “Jaclyn, don’t go up to the ice cave,” he
pleaded. “Please, believe my story. It’s true.”
I pulled my arm away. Then I started to jog over the snow toward my
house. “Go home, Eli,” I called back. “Go home before you freeze.”
I jogged all the way home. It felt good to run and not think about
anything.
Jogging on fresh, powdery snow was difficult. My boots kept slipping
on the slick, hard surface underneath. By the time I reached home, my legs
ached.
Breathing hard, I pushed open the front door. To my surprise, the
house was totally dark.
I pulled off a glove and squinted at my wrist-watch. Only nine o’clock.
Did Aunt Greta go to bed so early? She usually stays up until at least
midnight.
I clicked on the ceiling light and glanced around the small living room.
A magazine lay open on the couch. Nothing else was out of place.
Leaning against the front door, I pulled off my wet boots and stood
them in the corner. Then I tugged off my parka and dropped it onto the
couch.
My eyes stopped at the door to Aunt Greta’s bedroom.
The door stood open. Darkness beyond the door.
I quickly made my way across the room and peeked into my aunt’s
bedroom. “Aunt Greta?” I called softly.
No reply.
I stepped into the room. “Aunt Greta? Are you in here?”
I fumbled at the lamp on her dresser and finally managed to click it on.
“Aunt Greta—?”
No. Not in bed. Not in her room.
“Aunt Greta—are you home?” I called loudly.
I headed out of her room. “Ohh!” I cried out when I stepped in
something.
Something cold and wet soaked through my sock.
“Huh?” I lowered my gaze to see a wide puddle of cold water on the
bedroom floor.
“How did that get there?” I murmured.
I suddenly felt worried.
“Aunt Greta?” I called, hurrying back into the living room. “Aunt
Greta? Where are you?”
20
Panic swept over me.
Where could she be?
I started for the kitchen—when a rattling at the front door made me
stop.
Was someone breaking in?
I gasped as the door slowly creaked open.
And Aunt Greta came bustling in, brushing snow off her long, black
coat. She smiled at me. But her smile instantly died when she saw my
expression.
“Jaclyn—what’s wrong?”
“I—I—I—” I sputtered. “Aunt Greta—where were you? I got so
scared.”
She pulled off her coat. “Didn’t you see my note?”
“Huh? Note?”
“I left it for you on the refrigerator,” she said. “I met a nice couple this
morning at the general store. They came by and invited me over for dessert
and coffee.”
“Oh. That’s nice,” I choked out. My heart still pounded in my chest.
“Why did you get scared?” Aunt Greta demanded, hanging her coat in
the front closet. She straightened her long, white braid behind her sweater.
“Well, I was in your room. Looking for you. And I stepped in a cold
puddle on the floor,” I replied.
“Puddle? Show me,” Aunt Greta demanded.
I led the way to the bedroom and pointed to the wide wet spot on the
floor. Aunt Greta gazed up at the ceiling. “Maybe the roof leaks,” she
murmured. “We’ll have to examine it tomorrow morning.”
“I—I thought it was the snowman,” I blurted out. “I know it’s crazy,
but I thought he had been here. I thought he’d broken into the house and—”
I stopped when I saw the shock on my aunt’s face. Her mouth dropped
open and she uttered a silent gasp.
“Jaclyn—what are you talking about?” she demanded. “What have
your friends been telling you? More nonsense about a snowman?”
“Yes,” I confessed. “Rolonda and Eli, the two village kids I met. They
both told me a crazy story about a living snowman who stays in an ice cave
at the top of the mountain. They said—”
“It’s all superstition,” Aunt Greta interrupted. “It’s all old tales that
have been handed down. None of it is true. You’re smart enough to know
that, Jaclyn.”
“Yes,” I agreed. “But Rolonda and Eli seem so frightened. They really
believe the story. And Eli begged me not to go up to the ice cave.”
“Probably good advice,” Aunt Greta said. She crossed the room and
placed a hand tenderly on my shoulder. “You probably shouldn’t go up to
the mountaintop, dear,” she said softly.
“Why not?” I demanded.
“There must be some kind of real danger up there,” she replied. “Not a
living snowman. But something else dangerous.”
She sighed. “That’s how these old stories get started. Something bad
happened on the mountaintop. Then the story changed each time it was told.
Years later, no one remembers what really happened. And now everyone
believes a crazy story about a living snowman.”
She shook her head.
“Have you seen all the strange snowmen in this village?” I asked her.
“All the snowmen with scars on their faces and red scarves? Don’t you
think they’re spooky?”
“It’s a strange village tradition,” Aunt Greta confessed. “Very quaint. I
think they’re very interesting looking.”
“Interesting?” I frowned at her.
“Well, make me a promise,” she said, yawning.
“Promise?”
“Promise me you won’t go running up to the mountaintop to explore
the ice cave. It probably is a very dangerous place.”
“Well…” I hesitated.
“Promise,” Aunt Greta urged sternly.
“Okay. I promise,” I agreed, rolling my eyes.
But a few minutes later, I decided to break that promise.
I was lying in my attic bed, my eyes shut tight. Listening. Listening to
the strange howls from the mountaintop.
Were they animal? Were they human?
I hate mysteries. I have to know the answers to things.
I’m going up there, I decided.
I don’t care what I promised my aunt. I’m climbing up to the ice cave.
Tomorrow.
21
I didn’t dream of snowmen that night. I dreamed about fluffy white kittens
with sky-blue eyes. Dozens of them. The whitest kittens I ever saw.
They began climbing over one another. Silently at first. And then they
started to screech and hiss. A frightening, ugly sound.
Suddenly they all wore red scarves around their necks.
They clawed at each other, arching their pure white backs. Hissing and
screeching.
Until I woke up.
Yellow morning sunlight poured through the round window at the
other end of my bedroom. I could smell bacon frying downstairs. Aunt
Greta was already up and about.
I decided to climb the mountain right after breakfast. I didn’t want to
think about it anymore. I wanted to go up there and solve the mystery.
I knew that strange, white-bearded guy Conrad was a problem. If he
saw me, he’d try to stop me. He and his wolf.
But I had a plan to take care of Conrad.
If only Rolonda and Eli would help…
As it turned out, I didn’t get out of the house till after lunch. Aunt
Greta needed me to hang curtains with her. And then we put up the
paintings and posters she had brought from Chicago.
The house was tiny and cramped. But it was starting to feel a little
more like home.
“Where are you going?” Aunt Greta called as I pulled on my parka and
gloves and started out the door.
“Uh… nowhere really,” I lied. “Just going to hang out with Rolonda
and Eli.”
As I said their names, I saw them walking up my front yard.
I closed the front door behind me and hurried out to greet them. Eli
carried a snow shovel. Rolonda dragged two slender tree branches. She
dropped them at my feet.
“What’s that for?” I asked. “What are you guys doing here?”
“We have to build your snowman,” Rolonda replied solemnly.
“Excuse me?” I cried.
“You won’t be safe until you have a snowman in your yard,” Eli said.
“Listen, guys…” I started.
“The snow is very wet,” Rolonda reported.
“Good packing snow. It shouldn’t take long. Eli and I brought
everything we need.”
“But I don’t have time to build a snowman,” I protested. “I want to
climb up to the ice cave this morning.”
They both gasped. Eli gripped the shovel handle and gaped at me.
“You can’t—!” Eli cried.
“Jaclyn, I warned you—” Rolonda said.
“I have to see it for myself,” I told them. And then I added, “I want
you to come with me.”
“No!” Eli gasped.
Rolonda just shook her head. “You know we won’t go up to the ice
cave, Jaclyn. And we don’t want you to go, either.”
“But if we all go together…” I urged.
“No!” they both cried.
I could see real fear on their faces. Staring at them, I suddenly had an
idea.
“Okay, okay,” I said. “I’ll make a deal with you.”
They eyed me suspiciously. “What kind of deal?” Rolonda demanded.
“I’ll stay here and build the snowman—if you will help me when
we’re done,” I said.
“No. We won’t go with you,” Rolonda insisted. “You can’t get us to go
up to the ice cave, Jaclyn.”
“No deal,” Eli added sternly.
“You don’t have to go up to the ice cave,” I told them. “You just have
to keep Conrad busy so I can sneak past him.”
“Huh? How are we going to do that?” Eli asked, leaning on the shovel.
“We’ll think of something when we get up there,” I replied. “If you
can keep him talking to you, maybe I can sneak past and get up to the
cave.”
“But we don’t want you to go to the ice cave!” Rolonda insisted.
“I’m going to do it one way or the other,” I told her. “With or without
you. So are you going to help me or not?”
They glanced tensely at each other. Eli whispered something to his
sister. Rolonda whispered something back.
Then Rolonda turned to me. “Will you build the snowman first?” she
asked.
“You won’t be safe without the snowman,” Eli added.
I wanted to tell them that building a snowman wouldn’t protect me
against anything. I wanted to tell them how silly the whole thing was.
But I needed their help. I knew I could never get past Conrad and his
wolf without them.
“Okay. Fine. First, we’ll build the snowman,” I agreed.
“Then Eli and I will help you,” Rolonda promised.
“But we won’t go any farther than Conrad’s cabin,” Eli insisted in a
trembling voice.
“Great!” I replied. “Let’s get started.”
I bent down and started rolling a snowball for the snowman’s body.
Rolonda was right. It was good packing snow. I rolled the ball across my
snowy yard until it was big enough for two of us to roll. Rolonda and I
worked on the body. Eli worked on the snowball for the head.
Building one of the strange snowmen gave me a creepy feeling. I felt
as if I had become part of the superstition. I was taking part in some kind of
ancient village tradition. A tradition built on fear.
The people of the village all built these snowmen because they were
afraid. And now here I was, building one, too.
Should I be afraid? I wondered.
I felt glad when the snowman was finished. Rolonda pulled a red scarf
from her coat pocket, and we wrapped it under the scarred head.
The snowman’s dark eyes seemed to glare at me. The mouth was
turned down in an angry sneer. The arms bobbed softly in the wind.
“Okay. Good job,” I told my two new friends. “Now let’s get going.” I
motioned toward the mountaintop.
“Are you sure you want to do this?” Eli asked in a tiny voice.
“Sure, I’m sure!” I declared loudly.
But as we started making our way along the road, I didn’t feel as sure
as I pretended.
The road curved up the mountain. Soon the houses ended and we were
walking through snowy woods.
We didn’t talk. We kept our eyes straight ahead.
The afternoon sun was slowly lowering itself behind the trees. Blue
shadows stretched over the snow. The air grew colder as we climbed.
When Conrad’s low cabin came into view, my heart began to pound.
I tried to keep my mind calm and clear. But question after question
whirred through my brain.
Was Conrad inside the cabin?
Where was the white wolf?
Would my plan work?
22
All three of us stopped at the end of the road and stared at the cabin up
ahead. The late afternoon sun had fallen behind the trees. The snow
billowed in front of us in shades of gray.
To the left of the cabin, I saw a row of low evergreen shrubs, covered
in snow.
“I’ll hide behind those shrubs,” I told Rolonda and Eli. “You run up to
the cabin and keep Conrad and the wolf from seeing me.”
“This isn’t going to work,” Eli muttered, his eyes on the cabin.
“It’s getting kind of dark,” Rolonda fretted. “Maybe we should come
back in the morning.”
“Maybe we should forget the whole idea,” Eli suggested. I saw his
chin quiver. He shuddered.
“Hey—you promised!” I exclaimed. “A promise is a promise—right?”
They didn’t reply. They both stared across the gray snow at the dark
cabin up ahead.
“I came this far. I’m not going back,” I said sharply. “Are you going to
help me or not?”
I gasped when I heard a low growl from the cabin. The wolf must have
heard or smelled us.
I knew it would come running out any second.
“Come on!” I urged in a loud whisper. And I took off for the snowcovered shrubs.
I ducked out of view just as Conrad and the wolf burst out of the cabin.
“Hello!” Rolonda cried to Conrad.
“Hi!” Eli echoed.
I watched Rolonda and Eli go running up to Conrad.
The wolf lowered its head, watching them carefully.
I saw Rolonda and Eli, both talking at once, chattering with Conrad. I
couldn’t hear what they were saying.
They’re doing it! I told myself, my heart pounding. They’re keeping
his attention.
Time for me to move.
Time for me to make a run for it.
I could hear Rolonda talking to Conrad. I glanced over the top of the
bush. The wolf had its back to me.
Conrad was scratching his gray hair, listening to Rolonda. I couldn’t
see his expression. But I imagined he was very confused and surprised.
I knew he didn’t get any visitors.
He must be wondering what Rolonda and Eli were doing up here!
I forced all of these thoughts from my mind.
It was time for me to make a run for it.
I took a deep breath.
Then, still crouching, I began to run.
My legs felt like Jell-O. My boots sank into the deep snow.
Ducking my head, I darted up the steep mountainside.
Up, up.
I had just passed the bushes when I heard Conrad’s angry shout
—“Hey, wait!”
23
I stopped so suddenly, I fell over backward!
I landed hard. The snow seemed to fly up in my face, sweep over me,
surround me. Everything went white.
I’m caught, I realized.
My plan didn’t work.
I stood up and turned to face Conrad.
To my shock, he wasn’t coming after me. He and the wolf were
running downhill. Chasing after Rolonda and Eli.
I heard the wolf utter a high growl. Then they disappeared around a
curve.
I stood frozen in place, staring at the spot where they had just been.
Would Conrad harm Rolonda and Eli?
Should I run after them and try to help them?
No. I had to keep going.
This was the plan. This was my chance.
Taking another deep breath, I turned and started to run up the
mountainside. The climb was steep for a while. So steep I wasn’t sure I
could make it.
But then the ground leveled off. I found myself on a wide ledge. The
ledge was slick. My boots slipped on the ice.
I pressed my back against the mountain wall.
And gazed up at the ice cave.
Yes!
There it stood above me. A cave as tall as a building. Smooth and
glassy, it reflected the clouds in the sky above it.
I couldn’t see the entrance from here. I was staring at one of the sides.
The ledge narrowed as it curled up to the cave.
I kept my back pressed against the wall and slowly—step by step—
inched my way toward the top.
“Don’t look down!” I murmured out loud.
But as soon as I said it, I had to look.
It was a deep drop from the ledge to the ground far, far below.
If I slipped and fell…
I’m not going to slip and fall! I told myself.
A deep, rumbling sound made me jump!
I grabbed the mountainside with both hands to keep from falling.
The ledge trembled beneath me.
Another low rumble made me cry out in fear.
The ledge trembled again. The whole mountain seemed to shake!
The sound came from the cave.
Is something moving up there? I wondered.
Or is it the normal sound of a mountaintop in the wind?
I gathered my courage and moved forward. Inch by inch.
I had come this far. I refused to retreat now.
The ledge grew narrower, slipperier, as it curved around.
Another rumbling noise made me gasp.
Somehow I held on. And followed the ledge around.
It seemed to take forever. But then the cave opening came into view.
And after that, I saw the most terrifying sight of my life.
24
I didn’t see it at first.
First, I saw the layer of solid ice that covered the ledge. The glassy
cave rose up behind the ledge. The gaping entrance to the cave was blacker
than the darkest night.
I stood staring into the darkness. Trying to catch my breath. Trying to
slow my pounding heart.
Clouds reflected in the glassy ice drifted rapidly to the right. They
made the cave appear to move.
Sharply pointed icicles stabbed down from the roof of the cave
opening. They reminded me of sharpened teeth about to close.
I stared into the black cave opening and waited. Waited to see if
anything would appear.
I didn’t have to wait long.
A rumble as loud as thunder made the ledge quake.
Afraid I might slip off, I dropped to my knees.
The rumble grew to a roar.
And a tall, white figure lumbered out from the blackness of the cave
entrance. An enormous snowman!
I gasped—and stared in horror as the mountain of snow moved toward
me. “Nooooo!” I wailed.
I forgot where I was. Forgot I was perched on a narrow ice ledge.
And started to back up, to back away from the tall creature.
And I slipped.
Slipped off the ledge.
And felt myself fall.
25
My hands shot up.
Shot up and dug into the ledge.
I gripped the icy ledge. Held on. Held on.
With a terrified groan, I scrambled back up to safety. Trembling. My
entire body shaking. My breaths escaping in short, frantic gasps.
I huddled on my knees on the icy ledge and watched the snowman as it
glared down at me. Its blood-red scarf flapped in the wind. Its round, black
eyes were as big as doorknobs. Its dark mouth turned down in a fierce,
angry sneer.
And the scar. The scar cut deeply into the side of its round head, long
and curling, like a black snake.
“Ohhhhhh.” I uttered another moan as its tree branch arms reached for
me.
I shivered in a sudden, deep cold. A cold I’d never felt before. I could
see frozen waves floating from the snowman’s wide body.
And then the big, round head tilted. The black eyes bulged even wider.
And the snowman bellowed in a deep roar of a voice: “WHO ARE
YOU?”
I trembled in the waves of cold that floated off its body.
It talks!
The stories Rolonda and Eli told me are true. It’s all true.
Its round eyes locked on mine, the big snowman moved closer. Closer.
I wanted to stand up. I wanted to run.
But it had me frozen there.
I couldn’t stand. I couldn’t back up. I couldn’t escape from it.
“WHO ARE YOU?” the snowman bellowed again. And the whole
mountain shook.
“I—I—” My voice came out in a quivering squeak.
“Please—” I managed to choke out. “Please—I didn’t mean to bother
you. I—”
“WHO ARE YOU?” the huge snow creature thundered for the third
time.
“My name?” I squeaked. “My name is Jaclyn. Jaclyn DeForest.”
The snowman’s tree branch arms shot up. Its dark mouth gaped open
in surprise.
“SAY IT AGAIN,” it ordered.
I shivered in the waves of cold. “Jaclyn DeForest,” I repeated in my
tiny, frightened voice.
The snowman stared down at me in silence for a long while. It lowered
its arms to its round, white sides.
“DO YOU KNOW WHO I AM?” it demanded.
I swallowed hard. The question took me totally by surprise. I opened
my mouth to answer, but no sound came out.
“DO YOU KNOW WHO I AM?” the snowman thundered.
“No,” I squeaked. “Who are you?”
“I AM YOUR FATHER!” the snowman cried.
26
“Nooooooo!” A long wail escaped my throat.
I wanted to get away from there. I wanted to run. To slide down the
mountain. To fly away.
But I couldn’t move.
The snowman trapped me in his icy grip. Held me there on the ledge.
Froze me in wave after wave of cold.
“Jaclyn—I am your father,” the snowman repeated, lowering his
booming voice. He stared down at me with those frightening, round glassy
eyes. “Believe me.”
“Th-that’s impossible!” I stammered. I hugged myself, trying to stop
my body from trembling. “You’re a snowman! You can’t be my father!”
“Listen to me!” the snowman roared. “I am your father. Your mother
was a sorceress. And so is your aunt. Your aunt practices all sorts of
magic.”
“No—!” I protested. His lies made me gather my courage. I climbed to
my feet.
“That’s not true!” I cried angrily. “I’ve never seen Aunt Greta do any
magic. You’re lying!”
The snowman bobbed from side to side. The ledge shook beneath me.
I nearly lost my balance.
“I do not lie, Jaclyn,” he insisted. His arms raised up, as if he were
pleading with me. “I’m telling the truth.”
“But—but—” I sputtered.
“Your mother did this to me,” the snowman said. “She used her magic
and turned me into a snowman. You were two years old. She turned me into
a snowman. She tried to turn me back. But she failed. Then she and your
aunt Greta took you and ran away from the village.”
“Your story doesn’t make any sense!” I cried. “If what you say is true,
why did we move back here? Why did Aunt Greta bring us back to the
village?”
“Your aunt had a good reason for coming back,” the snowman
explained. “She knows that after ten years, the magic spell starts to fade.”
“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. My head felt frozen. It was hard
to think. I struggled to make sense of what he was telling me.
“After ten years, the spell fades,” the snowman repeated. “Your aunt
came back to renew the spell. She wants me to stay a snowman. She wants
to keep me prisoner up here forever. She wants to make sure I don’t tell the
world what happened to me. And she wants to keep you to herself!”
“Aunt Greta is not a sorceress!” I protested. “I’ve lived with her most
of my life. And I’ve never seen her do any kind of magic. She doesn’t—”
“PLEASE!” the snowman bellowed, raising a tree branch arm to
silence me. “There isn’t much time. I’m your father, Jaclyn. Your real
father. You’ve got to believe me.”
“But, I—I—” I didn’t know what to say. I couldn’t think straight. It
was all too… crazy.
“You can get me out of this,” the snowman pleaded. “You can save
me. But you’ve got to hurry. Your aunt Greta will renew the spell soon. If
you don’t save me, I’ll be a snowman for another ten years.”
“But what can I do?” I cried. “I’m not a sorceress. I can’t do magic.
What can I do?”
“You can save me,” the giant snow creature insisted. “But I cannot tell
you how.” He uttered a bitter sigh.
“If I tell you how to save me, it will only strengthen the spell,” he
continued. “You’ve got to figure it out for yourself.”
“Huh? But how?” I demanded.
“I can give you a hint,” the snowman replied. “I cannot tell you how to
save me. But I can give you a hint.”
“Okay,” I said softly. I hugged myself more tightly.
And I listened as, in his deep rumble of a voice, the snowman recited
the familiar rhyme:
“When the snows blow wild
And the day grows old,
Beware, the snowman, my child.
Beware, the snowman.
He brings the cold.”
I stared up at him in shock. “You—you know the poem!” I stammered.
“That is your clue,” the snowman said softly. “That is the only hint I
can give you. Now you must figure out how to rescue me.”
I already knew how to rescue him.
I knew instantly when he recited the old rhyme.
The second verse. The secret had to be in the second verse. The verse I
couldn’t remember.
“Please, Jaclyn.” The snowman gazed down at me, pleading. “Please.
Help me. I’m your father, Jaclyn. I’m really your father.”
I stared back at him. Trying to decide. Trying so hard to decide.
Should I believe him?
Should I help him?
27
Yes, I decided.
Yes. I’ll run home. I’ll find the old poetry book. And I’ll read the
second verse of the rhyme.
“I’m coming back!” I called up to the snowman. I spun away from
him, pulled myself out of his invisible, cold grip.
I started to run down the ledge. And gasped when I nearly ran into
Aunt Greta!
“Aunt Greta—!” I cried in shock.
“I tried to warn you!” she called to me. “I tried to scare you, Jaclyn. To
keep you from coming up here.”
So, it was Aunt Greta who whispered up to my room late at night, who
warned me to beware of the snowman!
Her dark eyes were wild. Her normally pale face was bright red! Her
long, black coat was open and flapped behind her in the wind.
She raised a large, black book in one hand above her head. “Jaclyn—is
this what you’re looking for?” she demanded shrilly.
“The poetry book?” I cried.
My aunt nodded. She held the book high above her.
“Aunt Greta—is it true?” I asked, glancing back at the huge snowman.
“Is he really my father?”
My aunt’s face twisted in surprise. “Huh? Your father?” she cried.
“What a lie! Is that what he told you? That he’s your father? It’s a lie. A
horrible lie!”
“NOOOOOO!” the snowman boomed.
I jumped. But Aunt Greta ignored the thunderous cry.
“It’s a lie, Jaclyn,” she repeated, glaring angrily at the snowman. “He
isn’t your father. He’s an evil monster!”
“NOOOOO!” the snowman bellowed again. The whole mountain
shook from his protest.
“Your mother and father were sorcerers,” Aunt Greta continued,
ignoring him. “They practiced their magic night and day. But they went too
far. They created him accidentally.”
Aunt Greta pointed to the snowman, her face bitter. “He’s an evil
monster,” she repeated through gritted teeth. “When your parents saw what
they had done, they were horrified. They froze the monster inside the
snowman body. Soon after, your father disappeared. Your mother and I took
you and ran from the village. We ran to be safe from the monster’s horrible
evil!”
“YOU ARE A LIAR!” the snowman raged. He waved his stick arms
wildly in the air. His scarf blew out at his sides like hawk wings. Wave after
wave of cold shot off his bulging body.
“Jaclyn, don’t believe her!” the snowman pleaded. “Save me—please!
I am your father.”
His arms reached out to me. “Please,” he begged. “I know it is hard for
you to believe. But your aunt is the evil one. She is a sorceress. She and
your mother and I—we were all sorcerers. I am not evil. I am not a monster.
Please—”
“Liar!” Aunt Greta shrieked. She gripped the big book angrily in both
hands, as if ready to throw it at him. “I know no magic!” Aunt Greta cried.
“I know no spells! I am not a sorceress!”
She opened the book and began frantically shuffling through the pages.
“I’m not a sorceress. But I brought this book because I know its secret. I
know what I need to do to make sure you stay frozen in that snowman body
forever!”
The snowman continued to reach out to me. “Jaclyn, save me. Save me
now,” he pleaded.
I turned from him to my aunt, then back to him.
Who should I believe?
Which one was telling the truth?
Suddenly, I had an idea.
28
I grabbed the open poetry book from my aunt’s hands.
“What are you doing?” she shrieked.
She moved quickly to wrestle it away from me.
We both tugged at it. The old pages tore and flew out. The heavy cover
cracked.
Aunt Greta made a desperate swipe at it.
But I pulled it away from her. Then I backed up against the wall of the
ice cave.
Aunt Greta took a step toward me. Then she gazed up at the snowman
and decided not to come that close to him.
“Jaclyn—you’re making a big mistake!” Aunt Greta warned.
Leaning against the smooth cave wall, I flipped frantically through the
pages of the old book. “I’m going to find the poem,” I told her. “I’m going
to read the second verse. It’s the only way to know the truth.”
“THANK YOU, DAUGHTER!” the snowman bellowed.
Aunt Greta uttered a wail of protest. “I’m telling you the truth,
Jaclyn!” she cried. “I have taken care of you all these years. I would not lie
to you.”
But I’d made up my mind.
I had to read the second verse. It was the only way I could find out
who was lying and who was telling the truth.
“He’s a monster!” Aunt Greta cried.
The snowman stood still and silent, watching me furiously shuffle
through the pages.
Where was that rhyme? Where?
I glanced up. “Aunt Greta—?”
She bent down and picked up a torn page from the snow. As her eyes
moved over the page, a smile spread over her face.
The wind blew her coat behind her. Her eyes were wild. The page
fluttered in her hand.
“Jaclyn, I can’t let you read the rhyme,” she said.
“You—you have it in your hand?” I cried.
“I can’t let you read it,” Aunt Greta repeated.
And tossed the page over the ledge.
29
I let out a shriek.
I watched the page float out over the ledge. I watched it fly up, then
start to drop.
It’s lost, I realized.
The second verse is lost forever.
The swirling wind will carry it down the mountain, down the steep
drop. It will never be seen again.
And then, I cried out again—as the wind carried the page up. Up. Back
up.
And into my hand!
I grabbed it out of the air.
I stared at it in amazement.
And before Aunt Greta could grab it back, I raised the page to my face
and started to read the second verse of the rhyme out loud:
“When the snows melt
And the warm sun is with thee,
Beware, the snowman—”
“Noooooo!” Aunt Greta wailed. She dove toward me. With a desperate
swipe, she pulled the page from my hand.
And ripped it to shreds.
The snowman uttered a horrified groan. He bent. Reached out to grab
Aunt Greta.
Too late.
The jagged strips of paper fluttered to the snow.
“Aunt Greta—why?” I choked out.
“I couldn’t let you do it,” she replied. “He’s a monster, Jaclyn. He’s
not your father. I couldn’t let you free him.”
“She’s lying,” the snowman insisted. “She does not want you to know
me, Jaclyn. She doesn’t want you to know your own father. She wants to
leave me trapped in this frozen cave forever.”
I turned back to my aunt. Her face had grown stern and hard. She
stared back at me coldly.
I took a deep breath. “Aunt Greta, I have to know the truth,” I told her.
“I’ve told you the truth,” she insisted.
“I have to know for myself,” I replied. “I—I saw the last line of the
poem. Before you grabbed it and tore it up. I know the whole poem, Aunt
Greta.”
“Don’t—” my aunt pleaded, reaching out to me.
But I backed up against the icy cave wall, and I recited the rhyme from
memory:
“When the snows melt
And the warm sun is with thee,
Beware, the snowman—
For the snowman shall go free!”
“No, Jaclyn! No! No! No!” Aunt Greta wailed. She pressed her hands
to the sides of her face and repeated her cry. “No! No! No!”
I turned to the snowman and saw him begin to melt.
The white snow oozed down his face and body like melting ice cream.
The black eyes dropped to the snow. The face melted, melted onto the
body. The snow poured off the round body. The tree branch arms thudded
heavily to the ground.
Slowly his real face came into view.
Slowly his body emerged from under the snow.
I stared as the snow dripped away.
And then I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror.
30
A monster!
An ugly, snarling, red-skinned monster stomped out from under the
oozing snow.
Aunt Greta had told the truth. A monster was trapped inside the
snowman. Not my father.
Not my father.
A monster… such a hideous monster!
Its head and body were covered with crusty red scales. Its yellow eyes
rolled wildly in its bull-shaped head. A purple tongue flapped from its
jagged-toothed mouth.
“No! No! No! No!” Aunt Greta chanted, still pressing both hands
against her face. Tears ran down her cheeks and over her hands.
“What have I done?” I wailed.
The monster tossed back its head in a throaty laugh. He picked the
poetry book off the snow in his scaly, three-fingered hands. And he heaved
it over the side of the mountain.
“You’re next!” he roared at me.
“No—please!” I begged.
I grabbed Aunt Greta by the shoulders and tugged her away from the
ledge. We pressed ourselves against the icy wall of the cave.
“Good-bye,” the monster grunted. “Good-bye, all.”
“But I saved you!” I pleaded. “Is that my reward? To be thrown over
the side of the mountain?”
The red-scaled beast nodded. An ugly grin revealed more jagged teeth.
“Yes. That is your reward.”
He picked me up in one powerful hand. Squeezing my waist.
Squeezing it so tightly I couldn’t breathe.
He picked Aunt Greta up in his other hand.
Raised us above his head.
Let out an ugly, raspy groan.
And held us over the side of the mountain.
31
His powerful hands swung us out over the cliff edge.
I peered down, down at the sheer drop, at the snowy ground that
appeared to be miles below.
To my surprise, the monster didn’t let go.
He swung around and dropped my aunt and me back onto the ledge.
“Huh?” I uttered a startled gasp.
The monster was staring down the ledge now. He had stopped paying
attention to Aunt Greta and me.
Struggling to catch my breath, I turned and followed his gaze.
And saw what had startled the monster. And saved my life.
A parade!
A parade of snowmen.
All of the snowmen of the village. They were marching up to the ice
cave in a single line.
Their red scarves waved in the wind. Their sticklike arms bobbed up
and down as they rumbled up the mountainside.
Like soldiers, they came marching up to us. Bouncing, thudding,
rumbling forward. All identical. All scarred and stern-faced and sneering.
“I—I don’t believe it!” I stammered. I grabbed Aunt Greta’s arm.
We stared at the marching snowmen in horror.
“They’re all coming to serve the monster,” Aunt Greta whispered.
“We’re doomed, Jaclyn. Doomed.”
32
The snowmen rumbled up the icy ledge. The steady thud thud thud grew
louder as they neared. The sound echoed off the snowy mountaintop until it
sounded as if a thousand snowmen were marching to attack us.
Aunt Greta and I shrank back against the glassy cave wall.
We had nowhere to run. The monster blocked the cave entrance. The
marching snowmen cut off any escape down the ledge.
Closer came the snowmen. Closer. Close enough to see the anger in
their round, black eyes. Close enough to see the snakelike scars cut into
their faces.
Aunt Greta and I couldn’t move. We raised our hands as if to shield
ourselves.
And then we gasped in surprise as the snowmen marched right past us.
They rumbled up to the monster. Bouncing fast. Thudding over the ice.
Arms waving, dark eyes glowing.
Bounced up to the startled monster. And pushed him. Pushed him
back.
The snowmen crushed up against him. One snowman. Then two. Then
ten.
They crushed against his scaly, red body. Pushing him back. Back.
The monster tossed its head in an angry roar.
But the roar was smothered as a snowman rolled over the monster’s
head.
Aunt Greta and I gasped in amazement as the snowmen swarmed over
the monster.
Pushed him back against the cave wall.
We saw the monster’s powerful arms flail the air, thrashing wildly.
Helplessly.
And then the monster disappeared behind a crush of snowmen.
The snowmen pushed forward. Pushed hard. Pushed silently.
Like a silent avalanche.
And when they finally stepped back, the monster stood frozen, arms
stretched out as if to attack. Not moving. Frozen inside the ice wall.
A prisoner.
The snowmen had pushed him into the wall. Trapped him inside the
glassy wall of ice.
Aunt Greta and I stood trembling beside the cave entrance. We were
still holding on to each other. My legs felt weak and rubbery. I could feel
Aunt Greta trembling beneath her coat.
“What brought all the snowmen up here?” I asked her. “Did you do it,
Aunt Greta?”
She shook her head, her eyes still wide with amazement. “I didn’t
bring them here, Jaclyn,” she said softly. “I told you the truth. I have no
magic. Your mother and father were sorcerers. But not me.”
“Then who made them climb the mountain to rescue us?” I demanded.
“I did!” a voice cried.
33
I turned to the ledge—and saw Conrad standing there. His gray hair blew
wildly in the wind. The white wolf stood at his side.
“You made the snowmen march?” I cried. “You are a sorcerer, too?”
Conrad nodded. He gazed at the monster trapped in the ice and a smile
spread over his face. “Yes. I sent them to rescue you,” he said.
Aunt Greta narrowed her eyes at Conrad. As she studied his face, her
mouth dropped open. “You!” Aunt Greta cried. “It’s you!”
Conrad’s smile grew even wider. “Yes,” he told my aunt.
“Who—who is he?” I demanded.
Aunt Greta turned to me and placed a hand on my shoulder. “Jaclyn,”
she said softly, “I moved back here because I thought he might still be here.
And yes, I was right. He is here.”
She squeezed my shoulder and smiled at me, tears welling in her eyes.
“Conrad is your father,” Aunt Greta whispered.
Conrad and I both cried out at the same time.
He rushed across the icy ledge and wrapped me in a hug. His long
beard scratched my face as he pressed his cheek against mine.
“I don’t believe it!” he cried, stepping back with tears in his eyes. “It’s
been so many years—I didn’t recognize you, Jaclyn. I’m so glad that Greta
brought you back to the village.”
“You—you’re really my father?” I stammered.
Conrad didn’t have a chance to answer. Rolonda and Eli came running
up to us. “Are you okay?” they cried.
Conrad pointed to Rolonda and Eli. “They saved your lives!” he told
Aunt Greta and me. “They told me that you planned to climb to the ice
cave. As soon as I heard that, I worked my magic. I sent the snowmen up to
rescue you.”
“Wow!” Eli exclaimed, seeing the monster frozen in the ice. “Look at
that!”
“That was the evil snowman,” Conrad explained to them. “He’ll never
threaten the village again.”
Rolonda and Eli stepped closer to view the frozen monster close up.
I turned to my father. “I don’t understand,” I said. “Why did you stay
behind in the village when Mom and Aunt Greta left? Why do you live up
here near the ice cave?”
He scratched his beard and sighed. “It’s kind of a long story. When
you were little, your mother and I were practicing powerful magic. Our
magic got out of control. We accidentally created this monster.”
He motioned to the monster and shook his head. “We froze the
monster inside the body of a snowman,” he explained. “Your mother—she
wanted to leave. She was so frightened and upset. She wanted to move as
far away from the village as she could. She wanted to forget it ever
happened.”
“And why did you stay?” I demanded.
“I stayed because I thought I owed it to the people of the village,” he
explained. “I owed it to them to keep the snowman in his cave. To keep him
from harming people.”
He uttered another sad sigh. “And so I stayed up here, close to the
monster we created. But… but… leaving you, Jaclyn, was the hardest thing
I ever had to do!”
He wrapped his arm around my shoulders. Again, his beard scratched
my face.
“I always dreamed that someday I could leave the mountain and go
find you,” he said softly. “And now the monster is dead. The horror is
finally over. And Greta has brought you back. Perhaps…”
His voice broke. He smiled at Aunt Greta and then at me. He took a
breath and tried again. “Perhaps… we can try to be a family again.”
He kept his arm around me as we turned to go down the mountain.
“Hey—!” I cried out as I saw the snowmen move to block our path.
In all the excitement of finding my father, I’d completely forgotten
about all the snowmen!
Now they circled us. Surrounded us.
Staring at us with their glowing coal eyes. Staring at us so coldly.
“Wh-what are they going to do?” I stammered.
Before my father could answer, one of the snowmen came thumping
out of the group. He rumbled up to us, arms twitching, eyes flashing.
I grabbed Dad’s arm. The snowmen had us totally surrounded.
Nowhere to move. No chance to run away.
The snowman stopped inches from my father—and opened his mouth
to speak.
“Can we go back down now?” the snowman asked. “It’s really cold up
here!”
Scanning, formatting and basic
proofing by Undead.
